[{"name": "B3GALT6-assoziiertes spEDS", "sub_name": "Ehlers-Danlos-Syndrom, spondylodysplastischer Typ, B3GALT6-assoziiert", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of spondylodysplastic Ehlers-Danlos syndrome due to variants in  and characterized by short stature, variable degrees of muscle hypotonia, joint hypermobility, especially of the hands, bowing of limbs and congenital or early onset, progressive kyphoscoliosis. Additional features include the typical craniofacial gestalt (prominent forehead, sparse hair, mid-face hypoplasia, blue sclerae, proptosis and abnormal dentition), hyperextensible, soft, thin, translucent and doughy skin, delayed motor and/or cognitive development, characteristic radiographic findings (spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia, platyspondyly, anterior beak of vertebral body, short ilia, elbow malalignment and generalized osteoporosis), joint contractures and ascending aortic aneurysm.", "synonyms": "B3GALT6-related spEDS, B3GALT6-related spondylodysplastic EDS, Beta3GalT6-deficient EDS, Ehlers-Danlos syndrome progeroid type 2, spEDS-B3GALT6, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q79.6", "omim": "615349", "epidemiology": "To date, 41 individuals with molecularly diagnosed B3GALT6-related spondylodysplastic EDS, have been reported.", "clinical_description": "The main features are short stature, variable degrees of muscle hypotonia, joint hypermobility, bowing of limbs and congenital or early onset, progressive kyphoscoliosis. Joint hypermobility, especially of the hands and feet, and soft, doughy and hyperextensible skin are some of the most striking characteristics. Facial dysmorphism includes prominent forehead, sparse hair, mid-face hypoplasia, blue sclerae, proptosis and abnormal dentition with discoloration of teeth. Most affected children present from infancy with delayed motor development and hypotonia; half of patients have delayed cognitive development. The majority of patients display severe kyphoscoliosis, which is usually congenital or early onset and progressive. Skeletal anomalies include platyspondyly, short iliac bones and elbow dislocation. Osteopenia has been frequently reported, usually in conjunction with fractures and luxations. Less frequent skeletal anomalies include cervical spine instability, pectus carinatum/excavatum, joint contractures, radioulnar synostosis, limited elbow extension, carpal synostosis, short metacarpals, ulnar deviation of fingers, oligodactyly, hip dysplasia, epiphyseal dysplasia of femoral heads, genu valgus, pes planus, talipes equinovarus, recurrent luxation of the toes and hallux valgus. Approximately one third of the patients have ophthalmological abnormalities, such as myopia, corneal opacity, sclerocornea, blue sclerae, microcornea, glaucoma, optic nerve atrophy and retinal detachment. Cardiovascular anomalies infrequently reported include mitral valve prolapse, aortic valve stenosis and aortic root aneurysm. Other less common features include urinary defects with nephroptosis, bilateral caliceal and ureteral dilatation, laryngeal cleft, tracheomalacia, spontaneous repeated pneumothoraces, chronic respiratory insufficiency, Wilms tumor, cryptorchidism, prominent superficial veins, hypoplastic nails. There are rare reports of sensorineural and conductive hearing loss and cleft palate.", "etiology": "The disorder is due to variants of the B3GALT6 gene (1p36.33), encoding for galactosyltransferase II. This gene is responsible for the synthesis of the linker region of proteoglycans, which are essential components of the extracellular matrix of connective tissues.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical examination, radiological studies and molecular findings.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasias (e.g due to KIF22 or EXOC6B), the other forms of spondylodysplastyic EDSs, as well as other genetic syndromes characterized by kyphoscoliosis, joint hypermobility, skin hyperextensibility and short stature.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible where a known pathogenic variant has previously been identified in a family member.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing variant) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Management requires a multidisciplinary approach. Musculoskeletal anomalies, in particular kyphoscoliosis, may require a precocious orthopedic intervention. Specific regular follow-up is recommended based on the patient's clinical manifestation. Rehabilitation therapies must be tailored to the patient's characteristics.", "prognosis": "Currently, data is limited with regard to life expectancy. Whilst four cases of death in infancy have been described, there are no known reasons to suspect reduced life expectancy. Functional consequences and quality of life depend on disease severity."}, {"name": "B4GALT1-CDG", "german_description": "Die Kongenitalen Glykosylierungs-Defekt (CDG)-Syndrome sind eine Gruppe von autosomal-rezessiv vererbten Krankheiten mit gest\u00f6rter Synthese von Glykoproteinen. Das CDG-Syndrom Typ IId (CDG 2D) ist gekennzeichnet durch Dandy-Walker-Malformation mit Makrozephalie, Hydrozephalus, Muskelhypotonie, Myopathie und Gerinnungsst\u00f6rungen. Bisher wurde nur 1 Patient beschrieben. Ursache des CDG 2D dieses Patienten waren inaktivierende Mutationen im GALT1 -Gen, das in der Chromosomenregion 9q13 liegt und die Beta-1,4-Galaktosyltransferase des Golgi-Apparates kodiert. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "B4GALT1-CDG is a congenital disorder of glycosylation characterised by macrocephaly due to Dandy-Walker malformation, hydrocephaly, hypotonia, myopathy and coagulation anomalies. To date, only one case has been reported. The syndrome is associated with mutations in the GALT1 gene (localised to region q13 of chromosome 9) leading to a deficiency in the Golgi apparatus enzyme beta-1,4-galactosyl transferase.", "synonyms": "Beta-1,4-galactosyltransferase deficiency, CDG syndrome type IId, CDG-IId, CDG2D, Carbohydrate deficient glycoprotein syndrome type IId, Congenital disorder of glycosylation type 2d, Congenital disorder of glycosylation type IId, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "E77.8", "omim": "607091", "umls": "C2931009", "gard": "9841"}, {"name": "B4GALT7-abh\u00e4ngiges spondylodysplastisches EDS", "sub_name": "B4GALT7-assoziiertes spondylodysplastisches Ehlers-Danlos-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of spondylodysplastic Ehlers-Danlos syndrome due to variants in B4GALT7 and characterized by short stature, variable degrees of muscle hypotonia, joint hypermobility, especially of the hands, and bowing of limbs. Additional features include the typical craniofacial gestalt (mid-face hypoplasia, round, flat face, proptosis and narrow mouth), hyperextensible skin that is soft, thin, translucent and doughy, delayed motor and/or cognitive development, characteristic radiographic findings (such as radio-ulnar synostosis, radial head subluxation or dislocation, metaphyseal flaring and osteopenia) and ocular abnormalities.", "synonyms": "B4GALT7-related spondylodysplastic EDS, EDS progeroid type 1, EDS with short stature and limb anomalies, spEDS-B4GALT7, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q79.6", "omim": "130070\u00a0 615349", "umls": "C1869122", "mesh": "C536201", "gard": "9991", "epidemiology": "To date, 34 individuals with molecularly diagnosed B4GALT7-related spondylodysplastic Ehlers-Danlos syndrome have been reported.", "clinical_description": "The main features in affected individuals are short stature, bowing of limbs, small joint hypermobility, hyperextensible, soft, doughy skin with delayed wound healing, and radioulnar synostosis. Facial dysmorphism includes short face with midface hypoplasia, proptosis, narrow mouth and loose skin also evident in the face. Most affected children present from infancy with delayed motor development and hypotonia; half of patients have delayed cognitive development. The most frequent skeletal anomalies are contractures or limited elbow movements, radioulnar synostosis, bowing of the ulna and radius, pes planus and osteopenia. Less frequently observed skeletal features include sagittal craniosynostosis, temporomandibular joint dislocation, scoliosis/kyphosis, vertebral coronal cleft, pectus carinatum, clavicular exostoses, patellar dislocation, hip dysplasia, bifid thumb, broad fingertips, ulnar deviation of fingers, equinovarus deformity and hallux valgus. Approximately half of the patients have ophthalmological abnormalities, such as hypermetropia, myopia, strabismus, blue sclerae, ptosis, nystagmus, glaucoma, megalocornea, iris and optic nerve coloboma, small optic nerves and cataracts. Dental anomalies include defective and discoloration of teeth. Less frequently reported features include cardiovascular anomalies (such as aortic/pulmonary stenosis and atrial septal defects) and urinogenetial defects (vesicoureteral reflux, cryptorchidism, hypogonadism, inguinal hernia) as well as hemidiaphragmatic eventration, varicose veins, lymphedema and multiple nevi. Sensorineural/conductive hearing loss and cleft palate are rarely reported.", "etiology": "The disorder is due to variants of the B4GALT7 gene (5q35.3), encoding for galactosyltransferase I. This gene is responsible for the synthesis of the linker region of proteoglycans, essential components of the extracellular matrix in connective tissues.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical examination, radiological studies and molecular findings.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes other spondylodysplastic Ehlers-Danlos syndromes and genetic conditions with joint hypermobility, skin hyperextensibility and short stature.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible where a known pathogenic variant has previously been identified in a family member.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing variant) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Management requires a multi-disciplinary approach. Specific regular follow-up is recommended based on the patient's clinical manifestations. Rehabilitation therapy must be tailored to the patient's characteristics. Musculoskeletal anomalies may require a precocious orthopedic intervention.", "prognosis": "Data is limited with respect to life expectancy; whilst there is only one adult patient reported in the literature, there are currently no known reasons suspect a reduced life expectancy. Functional consequences and quality of life depend on disease severity. The pathology is not progressive."}, {"name": "B4GALT7-assoziiertes spondylodysplastisches Ehlers-Danlos-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of spondylodysplastic Ehlers-Danlos syndrome due to variants in B4GALT7 and characterized by short stature, variable degrees of muscle hypotonia, joint hypermobility, especially of the hands, and bowing of limbs. Additional features include the typical craniofacial gestalt (mid-face hypoplasia, round, flat face, proptosis and narrow mouth), hyperextensible skin that is soft, thin, translucent and doughy, delayed motor and/or cognitive development, characteristic radiographic findings (such as radio-ulnar synostosis, radial head subluxation or dislocation, metaphyseal flaring and osteopenia) and ocular abnormalities.", "synonyms": "B4GALT7-related spondylodysplastic EDS, EDS progeroid type 1, EDS with short stature and limb anomalies, spEDS-B4GALT7, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q79.6", "omim": "130070\u00a0 615349", "umls": "C1869122", "mesh": "C536201", "gard": "9991", "epidemiology": "To date, 34 individuals with molecularly diagnosed B4GALT7-related spondylodysplastic Ehlers-Danlos syndrome have been reported.", "clinical_description": "The main features in affected individuals are short stature, bowing of limbs, small joint hypermobility, hyperextensible, soft, doughy skin with delayed wound healing, and radioulnar synostosis. Facial dysmorphism includes short face with midface hypoplasia, proptosis, narrow mouth and loose skin also evident in the face. Most affected children present from infancy with delayed motor development and hypotonia; half of patients have delayed cognitive development. The most frequent skeletal anomalies are contractures or limited elbow movements, radioulnar synostosis, bowing of the ulna and radius, pes planus and osteopenia. Less frequently observed skeletal features include sagittal craniosynostosis, temporomandibular joint dislocation, scoliosis/kyphosis, vertebral coronal cleft, pectus carinatum, clavicular exostoses, patellar dislocation, hip dysplasia, bifid thumb, broad fingertips, ulnar deviation of fingers, equinovarus deformity and hallux valgus. Approximately half of the patients have ophthalmological abnormalities, such as hypermetropia, myopia, strabismus, blue sclerae, ptosis, nystagmus, glaucoma, megalocornea, iris and optic nerve coloboma, small optic nerves and cataracts. Dental anomalies include defective and discoloration of teeth. Less frequently reported features include cardiovascular anomalies (such as aortic/pulmonary stenosis and atrial septal defects) and urinogenetial defects (vesicoureteral reflux, cryptorchidism, hypogonadism, inguinal hernia) as well as hemidiaphragmatic eventration, varicose veins, lymphedema and multiple nevi. Sensorineural/conductive hearing loss and cleft palate are rarely reported.", "etiology": "The disorder is due to variants of the B4GALT7 gene (5q35.3), encoding for galactosyltransferase I. This gene is responsible for the synthesis of the linker region of proteoglycans, essential components of the extracellular matrix in connective tissues.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical examination, radiological studies and molecular findings.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes other spondylodysplastic Ehlers-Danlos syndromes and genetic conditions with joint hypermobility, skin hyperextensibility and short stature.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible where a known pathogenic variant has previously been identified in a family member.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing variant) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Management requires a multi-disciplinary approach. Specific regular follow-up is recommended based on the patient's clinical manifestations. Rehabilitation therapy must be tailored to the patient's characteristics. Musculoskeletal anomalies may require a precocious orthopedic intervention.", "prognosis": "Data is limited with respect to life expectancy; whilst there is only one adult patient reported in the literature, there are currently no known reasons suspect a reduced life expectancy. Functional consequences and quality of life depend on disease severity. The pathology is not progressive."}, {"name": "B4GALT7-CDG", "sub_name": "B4GALT7-assoziiertes spondylodysplastisches Ehlers-Danlos-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of spondylodysplastic Ehlers-Danlos syndrome due to variants in B4GALT7 and characterized by short stature, variable degrees of muscle hypotonia, joint hypermobility, especially of the hands, and bowing of limbs. Additional features include the typical craniofacial gestalt (mid-face hypoplasia, round, flat face, proptosis and narrow mouth), hyperextensible skin that is soft, thin, translucent and doughy, delayed motor and/or cognitive development, characteristic radiographic findings (such as radio-ulnar synostosis, radial head subluxation or dislocation, metaphyseal flaring and osteopenia) and ocular abnormalities.", "synonyms": "B4GALT7-related spondylodysplastic EDS, EDS progeroid type 1, EDS with short stature and limb anomalies, spEDS-B4GALT7, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q79.6", "omim": "130070\u00a0 615349", "umls": "C1869122", "mesh": "C536201", "gard": "9991", "epidemiology": "To date, 34 individuals with molecularly diagnosed B4GALT7-related spondylodysplastic Ehlers-Danlos syndrome have been reported.", "clinical_description": "The main features in affected individuals are short stature, bowing of limbs, small joint hypermobility, hyperextensible, soft, doughy skin with delayed wound healing, and radioulnar synostosis. Facial dysmorphism includes short face with midface hypoplasia, proptosis, narrow mouth and loose skin also evident in the face. Most affected children present from infancy with delayed motor development and hypotonia; half of patients have delayed cognitive development. The most frequent skeletal anomalies are contractures or limited elbow movements, radioulnar synostosis, bowing of the ulna and radius, pes planus and osteopenia. Less frequently observed skeletal features include sagittal craniosynostosis, temporomandibular joint dislocation, scoliosis/kyphosis, vertebral coronal cleft, pectus carinatum, clavicular exostoses, patellar dislocation, hip dysplasia, bifid thumb, broad fingertips, ulnar deviation of fingers, equinovarus deformity and hallux valgus. Approximately half of the patients have ophthalmological abnormalities, such as hypermetropia, myopia, strabismus, blue sclerae, ptosis, nystagmus, glaucoma, megalocornea, iris and optic nerve coloboma, small optic nerves and cataracts. Dental anomalies include defective and discoloration of teeth. Less frequently reported features include cardiovascular anomalies (such as aortic/pulmonary stenosis and atrial septal defects) and urinogenetial defects (vesicoureteral reflux, cryptorchidism, hypogonadism, inguinal hernia) as well as hemidiaphragmatic eventration, varicose veins, lymphedema and multiple nevi. Sensorineural/conductive hearing loss and cleft palate are rarely reported.", "etiology": "The disorder is due to variants of the B4GALT7 gene (5q35.3), encoding for galactosyltransferase I. This gene is responsible for the synthesis of the linker region of proteoglycans, essential components of the extracellular matrix in connective tissues.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical examination, radiological studies and molecular findings.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes other spondylodysplastic Ehlers-Danlos syndromes and genetic conditions with joint hypermobility, skin hyperextensibility and short stature.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible where a known pathogenic variant has previously been identified in a family member.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing variant) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Management requires a multi-disciplinary approach. Specific regular follow-up is recommended based on the patient's clinical manifestations. Rehabilitation therapy must be tailored to the patient's characteristics. Musculoskeletal anomalies may require a precocious orthopedic intervention.", "prognosis": "Data is limited with respect to life expectancy; whilst there is only one adult patient reported in the literature, there are currently no known reasons suspect a reduced life expectancy. Functional consequences and quality of life depend on disease severity. The pathology is not progressive."}, {"name": "Babesiose", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Babesiose ist eine durch Protozoen der Gattung Babesia verursachte Infektionskrankheit. Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch Fieber und h\u00e4molytische An\u00e4mie, jedoch reicht das klinische Bild von symptomfreier Infektion bis zu schwerem Verlauf mit t\u00f6dlichem Ausgang.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "B60.0", "UMLS": "C0004576", "MeSH": "D001404", "GARD": "5878", "MedDRA": "10003965", "epidemiology": "Die weltweite Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Am h\u00e4ufigsten wird die Krankheit in den USA gesehen, im Jahr 2011 waren es 1124 F\u00e4lle, wobei 92 % dieser F\u00e4lle in den nord\u00f6stlichen Staaten und den Staaten des oberen Mittelwestens auftraten. Sporadische F\u00e4lle wurden auch in Europa, Asien, Afrika, Australien und S\u00fcdamerika beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die meisten immunkompetenten Patienten erkranken nur leicht bis mittelschwer oder sind ganz symptomfrei. In der Regel beginnen die Symptome 1-4 Wochen nach dem Biss einer infizierten Zecke oder 1 Woche bis 6 Monate nach einer Transfusion mit kontaminiertem Blut. Die h\u00e4ufigsten Symptome sind Fieber (das bis zu 40,9\u00b0 ansteigen und von einer Splenomegalie begleitet sein kann), Unwohlsein und Ersch\u00f6pfung. Andere h\u00e4ufige Symptome sind Sch\u00fcttelfrost, Schwei\u00dfausbr\u00fcche, Kopfschmerzen, Muskel-und Gelenkschmerzen, unproduktiver Husten, \u00dcbelkeit und Anorexie. Seltener sind Halsschmerzen, Photophobie, Erbrechen, Gewichtsverlust und Depression. Die Symptome k\u00f6nnen 1-2 Wochen dauern, die Mattigkeit kann jedoch mehrere Monate anhalten. Bei immungeschw\u00e4chten und \u00e4lteren Personen verlaufen die Infektionen schwerer und langdauernder, und Rezidive k\u00f6nnen eine Klinikeinweisung erforderlich machen. Infektionen mit B. divergens und B. duncani verlaufen in der Regel schwer und treten oft bei splenektomierten Menschen auf. Bei etwa der H\u00e4lfte der hospitalisierten Patienten bestehen Komplikationen: Disseminierte intravaskul\u00e4re Koagulopathie, akutes Atemnotsyndrom und seltener Leber- oder Niereninsuffizienz, kongestive Herzinsuffizienz, Koma und Tod.", "etiology": "Ursache der Babesiose sind Infektionen mit verschiedenen Babesia-Arten, darunter B.microti (am h\u00e4ufigsten in den USA), B. duncani, B. divergens (am h\u00e4ufigsten in Europa) und B.venatorum. Die meisten Patienten werden in der Zeit von Fr\u00fchsommer bis Sp\u00e4therbst durch den Biss infizierter Nymphen von Ixodes scapularis (in den USA) oder Ixodes ricinus (in Europa) infiziert. Der Parasit kann durch Transfusion von kontaminiertem Blut oder kontaminierten Blutprodukten auf den Menschen \u00fcbertragen werden. Beschrieben wurden auch einige F\u00e4lle von transplazentaler \u00dcbertragung.", "diagnostic_methods": "An Babesiose muss bei Patienten mit ungekl\u00e4rter fieberhafter Erkrankung gedacht werden, die in einer f\u00fcr Babesia endemischen Region leben oder k\u00fcrzlich in eine solche Region reisten, oder die in den letzten 6 Monaten eine Bluttransfusion erhielten. In der Regel erhobene Laborbefunde sind: H\u00e4molytische An\u00e4mie, Thrombozytopenie und normale oder leicht verminderte Leukozytenzahl. Durch Giemsa- oder Wright-F\u00e4rbung des Blutausstriches werden in den Erythrozyten der Patienten die runden, ovalen oder birnenf\u00f6rmigen Parasiten mit blauem Zytoplasma und rotem Chromatin nachgewiesen. Durch den Nachweis von Babesia-DNA mittels Polymerase-Kettenreaktion (PCR) im Blut des Patienten kann die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt werden. Ein Erregernachweis ist auch durch serologische Tests m\u00f6glich.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind andere Infektionskrankheiten, wie Malaria, Lyme-Krankheit, Ehrlichiose, Rocky-Mountain-Fleckfieber, Typhus (siehe diese Termini) und Infekti\u00f6se Mononukleose.", "management_and_treatment": "Leichte bis mittelschwere F\u00e4lle von Babesiose werden 7-10 Tage mit antimikrobiellen Agentien, Atovaquon und Azithromycin behandelt. F\u00fcr schwere F\u00e4lle werden Chinin oral und Clindamycin intraven\u00f6s empfohlen. Wegen der gr\u00f6\u00dferen H\u00e4ufigkeit von Nebenwirkungen m\u00fcssen die Patienten jedoch enger \u00fcberwacht werden. Schwer betroffene Patienten erhalten partielle oder vollst\u00e4ndige Austauschtransfusionen. Stark immungeschw\u00e4chte Patienten ben\u00f6tigen bei persistierender oder rezidivierender Infektion eine antimikrobielle Behandlung \u00fcber 6 Wochen. Pr\u00e4ventive Ma\u00dfnahmen sind das Vermeiden von Gegenden mit Zecken, M\u00e4usen und Rehen, Untersuchung auf Zecken, Schutzkleidung und Zeckenschutz-Produkte.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose wird durch die jeweilige Babesia-Spezies und durch den Allgemeinzustand des Patienten bestimmt, bei den meisten immunkompetenten Patienten ist sie exzellent.", "summary": "Die weltweite Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Am h\u00e4ufigsten wird die Krankheit in den USA gesehen, im Jahr 2011 waren es 1124 F\u00e4lle, wobei 92 % dieser F\u00e4lle in den nord\u00f6stlichen Staaten und den Staaten des oberen Mittelwestens auftraten. Sporadische F\u00e4lle wurden auch in Europa, Asien, Afrika, Australien und S\u00fcdamerika beschrieben."}, {"name": "Badeanzug-Ichthyose", "sub_name": "Bathing-suit-Ichthyose", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Badeanzug-Ichthyose (BSI) ist eine seltene Variante der autosomal-rezessiven kongenitalen Ichthyose (ARCI) und gekennzeichnet durch gro\u00dfe dunkle Schuppen in spezifischen Bereichen des K\u00f6rpers.", "synonyms": "BSI, Badeanzug-Ichthyose, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q80.2", "OMIM": "242300", "epidemiology": "In der Literatur wurden bisher weniger als 20 Patienten beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Der besondere Hautbefund erscheint nach dem Abwerfen der seit der Geburt bestehenden Kollodiummembran: Anders als bei anderen Formen der ARCI sind die Gliedmassen (mit Ausnahme der Falten) und das Gesicht durch die Ichthyose nicht betroffen. Die Schuppen treten in w\u00e4rmeren Hautbereichen auf, an Stamm, Kopfhaut und in den Achseln. In den betroffenen Bereichen haben die Patienten wie bei lamell\u00e4rer Ichthyose (LI) gro\u00dfe dunkle Schuppen.", "etiology": "Ursache der BSE sind spezifische temperatur-sensitive Mutationen im TGM1-Gen, das f\u00fcr die an der Verhornung des Stratum corneum beteiligte Transglutaminase 1 kodiert. In den betroffenen (w\u00e4rmeren) Hautbereichen ist die Enzymaktivit\u00e4t deutlich reduziert, im Gegensatz zur normalen Haut mit nahezu normaler Enzymaktivit\u00e4t. Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt.", "summary": "In der Literatur wurden bisher weniger als 20 Patienten beschrieben."}, {"name": "BADI", "sub_name": "Irisdepigmentierung, akute bilaterale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die bilaterale akute Depigmentierung der Iris (BADI) ist gekennzeichnet durch den akuten Beginn der bilateralen Depigmentierung der Iris, Pigmentdispersion in der Vorderkammer und schwerer Pigmentablagerung im Vorderkammerwinkel. Patienten weisen typischerweise eine akute und meist schwere Photophobie auf, verbunden mit verschwommenem Sehen, roten Augen und Augenbeschwerden oder Schmerzen mit zumeist selbstlimitierenden klinischen Verlauf. BADI tritt h\u00e4ufig nach einer grippe\u00e4hnlichen Erkrankung, einer Infektion der oberen Atemwege und nach der Anwendung von oralem Moxifloxacin auf. Im Zusammenhang mit Irisepitheldepigmentierung, Iristransilluminationsdefekten und atonischer/mydriatischer Pupille wird die Erkrankung als bilaterale akute Iristransillumination (BAIT) bezeichnet, die mit einem erh\u00f6hten Risiko der schweren, hartn\u00e4ckigen Erh\u00f6hung des Augeninnendrucks einhergeht.", "synonyms": "BADI, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unbekannt\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "Q13.8"}, {"name": "BAFME", "sub_name": "Myoklonusepilepsie, adulte benigne famili\u00e4re", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Benigne adulte famili\u00e4re Myoklonus-Epilepsie (BAFME) ist ein erbliches Epilepsie-Syndrom und gekennzeichnet durch kortikalen Handtremor, Myoklonien und gelegentliche generalisierte oder fokale Krampfanf\u00e4lle mit nicht oder sehr langsam progredientem Krankheitsverlauf und fehlenden Zeichen fr\u00fcher Demenz oder zerebell\u00e4rer Ataxie.", "synonyms": "ADCME, BAFME, FAME, FCMTE, Kortikale Myoklonie und Epilepsie, autosomal-dominant, Kortikaler myokloner Tremor und Epilepsie, famili\u00e4re Form, Myoklonusepilepsie, adulte, famili\u00e4re Form, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "G40.3", "OMIM": "601068\u00a0 607876\u00a0 613608\u00a0 615127\u00a0 615400", "epidemiology": "Die weltweite Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, in Japan wird sie auf 1:35.000 gesch\u00e4tzt.", "clinical_description": "Die BAFME wird in der Regel im zweiten Lebensjahrzehnt mit einem leichten kortikalen Tremor der H\u00e4nde manifest (die Symptome k\u00f6nnen aber im Alter zwischen 11 und 50 Jahren beginnen). Der Tremor besteht in einem andauernden, arrhythmischen, feinen Zucken der H\u00e4nde, das durch Erm\u00fcdung oder emotionalen Stress verst\u00e4rkt wird. Dieser Tremor nimmt bis zum 70. Lebensjahr nicht an St\u00e4rke zu. Der Myoklonus tritt in der Regel im gleichen Alter wie der kortikale Tremor auf und besteht in erratischen, arrhythmischen, segmentalen Myoklonien der oberen Gliedmassen und wird durch verschiedene Haltungen und Aktionen verst\u00e4rkt. Selten k\u00f6nnen auch tonisch-klonische Kr\u00e4mpfe ein Symptom der BAFME sein. Sie beginnen am h\u00e4ufigsten im Alter von 30 Jahren, wenn Tremor und Myoklonus schon aufgetreten sind und werden oft durch Lichtstimulation, emotionalen Stress und Schlafmangel ausgel\u00f6st. Einige Patienten aus Familien mit genetischen Anomalien in der Chromosomenregion 2p11.1-q12.2 hatten therapieresistente komplex-partielle Kr\u00e4mpfe und fokale EEG-Anomalien. In fortgeschrittenem Alter kann sich der Myoklonus verst\u00e4rken, und Gangschwierigkeiten und milde Ataxie k\u00f6nnen auftreten.", "etiology": "Die BAFME wurde in 4 verschiedene chromosomale Loci kartiert: 8q23.3-q24.11 in japanischen Familien (BAFME Typ 1), 2p11.1-q12.2 in italienischen Familien (BAFME Typ 2), 5p15.31-p15.1 in einer franz\u00f6sischen Familie (BAFME Typ 3) und nach 3q26.32-q28 in einer Thail\u00e4ndischen Familie (BAFME Typ 4). Vor kurzem wurde in einer konsanguinen \u00c4gyptischen Familie eine Krankheit beschrieben, die \u00c4hnlichkeiten zum BAFME aufweist, jedoch autosomal-rezessiv vererbt wird. Merkmale sind fokale Epilepsie, neuropsychiatrische St\u00f6rung, grenzwertiges kognitives Niveau und Myoklonus. Als urs\u00e4chlich wurden homozygote Deletionen im i>CNTN2(1q32.1)-Gen identifiziert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die klinischen und elektrophysiologischen Befunde. Zu den EEG-Befunden geh\u00f6ren eine photo-myoklonische Reaktion zusammen mit abnormen Polyspikes und Waves. Die Patienten k\u00f6nnen auch extrem vergr\u00f6\u00dferte kortikale Komponenten der somato-sensorisch evozierten Potenziale und einen verst\u00e4rkten C-Reflex aufweisen. Die 'jerk-locked'-gemittelte Analyse zeigt vor Einsetzen eines Myoklonus positiv-negative, biphasische Spikes.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die BAFME muss von Epilepsie-Syndromen mit prominentem Myoklonus unterschieden werden. Die Patienten k\u00f6nnen wegen ihrer Myoklonien und generalisierten tonisch-klonischen Kr\u00e4mpfe irrt\u00fcmlich als juvenile Myoklonus-Epilepsie (JME) diagnostiziert werden. Die JME unterscheidet sich aber klinisch von der BAFME durch das Fehlen des kortikalen Tremors, die \u00fcberwiegend proximalen Myoklonien und und durch das typische Auftreten der Kr\u00e4mpfe beim Aufwachen. Das Fehlen von Ataxie und Demenz, der Beginn im Erwachsenenalter und der in der Regel benigne Verlauf der Epilepsie differenziert die BAFME von den progressiven myoklonischen Epilepsien.", "genetic_counseling": "Den betroffenen Familien soll eine genetische Beratung angeboten werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Anders als der essentielle Tremor spricht der kortikale Tremor in der Regel nur ungen\u00fcgend auf Beta-Blocker an, wird aber durch antiepileptische Medikamente gebessert. Da Alkohol den Tremor verst\u00e4rkt, sollte er vermieden werden. Zur Behandlung des kortikalen Tremors und des Myoklonus sind Valproat, Levetiracetam und Benzodiazepine wegen ihrer kombinierten anti-epileptischen und anti-myoklonischen Wirkung am g\u00fcnstigsten. In einigen F\u00e4llen ist die Epilepsie schwierig zu therapieren.", "prognosis": "Die BAFME hat keine Auswirkungen auf die Lebenserwartung.", "summary": "Die weltweite Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, in Japan wird sie auf 1:35.000 gesch\u00e4tzt."}, {"name": "Bahemuka-Brown-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie-kutane Gesichtsl\u00e4sionen-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Spastische Paraplegie-kutane Gesichtsl\u00e4sionen-Syndrom ist eine komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die durch Verz\u00f6gerungen in der motorischen Entwicklung, gefolgt von einer langsam progredienten spastischen Paraplegie (die haupts\u00e4chlich die unteren Extremit\u00e4ten betrifft) in Verbindung mit einem schuppenden Gesichtsausschlag mit Schmetterlingsverteilung (der sich im Alter von etwa zwei Monaten zeigt) und Dysarthrie gekennzeichnet ist. Seit 1982 gibt es keine weiteren Beschreibungen in der Literatur.", "synonyms": "Bahemuka-Brown-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "UMLS": "C2931617", "GARD": "806"}, {"name": "Bainbridge-Ropers-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, syndromic intellectual disability disorder with a variable phenotypic presentation typically characterized by microcephaly, severe feeding difficulties, failure to thrive, severe global development delay that frequently results in absent/poor speech, moderate to severe intellectual disability and hypotonia. Distinctive craniofacial features include prominent forehead, high-arched, thin eyebrows, hypertelorism, downslanting palpebral fissures, long, tubular nose with broad tip and prominent nasal bridge and wide mouth with full, everted lower lip. Joint laxity and ulnar deviation of wrists are also frequently observed.", "synonyms": "Severe feeding difficulties-failure to thrive-microcephaly due to ASXL3 deficiency syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.0", "omim": "615485", "epidemiology": "Less than 100 cases have been reported in literature and databases to date.", "clinical_description": "Presentation is usually in the first months of life; however, intrauterine growth retardation has been reported in some cases. Symptoms of global development delay include hypotonia, delay in achieving independent sitting and walking, and marked language delay. Intellectual disability ranges from moderate to severe. Affected individuals may also display autistic features. Feeding difficulties requiring support are frequent. Other frequent gastrointestinal features include gastroesophageal reflux and constipation. Distinct facial features include highly arched or delineated eyebrows and also synophrys, and frequently a highly arched palate. Patients may exhibited skeletal anomalies including scoliotic attitude, joint laxity, pectus excavatum or carinatum and ulnar deviation of wrists.", "etiology": "The disorder is due to loss of function mutations in ASXL3 gene (18q12.1).", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on presentation of clinical features, and can be confirmed by genetic testing. Most of the patients described so far had been confirmed by next generation sequencing techniques.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes other syndromes with moderate-severe intellectual disability and poor language. In some reported cases Cornelia de Lange syndrome was suspected due to feeding difficulties, developmental delay and eyebrow characteristics.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "There is no definitive antenatal diagnosis available, however ultrasound may show intrauterine growth retardation which should be investigated further. As germline mosaicism has been described, prenatal diagnosis may be considered where the pathogenic variant has previously been identified in a family member.", "genetic_counseling": "The disorder is autosomal dominant; however, no familial transmission has been observed so far. Genetic counseling should be proposed to individuals having the disease-causing mutation informing them that, for each pregnancy, there is 50% risk of passing the mutation to offspring. It is also important to counsel affected families about the possibility of recurrence due to germline mosaicism.", "management_and_treatment": "Given the multisystemic involvement, multidisciplinary follow-up is needed and should include neurological follow up, developmental assessments, physiotherapy (particularly for joint laxity and musculoskeletal issues), feeding interventions for those with persistent feeding issues, and ophthalmologic follow up for patients with strabismus and/or refractive error.", "prognosis": "Quality of life and the functional consequences depends on the severity of the developmental delay and intellectual disability."}, {"name": "Baird-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Fehlende Dermatoglyphen-kongenitale Milien-Syndrom", "german_description": "Symptome dieses Syndroms sind Blasenbildung an der Haut, schon bei Neugeborenen, Milien (kleine, wei\u00dfe Papeln, besonders im Gesicht) und das Fehlen der Dermatoglyphen (Hautleisten) an H\u00e4nden und F\u00fc\u00dfen. Es wurde bisher in zwei Familien beschrieben (in einer von diesen waren in drei Generationen 13 Familienmitglieder betroffen) und bei einer nicht verwandten Person. Einige betroffene Personen hatten beidseitige, partielle Beugekontrakturen der Finger und Zehen und h\u00e4utige Syndakylie der Zehen. Das Syndrom wird autosomal-dominant vererbt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare syndrome characterized by neonatal blisters and milia (small white papules, especially on the face) and congenital absence of dermatoglyphics on the hands and feet. It has been reported in two kindreds (one of which contained 13 affected individuals spanning three generations) and in an unrelated individual. Some affected patients also showed bilateral partial flexion contractures of the fingers and toes, and webbing of the toes. The syndrome is inherited as an autosomal dominant trait.", "synonyms": "Absence of dermatoglyphics-congenital milia syndrome, Baird syndrome, Basan-Baird syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q82.8", "omim": "129200", "umls": "C0406707", "gard": "2336"}, {"name": "Bakrania-Ragge-Syndrom", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch Anophthalmie oder Mikrophthalmie, Retinadystrophie und/oder Myopie, in einigen F\u00e4llen verbunden mit Hirnanomalien. Es wurde in 2 Familien beschrieben. Bei einigen Patienten besteht eine Polydaktylie. Kopplungsuntersuchungen f\u00fchrten zum  BMP4-Gen (14q22-q23), dessen Beteiligung an der Entwicklung des Auges bereits bekannt gewesen war. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Microphthalmia with brain and digit anomalies is characterised by anophthalmia or microphthalmia, retinal dystrophy, and/or myopia, associated in some cases with cerebral anomalies. It has been described in two families. Polydactyly may also be present. Linkage analysis allowed identification of mutations in the  BMP4 gene, which has already been shown to play a role in eye development.", "synonyms": "Bakrania-Ragge syndrome, MCOPS6, Syndromic microphthalmia type 6, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q11.2", "omim": "607932", "umls": "C1864689", "gard": "3645"}, {"name": "Bakterielle Endokarditis", "sub_name": "Endokarditis, infekti\u00f6se", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare bacterial infectious disease characterized by infection of a native or prosthetic heart valve, the endocardial surface, or an indwelling cardiac device. Main causative agents are Gram-positive bacteria, most commonly Staphylococcus and Streptococcus species. Signs and symptoms include high fever or prolonged subfebrile state, excessive sweating, malaise, asthenia, arthralgia, myalgia, weight loss, headache, nausea, dyspnea, cough, heart murmurs, and petechiae of the skin. The most common complications are embolism in different organs and ischemic stroke, sepsis, heart failure, and renal failure.", "synonyms": "Bacterial endocarditis, Infectious endocarditis, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "I33.0"}, {"name": "Bakterielles TSS", "sub_name": "Toxisches Schock-Syndrom, bakterielles", "german_description": "Die weltweite Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1:30 000 gesch\u00e4tzt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Bacterial toxic shock syndrome (TSS) is a potentially fatal, acute disease characterized by a sudden onset of high fever along with nausea, myalgia, vomiting and multisystem organ involvement, potentially leading to shock and death. TSS is mediated by superantigenic toxins, usually caused by an infection with Staphylococcus aureus in staphylococcal TSS (see this term) or Streptococcus pyogenes in streptococcal TSS (see this term).", "synonyms": "Bacterial TSS, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "A48.3", "gard": "9560", "epidemiology": "The worldwide prevalence is estimated at 1/30, 000.", "clinical_description": "The disease affects mainly young adult women with no previous medical conditions. However, non-menstrual TSS, which can also be observed in men and children, represents up to 50% of Staphylococcal TSS cases. Onset is sudden and includes high fever (>38.9\u00b0C), nausea, diarrhea, vomiting, myalgia, abdominal pain and sore throat. Staphylococcal TSS almost always exhibits an erythematous rash and skin peeling as one of its manifestations, whereas it is very rarely seen in streptococcal TSS, which can show signs of soft tissue infection. Serious manifestations include confusion, shock, renal and myocardial dysfunction, acute respiratory distress syndrome (ARDS; see this term) and coma.", "etiology": "Staphylococcal TSS is due to an infection with Staphylococcus aureus and streptococcal TSS is due to an infection with Streptococcus pyogenes, or rarely, group C or G Streptococcus. Superantigens produced by both bacteria are responsible for the massive and sudden immune reaction seen in TSS. Both forms have been associated with recent traumas (surgery or childbirth) and viral infections, while staphylococcal TSS has also been associated with high absorbency tampon use."}, {"name": "Balantidienruhr", "sub_name": "Balantidiose", "german_description": "Die Balantidiose ist eine Infektionskrankheit, die in westlichen L\u00e4ndern nur selten auftritt. Sie wird durch den einzelligen Ziliaten Balantidium coli verursacht. Gew\u00f6hnlich verursacht der Parasit in der N\u00e4he von Schweinehaltungen eine Darminfektion. Von der Infektion betroffene Menschen sind zumeist abwehrgeschw\u00e4cht. Einige Infizierte k\u00f6nnen symptomfrei sein oder nur eine leichte Diarrhoe und Unwohlsein haben. Andere haben schwerere Symptome, die an eine akute Enteritis denken lassen. Die Symptome der Balantidiose k\u00f6nnen z.B. auch einer Am\u00f6ben-Enteritis \u00e4hneln. Sehr selten dringt der Erreger in andere Organe ein, meist dann in die Lunge. Mittel der Wahl ist Metronidazol. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Balantidiasis is an infectious disease, rare in western countries. It is caused by Balantidium coli, a single celled parasite (ciliate protozoan) that is usually associated with intestinal infection in areas associated with pig rearing. It infects humans occasionally, mostly immunocompromised patients. Some infected people may have no symptoms or only mild diarrhea and abdominal discomfort but others may experience more severe symptoms reminiscent of an acute inflammation of the intestines. Symptoms of Balantidiasis may be similar to those of other infections that cause intestinal inflammation, for example, amoebic dysentery. On very rare occasions this bacterium may invade extra-intestinal organs, mostly the lungs. Metronidazole is the treatment of choice.", "synonyms": "Balantidiosis, Ciliary dysentery, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "A07.0", "umls": "C0004692\u00a0 C0276786", "mesh": "C531629\u00a0 D001447", "gard": "809", "meddra": "10004080"}, {"name": "Balantidiose", "german_description": "Die Balantidiose ist eine Infektionskrankheit, die in westlichen L\u00e4ndern nur selten auftritt. Sie wird durch den einzelligen Ziliaten Balantidium coli verursacht. Gew\u00f6hnlich verursacht der Parasit in der N\u00e4he von Schweinehaltungen eine Darminfektion. Von der Infektion betroffene Menschen sind zumeist abwehrgeschw\u00e4cht. Einige Infizierte k\u00f6nnen symptomfrei sein oder nur eine leichte Diarrhoe und Unwohlsein haben. Andere haben schwerere Symptome, die an eine akute Enteritis denken lassen. Die Symptome der Balantidiose k\u00f6nnen z.B. auch einer Am\u00f6ben-Enteritis \u00e4hneln. Sehr selten dringt der Erreger in andere Organe ein, meist dann in die Lunge. Mittel der Wahl ist Metronidazol. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Balantidiasis is an infectious disease, rare in western countries. It is caused by Balantidium coli, a single celled parasite (ciliate protozoan) that is usually associated with intestinal infection in areas associated with pig rearing. It infects humans occasionally, mostly immunocompromised patients. Some infected people may have no symptoms or only mild diarrhea and abdominal discomfort but others may experience more severe symptoms reminiscent of an acute inflammation of the intestines. Symptoms of Balantidiasis may be similar to those of other infections that cause intestinal inflammation, for example, amoebic dysentery. On very rare occasions this bacterium may invade extra-intestinal organs, mostly the lungs. Metronidazole is the treatment of choice.", "synonyms": "Balantidiosis, Ciliary dysentery, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "A07.0", "umls": "C0004692\u00a0 C0276786", "mesh": "C531629\u00a0 D001447", "gard": "809", "meddra": "10004080"}, {"name": "Balikova-Vermeesch-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Mikrotie-Augenkolobom-imperforierter nasolakrimaler Gang-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Balikova-Vermeesch-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Keine Daten verf\u00fcgbar", "ICD-10": "Q13.8", "OMIM": "611863", "UMLS": "C2678482", "GARD": "10300", "summary": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch die Assoziation von Mikrotie, Kolobom der Augen und verschlossenen Ductus naso-lacrimalis. Es wurde bisher nur in 1 Familie beschrieben und wird autosomal-dominant vererbt. Die Patienten haben f\u00fcnf Kopien einer 'copy-number-variable region' (CNV) in der Chromosomenregion 4pter. Es handelt sich um das erste Beispiel einer amplifizierten CNV in Assoziation mit einer einfach (nach Mendelschen Regeln) vererbten Krankheit. "}, {"name": "Balint-Holmes-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Balint-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Balint syndrome is a rare neurologic disease characterized by the triad of optic ataxia, ocular apraxia and simultanagnosia due to posterior parietal lobe lesions. Patients report ophthalmologic difficulties in the absence of underlying ophthalomologic anomalies and present severe visual and spatial disabilities in locating and reaching objects, initiating voluntary eye movements and perceiving more than one object at a time.", "synonyms": "Balint-Holmes syndrome, Optic ataxia-gaze apraxia-simultanagnosia syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "H51.8", "umls": "C0270706"}, {"name": "Balint-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Balint syndrome is a rare neurologic disease characterized by the triad of optic ataxia, ocular apraxia and simultanagnosia due to posterior parietal lobe lesions. Patients report ophthalmologic difficulties in the absence of underlying ophthalomologic anomalies and present severe visual and spatial disabilities in locating and reaching objects, initiating voluntary eye movements and perceiving more than one object at a time.", "synonyms": "Balint-Holmes syndrome, Optic ataxia-gaze apraxia-simultanagnosia syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "H51.8", "umls": "C0270706"}, {"name": "Balkenagenesie mit chorioretinaler Anomalie", "sub_name": "Aicardi-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Aicardi-Syndrom ist eine seltene neuronale Entwicklungsst\u00f6rung mit der Symptomentrias (i) Agenesie des Corpus callosum (total oder partiell), (ii) typische chorio-retinale Lakunen und (iii) infantile Spasmen. Fast ausschlie\u00dflich M\u00e4dchen sind betroffen. In Nordamerika und Europa wurden etwa 200 Patienten beschrieben, wahrscheinlich werden aber nicht alle F\u00e4lle diagnostiziert und beschrieben. Vereinzelte m\u00e4nnliche Patienten hatten einen Karyotyp 47,XXY (Klinefelter-Syndrom). Meist wird die Krankheit in den ersten f\u00fcnf Lebensmonaten diagnostiziert. Zus\u00e4tzliche Symptome sind faziale Dysmorphien (prominente Praemaxilla, aufgeworfene Nasenspitze, breite und flache Nase, lateral sp\u00e4rliche Augenbrauen), Netzhaut-Kolobome, Mikrozephalie, periventrikul\u00e4re Heterotopien, Mikrogyrie, vergr\u00f6\u00dferte Ventrikel oder porenzephale Zysten, Hypotonie der K\u00f6rperachse, hypertone und evtl. spastische Gliedma\u00dfen. Im Verlauf der Krankheit entwickelt sich eine therapierefrakt\u00e4re Epilepsie mit verschiedenen Anfallstypen (infantile Spasmen, die auch asymmetrisch oder einseitig sein k\u00f6nnen; partielle Anf\u00e4lle) und einem 'split brain'-EEG. Fast alle Patienten sind geistig behindert und in ihrer Entwicklung moderat bis schwer retardiert. Bis zu einem Drittel der Patienten hat eine ausgepr\u00e4gte Skoliose. Seltene Symptome sind gastrointestinale St\u00f6rungen, Gef\u00e4\u00dffehlbildungen, kleine H\u00e4nde, Pigmentst\u00f6rungen der Haut und vermehrte Entstehung von Tumoren. Man nimmt an, dass das Aicardi-Syndrom eine sporadische Krankheit ist, mit heterozygoten Mutationen eines X-chromosomalen Gens im weiblichen Geschlecht und fr\u00fchembryonaler Letalit\u00e4t der hemizygoten m\u00e4nnlichen Embryonen. Ein Genort konnte bisher nicht lokalisiert werden. Die Diagnose basiert auf den klinischen Befunden, der Magnetresonanz-Bildgebung des Gehirns und den Befunden am Skelett. Differentialdiagnosen sind das Oculo-cerebro-kutane Syndrom, Krankheiten mit neuronalen Migrationsst\u00f6rungen (sh diese Termini) und eine gro\u00dfe Zahl von Syndromen, dieeines oder mehrere Symptome mit dem Aicardi-Syndrom gemeinsam haben. F\u00fcr die Anfalls-Kontrolle ist kontinuierliche Betreuung durch einen Neurop\u00e4diater erforderlich. Mit Krankengymnastik, Besch\u00e4ftigungs-, Sprach- und Ergotherapie soll unmittelbar nach Diagnosetellung begonnen werden. Ebenfalls indiziert ist angemessene Kr\u00e4ftigung der Skelettmuskulatur, um Komplikationen einer Skoliose vorzubeugen. Prognose und \u00dcberlebensdauer sind von Fall zu Fall sehr unterschiedlich.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare neurodevelopmental disorder characterized by the classic triad of agenesis of the corpus callosum (total or partial), central chorioretinal lacunae and infantile spasms that affects almost exclusively females.", "synonyms": "Agenesis of corpus callosum with chorioretinal abnormality, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "X-linked dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q04.0", "omim": "304050", "umls": "C0175713", "mesh": "D058540", "gard": "5764", "meddra": "10054935", "epidemiology": "About 200 individuals with Aicardi syndrome have been reported in North America and Europe, but the true prevalence is unknown. Single cases in males with 47, XXY chromosome constitution have been reported.", "clinical_description": "Individuals typically present within the first few months of life with infantile spasms and low muscle tone. In addition to the classic triad (agenesis of the corpus callosum, central chorioretinal lacunae and infantile spasms), other characteristics have been identified. All individuals manifest additional developmental brain abnormalities, with most presenting periventricular nodular heterotopias, brain cysts and polymicrogyria or pachygyria. While infantile spasms are the most common initial seizure type, most evolve into a complex pattern of partial and generalized seizures that are typically very difficult to control. In addition to chorioretinal lacunae, microphthalmia, retinal and optic nerve colobomas can be seen. Facial features, including prominent premaxilla, upturned nasal tip, decreased angle of the nasal bridge, and sparse lateral eyebrows have been described. Scoliosis is present in up to one third of affected individuals. Gastrointestinal disorders such as reflux, discomfort and constipation are nearly universal. Less common findings include cutaneous vascular malformations and pigmentary skin lesions. Vascular tumors have been reported in a few individuals.", "etiology": "It is believed that Aicardi syndrome is a sporadic disorder caused by heterozygous pathogenic variants in an X-linked gene in females, with early embryonic lethality in hemizygous males; however, a candidate region on the X chromosome has not yet been identified due to the sporadic nature of the condition. Some groups have reported potential causative genes in single individuals but these have not been confirmed in larger studies.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical features, brain imaging and skeletal findings. There is no blood test or other clinical diagnostic test to confirm the diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes microcephaly-chorioretinopathy with or without lymphedema (in this disorder, the lacunae are peripheral and the microcephaly is significant ; girls with Aicardi syndrome typically do not have microcephaly), oculocerebrocutaneous syndrome, neuronal migration disorders and numerous syndromes that present with one or more of the features characteristic for Aicardi syndrome.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis may be suspected based upon fetal brain imaging.", "genetic_counseling": "Aicardi syndrome appears to be a de novo, X-linked dominant disorder with lethality in males. There are no confirmed cases of familial recurrence.", "management_and_treatment": "Long-term follow-up by a pediatric neurologist is necessary for management of seizures. Seizures are often refractory to multiple medication regimens and no single medication works for all; some have reported improvement with vagal nerve stimulators. Physical, occupational, speech and vision therapy should begin at diagnosis. Appropriate musculoskeletal support and treatment for prevention of scoliosis-related complications is indicated. Immunizations, infection control measures and therapy for pulmonary toilet are important to reduce the risk of pneumonia, a major cause of mortality.", "prognosis": "Difficult-to-control seizures and significant neurodevelopmental disorders are the primary challenge for individuals with Aicardi syndrome. Most are not able to sit independently, walk or speak. The 5-, 10- and 20-year survival rates are 90%, 80% and 50%, respectively. Pulmonary infections, presumed secondary to hypotonia, are the most common cause of death."}, {"name": "B-ALL", "sub_name": "Lymphoblastische B-Vorl\u00e4uferzell-Leuk\u00e4mie, akute", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare acute lymphoblastic leukemia characterized by infiltration of bone marrow and peripheral blood by small to medium-sized blast cells typically positive for the B-cell markers CD19, cCD79a, and cCD22. Predilection sites for extramedullary involvement are the central nervous system, lymph nodes, spleen, liver, and testes. Patients present with evidence of bone marrow failure (i. e. thrombocytopenia, anemia, and/or neutropenia) and variable leukocyte count, as well as lymphadenopathy, hepatomegaly, splenomegaly, bone pain, and arthralgias.", "synonyms": "B-ALL, Precursor B-cell acute lymphoblastic leukemia/lymphoma, Precursor B-cell acute lymphocytic leukemia, Precursor B-cell acute lymphocytic leukemia/lymphoma, ", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "C83.5\u00a0 C91.0", "omim": "615545", "umls": "C0006413\u00a0 C1292769"}, {"name": "Baller-Gerold-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Syndrom der Kraniosynostose und Radiusaplasie, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q75.0", "OMIM": "218600", "UMLS": "C0265308", "MeSH": "C536788", "GARD": "1602", "summary": "Das Baller-Gerold-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch Kranznaht-Synostose und Anomalien des radialen Strahls (Oligodaktylie, Daumenaplasie oder -hypoplasie, Radiusaplasie oder -hypoplasie). Bisher wurden etwa 30 F\u00e4lle beschrieben, die Pr\u00e4valenz des Syndroms ist nicht bekannt. Die Kraniosynostose mit Brachyzephalie, Exophthalmus und Balkonstirn und die Anomalien des radialen Strahls bestehen seit Geburt. Weitere Symptome sind faziale Dysmorphien (hypoplastische Nase, kleiner Mund, spitzer Gaumenbogen). In den ersten Lebensmonaten kann eine Poikilodermie auftreten. Fast immer ist das Wachstum retardiert, meist um -4 SD. Im Kindesalter f\u00e4llt eine Aplasie oder Hypoplasie der Patella auf. Die Intelligenz ist in der Regel normal. Es besteht eine Krebsdisposition, besonders f\u00fcr die Entstehung von Osteosarkomen. Das Baller-Gerold-Syndrom wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache sind Mutationen im RECQL4-Gen (8q24.3). RECQL4 ist ein Mitglied der Genfamilie der RecQ-Helicasen, die auch f\u00fcr andere Krankheiten mit Krebsdisposition verantwortlich sind. Der Anteil der Patienten mit Mutationen in diesem Gen ist noch nicht bekannt. Das Baller-Gerold-Syndrom ist eine klinische Diagnose. Angesichts der vielen Differentialdiagnosen verschafft der Nachweis einer RECQL4-Mutation diagnostische Klarheit und erm\u00f6glicht eine gezielte genetische Beratung und Betreuung. Die wichtigsten Differentialdiagnosen sind das Rothmund-Thomson-Syndrom (RTS) und das RAPADILINO-Syndrom (s. diese Termini), die beide durch RECQL4-Mutationen bedingt sind. Mehrere Autoren haben auf das klinische Kontinuum dieser drei Krankheiten hingewiesen, es erscheint daher m\u00f6glich, dass sie das Ergebnis einer gleichen Pathogenese sind. Andere Differentialdiagnosen sind: Roberts-Syndrom und Fanconi-An\u00e4mie (h\u00e4ufig mit radialen Defekten und nur selten mit Kraniosynostose) und das Saethre-Chotzen-Syndrom (mit charakteristischer Kranznaht-Synostose, aber gew\u00f6hnlich ohne radiale Defekte), s. diese Termini. Die Kombination von Kraniosynostose und Hypoplasie des radialen Strahles tritt auch bei der Valproat-Embryopathhie (Fetales Valproat-Syndrom, s. dort) auf. Bei vorhandener Poikilodermie k\u00f6nnen andere Krankheiten ausgeschlossen werden. Der Nachweis pathogener RECQL4-Mutationen beim Indexfall erm\u00f6glicht in weiteren Schwangerschaften eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik durch Chorionzottenbiopsie. Anomalien der Gliedma\u00dfen und abnorme Form des Kopfes werden durch Fehlbildungs-Ultraschall nachgewiesen. Die Behandlung besteht in chirurgischer L\u00f6sung der Kraniosynostose in den ersten 6 Lebensmonaten und, falls erforderlich, in einer Rekonstruktion des Daumens durch Transposition des Zeigefingers. Bei der klinischen \u00dcberwachung der Patienten muss wegen des Osteosarkom-Risikos besonders auf Knochenschmerzen, Gangst\u00f6rungen und Frakturen geachtet werden. Wegen des Risikos f\u00fcr Hautkrebs und Photosensibilit\u00e4t soll Sonnenexposition vermieden werden. Die Prognose der Tr\u00e4ger homozygoter oder heterozygoter RECQL4-Mutationen wird durch das erh\u00f6hte Krebsrisiko bestimmt."}, {"name": "B-ALL mit t(9;22)(q34.1;q11.2)", "sub_name": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(9;22)(q34.1;q11.2)", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "B-ALL mit t(9;22)(q34.1;q11.2), BCR-ABL1-\u00e4hnliche B-ALL, Philadelphia-Chromosom-\u00e4hnliche B-ALL, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter, \u00c4ltere Erwachsene", "ICD-10": "C91.0", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Ballonartige Kardiomyopathie", "sub_name": "Tako-Tsubo-Kardiomyopathie", "german_description": "Die Kardiomyopathie Typ Takotsubo (TC) ist eine k\u00fcrzlich beschriebene akute Erkrankung des Herzens, die unter dem Bild eines akuten Herzinfarkts verl\u00e4uft. Das Syndrom wurde zuerst in der japanischen Bev\u00f6lkerung beschrieben, dann aber auch in den USA und Europa. Am h\u00e4ufigsten betroffen sind Frauen im Alter von 55 bis 75 Jahren. Die Pr\u00e4valenz in der Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung wird auf 1:36.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Patienten haben einen isch\u00e4mischen Thoraxschmerz oder sind dyspnoeisch, im EKG ist die ST-Strecke erh\u00f6ht und das QT-Intervall ist verl\u00e4ngert. Die kardialen Serumenzyme und Biomarker sind leicht bis m\u00e4\u00dfig erh\u00f6ht. Spitze und der Mittelteil des linken Ventrikels sind 'balloniert'. Im Gegensatz zu akuten Koronarsyndromen (ACS) haben Patienten mit TC keine angiographischen Zeichen einer obstruktiven Koronarkrankheit. Die h\u00e4ufigsten Komplikationen sind kardiogener Schock, Obstruktion des linksventrikul\u00e4ren Ausflusstraktes, Schlaganfall und Bildung eines apikalen Thrombus. Die Ursache ist nicht genau bekannt, aber in typischen F\u00e4llen wird das Syndrom durch akute seelische oder k\u00f6rperliche Belastung, eine Reihe von nicht-kardialen Krankheiten und chirurgische Eingriffe ausgel\u00f6st. Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren Angiographie der Koronararterien, Links-Ventrikulographie und Echokardiographie. Differentialdiagnostisch ist an ACS und andere passagere ventrikul\u00e4re Funktionsst\u00f6rungen zu denken. Die Patienten m\u00fcssen station\u00e4r \u00fcberwacht und behandelt (Vorhof- und Kammerarrhythmien, Herzversagen, mechanische Komplikationen) werden. Die Behandlung ist unterst\u00fctzend und symptomatisch, z.B. mit Betablockern, Inhibitoren des angiotensin-konvertierenden Enzyms (ACE-Hemmer), Aspirin und Diuretika. Wenn in der akuten Phase der Erkrankung die richtigen Ma\u00dfnahmen getroffen werden, ist der kurzfristige Verlauf durch sehr gute klinische Erholung gekennzeichnet. Der weitere Verlauf ist in der Regel unauff\u00e4llig, aber eine Ventrikelruptur ist m\u00f6glich. Damit ist dieses Syndrom eine weitere Ursache eines pl\u00f6tzlichen Todes.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare cardiac disease characterized by acute occurrence of heart failure after an emotional or physical trigger however, recovery of the wall motion abnormalities are observed within months. Symptoms are similar to acute coronary syndrome (ACS).", "synonyms": "Ampulla cardiomyopathy, Apical ballooning syndrome, Ballooning cardiomyopathy, Broken heart syndrome, Stress cardiomyopathy, Tako-Tsubo syndrome, Takotsubo cardiomyopathy, Takotsubo syndrome, Transient left ventricular apical ballooning syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "I42.8", "umls": "C1168291\u00a0 C1739395", "gard": "9400", "epidemiology": "Takotsubo syndrome (TTS) is found in about 1-3% of all patients with symptoms of ACS; however, the prevalence is likely underestimated. Around 90% of TTS patients are women, typically postmenopausal but male and younger patients are diagnosed increasingly due to raised awareness of the syndrome.", "clinical_description": "In the acute phase, clinical presentation, electrocardiography (ECG) and cardiac biomarkers are similar to those of ACS. Typical symptoms are acute chest pain or dyspnea. Further symptoms can arise from complications of TTS, e.g. heart failure, cardiogenic shock, or cardiac arrest. New ECG changes or elevated cardiac biomarkers may or may not be present.", "etiology": "The underlying mechanisms of this syndrome remain incompletely understood. Recent findings show that specific alterations in neurological response and sympathetic activation after emotional stimuli are present in TTS. These findings confirm the importance of brain-heart interaction in the development of this process. Microcirculatory constriction is also proposed as an underlying mechanism.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is often challenging due to the similarity with ACS. Coronary angiography with left ventriculography is considered the gold standard diagnostic tool. The InterTAK (international takotsubo) Diagnostic Criteria have been developed to improve diagnosis and include the following: 1) transient left ventricular dysfunction presenting as either apical, midventricular, basal or focal wall motion abnormalities with possible right ventricular involvement, 2) a preceding emotional, physical, or combined trigger (although not obligatory), 3) neurological disorders can be possible triggers, 4) presence of new ECG abnormalities (ST-segment elevation or depression, T-wave inversion, or QTc prolongation), 5) elevated cardiac markers (especially brain natriuretic peptide), 6) significant coronary artery disease can coexist, 7) absence of myocarditis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include AMI, myocarditis, spontaneous coronary artery dissection, or peripartum cardiomyopathy.", "management_and_treatment": "Due to difficulty in distinguishing TTS from ACS, patients should be transferred to a chest pain unit upon presentation and receive guideline based treatment of ACS. There are no randomized clinical trials to support specific acute or long term treatment recommendations in TTS. However, the consensus statement from an international TTS expert panel provides recommendations for optimal treatment of TTS patients. Electrocardiogram monitoring is essential as a prolonged QT-interval may trigger malignant ventricular arrhythmias (torsades de pointes) or atrioventricular-block. Cardiogenic shock or post cardiac arrest requires intensive care with treatment according to the presence or absence of pulmonary edema, low left ventricular ejection fraction, hypotension and bradycardia. In all cases, inotropic substances should be avoided. For long term treatment, angiotensin converting-enzyme inhibitors (ACEi) or angiotensin II receptor blockers (ARB) are recommended as they are associated with improved survival and lower recurrence rates. Echocardiography should be performed during the acute phase to exclude right ventricular involvement, left ventricular outflow tract obstruction or intraventricular thrombus. A follow-up echocardiography should be performed after discharge to confirm recovery.", "prognosis": "The spectrum of TTS is wide and ranges from low to very high risk. In-hospital mortality and long-term outcome in TTS are similar compared to ACS. Recovery of the left ventricular regional systolic dysfunction is usually observed after 4-8 weeks. The risk of recurrence is around 5%."}, {"name": "Bal\u00f3-Krankheit", "sub_name": "Konzentrische Sklerose Bal\u00f3", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare multiple sclerosis variant characterized by discrete concentrically layered, ring-like lesions in the cerebral white matter, consisting of alternating layers of myelinated and demyelinated tissue. Patients most commonly present with symptoms of an intracerebral mass lesion, including headache, cognitive abnormalities, behavioral changes, seizures, aphasia, or hemiparesis, among others, although there may also be classic focal symptoms of multiple sclerosis, such as focal weakness, ataxia, sensory disturbance, or diplopia.", "synonyms": "Concentric demyelination, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Multigenic/multifactorial\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G37.5", "umls": "C0004712", "gard": "5885", "meddra": "10010252"}, {"name": "Bambushaar-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Netherton-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Netherton-Syndrom (NS) ist eine Hautkrankheit. Charakteristische Symptome sind kongenitale ichthyosiforme Erythrodermie (CIE), ein distinkter Defekt des Haarschaftes (Trichorrhexis invaginata; TI) und Atopiesymptome.", "synonyms": "Bambushaar-Syndrom, Com\u00e8l-Netherton-Syndrom, NS, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q80.8", "OMIM": "256500", "UMLS": "C0265962", "GARD": "7182", "MedDRA": "10062909", "epidemiology": "Die gesch\u00e4tzte Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt ist 1: 200.000.", "clinical_description": "Die Patienten haben bei Geburt eine generalisierte Eythrodermie mit Schuppung und gedeihen schlecht. H\u00e4ufige Komplikationen sind hypernatri\u00e4mische Dehydratation, rezidivierende Infekte, Diarrhoe und intestinale Malabsorption. Der Verlauf der Krankheit ist unterschiedlich: Die generalisierte Erythrodermie kann bei einigen Patienten persistieren, h\u00e4ufiger aber entwickelt sie sich w\u00e4hrend der Kindheit in eine Ichthyosis linearis circumflexa (ILC). Die ILC ist eine eher leichte und sehr charakteristische Dermatose mit wandernden erythemat\u00f6sen Plaques und zweischneidigen Schuppen. Die Haaranomalien fallen erst nach der S\u00e4uglingszeit auf: Bei TI und anderen Anomalien des Haarschaftes (Pili torti und/oder Trichrrehexis nodosa) sind die Haare sp\u00e4rlich und br\u00fcchig. Auch Augenbrauen und Wimpern sind betroffen. Die allermeisten Patienten entwickeln atopische Symptome (Asthma, atopische Dermatitis, Nahrungsmittelallergien, Urtikaria, Angio\u00f6dem, erh\u00f6hte IgE-Spiegel). Weitere klinische Symptome sind verz\u00f6gertes Wachstum, Entwicklungsr\u00fcckstand, Kleinwuchs, in einigen F\u00e4llen intellektuelles Defizit und selten auch eine intermittierende Aminoazidurie.", "etiology": "Das NS wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache sind Mutationen im SPINK5-Gen (5q31-q32), das f\u00fcr den Serinprotease-Inhibitor LEKTI kodiert. Dessen Mangel f\u00fchrt zu vermehrter trypsin\u00e4hnlicher hydrolytischer Aktivit\u00e4t im Stratum corneum (SC) mit vorzeitiger Desquamation des SC und schwer gest\u00f6rter Schrankenfunktion der Haut.", "diagnostic_methods": "Eine fr\u00fche Diagnose kann schwierig sein, da die typischsten Symptome (TI und ILC) meist erst im Kindesalter auffallen. Als diagnostischer Test wurde der immunhistochemische Nachweis des LEKTI-Mangels vorgeschlagen. Am sichersten wird die klinische Diagnose jedoch durch den Nachweis der urs\u00e4chlichen SPINK5-Mutationen best\u00e4tigt.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind andere infantile Erythrodermien, besonders die Nichtbull\u00f6se kongenitale ichthyosiforme Erythrodermie (s. dort) und die psoriatische Erythrodermie. Ebenfalls m\u00fcssen atopische Dermatitis, Lamell\u00e4re Ichthyose (s. dort), prim\u00e4re Immundefizienz-Syndrome, seborrhoische Dermatitis und Akrodermatitis enteropathica (s. dort) ausgeschlossen werden.", "genetic_counseling": "Den betroffenen Familien soll eine genetische Beratung und ggf. eine molekulare Pr\u00e4nataldiagnose angeboten werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung ist symptomatisch. Die neonatalen Komplikationen erfordern rasches Handeln. Langfristig werden die Hautsymptome mit Emollientien behandelt. Topische Steroide und topische Immunmodulatoren (Tacrolimus, Pimecrolimus) waren in einigen F\u00e4llen hilfreich. Sie sind aber nicht f\u00fcr eine Langzeittherapie oder die Behandlung gro\u00dfer Fl\u00e4chen geeignet und indiziert, da die Medikamente wegen des Schrankendefektes der Haut vermehrt systemisch absorbiert werden.", "prognosis": "Neugeborene mit lebensbedrohlichen Komplikationen haben eine sehr ung\u00fcnstige Prognose mit hoher Sterblichkeit. Die Hautsymptome und Haaranomalien bestehen lebenslang, verlieren im weiteren Verlauf aber an Schwere, sodass die meisten Patienten ab dem zweiten Lebensjahr anfangen zu gedeihen.", "summary": "Die gesch\u00e4tzte Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt ist 1: 200.000."}, {"name": "Bamforth-Lazarus-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein sehr seltene Form der kongenitalen syndromalen Hypothyreose, die durch Schilddr\u00fcsen-Dysgenesie (in den meisten F\u00e4llen Athyreose), Gaumenspalte und abstehendes Haaren, mit oder ohne Choanalatresie und bifider Epiglottis gekennzeichnet ist. Gesichtsdysmorphien und Porenzephalie wurden in Einzelf\u00e4llen berichtet.", "synonyms": "Bamforth-Syndrom, Hypothyreose - Gaumenspalte, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "E03.1", "OMIM": "241850", "UMLS": "C1855794", "MeSH": "C537901", "GARD": "414", "epidemiology": "Bislang wurden nur 8 Patienten aus 6 Familien beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die Betroffenen pr\u00e4sentieren sich typischerweise bei der Geburt mit Gaumenspalte, abstehendem Haar und Schilddr\u00fcsen-Dysgenesie (in den meisten F\u00e4llen Athyreose), die zu einer kongenitalen Hypothyreose f\u00fchrt und sich mit Lethargie, schlechter Nahrungsaufnahme, Makroglossie, kalter oder gesprenkelter Haut, anhaltender Gelbsucht und Nabelbruch manifestiert. Eine neonatale Hyperbilirubin\u00e4mie ist ebenfalls h\u00e4ufig. Einige Patienten k\u00f6nnen zus\u00e4tzlich eine Choanalatresie und eine bifide Epiglottis aufweisen. Gesichtsdysmorphien, bestehend aus Mikrozephalie, Hypertelorismus, antevertierter Nase, schmalem Nasenr\u00fccken, tief angesetzten Ohren, kleinem Kiefer und Retrognathie, wurde in einem Fall berichtet. K\u00fcrzlich wurde in einem Fall auch eine Porenzephalie beschrieben.", "etiology": "Das Bamforth-Lazarus-Syndrom wird durch homozygote Missense-Mutationen innerhalb der Forkhead-Dom\u00e4ne des FOXE1-Gens (9q22) verursacht, das f\u00fcr den Thyroid-Transkriptionsfaktor 2 (TTF-2) kodiert. TTF-2 wird in der Schilddr\u00fcse (sowie an anderen Stellen wie der Zunge, der Epiglottis und dem Gaumen) exprimiert und spielt vermutlich eine entscheidende Rolle bei der Morphogenese der Schilddr\u00fcse. Die bisher berichteten F\u00e4lle sind alle auf homozygote Loss-of-Function-Mutationen im FOXE1 zur\u00fcckzuf\u00fchren, abgesehen von einem Fall in der eine homozygote de novo Mutation beschrieben wurde, die eine erh\u00f6hte Expression des Schilddr\u00fcsengens verursacht.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf den vorhandenen klinischen Symptomen und wird durch die Befunde der Schilddr\u00fcsen-Ultraschalluntersuchung (USG) und der Computertomographie erg\u00e4nzt. Das Schilddr\u00fcsengewebe ist entweder v\u00f6llig abwesend oder nicht funktionsf\u00e4hig. Die Serumwerte des Schilddr\u00fcsenstimulationshormons (TSH) sollten gemessen werden (die Werte sind im Filterpapiertest des Neugeborenen-Screenings erh\u00f6ht, wie es in allen F\u00e4llen von Athyreose der Fall ist), um die notwendige Behandlungsdosis zu bestimmen. Ein molekulargenetischer Test kann eine Mutation im FOXE1-Gen identifizieren und die Diagnose best\u00e4tigen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Zu den Differentialdiagnosen geh\u00f6ren andere Formen der syndromalen Hypothyreose wie das Johanson-Blizzard-Syndrom.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Auch wenn eine pr\u00e4natale Diagnose nicht durchgef\u00fchrt wird, k\u00f6nnen eine Gaumenspalte und in einigen F\u00e4llen ein Polyhydramnion (als Folge einer Choanalatresie) bei einer routinem\u00e4\u00dfigen vorgeburtlichen Sonographie beobachtet werden.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt und eine genetische Beratung ist m\u00f6glich. Ein Gro\u00dfteil der bisher berichteten Patienten stammen von blutsverwandten Eltern, die beide heterozygot f\u00fcr die Genmutation sind. Wenn beide Eltern heterozygote Tr\u00e4ger sind, besteht ein Risiko von 25 %, die Krankheit an die Nachkommen weiterzugeben.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Schilddr\u00fcsenhormon-Ersatztherapie ist die Standardbehandlung f\u00fcr Personen mit Bamforth-Lazarus-Syndrom und sollte so bald wie m\u00f6glich begonnen werden. Die erforderliche Dosierung von synthetischem Thyroxin (T4) h\u00e4ngt vom Alter, Gewicht und anderen medizinischen Bedingungen des Patienten ab. Regelm\u00e4\u00dfige Nachuntersuchungen werden empfohlen, um jede Schwankung des TSH-Spiegels zu \u00fcberwachen, und die Behandlung ist lebenslang. Bei Neugeborenen, die mit Hyperbilirubin\u00e4mie geboren werden, ist eine Phototherapie oft wirksam. Chirurgische Eingriffe f\u00fcr Gaumenspalten (Kiefer-Gesichtsrekonstruktion und plastische Chirurgie) und Choanalatresie (Operation zur Wiederer\u00f6ffnung der Naseng\u00e4nge) sollten in einem spezialisierten Gesundheitszentrum besprochen werden. Es kann auch eine Sprachtherapie erforderlich sein.", "prognosis": "Bei richtiger Behandlung ist die Prognose gut und die Kinder k\u00f6nnen ein normales k\u00f6rperliches Wachstum, eine normale pubert\u00e4re Entwicklung und eine normale Funktion des Hypophysenvorderlappens haben. Die Lebensqualit\u00e4t kann jedoch durch die Gaumenspalte/Choanalatresie beeintr\u00e4chtigt werden, da mehrere Operationen erforderlich sein k\u00f6nnen. Die intellektuelle Entwicklung ist normal, wenn die Behandlung der Hypothyreose nicht verz\u00f6gert wird.", "summary": "Bislang wurden nur 8 Patienten aus 6 Familien beschrieben."}, {"name": "Bamforth-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Bamforth-Lazarus-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein sehr seltene Form der kongenitalen syndromalen Hypothyreose, die durch Schilddr\u00fcsen-Dysgenesie (in den meisten F\u00e4llen Athyreose), Gaumenspalte und abstehendes Haaren, mit oder ohne Choanalatresie und bifider Epiglottis gekennzeichnet ist. Gesichtsdysmorphien und Porenzephalie wurden in Einzelf\u00e4llen berichtet.", "synonyms": "Bamforth-Syndrom, Hypothyreose - Gaumenspalte, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "E03.1", "OMIM": "241850", "UMLS": "C1855794", "MeSH": "C537901", "GARD": "414", "epidemiology": "Bislang wurden nur 8 Patienten aus 6 Familien beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die Betroffenen pr\u00e4sentieren sich typischerweise bei der Geburt mit Gaumenspalte, abstehendem Haar und Schilddr\u00fcsen-Dysgenesie (in den meisten F\u00e4llen Athyreose), die zu einer kongenitalen Hypothyreose f\u00fchrt und sich mit Lethargie, schlechter Nahrungsaufnahme, Makroglossie, kalter oder gesprenkelter Haut, anhaltender Gelbsucht und Nabelbruch manifestiert. Eine neonatale Hyperbilirubin\u00e4mie ist ebenfalls h\u00e4ufig. Einige Patienten k\u00f6nnen zus\u00e4tzlich eine Choanalatresie und eine bifide Epiglottis aufweisen. Gesichtsdysmorphien, bestehend aus Mikrozephalie, Hypertelorismus, antevertierter Nase, schmalem Nasenr\u00fccken, tief angesetzten Ohren, kleinem Kiefer und Retrognathie, wurde in einem Fall berichtet. K\u00fcrzlich wurde in einem Fall auch eine Porenzephalie beschrieben.", "etiology": "Das Bamforth-Lazarus-Syndrom wird durch homozygote Missense-Mutationen innerhalb der Forkhead-Dom\u00e4ne des FOXE1-Gens (9q22) verursacht, das f\u00fcr den Thyroid-Transkriptionsfaktor 2 (TTF-2) kodiert. TTF-2 wird in der Schilddr\u00fcse (sowie an anderen Stellen wie der Zunge, der Epiglottis und dem Gaumen) exprimiert und spielt vermutlich eine entscheidende Rolle bei der Morphogenese der Schilddr\u00fcse. Die bisher berichteten F\u00e4lle sind alle auf homozygote Loss-of-Function-Mutationen im FOXE1 zur\u00fcckzuf\u00fchren, abgesehen von einem Fall in der eine homozygote de novo Mutation beschrieben wurde, die eine erh\u00f6hte Expression des Schilddr\u00fcsengens verursacht.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf den vorhandenen klinischen Symptomen und wird durch die Befunde der Schilddr\u00fcsen-Ultraschalluntersuchung (USG) und der Computertomographie erg\u00e4nzt. Das Schilddr\u00fcsengewebe ist entweder v\u00f6llig abwesend oder nicht funktionsf\u00e4hig. Die Serumwerte des Schilddr\u00fcsenstimulationshormons (TSH) sollten gemessen werden (die Werte sind im Filterpapiertest des Neugeborenen-Screenings erh\u00f6ht, wie es in allen F\u00e4llen von Athyreose der Fall ist), um die notwendige Behandlungsdosis zu bestimmen. Ein molekulargenetischer Test kann eine Mutation im FOXE1-Gen identifizieren und die Diagnose best\u00e4tigen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Zu den Differentialdiagnosen geh\u00f6ren andere Formen der syndromalen Hypothyreose wie das Johanson-Blizzard-Syndrom.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Auch wenn eine pr\u00e4natale Diagnose nicht durchgef\u00fchrt wird, k\u00f6nnen eine Gaumenspalte und in einigen F\u00e4llen ein Polyhydramnion (als Folge einer Choanalatresie) bei einer routinem\u00e4\u00dfigen vorgeburtlichen Sonographie beobachtet werden.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt und eine genetische Beratung ist m\u00f6glich. Ein Gro\u00dfteil der bisher berichteten Patienten stammen von blutsverwandten Eltern, die beide heterozygot f\u00fcr die Genmutation sind. Wenn beide Eltern heterozygote Tr\u00e4ger sind, besteht ein Risiko von 25 %, die Krankheit an die Nachkommen weiterzugeben.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Schilddr\u00fcsenhormon-Ersatztherapie ist die Standardbehandlung f\u00fcr Personen mit Bamforth-Lazarus-Syndrom und sollte so bald wie m\u00f6glich begonnen werden. Die erforderliche Dosierung von synthetischem Thyroxin (T4) h\u00e4ngt vom Alter, Gewicht und anderen medizinischen Bedingungen des Patienten ab. Regelm\u00e4\u00dfige Nachuntersuchungen werden empfohlen, um jede Schwankung des TSH-Spiegels zu \u00fcberwachen, und die Behandlung ist lebenslang. Bei Neugeborenen, die mit Hyperbilirubin\u00e4mie geboren werden, ist eine Phototherapie oft wirksam. Chirurgische Eingriffe f\u00fcr Gaumenspalten (Kiefer-Gesichtsrekonstruktion und plastische Chirurgie) und Choanalatresie (Operation zur Wiederer\u00f6ffnung der Naseng\u00e4nge) sollten in einem spezialisierten Gesundheitszentrum besprochen werden. Es kann auch eine Sprachtherapie erforderlich sein.", "prognosis": "Bei richtiger Behandlung ist die Prognose gut und die Kinder k\u00f6nnen ein normales k\u00f6rperliches Wachstum, eine normale pubert\u00e4re Entwicklung und eine normale Funktion des Hypophysenvorderlappens haben. Die Lebensqualit\u00e4t kann jedoch durch die Gaumenspalte/Choanalatresie beeintr\u00e4chtigt werden, da mehrere Operationen erforderlich sein k\u00f6nnen. Die intellektuelle Entwicklung ist normal, wenn die Behandlung der Hypothyreose nicht verz\u00f6gert wird.", "summary": "Bislang wurden nur 8 Patienten aus 6 Familien beschrieben."}, {"name": "Bandheterotopie, subkortikale", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, non-syndromic cerebral malformation due to abnormal neuronal migration characterized by variable clinical manifestation depending on the location, size and thickness of subcortical bands. Clinical presentation ranges from mild cognitive deficit to developmental delay with severe intellectual disability, seizures and behavioral problems.", "synonyms": "Subcortical laminar heterotopia, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0X-linked recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Unknown\u00a0", "icd_10": "Q04.3", "omim": "300067\u00a0 600348\u00a0 607432", "umls": "C1848201", "gard": "1904"}, {"name": "Bangstad-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Assoziation, die bisher nur bei 2 Geschwistern beschrieben wurde: Primordialer Zwergwuchs mit 'Vogelkopf', progrediente Ataxie, Struma, prim\u00e4re Gonadeninsuffizienz und insulin-resistenter Diabetes mellitus. Die Plasmaspiegel von TSH, PTH, LH, FSH, ACTH, Glukagon und Insulin waren erh\u00f6ht. Da alle diese Hormone durch verschiedene Rezeptoren wirken, wurde als Ursache ein allgemeiner Zellmembran-Defekt angenommen. Die Vererbung ist vermutlich autosomal-rezessiv. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Bangstad syndrome is a rare endocrine disease characterized by the association of primordial birdheaded nanism, progressive ataxia, goiter, primary gonadal insufficiency and insulin resistant diabetes mellitus. Plasma concentrations of TSH, PTH, LH, FSH, ACTH, glucagon, and insulin are usually elevated. A generalized cell membrane defect was suggested to be the pathophysiological abnormality in these patients. The mode of inheritance was thought to be autosomal recessive. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1989.", "synonyms": "Ataxia-diabetes-goiter-gonadal insufficiency syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "E31.8", "omim": "210740", "umls": "C0342284", "mesh": "C537902", "gard": "812"}, {"name": "Banki-Syndrom", "german_description": "Im Jahr 1965 wurde eine ungarischen Familie beschrieben, in der Mitglieder aus 3 Generationen Fusionen von Handwurzelknochen (Lunatum und Cuneiforme), Klinodaktylie, Klinometakarpie, Brachymetakarpie und Leptometakarpie (d\u00fcnne Diaphysen der Metacarpalia) aufwiesen. Es scheint sich um eine singul\u00e4re dominante Mutation zu handeln. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Banki syndrome is a synostosis syndrome, reported in a single Hungarian family in which members of 3 generations showed lunotriquetral synostosis, clinodactyly, clinometacarpy, brachymetacarpy and leptometacarpy (thin diaphysis). It appeared to be a unique dominant mutation. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1965.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q68.1", "omim": "109300", "umls": "C1862319", "gard": "813"}, {"name": "Bannayan-Riley-Ruvalcaba-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, das BRRS wird aber generell f\u00fcr eine seltene Krankheit gehalten.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare developmental defect during embryogenesis characterized by hamartomatous intestinal polyposis, lipomas, macrocephaly and genital lentiginosis.", "synonyms": "BRRS, Myhre-Riley-Smith syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "158350", "umls": "C0265326", "gard": "5887", "epidemiology": "The prevalence is unknown, but Bannayan-Riley-Ruvalcaba syndrome (BRRS) is generally considered as a rare disease.", "clinical_description": "BRRS shares some of the clinical characteristics of Cowden syndrome (CS;) but with differing frequencies. Unlike CS, the classic presentation of BRRS occurs neonatally or shortly thereafter with macrocephaly, Hashimoto struma, lipomatosis, vascular malformations and speckled lentiginosis of the penis or vulva. Developmental delay and gastrointestinal hamartomatous polyposis occur in a subset of BRRS patients. There should be a low threshold to evaluate for autism spectrum disorder in BRRS, especially if a PTEN mutation is found. It is unclear if the case-based signs of myopathic processes in proximal muscles, pectus excavatum, joint hyperextensibility, scoliosis and high birth weight are truly components of BRRS. Although predisposition to cancer was not thought to be a feature of this syndrome, it is now believed that BRRS patients with a germline PTEN mutation share the same risk of cancer development as CS patients.", "etiology": "BRRS is caused (in 60% of cases) by a mutation in the phosphatase and tensin homolog (PTEN) gene (10q23) that encodes PTEN, a dual-specificity phosphatase. When BRRS is accompanied by germline PTEN mutations, it belongs to the PHTS group. Because the non-PTEN CS-related genes (ex. SDHB-D, AKT1, PIK3CA and KLLN) have not been formally studied in BRRS, it is not clear if they are also etiologic for non-PTEN-related BRRS.", "diagnostic_methods": "There are no specific criteria for diagnosis of BRRS but it is usually determined by the clinical presentation. The pediatric criteria of the PTEN scoring systemcan be used and are heavily based on the presence or absence of macrocephaly and the presence of one of four sub-criteria (autism spectrum disorder, dermatologic features, vascular malformations and/or gastrointestinal polyposis). A germline PTEN mutation confirms that the BRRS patient belongs to the PHTS group.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include Lhermitte-Duclos syndrome, juvenile polyposis syndrome, Peutz-Jeghers syndrome (PJS), Birt-Hogg-Dube syndrome, Proteus syndrome, Cowden syndrome, Gorlin syndrome, and neurofibromatosis type 1.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible for at-risk pregnancies if the disease-causing mutation is discovered in an affected family member.", "genetic_counseling": "BRRS is inherited autosomal dominantly. Genetic counseling can be offered to patients with germline PTEN mutations and asymptomatic family members should also be tested for the mutation to identify those that need to be monitored before symptom onset.", "management_and_treatment": "Management and treatment are multidisciplinary. Monitoring for symptoms of gastrointestinal hamartomatous polyposis is important as they can be more severe than those seen in CS. Once a germline PTEN mutation is identified, the patient should undergo a screening thyroid ultrasound exam, starting at the age of 7, and a low threshold for evaluation for autism spectrum disorder is strongly recommended. In patients over the age of 18, a yearly skin check is recommended. A colonoscopy and biennial renal imaging should begin between the ages of 35-40, unless symptomatic. Women should perform monthly breast self-examinations and yearly breast screenings as well as transvaginal ultrasounds (postmenopausal) or endometrial biopsies beginning at the age of 35. It is also important to pay attention to neurological and vascular malformations as well as GI symptoms.", "prognosis": "The prognosis is unknown and is dependent on initial presentation and likely genotype."}, {"name": "Bantu-Siderose", "sub_name": "Afrikanische Eisen\u00fcberladung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Afrikanische Eisen\u00fcberladung ist eine seltene, in Sub-Sahara-afrikanischen Bev\u00f6lkerungen auftretende St\u00f6rung mit Eisen\u00fcberladung, verursacht durch exzessive Eisenaufnahme mit der Nahrung und eventuelle Beteiligung genetischer Faktoren. Die Folge sind portale Leberfibrose und mikronodul\u00e4re Zirrhose.", "synonyms": "Bantu-Siderose, ", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter, \u00c4ltere Erwachsene", "ICD-10": "E83.1", "OMIM": "601195", "UMLS": "C0268063", "GARD": "8495"}, {"name": "BAP1-abh\u00e4ngiges Tumorpr\u00e4dispositionssyndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "BAP1-related tumor predisposition syndrome (TPDS) is an inherited cancer-predisposing syndrome, associated with germline mutations in BAP1 tumor suppressor gene. The most commonly observed cancer types include uveal melanoma, malignant mesothelioma, renal cell carcinoma, lung, ovarian, pancreatic, breast cancer and meningioma, with variable age of onset. Common cutaneous manifestations include malignant melanoma, basal cell carcinoma and benign melanocytic BAP1-mutated atypical intradermal tumors (MBAIT) presenting as multiple skin-coloured to reddish-brown dome-shaped to pedunculated, well-circumscribed papules with an average size of 5 mm, histologically predominantly composed of epithelioid melanocytes with abundant amphophilic cytoplasm, prominent nucleoli and large, vesicular nuclei that vary substantially in size and shape.", "synonyms": "Tumor susceptibility linked to germline BAP1 mutations, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "D23.9", "omim": "614327"}, {"name": "Baraitser-Brett-Piesowicz-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Intrauterines infektions\u00e4hnliches Syndrom, kongenitales", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "BLC-PMG, Baraitser-Brett-Piesowicz-Syndrom, Baraitser-Reardon-Syndrom, Bilaterale band-\u00e4hnliche Kalzifizierung mit Polymikrogyrie, Mikrozephalie - intrakraniale Verkalkungen - Intelligenzminderung, Pseudo-TORCH-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "251290", "UMLS": "C2931662\u00a0 C3489725", "GARD": "12426\u00a0 815", "summary": "Das Kongenitale Intrauterine Infektions\u00e4hnliche Syndrom (KIIS) ist bei Geburt gekennzeichnet durch Mikrozephalie, intrakraniale Verkalkungen, neurologische Unreife, Krampfanf\u00e4lle und einen weiteren klinischen Verlauf, wie er bei Patienten nach intrauteriner Infektion mit Toxoplasma gondii gesehen wird. Trotz wiederholter Tests werden auch andere bekannte infekt\u00f6se Ursachen, R\u00f6teln, Zytomegalievirus oder Herpes simplex (sog. TORCH-Syndrom) immer wieder ausgeschlossen. Bisher wurden mehr als 30 F\u00e4lle publiziert. Die beschriebenen F\u00e4lle sind klinisch sehr heterogen. Zu den unterschiedlich ausgepr\u00e4gten Symptomen z\u00e4hlen intrauterine Wachstumsverz\u00f6gerung, Hepatosplenomegalie, Hyperbilirubin\u00e4mie, Kleinhirn-Hypoplasie oder -Atrophie und kongenitale Katarakt. Patienten mit gleichzeitig bestehender Thrombozytopenie werden als distinkter Untertyp angesehen. Mehrere famili\u00e4re F\u00e4lle sind mit autosomal-rezessiver Vererbung vereinbar. Die Ursache ist weiterhin unklar. Die Diagnose basiert auf dem klinischen Bild und erfordert den Ausschluss intrauteriner Infektionen. Das KIIS zeigt eine erhebliche klinische \u00dcberschneidung mit dem Aicardi-Goutieres-Syndrome (AGS, s. dort). Nach Ansicht einiger Autoren sprechen Ver\u00e4nderungen der Zerebrospinalfl\u00fcssigkeit (Leukozytose, erh\u00f6hte IFN-Alpha-Spiegel) f\u00fcr AGS und gest\u00f6rte Leberfunktion, angeborene Mikrozephalie und Thromozytopenie f\u00fcr KIIS. Da aber beide Syndrome klinisch au\u00dferordentlich variabel sind, wurde auch vermutet, dass AGS und KIIS unterschiedliche Auspr\u00e4gungen der gleichen Krankheit sind. Weitere Differentialdiagnosen sind andere Syndrome mit Mikrozephalie und intrakranialen Verkalkungen: Cockayne-Syndrom, COFS-Syndrom (das in der Regel als neonatale Form des Cockayne-Syndroms angesehen wird), das Hoyeraal-Hreidarsson-Syndrom (die neonatale Auspr\u00e4gung des Dyskeratosis congenita-Syndroms; s. diese Termini), einige F\u00e4lle von mitochondrialer Enzephalomyelopathie und Pseudohypoparathyreoidismus. Fr\u00fchere F\u00e4lle wurden evtl. als 'Fahr-Krankheit` beschrieben, eine \u00fcberholte Bezeichnung f\u00fcr urs\u00e4chlich heterogene Krankheitsbilder mit intrakranialen Verkalkungen. Die Behandlung ist ausschlie\u00dflich symptomatisch. Die Prognose ist unterschiedlich, in ung\u00fcnstigen F\u00e4llen starben mehrere der Patienten im ersten Lebensjahr."}, {"name": "Baraitser-Burn-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Oro-fazio-digitales Syndrom Typ 4", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Baraitser-Burn-Syndrom, Mohr-Majewski-Syndrom, OFD4, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.0", "OMIM": "258860", "UMLS": "C0406727", "GARD": "816", "summary": "Das Oro-fazio-digitale Syndrom Typ 4 ist gekennzeichnet durch Zungenhamartome, postaxiale Polysyndaktylie der H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe, mesomele Verk\u00fcrzung der Beine und Pes equinovarus. Bisher wurden etwa 15 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Weitere Symptome sind hypoplastische Mandibula, Mikrogenie, Gaumenspalte, prominente Augen und tiefsitzende Ohren. Die Intelligenz ist normal. Autosomal-rezessive Vererbung wird vermutet, das urs\u00e4chliche Gen ist nicht bekannt. "}, {"name": "Baraitser-Reardon-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Intrauterines infektions\u00e4hnliches Syndrom, kongenitales", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "BLC-PMG, Baraitser-Brett-Piesowicz-Syndrom, Baraitser-Reardon-Syndrom, Bilaterale band-\u00e4hnliche Kalzifizierung mit Polymikrogyrie, Mikrozephalie - intrakraniale Verkalkungen - Intelligenzminderung, Pseudo-TORCH-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "251290", "UMLS": "C2931662\u00a0 C3489725", "GARD": "12426\u00a0 815", "summary": "Das Kongenitale Intrauterine Infektions\u00e4hnliche Syndrom (KIIS) ist bei Geburt gekennzeichnet durch Mikrozephalie, intrakraniale Verkalkungen, neurologische Unreife, Krampfanf\u00e4lle und einen weiteren klinischen Verlauf, wie er bei Patienten nach intrauteriner Infektion mit Toxoplasma gondii gesehen wird. Trotz wiederholter Tests werden auch andere bekannte infekt\u00f6se Ursachen, R\u00f6teln, Zytomegalievirus oder Herpes simplex (sog. TORCH-Syndrom) immer wieder ausgeschlossen. Bisher wurden mehr als 30 F\u00e4lle publiziert. Die beschriebenen F\u00e4lle sind klinisch sehr heterogen. Zu den unterschiedlich ausgepr\u00e4gten Symptomen z\u00e4hlen intrauterine Wachstumsverz\u00f6gerung, Hepatosplenomegalie, Hyperbilirubin\u00e4mie, Kleinhirn-Hypoplasie oder -Atrophie und kongenitale Katarakt. Patienten mit gleichzeitig bestehender Thrombozytopenie werden als distinkter Untertyp angesehen. Mehrere famili\u00e4re F\u00e4lle sind mit autosomal-rezessiver Vererbung vereinbar. Die Ursache ist weiterhin unklar. Die Diagnose basiert auf dem klinischen Bild und erfordert den Ausschluss intrauteriner Infektionen. Das KIIS zeigt eine erhebliche klinische \u00dcberschneidung mit dem Aicardi-Goutieres-Syndrome (AGS, s. dort). Nach Ansicht einiger Autoren sprechen Ver\u00e4nderungen der Zerebrospinalfl\u00fcssigkeit (Leukozytose, erh\u00f6hte IFN-Alpha-Spiegel) f\u00fcr AGS und gest\u00f6rte Leberfunktion, angeborene Mikrozephalie und Thromozytopenie f\u00fcr KIIS. Da aber beide Syndrome klinisch au\u00dferordentlich variabel sind, wurde auch vermutet, dass AGS und KIIS unterschiedliche Auspr\u00e4gungen der gleichen Krankheit sind. Weitere Differentialdiagnosen sind andere Syndrome mit Mikrozephalie und intrakranialen Verkalkungen: Cockayne-Syndrom, COFS-Syndrom (das in der Regel als neonatale Form des Cockayne-Syndroms angesehen wird), das Hoyeraal-Hreidarsson-Syndrom (die neonatale Auspr\u00e4gung des Dyskeratosis congenita-Syndroms; s. diese Termini), einige F\u00e4lle von mitochondrialer Enzephalomyelopathie und Pseudohypoparathyreoidismus. Fr\u00fchere F\u00e4lle wurden evtl. als 'Fahr-Krankheit` beschrieben, eine \u00fcberholte Bezeichnung f\u00fcr urs\u00e4chlich heterogene Krankheitsbilder mit intrakranialen Verkalkungen. Die Behandlung ist ausschlie\u00dflich symptomatisch. Die Prognose ist unterschiedlich, in ung\u00fcnstigen F\u00e4llen starben mehrere der Patienten im ersten Lebensjahr."}, {"name": "Baraitser-Winter zerebro-fronto-faziales Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Baraitser-Winter-Syndrom (BWS) ist ein Fehlbildungssyndrom. Charakteristische Zeichen sind faziale Dysmorphien (metopische Leiste, Hypertelorismus mit Ptose, breite kolbige Nase, geschwungene Augenbrauen, zunehmende Vergr\u00f6berung des Gesichtes), okul\u00e4res Kolobom, Pachygyrie und/oder Band-Heterotopien mit antero-posteriorem Gradienten, fortschreitende Versteifung der Gelenke und intellektuelles Defizit unterschiedlichen Ausma\u00dfes, oft mit schwerer Epilepsie. Das Fryns-Aftimos-Syndrom (FAS) bezeichnet das Erscheinungsbild des BWS bei \u00e4lteren Patienten.", "synonyms": "BWCFF, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.0", "OMIM": "243310\u00a0 614583", "UMLS": "C1855722", "GARD": "5279", "epidemiology": "BWS und FAS wurden anf\u00e4nglich f\u00fcr unterschiedliche Entit\u00e4ten gehalten. Sie wurden bisher bei etwa 30 nicht miteinander verwandten Patienten beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Das klinische Bild umfasst sehr auff\u00e4llige Dysmorphien: Eine metopische Leiste, die dem Sch\u00e4del ein trigonozephales Aussehen verleiht, Hypertelorismus, lange und breite, schr\u00e4g abw\u00e4rts verlaufende Lidspalten, kongenitale Ptose, hoch gebogene Augenbrauen, gro\u00dfe Nase mit gro\u00dfer kolbige oder flacher Spitze, prominente Nasenwurzel, langes Philtrum und leichte Mikrogenie. Die Gesichtsz\u00fcge vergr\u00f6bern sich im sp\u00e4ten Kindesalter und in der Adoleszenz mit ausgepr\u00e4gten Nasenfalten. Lippen- und Gaumenspalte sind m\u00f6gliche Symptome. H\u00e4ufig bestehen Augenanomalien, wie Iris- und/oder Netzhautkolobom mit oder ohne Mikrophthalmie. Bei den meisten Patienten wird eine gewisse Dysplasie der Hirnrinde, Pachygyrie (oft im Frontalhirn st\u00e4rker ausgepr\u00e4gt) und subkortikale Band-Heterotopien. In schweren F\u00e4llen hat das Gehirn oft ein lissenzephales Aussehen, aber andere Patienten haben ein normales MRI. Der Kopfumfang entwickelt sich im Kleinkindalter in Richtung auf eine Mikrozephalie. Das Wachstum ist leicht verz\u00f6gert, die Endgr\u00f6\u00dfe ist unternormal. Patienten mit Hydronephrose wurden beschrieben, Fehlbildungen der inneren Organe sind jedoch selten. Der Grad der geistigen Behinderung reicht von leicht bis sehr schwer und korreliert mit dem Schweregrad der Hirnanomalien und dem Vorhandensein einer (nicht selten therapieresistenten) Krampfneigung. Im Kleinkindalter bestimmen die neurologischen Probleme das klinische Bild, w\u00e4hrend die fazialen Dysmorphien weniger im Vordergrund stehen. In der Adoleszenz kommt es in den gro\u00dfen Gelenken (Knie, Schulter, Ellenbogen) zu eingeschr\u00e4nkter Beweglichkeit, gefolgt von Gangst\u00f6rungen im Erwachsenenalter. Auch eine Kyphoskoliose kann sich entwickeln.", "etiology": "Das BWS ist genetisch heterogen. Es wird verursacht durch heterozygote Mutationenen in einem der 2 Gene, die f\u00fcr ubiquit\u00e4r exprimierte Aktine kodieren: Das ACTB-Gen (7p22; Locus BRWS1) und das ACTG1-Gen (17q25; Locus BRWS2). Alle Mutationen sind Missense-Mutationen mit wahrscheinlich konstitutiver Genaktivit\u00e4t ('gain of function'-Mechanismus), da Deletionen der gleichen Gene nicht zum BWS-Ph\u00e4notyp f\u00fchren.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose wird durch Mutationsnachweis in den Genen ACTG1 und ACTB best\u00e4tigt.", "differential_diagnosis": "Im Kleinkindalter kann das BWS dem nun Noonan-Syndrom \u00e4hneln (siehe dort). Beim Typ Teebi des Hypertelorismus (siehe dort) sehen die Lidspalten \u00e4hnlich aus. CHARGE-Syndrom, der Typ Norman-Roberts des Lissenzephalie-Syndroms und andere Syndrome mit Lissenzephalie/Pachygyrie (siehe diese Termini) \u00fcberlappen teilweise das klinische Bild des BWS.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Das abnorme Gyrierungs-Muster kann pr\u00e4natal erkannt werden. Das Wiederholungsrisiko des BWS wird auf <1% gesch\u00e4tzt. Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik ist m\u00f6glich, es m\u00fcssen jedoch vorher das niedrige Wiederholungsrisiko und das Risiko einer Fehlgeburt diskutiert werden.", "genetic_counseling": "Alle molekular best\u00e4tigten F\u00e4lle waren sporadisch. Theoretisch ist autosomal-dominante Vererbung m\u00f6glich, wurde bisher jedoch nicht beobachtet.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung erfordert angemessene p\u00e4dagogische Ma\u00dfnahmen. Die Behandlung der Epilepsie ist, wie auch bei anderen Pachygyrie-Formen, schwierig. Einige Patienten sind sogar gegen Kombinationstherapien resistent. Orthop\u00e4dische Versorgung ist unerl\u00e4sslich, da die zunehmende Versteifung der Gelenke zum Verlust der autonomen Gehf\u00e4higkeit f\u00fchren kann.", "prognosis": "Einige Patienten mit schweren Hirnanomalien haben in fr\u00fchem Alter eine ung\u00fcnstige Prognose. Die meisten Patienten mit leichteren ZNS-Anomalien k\u00f6nnen das Erwachsenenalter erreichen, werden aber nie autonom.", "summary": "BWS und FAS wurden anf\u00e4nglich f\u00fcr unterschiedliche Entit\u00e4ten gehalten. Sie wurden bisher bei etwa 30 nicht miteinander verwandten Patienten beschrieben."}, {"name": "Barakat-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Hypoparathyreoidismus-sensorineurale Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Nierendysplasie-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das HDR-Syndrom ist eine seltene, klinisch heterogene genetische St\u00f6rung, die durch die Trias von Hypoparathyreoidismus (H ypoparathyroidism), Sensorineuraler Taubheit (D eafness) und Nierenerkrankung (R enal disease) gekennzeichnet ist.", "synonyms": "Barakat-Syndrom, HDR-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "146255", "UMLS": "C1840333", "GARD": "2911", "epidemiology": "Die genaue Pr\u00e4valenz ist unbekannt, aber das Syndrom gilt als sehr selten. Bis heute sind in der medizinischen Weltliteratur etwa 180 F\u00e4lle in verschiedenen ethnischen Gruppen und bei beiden Geschlechtern beschrieben worden.", "clinical_description": "Das HDR-Syndrom kann in jedem Alter mit Taubheit, Hypokalz\u00e4mie, Tetanie und afebrilen Kr\u00e4mpfen auftreten. Da die pr\u00e4natale Ultraschalluntersuchung heute zur Routine geh\u00f6rt, k\u00f6nnen angeborene Nieren- und Harnwegsanomalien der erste Befund sein. Hypoparathyreoidismus tritt bei 93% der Patienten auf. Sensorineuraler Taubheit tritt bei 96% der Patienten auf und ist in der Regel beidseitig, wobei die Beeintr\u00e4chtigung von m\u00e4\u00dfig bis schwerwiegend reicht. Eine Nierenerkrankung tritt bei 72% der Patienten auf und umfasst kongenitale Anomalien der Niere und der ableitenden Harnwege (zystische, dysplastische, hypoplastische oder aplastische Nieren, Verformungen von Nierenkelch und Nierenbecken, vesikoureteraler Reflux), chronische Nierenerkrankungen, nephrotisches Syndrom, H\u00e4maturie, Proteinurie und andere. Einige zus\u00e4tzliche Merkmale, wie z. B. angeborene Herzfehler, Gesichts- und Augenanomalien (Retinitis pigmentosa, Nystagmus, Pseudopapillen\u00f6dem), Basalganglienverkalkungen, Psoriasis, Wachstumsst\u00f6rungen und kognitive Behinderungen wurden ebenfalls beschrieben.", "etiology": "Das HDR-Syndrom wird haupts\u00e4chlich durch Mutationen im GATA3-Gen (10p14) verursacht. Da jedoch nicht bei allen berichteten Patienten GATA3-Defekte nachgewiesen wurden, ist es m\u00f6glich, dass auch andere Gendefekte assoziiert sind. GATA3 geh\u00f6rt zu einer Familie von dualen Zink-Finger-Transkriptionsfaktoren, die bei Wirbeltieren an der embryonalen Entwicklung der Nebenschilddr\u00fcsen, des Geh\u00f6rs und der Nieren sowie des Thymus und des zentralen Nervensystems beteiligt sind. Die Variabilit\u00e4t der Expression und die unvollst\u00e4ndige Penetranz von GATA3-Mutationen f\u00fchren zu der beobachteten ph\u00e4notypischen Heterogenit\u00e4t.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf dem klinischen Befund und kann durch die Messung des Parathormonspiegels, einem Audiogramm oder einer auditorischen Hirnstammreaktionsstudie, bildgebende Nierenuntersuchungen und, falls angezeigt, eine Nierenbiopsie unterst\u00fctzt werden. Obwohl das Syndrom ph\u00e4notypisch durch die ''HDR''-Trias definiert ist, weisen nur 65% der gemeldeten Patienten eine Kombination aller 3 Merkmale auf. Alle anderen Betroffenen zeigen verschiedene Kombinationen von ''H'', ''D'' und ''R''. Die Diagnose wird bei Patienten best\u00e4tigt, die die ''HDR''-Trias aufweisen oder alternativ zwei der drei Merkmale plus eine positive Familienanamnese haben. Patienten mit isolierter Taubheit oder Nierenerkrankung und solche, die die oben genannten Kriterien nicht erf\u00fcllen, ben\u00f6tigen einen positiven GATA3-Test, damit die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt werden kann. GATA3-Mutationen wurden nicht mit isoliertem Hypoparathyreoidismus in Verbindung gebracht.", "differential_diagnosis": "Zu den Differentialdiagnosen geh\u00f6ren der famili\u00e4re idiopathische Hypoparathyreoidismus, die progressive sensorineurale Taubheit ohne Nierenerkrankung, der autosomal-rezessive Hypoparathyreoidismus mit Niereninsuffizienz und Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung sowie das Deletionssyndrom 22q11. Das HDR-Syndrom sollte bei S\u00e4uglingen in Betracht gezogen werden, bei denen pr\u00e4natal ein Chromosom 10p-Defekt oder angeborene Anomalien der Niere und der Harnwege diagnostiziert werden.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Vererbung ist autosomal-dominant. Familienmitglieder betroffener Patienten sollten auf klinische Merkmale des Syndroms untersucht werden und ein GATA3-Gentest sollte in Betracht gezogen werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung von Patienten mit HDR-Syndrom sollte umfassend sein und eine genetische Beratung einschlie\u00dfen. Die Behandlung der Erkrankung erfolgt im Wesentlichen symptomatisch und h\u00e4ngt von den spezifischen klinischen Befunden und dem Schweregrad der Erkrankung ab. Hypokalz\u00e4mie ist in der Regel das h\u00e4ufigste behandlungsbed\u00fcrftige Problem. Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit sollte fr\u00fchzeitig mit einer H\u00f6runterst\u00fctzung und, falls n\u00f6tig, mit einem Cochlea-Implantat behandelt werden. Die Behandlung von Nierenerkrankungen h\u00e4ngt von der jeweiligen Anomalie ab und umfasst die regelm\u00e4\u00dfige Kontrolle (z.B. bei Zysten) bis hin zur medizinischen oder chirurgischen Intervention, einschlie\u00dflich Nierentransplantation. Chronische Nierenerkrankungen sollten fr\u00fchzeitig diagnostiziert und behandelt werden, um eine Nierenerkrankung im Endstadium zu verhindern oder zu verz\u00f6gern.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose h\u00e4ngt von der Art und dem Schweregrad der Nierenerkrankung ab. Patienten mit leichten Nierenproblemen haben eine normale Lebenserwartung.", "summary": "Die genaue Pr\u00e4valenz ist unbekannt, aber das Syndrom gilt als sehr selten. Bis heute sind in der medizinischen Weltliteratur etwa 180 F\u00e4lle in verschiedenen ethnischen Gruppen und bei beiden Geschlechtern beschrieben worden."}, {"name": "Barber-Say-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Barber Say-Syndrom (BSS) ist eine seltene ektodermale Dysplasie mit Beginn in der Neonatalperiode. Symptome sind: Kongenitale generalisierte Hypertrichose, atrophische Haut, Ektropion und Mikrostomie.", "synonyms": "Hypertrichose - Hautatrophie - Ektropium - Makrostomie, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.0", "OMIM": "209885", "UMLS": "C1319466", "MeSH": "C537908", "GARD": "819", "epidemiology": "Das BBS wurde bisher nur bei 11 Patienten beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Das BBS wird manifest mit kongenitaler generalisierter Hypertrichose, fazialen Dysmorphien (typisch mit beidseitigem Ektropion, fehlenden oder sp\u00e4rlichen Augenbrauen und Wimpern, Hypertelorismus/Telekanthus, breitem Nasenr\u00fccken, knollige Nase, antevertierten Nasenl\u00f6chern, Makrostomie, schmalen Lippen und malformierten Ohren), \u00fcberdehnbarer und \u00fcbersch\u00fcssiger Haut mit tiefen Falten, Mamillen-Hypoplasie und fehlenden Brustdr\u00fcsen. Z\u00e4hne sind vorhanden, aber von der Gingiva \u00fcberwachsen. Beschriebene Zahnanomalien sind: Taurodontie, schaufelf\u00f6rmige Inzisoren, versp\u00e4teter Durchbruch der Milchz\u00e4hne und pr\u00e4maturer apikaler Schluss. Seltenere Symptome sind: Gaumenspalte, Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, leicht verz\u00f6gerte psychomotorische Entwicklung und Genitalanomalien.", "etiology": "Autosomal-dominante und autosomal-rezessive Vererbung und sporadische F\u00e4lle wurden beschrieben.", "summary": "Das BBS wurde bisher nur bei 11 Patienten beschrieben."}, {"name": "Bardet-Biedl-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Bardet-Biedl-Syndrom (BBS) ist eine Zilienst\u00f6rung mit Beteiligung vieler Systeme. Sch\u00e4tzungen der Pr\u00e4valenz in Europa liegen zwischen 1:125.000 und 1:175.000. Charakteristische Symptome sind Adipositas, Pigment-Retinopathie, postaxiale Polydaktylie, polyzystische Nieren, Hypogenitalismus und Lernprobleme. Viele dieser Symptome treten erst mehrere Jahre nach Beginn der Krankheit auf. Die klinische Auspr\u00e4gung ist unterschiedlich, aber die meisten Patienten manifestieren im Verlauf der Krankheit die \u00fcberwiegende Zahl der Symptome, aber das einzige konstante Symptom nach der Kindheit ist die Pigment-Retinopathie. Weitere m\u00f6gliche Symptome des BBS sind: Diabetes mellitus, Bluthochdruck, kongenitale Kardiopathie und Hirschsprung-Krankheit (s. dort). Das weite klinische Spektrum des BBS geht einher mit einer signifikanten genetischen Heterogenit\u00e4t. Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt, bei einigen F\u00e4llen wurde oligogene Vererbung nachgewiesen. Bisher konnten f\u00fcr diesen Ph\u00e4notyp 12 verschiedene Gene (BBS1 bis BBS12) verantwortlich gemacht werden. Sie kodieren f\u00fcr Proteine, die an Entwicklug und Funktion prim\u00e4rer Zilien beteiligt sind. Fehlen oder Dysfunktion von BBS-Proteinen f\u00fchrt zu Zilienanomalien in Organen wie Niere oder Auge. F\u00fcr einige Symptome des BBS kann bisher aber kein Zusammenhang mit einer Ziliendysfunktion hergestellt werden. Das Erkennen des klinischen Bildes ist wichtig, da die klinische Diagnose durch molekulare Analyse gesichert werden kann. Das erm\u00f6glicht eine valide genetische Beratung und eine pr\u00e4natale Diagnostik. Differentialdiagnosen sind Alstr\u00f6m-, McKusick-Kaufmann und Meckel-Gruber-Syndrom (s. diese Termini). Patienten mit BBS ben\u00f6tigen eine multidisziplin\u00e4re medizinische Betreuung. Lebensbedrohlich sind die Nieren-Anomalien: Sie schreiten bis zum terminalen Nierenversagen fort und erfordern eine Nierentransplantation. Progredienter Visusverlust durch die Netzhautdystrophie, eine eventuell vorhandenes moderates intellektuelles Defizit, Verhaltensanomalien, Hypomimie und Adipositas schr\u00e4nken das soziale Leben dieser Patienten ein.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic multisystem disorder characterized by the variable association of retinal dystrophy, obesity, polydactyly, genitourinary and kidney anomalies, learning disability and hypogonadism, with a wide spectrum of other minor manifestations.", "synonyms": "BBS, ", "inheritance": "Oligogenic\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Infancy, Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "209900\u00a0 600151\u00a0 605231\u00a0 615981\u00a0 615982\u00a0 615983\u00a0 615984\u00a0 615985\u00a0 615986\u00a0 615987\u00a0 615988\u00a0 615989\u00a0 615990\u00a0 615991\u00a0 615992\u00a0 615993\u00a0 615994\u00a0 615995\u00a0 615996\u00a0 617119\u00a0 617406", "umls": "C0752166", "mesh": "D020788", "gard": "6866", "meddra": "10056715", "epidemiology": "In the USA, the prevalence is estimated at 1/100,000. Whilst epidemiological data is limited in Europe, a prevalence of 1/59,000 has been estimated in Denmark and 1/45,000-66,000 in the Reunion Island, France (due to a founder effect).", "clinical_description": "The clinical manifestations are highly variable, even within affected families. Post-axial polydactyly, sometimes associated with brachydactyly and/or syndactyly, is a common congenital feature. Other manifestations develop gradually over the first decade of life. Rapid weight gain is often described in early childhood, with obesity/overweight present in over 90% of individuals after 5 years of age; it is often difficult to treat and is associated with the metabolic syndrome in adults. Rod-cone or choroidal dystrophy causes decreased visual acuity, night blindness, photophobia and loss of central and color vision by late childhood/early adulthood. Other ocular manifestations include strabismus, cataracts, and astigmatism. Kidney and urinary tract abnormalities are common and may lead a progressive decline of kidney function: stage II-V chronic kidney disease (CKD) is described in 30 to over 40% of affected individuals. Developmental delay, cognitive deficit and behavioral disorders (autism, psychosis) are frequent features. Hypogonadism is often reported, especially in males. Minor signs include diabetes mellitus, heart (valvular stenoses, patent ductus arteriosus, cardiomyopathy), gastrointestinal tract (Hirschsprung disease), central nervous system (clumsiness, ataxia), liver (fibrosis, biliary cirrhosis, portal hypertension), and dentition (dental crowding, hypodontia, malocclusion, enamel hypoplasia) abnormalities. Subtle and inconsistent dysmorphic features (brachycephaly, macrocephaly, hypertelorism, midface hypoplasia, retrognathia) have also been reported. Anosmia or hyposmia may also be found as well as bilateral sensorineural hearing loss.", "etiology": "Bardet-Biedl syndrome (BBS) is a ciliopathy associated with abnormalities in proteins involved in the development and function of primary cilia. Pathogenic or likely pathogenic variants in at least 24 different genes have been associated with BBS to date. Depending on the population origin, BBS1 (11q13.2) and BBS10 (12q21.2) are the most frequent genes, respectively accounting for ~23% and 15% of genotyped BBS patients.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis of BBS is based on the clinical manifestations (at least four major clinical signs or 3 major and 2 minor clinical signs) and can be confirmed by molecular genetic testing of the causative genes in more than 80% of patients. Visual manifestations are often the first sign leading to diagnosis in patients with no polydactyly; polydactyly and kidney anomalies (hyperechoic or multicystic kidneys) can be antenatal presenting signs.", "differential_diagnosis": "Main differential diagnoses include Alstr\u00f6m syndrome, McKusick-Kaufman syndrome, Joubert syndrome, Jeune syndrome, Sensenbrenner syndrome and Senior-L\u00f8ken syndrome.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Genetic prenatal testing for BBS is possible in families with an identified gene mutation.", "genetic_counseling": "BBS is inherited in an autosomal recessive manner. Oligogenic inheritance has also been reported is some affected families. Genetic counseling should be provided to affected families.", "management_and_treatment": "Multidisciplinary management and treatment are required. No targeted treatment is available. Most manifestations are treated following standard practice for the general population (obesity, learning disability, kidney anomalies). Genital abnormalities and polydactyly may be treated with surgery.", "prognosis": "Chronic kidney disease is considered the main cause of morbidity and mortality; its severity varies among patients but may potentially lead to end-stage kidney disease requiring dialysis or transplantation. Progressive vision loss due to retinal dystrophy, together with moderate intellectual deficit (when present), behavioral anomalies, hypomimia and obesity will affect the social life of these patients."}, {"name": "Barnes-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Dysostose, thorakopelvine", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Barnes-Syndrom, Thorax-Larynx-Becken-Dysplasie, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q77.2", "OMIM": "187760\u00a0 187770", "UMLS": "C1861197", "MeSH": "C536517", "GARD": "5184", "summary": "Die Thorax-Larynx-Becken-Dysplasie ist eine Kurzrippen-Dysplasie und gekennzeichnet durch Thoraxdystrophie, Kehlkopfstenose und kleines Becken. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, bisher wurden in der Literatur weniger als 10 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Patienten haben in der Neugeborenenzeit schwere Atemst\u00f6rungen, die eine Intubation erfordern. Die Rippen sind weniger stark verk\u00fcrzt als beim Jeune-Syndrom (s. dort). Der Thorax ist charakteristisch schmal, eng und glockenf\u00f6rmig. Das Becken ist in allen Dimensionen reduziert, und die Kombination der Thoraxanomalien und des kleinen Beckens vermittelt den Eindruck eines vorstehenden Abdomens. Es ist unklar, ob die beschriebene Subglottis-Stenose eine angeborene Fehlbildung ist, oder durch langzeitige Intubation verursacht wird. Es wurden auch mehrere F\u00e4lle von Thorax-Pelvis-Dysostose (ohne Larynx-Beteiligung) beschrieben, die eine variante Auspr\u00e4gung des gleichen Syndroms oder eine andere Entit\u00e4t darstellen. Die Vererbung ist autosomal-dominant. "}, {"name": "Baroreflexversagen", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autonomic nervous system disorder characterized by diminished or absent buffering capability to prevent blood pressure from rising or falling excessively, due to abnormalities in the vascular baroreceptors, the glossopharyngeal or vagal nerves, or the brain stem. Typical clinical presentations are acute severe sustained hypertension, tachycardia, and headache, or volatile hypertension and tachycardia with headache, diaphoresis, flushing, and emotional instability. Rare cases rather present with hypotension, bradycardia, and dizziness or syncope.", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "G90.4", "gard": "10664"}, {"name": "Barraquer-Simons-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Lipodystrophie, partielle erworbene", "german_description": "Die Erworbene partielle Lipodystrophie, auch Barraquer-Simons-Syndrom genannt, ist gekennzeichnet durch Lipatrophie der oberen K\u00f6rperh\u00e4lfte und Hypertrophie des Oberschenkel-Fettgewebes. Mehr als 250 F\u00e4lle wurden bisher beschrieben. Das Geschlechtsverh\u00e4ltnis (m:w) ist 1:3. Eine famili\u00e4re H\u00e4ufung besteht in der Regel nicht. Die Symptomatik beginnt in der Kindheit oder Adoleszenz. Zuerst ist das Gesicht betroffen. Danach breitet sich die Lipatrophie auf Hals, Schultern, Arme und danach auf den Thorax aus. Gelegentliche Begleitsymptome sind Schallempfindungs-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, Epilepsie, Minderbegabung oder sogar eine Myopathie. Auch Stoffwechselanomalien sind m\u00f6glich. Bei einem Drittel der Patienten wurde eine mesangio-kapill\u00e4re Glomerulonephritis beschrieben, bei 90% dieser Patienten wurden C3NeF-IgG (Autoantik\u00f6rper gegen den 'nephritic factor') und niedrige Komplementspiegel gefunden. In einigen F\u00e4llen bestanden auch andere Autoimmun-Krankheiten. K\u00fcrzlich wurden bei Patienten Mutationen im LMNB2-Gen (19p13.3) nachgewiesen. Das Gen kodiert f\u00fcr Lamin B2, ein Protein der Kernmembran. Eine chirurgische Behandlung der Lipodystrophie aus \u00e4sthetischen Gr\u00fcnden ist m\u00f6glich. Die Behandlung der evtl. vorhandenen Stoffwechselsymptome folgt den allgemeinen Leitlinien zur Behandlung aller Arten von Insulinresistenz: K\u00f6rperliche Aktivit\u00e4ten, Insulin-Sensitizer (Metformin oder Glitazone), Insulin (vorzugsweise Insulin-Analoga), Antihypertonika, Verlaufskontrollen und Management der Dyslipid\u00e4mie. Auch muss die Nierenfunktion regelm\u00e4\u00dfig \u00fcberwacht werden. Die Prognose ist weitgehend unbekannt, h\u00e4ngt aber wahrscheinlich vom Ausma\u00df der Nephropathie ab, die bis zur Niereninsuffizienz fortschreiten kann. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare acquired lipodystrophy characterized by bilateral, symmetrical lipoatrophy of the upper body (face, neck, arms, thorax and sometimes upper abdomen) with sparing of the lower extremities and cephalothoracic progression. The disease may be associated with low serum levels of C3 and presence of C3-nephritic factor.", "synonyms": "Barraquer-Simons syndrome, Progressive cephalothoracic lipodystrophy, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0or\u00a0Multigenic/multifactorial\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adult, Adolescent", "icd_10": "E88.1", "omim": "608709", "umls": "C0220989", "gard": "10509", "epidemiology": "The prevalence in Europe is less than 1/100 000. There is a female predominance with a female-to-male ratio of 4:1.", "clinical_description": "Onset typically occurs during childhood or adolescence but may occur as late as the fourth or fifth decade of life. Lipoatrophy is slowly progressive, starts on the face and then extends downwards to the neck, shoulders, upper limbs and/or thorax. The hips, thighs, distal legs and gluteal regions are initially normal, however, lipohypertrophy may present post-puberty, especially in females. Mesangiocapillary glomerulonephritis is reported in one third of patients and is associated with low complement-component 3 (C3) serum levels and the presence of C3-nephritic factor. Whilst there is an increased risk of insulin resistance and metabolic complications (including menstrual irregularities, hirsutism, diabetes mellitus, dyslipidemia, hypertension and hepatic steatosis), these are less frequently observed compared to other types of lipodystrophies. Occasionally, functional anomalies including sensorineural deafness, epilepsy, intellectual deficit, myopathy and retinal changes may be associated.", "etiology": "Whilst the etiology is unknown, susceptibility has been linked to heterozygous mutations in the LMNB2 (19p12.3) gene, encoding the lamin B2 nuclear envelope protein. Nevertheless, this mutation is very inconstant. Moreover, the frequently early occurrence of the disease suggests yet unknown genetic causes, perhaps involved in the innate immunity.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is essentially based on the characteristic subcutaneous fat loss pattern. Physical examination (including skin fold thickness measurements) and MRI studies are important to assess fat loss distribution. Measurement of serum complements and autoantibodies (low C3 and presence of C3-nephritic factor), absence of family history of lipodystrophy, an onset during childhood/adolescence, and biopsy may support diagnosis. Clinical judgement should be used for screening for co-morbidities.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes anorexia nervosa, cachexia, starvation, diencephalic syndrome, multiple symmetric lipomatosis and other rare progeroid syndromes and disorders affecting growth and development. In addition, other forms of acquired lipodystrophy observed may be associated with a broad spectrum of autoimmune diseases, including systemic lupus erythematosus, juvenile dermatomyositis, celiac disease, or pernicious anemia and vasculitis.", "management_and_treatment": "Surgical management of the lipodystrophy is feasible, and is mainly aimed at aesthetic improvement. Treatment of the metabolic manifestations, if present, should follow the same guidelines as those used for other forms of insulin resistance: physical exercise, insulin-sensitizing medication (metformin or, if available, glitazones), agonists of GLP1 receptor, and finally insulin (or preferably insulin analogues)) and management of the hypertension and hypertriglyceridemia. Nephrological follow-up should also be recommended. Metreleptin, indication authorized in Europe, may be considered for hypoleptinemic patients with severe metabolic derangements, where other treatments have failed to achieve adequate metabolic control.", "prognosis": "The prognosis is largely unknown but greatly depends on the extent of the nephropathy, which may progress to renal insufficiency."}, {"name": "Barth-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Barth-Syndrom (BTHS) ist ein angeborener Defekt des Phospholipid-Stoffwechsels und gekennzeichnet durch dilatative Kardiomyopathie (DCM), Myopathie der Skelettmuskulatur, Neutropenie, verz\u00f6gertes Wachstum und Organoazidurie.", "synonyms": "3-Methylglutaconazidurie Typ 2, BTHS, Kardioskelettale Myopathie - Neutropenie, X-chromosomal, Kardioskelettale Myopathie-Neutropenie-Syndrom, MGA2, X-chromosomale kardioskelettale Myopathie und Neutropenie, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "E71.1", "OMIM": "302060", "UMLS": "C0574083", "MeSH": "D056889", "GARD": "5890", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz im der Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung wird auf 1:454.000 gesch\u00e4tzt, die Pr\u00e4valenz unter lebend Geborenen auf 1:140.000 (SW-England, South Wales) bis 1:300.000 -1:400.000 (USA). Am BTHS erkrankt das m\u00e4nnliche Geschlecht.", "clinical_description": "Das klinische Bild ist sehr unterschiedlich. Die meisten Knaben entwickeln im ersten Lebensjahrzehnt, im allg. schon im ersten Lebensjahr, eine DCM, die von einer Endokardfibroelastose (EFE) und oder linksventrikul\u00e4ren Noncompaction (LVNC) begleitet sein kann. Sie kann auch schon in utero beginnen und zu Herzinsuffizienz, fetalem Hydrops und Fehlgeburt oder im 2./3. Trimenon zur Totgeburt f\u00fchren. Ventrikul\u00e4re Arrhythmie, besonders in der Adoleszenz, kann zu pl\u00f6tzlichem Herztod f\u00fchren. Es besteht ein signifikantes Schlaganfall-Risiko. Die (meist proximale) Skelettmyopathie ist Ursache von verz\u00f6gerten motorischen Meilensteinen, Muskelhypotonie, schwerer Lethargie oder Belastungsintoleranz. W\u00e4hrend der Neugeborenenzeit besteht eine Neigung zur Hypoglyk\u00e4mie. Neunzig Prozent der Patienten haben eine milde bis schwere intermittierende oder persistierende Neutropenie mit dem Risiko einer Septik\u00e4mie, von schwerer bakterieller Sepsis, Mundgeschw\u00fcren oder schmerzhaften Gummen. Laktatazidose und leichte An\u00e4mie sind m\u00f6gliche Befunde. Die betroffenen Knaben zeigen in der Regel eine verz\u00f6gerte Pubert\u00e4t und ein bis in die sp\u00e4ten Teens oder fr\u00fchen 20er Jahre verz\u00f6gertes Wachstum. Danach kommt es oft zu einem erheblichen Wachstumsschub. Die Patienten k\u00f6nnen auch gro\u00dfe Schwierigkeiten mit angemessener Nahrungsaufnahme haben. Episodische Diarrh\u00f6en sind h\u00e4ufig. Viele Patienten haben \u00e4hnliche Gesichtsmerkmale: Pausbacken, tiefliegende Augen, prominente Ohren.", "etiology": "Ursache des BTHS sind Mutationen im Tafazzin-Gen (TAZ; Xq28), das f\u00fcr die TAZ1p-Acyltransferase kodiert. Dieses Enzym ist am Stoffwechsel des Cardiolipins, einem wichtigen Phospholipid der inneren Mitochondrien-membran, beteiligt. Die defekte TAZ1p-Funktionf\u00fchrt zu abnormer Modifizierung des Cardiolipins, wodurch letzlich die Struktur der Mitochondrien und die Finktion der Atemkette beeintr\u00e4chtigt werden.", "diagnostic_methods": "Historisches diagnostisches Vorgehen war das Stoffwechselscreening des Urins mit dem Nachweis einer erh\u00f6hten Ausscheidung organischer S\u00e4uren (typisch: 3-Methylglutacons\u00e4ure (3-MCGA)), gefolgt von der Sequenzierung des TAZ<7I>-Gens. Die Ausscheidung der MCGA kann aber auch in schweren F\u00e4llen normal sein. Die Methode der Wahl ist deshalb jetzt die Bestimmung des Verh\u00e4ltnisses Mono-Lysocardiolipin (MLCL) / Cardiolipin (CL) in Blut, Geweben, Fibroblasten oder aus asservierten Guthrie-K\u00e4rtchen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind heredit\u00e4re dilatative und nutritive Kardiomyopathien und idiopathische / zyklische Neutropenie.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "In Familien mit bekannter Mutation ist eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Krankheit wird X-chromosomal-rezessiv vererbt.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung ist im wesentlichen unterst\u00fctzend und erfordert ein multidisziplin\u00e4res Team. Die Herzinsuffizienz wird konventionell medikament\u00f6s, oder in refrakt\u00e4ren F\u00e4llen chirurgisch durch Herztransplantation behandelt. Das Risiko einer bakteriellen Sepsis in F\u00e4llen von intermittierender Neutropenie kann durch prophylaktische Gabe von Antibiotika und/oder intermittierende Anwendung von Granulozyten-Kolonie-stimulierendem Faktor (G-CSF) verringert werden. Die Schwierigkeiten bei der Nahrungsaufnahme erfordern evtl. Ern\u00e4hrung durch Nase-Magen- oder Gastrostomie-Sonde.", "prognosis": "Durch fr\u00fche Diagnose und verbesserte Behandlung und Betreuung wurde die Prognose erheblich verbessert. Die Patienten erreichen bereits ihr 40. Lebensjahr, und es ist zu erwarten, das sie noch dar\u00fcber hinaus \u00fcberleben werden.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz im der Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung wird auf 1:454.000 gesch\u00e4tzt, die Pr\u00e4valenz unter lebend Geborenen auf 1:140.000 (SW-England, South Wales) bis 1:300.000 -1:400.000 (USA). Am BTHS erkrankt das m\u00e4nnliche Geschlecht."}, {"name": "Bartonellose durch Infektion mit Bartonella bacilliformis", "sub_name": "Oroya-Fieber", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Bartonellose durch Infektion mit Bartonella bacilliformis, Carri\u00f3n-Krankheit, ", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "A44.0", "UMLS": "C0029307\u00a0 C0348974", "MeSH": "D001474", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Bartonellose durch Infektion mit Bartonella henselae", "sub_name": "Katzenkratzkrankheit", "german_description": "Die Katzenkratzkrankheit (cat scratch disease, CSD) wurde erstmals 1889 von H. Parinaud als infekti\u00f6se, von Tieren \u00fcbertragene Konjunktivitis mit erheblicher reaktiver Lymphknotenschwellung beschrieben. Der Erreger ist ein Gram-negativer Bazillus, Bartonella henselae. Vektoren bei der \u00dcbertragung der Krankheit sind Fl\u00f6he. Die Infektion erfolgt durch Kratzen oder Bei\u00dfen einer Katze oder durch den Stich eines infizierten Flohs. Klassische Symptome sind Lymphknotenschwellungen, Fieber (38-41\u00b0C), Mattigkeit, Kopfschmerzen, Splenomegalie und ein passageres makulo-papul\u00e4res Exanthem. Atypische Verl\u00e4ufe sind charakterisiert durch neurologische Symptome (Enzephalitis, periphere Neuropathie, Augensymptome [okulo-glandul\u00e4res Syndrom Parinaud]), Lungenbeteiligung, kardiovaskul\u00e4re St\u00f6rungen, Hepatomegalie, thrombozytopenische Purpura und Erythema nodosum. Neben dem klinischen Bild sind serologische Tests (indirekte Immunfluoreszenz oder enzymatischer Immunoassay mit Titration der IgG- und IgM-Antik\u00f6rper) Grundlage der Diagnose. Die Lymphknotenbiopsie zeigt konsistente, aber nicht pathognomonische Ver\u00e4nderungen (unspezifische entz\u00fcndliche Infiltrate, Granulome, Mikroabszesse). Diagnostisch wertvoll ist auch die Polymerase-Kettenreaktion (PCR) in Klappen- und Lymphknotenbiopsien. Die Pr\u00e4valenz der CSD ist etwa 6,6 (1,8-9,3)/100.000 Personen. Am h\u00e4ufigsten erkranken Personen im Alter von 30-50 Jahren, 75% der F\u00e4lle treten in der kalten Jahreszeit, zwischen September und April, auf. Das Geschlechtsverh\u00e4ltnis m:w ist 3:2. Bei immunkompetenten Patienten ist die Prognose sehr gut, in 90% kommt es zu spontaner Heilung. Jedoch ist eine antibiotische Therapie bei abwehrgeschw\u00e4chten Patienten, sowie bei neurologischer und kardialer Beteiligung erforderlich. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Cat-scratch disease is a rare infectious disease, caused by the Gram-negative bacteria Bartonella henselae, that is transmitted to humans via a scratch or bite of an infected cat and that has a variable clinical presentation but that usually manifests with an erythematous papule at the site of inoculation followed by chronic regional lymphadenopathy. Clinical course is usually self-limiting but disseminated illness with high fever, hepatosplenomegaly, granulomatous osteolytic lesions, encephalitis, retinitis, and atypical pneumonia can also occur. Cat-scratch disease can atypically present as parinaud oculoglandular syndrome (unilateral conjunctivitis and preauricular lymphadenopathy).", "synonyms": "Bartonellosis due to Bartonella henselae infection, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "A28.1", "umls": "C0007361\u00a0 C0238909", "mesh": "D002372", "gard": "27", "meddra": "10007729"}, {"name": "Bart-Pumphrey-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Knuckle-Pads-Leukonychie-sensorineurale Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-palmoplantare Hyperkeratose-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, syndromic genetic deafness disease characterized by symmetric or asymmetirc knuckle pads (typically located on the distal and interphalangeal joints), leukonychia, diffuse palmoplantar keratoderma, and congenital, mild to moderate sensorineural deafness.", "synonyms": "Bart-Pumphrey syndrome, Knuckle pads-leukonychia-sensorineural deafness-palmoplantar keratoderma syndrome, Knuckle pads-leukonychia-sensorineural hearing loss-palmoplantar hyperkeratosis syndrome, Knuckle pads-leukonychia-sensorineural hearing loss-palmoplantar keratoderma syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q82.8", "omim": "149200", "umls": "C0266004", "gard": "3125"}, {"name": "Bartsocas-Papas-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Bartsocas-Papas syndrome is a rare, inherited, popliteal pterygium syndrome (see this term) characterized by severe popliteal webbing, microcephaly, a typical face with short palpebral fissures, ankyloblepharon, hypoplastic nose, filiform bands between the jaws and facial clefts, oligosyndactyly, genital abnormalities, and additional ectodermal anomalies (i.e. absent hair, eyebrows, lashes, nails). It is often fatal in the neonatal period, but patients living until childhood have been reported.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive popliteal pterygium syndrome, Lethal popliteal pterygium syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.2", "omim": "263650\u00a0 619339", "umls": "C1849718", "gard": "4436"}, {"name": "Bartter-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Jahresinzidenz wird auf 1 :830.000 gesch\u00e4tzt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Bartter syndrome is a group of rare renal tubular disease characterized by impaired salt reabsorption in the thick ascending limb of Henle's loop and clinically by the association of hypokalemic alkalosis, hypercalciuria/nephrocalcinosis, increased levels of plasma renin and aldosterone, low blood pressure and vascular resistance to angiotensin II.", "synonyms": "Renal tubular normotensive hypokalemic alkalosis with hypercalciuria, Salt-losing tubular disorder, Henle's loop type, Salt-wasting tubulopathy, Henle's loop type, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal, Infancy, Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "E26.8", "omim": "241200\u00a0 300971\u00a0 601198\u00a0 601678\u00a0 602522\u00a0 607364\u00a0 613090", "umls": "C0004775", "mesh": "D001477", "gard": "5893", "meddra": "10050839", "epidemiology": "Annual incidence is estimated at 1/1000,000 in Europe.", "clinical_description": "Five distinct genotypes have been described, with four distinct clinical variants: an antenatal/infantile Bartter syndrome (most patients with genotypes I and II; see this term), characterized by polyhydramnios, premature delivery, polyuria, dehydration, hypercalciuria and nephrocalcinosis; an infantile Bartter syndrome with deafness (genotype IV, see this term), with congenital sensorineural deafness; classic Bartter syndrome (mostly patients with genotype III, but also some patients with genotype I and II; see this term), manifesting as polyuria-polydipsia in infancy-childhood through adulthood, dehydration and a variable delay in the height-weight growth curve; and autosomal dominant hypocalcemia with Bartter syndrome (patients with genotype V, see this term), associating chronic hypocalcemia and tubular salt wasting, hypokalemia and alkalosis.", "etiology": "Bartter syndrome results from a defect in sodium, potassium and chloride reabsorption at the level of Henle's loop. They are caused by homozygous or compound heterozygous mutations in four genes encoding proteins involved in tubular fluid reabsorption in the thick ascending part of Henle's loop: SLC12A1 gene (15q15-21), encoding the sodium-potassium-chloride cotransporter NKCC2 in type I Bartter syndrome; KCNJ1 gene (11q24) encoding the potassium channel ROMK in type II; CLCNKB gene (1p36), encoding a basolateral chloride channel, in type III; and BSND gene (1p32.3), encoding barttin, the beta-subunit for the basolateral chloride channels, CLCNKA and CLCNKB in type IV. A final variant (type V) is associated with heterozygous activating mutations of the CASR gene (3q21.1), encoding the calcium sensing receptor.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on the clinical picture, as well as in plasma and urine electrolytes (sodium, potassium, chloride, bicarbonate, magnesium, calcium), renin and aldosterone levels. Calcium levels in the urine may be normal to markedly increased. Hypocalcemia is observed in Bartter syndrome type V. Genetic testing provides the definite diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnosis includes pseudo-Bartter syndrome (diuretic abuse, surreptitious vomiting), Gitelman syndrome, cystic fibrosis and celiac disease (see these terms).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Diagnostic testing of amniocytes might be indicated for mothers of affected children, or potential heterozygous carriers (close relatives of affected individuals).", "genetic_counseling": "Four of the genetic variants (types I,II,III,IV) of Bartter syndrome are transmitted following an autosomal recessive pattern whereas variant (type V) is transmitted as an autosomal dominant trait.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment includes oral potassium supplements, non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (e.g. indomethacin) and possibly potassium-sparing diuretics. In stressful situations (intecurrent diseases, surgical procedures, trauma) blood electrolyte levels may change rapidly, requiring prompt and vigorous intravenous treatment.", "prognosis": "Life expectancy may be reduced in severe cases but renal failure is rare. Quality of life may be poor, growth rate reduced, and hospitalization rate high."}, {"name": "Bartter-Syndrom, adultes", "sub_name": "Bartter-Syndrom, klassische Form", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of Bartter syndrome characterized by a later age at onset than the other types of Bartter syndrome, typically presenting beyond the first year of life with failure to thrive, hypokalemic and hypochloremic metabolic alkalosis, increased levels of plasma renin and aldosterone and low to normal blood pressure.", "synonyms": "Bartter syndrome type III, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "E26.8", "omim": "607364", "umls": "C1846343", "gard": "9659", "epidemiology": "Exact prevalence is not known.", "clinical_description": "The disease is characterized by a milder clinical picture with a wide phenotypic heterogeneity when compared to other types of Bartter syndrome. Only one third of the patients present with maternal polyhydramnios which usually does not lead to prematurity. Patients usually present in the first year of life with failure to thrive, poor weight gain or polyuria with polydipsia. Fatigue, muscle weakness, cramps and carpopedal spasms may occur in some patients. Hypokalemia and hypochloremic metabolic alkalosis are common. Urinary calcium excretion is variable, only a few patients develop medullary nephrocalcinosis. In a subset of patients, the clinical picture and the biochemical abnormalities may resemble Gitelman syndrome, another salt losing tubulopathy caused by mutations in the sodium chloride cotransporter, SLC12A3, of the distal convoluted tubule. Indeed, the biochemical hallmarks of hypomagnesmia with hypocalciuria may also be detected in some patients with this type of Bartter syndrome.", "etiology": "Mutations in the CLCNKB gene (1p36), encoding the basolateral chloride channel ClC-Kb, have been identified as the underlying molecular defect. ClC-Kb is closely related to ClC-Ka, and both channels are expressed in thick ascending limb of the loop of Henle (TAL), ClC-Ka is exclusively expressed in the loop of Henle, whereas ClC-Kb is also expressed in distal convoluted tubule (DCT), thereby explaining the pronounced DCT features (similar to Gitelman syndrome) in some patients with this type of Bartter syndrome.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on the clinical picture, blood gas analysis, plasma and urine electrolytes (sodium, potassium, chloride, bicarbonate, magnesium, calcium), renin and aldosterone levels. Urinary calcium excretion rates variably range from low to normal or slightly increased. Only genetic testing provides the definite diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnosis includes Gitelman syndrome, pseudo-Bartter syndrome (e.g. in cystic fibrosis), HNF1B-nephropathy, and EAST syndrome. From late adolescence, also diuretic abuse, surreptitious vomiting, and surreptitious laxative use need to be ruled out.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is technically feasible after genetic counseling and may be considered on an individual basis.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counselling should be offered to any patient with Bartter syndrome and to parents with an affected child. In at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment includes oral salt and potassium supplements next to liberal salt and fluid intake. In addition, non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (e.g. indometacin or celecoxib) are helpful in the majority of patients. Potassium-sparing diuretics should only be used with caution. In stressful situations (intercurrent illness, surgical procedures, trauma) blood electrolyte levels may change rapidly, requiring prompt and vigorous treatment.", "prognosis": "Reliable long term outcome data are still lacking. Life expectancy may be reduced in severe cases. Quality of life may be compromised. During follow-up, proteinuria may occur, some patients develop chronic renal failure but rarely need renal replacement therapy."}, {"name": "Bartter -Syndrom, antenatales transientes", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of antenatal Bartter syndrome characterized by early maternal polyhydramnios, excessive renal salt loss with secondary metabolic alkalosis in the neonatal period that completely disappears within the first months of life.", "synonyms": "Bartter syndrome type V, Transient antenatal Bartter syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal", "icd_10": "E26.8"}, {"name": "Bartter syndrome type 1", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Bartter syndrome type 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Bartter-Syndrom, klassische Form", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of Bartter syndrome characterized by a later age at onset than the other types of Bartter syndrome, typically presenting beyond the first year of life with failure to thrive, hypokalemic and hypochloremic metabolic alkalosis, increased levels of plasma renin and aldosterone and low to normal blood pressure.", "synonyms": "Bartter syndrome type III, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "E26.8", "omim": "607364", "umls": "C1846343", "gard": "9659", "epidemiology": "Exact prevalence is not known.", "clinical_description": "The disease is characterized by a milder clinical picture with a wide phenotypic heterogeneity when compared to other types of Bartter syndrome. Only one third of the patients present with maternal polyhydramnios which usually does not lead to prematurity. Patients usually present in the first year of life with failure to thrive, poor weight gain or polyuria with polydipsia. Fatigue, muscle weakness, cramps and carpopedal spasms may occur in some patients. Hypokalemia and hypochloremic metabolic alkalosis are common. Urinary calcium excretion is variable, only a few patients develop medullary nephrocalcinosis. In a subset of patients, the clinical picture and the biochemical abnormalities may resemble Gitelman syndrome, another salt losing tubulopathy caused by mutations in the sodium chloride cotransporter, SLC12A3, of the distal convoluted tubule. Indeed, the biochemical hallmarks of hypomagnesmia with hypocalciuria may also be detected in some patients with this type of Bartter syndrome.", "etiology": "Mutations in the CLCNKB gene (1p36), encoding the basolateral chloride channel ClC-Kb, have been identified as the underlying molecular defect. ClC-Kb is closely related to ClC-Ka, and both channels are expressed in thick ascending limb of the loop of Henle (TAL), ClC-Ka is exclusively expressed in the loop of Henle, whereas ClC-Kb is also expressed in distal convoluted tubule (DCT), thereby explaining the pronounced DCT features (similar to Gitelman syndrome) in some patients with this type of Bartter syndrome.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on the clinical picture, blood gas analysis, plasma and urine electrolytes (sodium, potassium, chloride, bicarbonate, magnesium, calcium), renin and aldosterone levels. Urinary calcium excretion rates variably range from low to normal or slightly increased. Only genetic testing provides the definite diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnosis includes Gitelman syndrome, pseudo-Bartter syndrome (e.g. in cystic fibrosis), HNF1B-nephropathy, and EAST syndrome. From late adolescence, also diuretic abuse, surreptitious vomiting, and surreptitious laxative use need to be ruled out.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is technically feasible after genetic counseling and may be considered on an individual basis.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counselling should be offered to any patient with Bartter syndrome and to parents with an affected child. In at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment includes oral salt and potassium supplements next to liberal salt and fluid intake. In addition, non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (e.g. indometacin or celecoxib) are helpful in the majority of patients. Potassium-sparing diuretics should only be used with caution. In stressful situations (intercurrent illness, surgical procedures, trauma) blood electrolyte levels may change rapidly, requiring prompt and vigorous treatment.", "prognosis": "Reliable long term outcome data are still lacking. Life expectancy may be reduced in severe cases. Quality of life may be compromised. During follow-up, proteinuria may occur, some patients develop chronic renal failure but rarely need renal replacement therapy."}, {"name": "Bartter-Syndrom Typ 3", "sub_name": "Bartter-Syndrom, klassische Form", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of Bartter syndrome characterized by a later age at onset than the other types of Bartter syndrome, typically presenting beyond the first year of life with failure to thrive, hypokalemic and hypochloremic metabolic alkalosis, increased levels of plasma renin and aldosterone and low to normal blood pressure.", "synonyms": "Bartter syndrome type III, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "E26.8", "omim": "607364", "umls": "C1846343", "gard": "9659", "epidemiology": "Exact prevalence is not known.", "clinical_description": "The disease is characterized by a milder clinical picture with a wide phenotypic heterogeneity when compared to other types of Bartter syndrome. Only one third of the patients present with maternal polyhydramnios which usually does not lead to prematurity. Patients usually present in the first year of life with failure to thrive, poor weight gain or polyuria with polydipsia. Fatigue, muscle weakness, cramps and carpopedal spasms may occur in some patients. Hypokalemia and hypochloremic metabolic alkalosis are common. Urinary calcium excretion is variable, only a few patients develop medullary nephrocalcinosis. In a subset of patients, the clinical picture and the biochemical abnormalities may resemble Gitelman syndrome, another salt losing tubulopathy caused by mutations in the sodium chloride cotransporter, SLC12A3, of the distal convoluted tubule. Indeed, the biochemical hallmarks of hypomagnesmia with hypocalciuria may also be detected in some patients with this type of Bartter syndrome.", "etiology": "Mutations in the CLCNKB gene (1p36), encoding the basolateral chloride channel ClC-Kb, have been identified as the underlying molecular defect. ClC-Kb is closely related to ClC-Ka, and both channels are expressed in thick ascending limb of the loop of Henle (TAL), ClC-Ka is exclusively expressed in the loop of Henle, whereas ClC-Kb is also expressed in distal convoluted tubule (DCT), thereby explaining the pronounced DCT features (similar to Gitelman syndrome) in some patients with this type of Bartter syndrome.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on the clinical picture, blood gas analysis, plasma and urine electrolytes (sodium, potassium, chloride, bicarbonate, magnesium, calcium), renin and aldosterone levels. Urinary calcium excretion rates variably range from low to normal or slightly increased. Only genetic testing provides the definite diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnosis includes Gitelman syndrome, pseudo-Bartter syndrome (e.g. in cystic fibrosis), HNF1B-nephropathy, and EAST syndrome. From late adolescence, also diuretic abuse, surreptitious vomiting, and surreptitious laxative use need to be ruled out.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is technically feasible after genetic counseling and may be considered on an individual basis.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counselling should be offered to any patient with Bartter syndrome and to parents with an affected child. In at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment includes oral salt and potassium supplements next to liberal salt and fluid intake. In addition, non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (e.g. indometacin or celecoxib) are helpful in the majority of patients. Potassium-sparing diuretics should only be used with caution. In stressful situations (intercurrent illness, surgical procedures, trauma) blood electrolyte levels may change rapidly, requiring prompt and vigorous treatment.", "prognosis": "Reliable long term outcome data are still lacking. Life expectancy may be reduced in severe cases. Quality of life may be compromised. During follow-up, proteinuria may occur, some patients develop chronic renal failure but rarely need renal replacement therapy."}, {"name": "Bartter-Syndrom Typ 4", "sub_name": "Infantiles Bartter-Syndrom mit sensorineuraler Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of Bartter syndrome characterized by maternal polyhydramnios, premature delivery, salt loss, polyuria and sensorineural deafness, associated with hypokalemic and hypochloremic metabolic alkalosis, increased levels of plasma renin and aldosterone, and low to normal blood pressure. Urinary calcium excretion rates are variable, and nephrocalcinosis is typically absent.", "synonyms": "Bartter syndrome type IV, Bartter syndrome with sensorineural deafness, Bartter syndrome with sensorineural hearing loss, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal, Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "E26.8", "omim": "602522\u00a0 613090", "gard": "10508", "epidemiology": "It is the least common of all recessive types of Bartter syndrome.", "clinical_description": "A severe type of antenatal Bartter syndrome that typically manifests prenatally with maternal polyhydramnios (due to fetal polyuria) usually evident by the end of second trimester, often leading to preterm labor and prematurity. Postnatally, patients present with polyuria, isosthenuria/hyposthenuria and are at high risk of dehydration, hypovolemic hypotension and shock. Virtually all patients are found to have complete sensorineural deafness. Recurrent vomiting, muscle cramps, spasms and failure to thrive are observed. Progression to renal failure is frequent. Hypokalemic and hypochloremic metabolic alkalosis, and in some cases hypomagnesemia, are noted (hypercalciuria is an inconsistent finding and only transient).", "etiology": "The disorder is caused by a defect in chloride reabsorption in the thick ascending limb of the loop of Henle and the early distal convoluted tubule as a consequence of inactivating mutations of the BSND gene (1p32.3), encoding for the protein Barttin (Bartter syndrome type 4A), which is required for the location and proper function of the basolateral chloride channels ClC-Ka and ClC-Kb. Alternatively, the disorder may be caused by digenic mutations in CLCNKA (1p36.13) and CLCNKB (1p36.13) which inactivates the 4 alleles of the 2 genes (Bartter syndrome type 4B). ClC-Ka is highly expressed in the inner ear and contributes to maintaining the high potassium ion concentration in the endolymph necessary for normal hearing, and for which functional disruption leads to nerve deafness.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on the clinical picture, blood gas analysis, plasma and urine electrolytes (sodium, potassium, chloride, bicarbonate, magnesium, calcium), renin and aldosterone levels. Urinary calcium excretion rates are variably ranging from low to normal or slightly increased. Objective hearing assessment is mandatory to identify sensorineural hearing loss. Only genetic testing provides the definite diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "The most important differential diagnoses include congenital chloride diarrhea, pseudohypoaldosteronism type 1, and pseudo-Bartter syndrome (e.g. in cystic fibrosis).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is technically feasible after genetic couseling and may be considered on an individual basis.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to any patient with Bartter syndrome and to parents with an affected child. In at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Especially in the perinatal period, treatment includes vigorous salt and fluid replacement therapy. Non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (e.g. indomethacin or celecoxib) are the second mainstay of therapy. Beyond the neonatal period, next to liberal salt intake, long-term enteral salt and potassium supplements are necessary in most patients. In stressful situations (intercurrent illness with fever, gastroenteritis) blood electrolyte levels may change rapidly, requiring prompt and vigorous intravenous treatment. With respect to deafness, timely intervention ensuring that the child has access to developing receptive and expressive language is of paramount importance.", "prognosis": "The perinatal course is critical because of the complications of severe prematurity. Life expectancy may be reduced in severe cases and chronic renal failure may develop in a subset of children. Reliable long term outcome data are still lacking."}, {"name": "Bartter-Syndrom Typ 5", "sub_name": "Bartter -Syndrom, antenatales transientes", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of antenatal Bartter syndrome characterized by early maternal polyhydramnios, excessive renal salt loss with secondary metabolic alkalosis in the neonatal period that completely disappears within the first months of life.", "synonyms": "Bartter syndrome type V, Transient antenatal Bartter syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal", "icd_10": "E26.8"}, {"name": "Bartter-Syndrom Typ III", "sub_name": "Bartter-Syndrom, klassische Form", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of Bartter syndrome characterized by a later age at onset than the other types of Bartter syndrome, typically presenting beyond the first year of life with failure to thrive, hypokalemic and hypochloremic metabolic alkalosis, increased levels of plasma renin and aldosterone and low to normal blood pressure.", "synonyms": "Bartter syndrome type III, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "E26.8", "omim": "607364", "umls": "C1846343", "gard": "9659", "epidemiology": "Exact prevalence is not known.", "clinical_description": "The disease is characterized by a milder clinical picture with a wide phenotypic heterogeneity when compared to other types of Bartter syndrome. Only one third of the patients present with maternal polyhydramnios which usually does not lead to prematurity. Patients usually present in the first year of life with failure to thrive, poor weight gain or polyuria with polydipsia. Fatigue, muscle weakness, cramps and carpopedal spasms may occur in some patients. Hypokalemia and hypochloremic metabolic alkalosis are common. Urinary calcium excretion is variable, only a few patients develop medullary nephrocalcinosis. In a subset of patients, the clinical picture and the biochemical abnormalities may resemble Gitelman syndrome, another salt losing tubulopathy caused by mutations in the sodium chloride cotransporter, SLC12A3, of the distal convoluted tubule. Indeed, the biochemical hallmarks of hypomagnesmia with hypocalciuria may also be detected in some patients with this type of Bartter syndrome.", "etiology": "Mutations in the CLCNKB gene (1p36), encoding the basolateral chloride channel ClC-Kb, have been identified as the underlying molecular defect. ClC-Kb is closely related to ClC-Ka, and both channels are expressed in thick ascending limb of the loop of Henle (TAL), ClC-Ka is exclusively expressed in the loop of Henle, whereas ClC-Kb is also expressed in distal convoluted tubule (DCT), thereby explaining the pronounced DCT features (similar to Gitelman syndrome) in some patients with this type of Bartter syndrome.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on the clinical picture, blood gas analysis, plasma and urine electrolytes (sodium, potassium, chloride, bicarbonate, magnesium, calcium), renin and aldosterone levels. Urinary calcium excretion rates variably range from low to normal or slightly increased. Only genetic testing provides the definite diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnosis includes Gitelman syndrome, pseudo-Bartter syndrome (e.g. in cystic fibrosis), HNF1B-nephropathy, and EAST syndrome. From late adolescence, also diuretic abuse, surreptitious vomiting, and surreptitious laxative use need to be ruled out.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is technically feasible after genetic counseling and may be considered on an individual basis.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counselling should be offered to any patient with Bartter syndrome and to parents with an affected child. In at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment includes oral salt and potassium supplements next to liberal salt and fluid intake. In addition, non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (e.g. indometacin or celecoxib) are helpful in the majority of patients. Potassium-sparing diuretics should only be used with caution. In stressful situations (intercurrent illness, surgical procedures, trauma) blood electrolyte levels may change rapidly, requiring prompt and vigorous treatment.", "prognosis": "Reliable long term outcome data are still lacking. Life expectancy may be reduced in severe cases. Quality of life may be compromised. During follow-up, proteinuria may occur, some patients develop chronic renal failure but rarely need renal replacement therapy."}, {"name": "Bartter-Syndrom Typ IV", "sub_name": "Infantiles Bartter-Syndrom mit sensorineuraler Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of Bartter syndrome characterized by maternal polyhydramnios, premature delivery, salt loss, polyuria and sensorineural deafness, associated with hypokalemic and hypochloremic metabolic alkalosis, increased levels of plasma renin and aldosterone, and low to normal blood pressure. Urinary calcium excretion rates are variable, and nephrocalcinosis is typically absent.", "synonyms": "Bartter syndrome type IV, Bartter syndrome with sensorineural deafness, Bartter syndrome with sensorineural hearing loss, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal, Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "E26.8", "omim": "602522\u00a0 613090", "gard": "10508", "epidemiology": "It is the least common of all recessive types of Bartter syndrome.", "clinical_description": "A severe type of antenatal Bartter syndrome that typically manifests prenatally with maternal polyhydramnios (due to fetal polyuria) usually evident by the end of second trimester, often leading to preterm labor and prematurity. Postnatally, patients present with polyuria, isosthenuria/hyposthenuria and are at high risk of dehydration, hypovolemic hypotension and shock. Virtually all patients are found to have complete sensorineural deafness. Recurrent vomiting, muscle cramps, spasms and failure to thrive are observed. Progression to renal failure is frequent. Hypokalemic and hypochloremic metabolic alkalosis, and in some cases hypomagnesemia, are noted (hypercalciuria is an inconsistent finding and only transient).", "etiology": "The disorder is caused by a defect in chloride reabsorption in the thick ascending limb of the loop of Henle and the early distal convoluted tubule as a consequence of inactivating mutations of the BSND gene (1p32.3), encoding for the protein Barttin (Bartter syndrome type 4A), which is required for the location and proper function of the basolateral chloride channels ClC-Ka and ClC-Kb. Alternatively, the disorder may be caused by digenic mutations in CLCNKA (1p36.13) and CLCNKB (1p36.13) which inactivates the 4 alleles of the 2 genes (Bartter syndrome type 4B). ClC-Ka is highly expressed in the inner ear and contributes to maintaining the high potassium ion concentration in the endolymph necessary for normal hearing, and for which functional disruption leads to nerve deafness.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on the clinical picture, blood gas analysis, plasma and urine electrolytes (sodium, potassium, chloride, bicarbonate, magnesium, calcium), renin and aldosterone levels. Urinary calcium excretion rates are variably ranging from low to normal or slightly increased. Objective hearing assessment is mandatory to identify sensorineural hearing loss. Only genetic testing provides the definite diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "The most important differential diagnoses include congenital chloride diarrhea, pseudohypoaldosteronism type 1, and pseudo-Bartter syndrome (e.g. in cystic fibrosis).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is technically feasible after genetic couseling and may be considered on an individual basis.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to any patient with Bartter syndrome and to parents with an affected child. In at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Especially in the perinatal period, treatment includes vigorous salt and fluid replacement therapy. Non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (e.g. indomethacin or celecoxib) are the second mainstay of therapy. Beyond the neonatal period, next to liberal salt intake, long-term enteral salt and potassium supplements are necessary in most patients. In stressful situations (intercurrent illness with fever, gastroenteritis) blood electrolyte levels may change rapidly, requiring prompt and vigorous intravenous treatment. With respect to deafness, timely intervention ensuring that the child has access to developing receptive and expressive language is of paramount importance.", "prognosis": "The perinatal course is critical because of the complications of severe prematurity. Life expectancy may be reduced in severe cases and chronic renal failure may develop in a subset of children. Reliable long term outcome data are still lacking."}, {"name": "Basalgangliendegeneration-Syndrom mit Beginn im Kindesalter", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic neurodegenerative disease characterized by sudden onset of progressive motor deterioration and regression of developmental milestones. Manifestations include dystonia and muscle spasms, dysphagia, dysarthria, and eventually loss of speech and ambulation. Brain MRI shows predominantly striatal abnormalities. The disease is potentially associated with a fatal outcome.", "synonyms": "Lenk-Ploski syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "G31.8", "omim": "617054"}, {"name": "Basalganglien-Erkrankungen, adulte", "sub_name": "Neuroferritinopathie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Neuroferritinopathy is a late-onset type of neurodegeneration with brain iron accumulation (NBIA; see this term) characterized by progressive chorea or dystonia and subtle cognitive deficits.", "synonyms": "Adult basal ganglia disease, Ferritin-related neurodegeneration, Hereditary ferritinopathy, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G23.0", "omim": "606159", "umls": "C1853578", "mesh": "C548080", "gard": "10686", "epidemiology": "Prevalence of neuroferritinopathy is unknown. To date fewer than 50 cases have been reported.", "clinical_description": "The disease presents typically in the fourth to sixth decades, although cases with symptoms in their late teens have been observed. Symptoms are restricted to the nervous system and include chorea, dystonia, bradykinesia, dystonic dysarthria, and Parkinsonian features. Choreiform movements tend to occur in the face, orolingual musculature and upper limbs and onset is usually asymmetrical. Dystonia can affect the face, tongue, arms and legs and onset is also usually asymmetrical. The majority of individuals develop a characteristic orofacial action-specific dystonia related to speech that leads to dysarthrophonia. Frontalis overactivity is common, as is orolingual dyskinesia. Cognitive deficits, behavioral issues and dysphagia can be a late feature.", "etiology": "Neuroferritinopathy is caused by mutations in the ferritin light chain (FTL) gene (19q13.3-q13.4) and is inherited in an autosomal dominant manner with high penetrance.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical findings including adult-onset chorea or dystonia, low serum ferritin (typically 20 micrograms/L or less) and iron deposition in the basal ganglia shown on brain MRI. Molecular genetic testing is available on a limited basis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include Huntington disease and spinocerebellar ataxia type 17 (see these terms), although neither has the characteristic findings on neuroimaging; choreoacanthocytosis and McLeod neuroacanthocytosis syndrome (see these terms), although, unlike in these two diseases, the reflexes are preserved in neuroferritinopathy, and juvenile-onset Parkinson disease, aceruloplasminemia and Neimann-Pick type C (see these terms), although these disorders do not show the characteristic neuroimaging of neuroferritinopathy. The MRI findings are similar to those found in pantothenate kinase-associated neurodegeneration (PKAN; see this term). Individuals with neuroferritinopathy also show the 'eye of the tiger'' sign.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal testing for pregnancies at increased risk may be available through laboratories offering prenatal testing if the disease-causing mutation in the family is known.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment is of the manifestations of the disease and includes levodopa, tetrabenazine, benzhexol, sulpiride, diazepam, clonezepam and deanol for the movement disorder and botulinum toxin for painful focal dystonia. Treatment also includes ensuring adequate caloric intake and physiotheraphy to maintain mobility. Iron supplements are not recommended.", "prognosis": "The movement disorder is progressive, involving additional limbs in five to ten years and becoming more generalized within 20 years."}, {"name": "Basalganglien-Kalzifizierung, idiopathische", "sub_name": "Striopallidodentate Kalzinose, bilaterale", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Bilateral striopallidodentate calcinosis (BSPDC, also erroneously called Fahr disease) is characterized by the accumulation of calcium deposits in different brain regions, particularly the basal ganglia and dentate nucleus, and is often associated with neurodegeneration.", "synonyms": "BSPDC, Cerebrovascular ferrocalcinosis, Idiopathic basal ganglia calcification, PFBC, Primary familial brain calcification, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G23.8", "omim": "213600\u00a0 615007\u00a0 615483\u00a0 616413\u00a0 618824", "umls": "C0393590", "gard": "6406", "meddra": "10059626", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of BSPDC is not known, however it is very rare and fewer than 200 cases have been reported. BSPDC is more common in men (male:female ratio 2:1).", "clinical_description": "BSPCD can be asymptomatic. Symptomatic forms usually manifest in the fourth decade of life, whereas calcification may be found in the second decade. Patients present with progressive movement disorders, including parkinsonism, chorea, tremor, dystonia, athetosis and orofacial dyskinesia, ataxia and neuropsychiatric disorders including difficultly with concentration and memory, personality and/or behavior changes, and dementia. The first manifestations often include clumsiness, fatigability, unsteady gait, slow or slurred speech, dysphagia, involuntary movements or muscle cramping. Seizures occur frequently. Urinary incontinence may occur.", "etiology": "The causative gene or genes are not known. Linkage to chromosome 14q has been established in one family. Calcium is the major element deposited on the basal ganglia and accounts for the radiologic appearance of the disease. It is thought that the calcifications observed are a marker of the disease rather than a cause of the clinical symptoms.", "diagnostic_methods": "Single proton emission computed tomography (SPECT) reveals markedly decreased perfusion to the basal ganglia bilaterally with decreased perfusion to the cerebral cortices. Diagnosis is based on CT or MRI evidence of bilateral, almost symmetric, calcifications of one or more of the following areas: basal ganglia, dentate nuclei, thalamus and cerebral white matter. Diagnosis is further based on normal childhood growth and development and the absence of parathyroid or other known neurologic disorders. Electroencephalogram, nerve conduction studies, and pattern shift visual-evoked potentials studies are usually normal and brainstem auditory-evoked potentials may vary from normal to minor abnormalities.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include hypoparathyroidism and pseudohypoparathyroidism, which can usually be excluded by normal serum levels of parathyroid hormone, Kenny-Caffey syndrome type 1, neurodegeneration with iron accumulation, Cockayne syndrome and Aicardi-Gouti\u00e8res syndrome (see these terms).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Genetic counseling may be offered.However, there is currently no possibility of antenatal diagnosis.", "genetic_counseling": "It can be familial or sporadic. Over 30 families with the familial form have been reported. The familial form of idiopathic basal ganglia calcification is inherited in an autosomal dominant manner.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no specific treatment available. Treatment based on amelioration of manifestations, including pharmacologic treatment for anxiety, depression, obsessive-compulsive behaviors and dystonia, may be attempted.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is not fully understood due to a lack of longitudinal studies. However, while asymptomatic cases have been observed in individuals younger than 25 years old, it is possible that symptoms may appear with increasing age."}, {"name": "Basalkarzinom, adenoides zervikales", "sub_name": "Adenoides Basalzellkarzinom der Cervix uteri", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltener, langsam wachsender Geb\u00e4rmutterkrebs, der histologisch durch kleine, gut differenzierte Nester basaloider Zellen gekennzeichnet ist, die dem Basalzellkarzinom der Haut \u00e4hneln und h\u00e4ufig mit Plattenepithelkarzinomen oder Plattenepithelkarzinomen vergesellschaftet sind. Die Patientinnen sind in der Regel asymptomatisch oder pr\u00e4sentieren sich mit dysfunktionalen vaginalen Blutungen, oft ohne erkennbare L\u00e4sion an der Zervix. Eine Infektion mit Hochrisiko-HPV-Typen (16 und 33) wurde in einigen F\u00e4llen berichtet.", "synonyms": "Basalkarzinom, adenoides zervikales, ", "ICD-10": "C53.0\u00a0 C53.1\u00a0 C53.8"}, {"name": "Basalmembrandystrophie, anteriore", "sub_name": "Basalmembrandystrophie, epitheliale", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare corneal dystrophy characterized by thickened, redundant sheets of basement membrane extending into the corneal epithelium, as well as intraepithelial lacunae filled with cellular debris, together presenting as a pattern of ''maps'', ''dots'', and ''fingerprints'' on slit-lamp examination. Patients may be asymptomatic or present with recurrent episodes of painful corneal erosions with variable visual impairment, typically beginning after the age of thirty. The condition is bilateral and may be inherited in an autosomal dominant manner.", "synonyms": "Anterior basement membrane dystrophy, Cogan microcystic epithelial dystrophy, EBMD, Map-dot-fingerprint dystrophy, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "icd_10": "H18.5", "omim": "121820", "umls": "C0521723", "gard": "9732"}, {"name": "Basalmembrandystrophie, epitheliale", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare corneal dystrophy characterized by thickened, redundant sheets of basement membrane extending into the corneal epithelium, as well as intraepithelial lacunae filled with cellular debris, together presenting as a pattern of ''maps'', ''dots'', and ''fingerprints'' on slit-lamp examination. Patients may be asymptomatic or present with recurrent episodes of painful corneal erosions with variable visual impairment, typically beginning after the age of thirty. The condition is bilateral and may be inherited in an autosomal dominant manner.", "synonyms": "Anterior basement membrane dystrophy, Cogan microcystic epithelial dystrophy, EBMD, Map-dot-fingerprint dystrophy, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "icd_10": "H18.5", "omim": "121820", "umls": "C0521723", "gard": "9732"}, {"name": "Basalzellkarzinom der Vulva", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare vulvar carcinoma characterized by a slowly growing ulcer or nodule which is histologically composed of demarcated nests of palisaded basal cells originating at the epidermal-dermal junction. Occasionally, the tumor may be extensively pigmented. Patients most commonly present with pruritus. The lesion is usually treated by local excision, although groin metastases have been reported.", "synonyms": "Basal cell carcinoma of vulva, ", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "C51.8"}, {"name": "Basalzell-Naevus-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Gorlin-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene, autosomal-dominant vererbte Erbkrankheit mit Hamartose, die durch multiple, fr\u00fch auftretende Basalzellkarzinome (BCC), multiple Kieferkeratozysten und Skelettanomalien gekennzeichnet ist.", "synonyms": "Basalzell-Naevus-Syndrom, Gorlin-Goltz-Syndrom, NBCCS, Naevoides Basalzellkarzinom-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C44.9", "OMIM": "109400", "UMLS": "C0004779\u00a0 C0812437", "GARD": "7166", "MedDRA": "10062804", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des Gorlin-Syndroms (GS) wird auf 1/30.000-1/164.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Geburtsinzidenz wird mit 1/19.000 angegeben.", "clinical_description": "GS ist charakterisiert durch das fr\u00fche Auftreten von odontogenen Keratozysten im Unterkiefer (2. Lebensjahrzehnt) und/oder multiplen BCCs, die am h\u00e4ufigsten im Gesicht, am R\u00fccken und auf der Brust auftreten (3. Lebensjahrzehnt). Ungef\u00e4hr 60 % der Betroffenen zeigen ein typisches Erscheinungsbild mit Makrozephalie, prominenter Stirn, groben Gesichtsz\u00fcgen und Gesichtsmilien. Im Alter von 20 Jahren sind bei mehr 90 % der betroffenen Personen ektopische Verkalkungen (insbesondere des Falx cerebri) vorhanden. Palmar- oder Plantargruben (asymmetrisch, 2-3 mm im Durchmesser, 1-3 mm in der Tiefe und sich in der 2. Dekade entwickelnd) und Skelettanomalien (Verschmelzung von Wirbeln, keilf\u00f6rmige Wirbel, bifide oder verschmolzene Rippen, Halbwirbel, Kyphoskoliose, Pectusdeformit\u00e4t, Sprengeldeformit\u00e4t, Syndaktylie, Polydaktylien) sind ebenfalls assoziiert. Weitere Merkmale sind Gesichtsdysmorphien (Lippen-/Gaumenspalte, Makrozephalie), Augenanomalien (Katarakt, Kolobom, Mikrophthalmus) und lymphomesenterische Zysten. Eine Pr\u00e4disposition f\u00fcr maligne oder benigne Tumore wie Medulloblastom, Meningeom, papill\u00e4res Fibroelastom des Herzens, Ovarialfibrom (h\u00e4ufig bilateral und verkalkt), Fibrosarkom und Nephroblastom wird beobachtet.", "etiology": "Ursache des GS sind Mutationen im PTCH1-Gen (9q22.3) f\u00fcr den Patched-Rezeptor, einem negativen Regulator der Effekte von Sonic Hedgehog. Umweltexposition und andere Modifikatorgene (SUFU; PTCH2) k\u00f6nnen zu der variablen Expressivit\u00e4t beitragen, die bei der klinischen Pr\u00e4sentation beobachtet wird. Mutationen in PTCH1 sind auch f\u00fcr die Mehrzahl der Merkmale bei Monosomie 9q22.3 verantwortlich.", "diagnostic_methods": "Das komplexe klinische Bild dieses Syndroms erschwert seine Diagnose. Deshalb sind spezifische diagnostische Kriterien erforderlich. Die Diagnose basiert auf dem Vorhandensein von zwei Hauptkriterien und einem Nebenkriterium oder einem Haupt- und drei Nebenkriterien. K\u00f6rperliche Untersuchung, R\u00f6ntgen, ophthalmologische Beurteilung, zahn\u00e4rztliche oder kieferorthop\u00e4dische Untersuchung, Hautuntersuchung, Ultraschalltest und Echokardiographie sind f\u00fcr die Identifizierung der Kriterien, die zur Diagnose f\u00fchren, unerl\u00e4sslich. Der Nachweis einer heterozygoten Keimbahnmutation im-PTCH1-Gen oder einer pathogenen Variante im SUFU-Gen durch einen molekulargenetischen Test unterst\u00fctzt die Diagnose, wenn die klinischen Merkmale nicht schl\u00fcssig sind.", "differential_diagnosis": "Zu den Differentialdiagnosen geh\u00f6ren: Sotos-Syndrom, Brooke-Spiegler-Syndrom, Bazex-Syndrom, Rombo-Syndrom, Muir-Torre-Syndrom, Beckwith-Wiedemann-Syndrom, isolierte Hydrozephalie oder Megalenzephalie, ein autosomal-dominantes oder X-chromosomales Hypotrichose-Syndrom.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik ist mittels Fehlbildungs-Ultraschall und DNA-Analyse in fetalen Zellen (Amniozentese oder Choriozottenbiopsie) m\u00f6glich. Die Pr\u00e4implantationsdiagnostik kann Familien vorgeschlagen werden, in denen die pathogene Variante bereits identifiziert wurde.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Vererbung erfolgt autosomal-dominant, mit hoher Penetranz und variabler Expressivit\u00e4t. Eine Bewertung und Beratung zum genetischen Krebsrisiko sowie eine Beratung von Familien mit einer mutma\u00dflichen pathogenen de novo-Variante ist sinnvoll. Der optimale Zeitpunkt f\u00fcr die Bestimmung des genetischen Risikos und die Diskussion \u00fcber die Verf\u00fcgbarkeit von pr\u00e4natalen Tests ist vor der Schwangerschaft. Jungen Erwachsenen, die betroffen oder gef\u00e4hrdet sind, soll eine genetische Beratung angeboten werden (einschlie\u00dflich einer Aufkl\u00e4rung \u00fcber m\u00f6gliche Risiken f\u00fcr die Nachkommenschaft und Reproduktionsm\u00f6glichkeiten).", "management_and_treatment": "Die bevorzugte Behandlungsmethode bei multiplen BCC besteht aus einem kombinierten Ansatz, der eine chirurgische Entfernung umfasst, die durch Kryotherapie, Laser, photodynamische Therapie oder topische Behandlungen erg\u00e4nzt wird. Die Verwendung von oralen Retinoiden wird ebenfalls empfohlen. Orales Vismodegib kann die Entwicklung von BCC reduzieren, aber unerw\u00fcnschte Nebenwirkungen sind h\u00e4ufig. Sonic-Hedgehog-Inhibitoren k\u00f6nnen besonders bei L\u00e4sionen um die Augen hilfreich sein. Eine Strahlentherapie muss vermieden werden, da sie Jahre sp\u00e4ter eine Invasion des BCC verursachen kann. Die photodynamische Therapie ist besonders f\u00fcr d\u00fcnne L\u00e4sionen von <2 mm im Ultraschall geeignet. Die chirurgische Behandlung mittels Mohs'scher Mikrochirurgie erscheint besonders effektiv. Kieferkeratozysten sind h\u00e4ufig rezidivierend und erfordern wiederholte chirurgische Exzisionen. Ovarialfibrome werden in der Regel mit konservativer Chirurgie behandelt, um normales Ovarialgewebe zu erhalten.", "prognosis": "Die Lebenserwartung bei GS ist nicht beeintr\u00e4chtigt. Eine fr\u00fchzeitige Diagnose ist wichtig wegen der Anf\u00e4lligkeit f\u00fcr multiple Neoplasmen im fr\u00fchen Alter. Ovarialtumoren sind in der Regel gutartig mit dem Risiko eines Rezidivs. Bei jungen Patienten k\u00f6nnen odontogene Keratozysten im Unterkiefer zu einer Verschiebung der sich entwickelnden Z\u00e4hne f\u00fchren und k\u00f6nnen mit nicht durchgebrochenen Z\u00e4hnen assoziiert sein und eine Wurzelresorption verursachen.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des Gorlin-Syndroms (GS) wird auf 1/30.000-1/164.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Geburtsinzidenz wird mit 1/19.000 angegeben."}, {"name": "BASD", "sub_name": "Gallens\u00e4uresynthesedefekt, kongenitaler", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "BASD, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "BASD1", "sub_name": "Gallens\u00e4uresynthesedefekt, kongenitaler, Typ 1", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Typ 1 der Kongenitalen Defekte der Gallens\u00e4ure-Synthese (BAS-Defekt Typ 1) ist die h\u00e4ufigste Anomalie der Gallens\u00e4ure-Synthese und gekennzeichnet durch unterschiedliche Zeichen einer progredienten cholestatischen Lebererkrankung und Fett-Malabsorption.", "synonyms": "3-beta-Hydroxy-Delta-5-C27-Steroid-Oxidoreduktase-Mangel, BASD1, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "K76.8", "OMIM": "607765", "UMLS": "C1843116", "MeSH": "C535442", "GARD": "9813", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, f\u00fcr alle BAS-Defekte zusammen und ohne die Zerebro-tendin\u00f6se Xanthomathose wird eine Pr\u00e4valenz von etwa 1-9:1.000.000 angenommen.", "clinical_description": "Das klinische Bild ist unterschiedlich, bei den meisten Patienten beginnt die Krankheit mit den Zeichen neonataler Cholestase. Symptome sind Hepatomegalie mit oder ohne Splenomegalie, Ikterus, Malabsorption von Fett und fettl\u00f6slichen Vitaminen und leichte Steatorrhoe. Pruritus fehlt in den meisten F\u00e4llen. Befunde der Leberfunktionstests sind: Erh\u00f6hte Serum-Transaminasen (GOT,GPT), konjugierte Hyperbilirubin\u00e4mie und normale Gamma-GT. Die Leberhistologie zeigt Entz\u00fcndung, Riesenzellen, Zeichen der Cholestase und unterschiedliche Grade von Fibrose. Der klinische Verlauf fr\u00fch beginnender Krankheiten ist unterschiedlich: Bei einigen Patienten geht der Ikterus zur\u00fcck, und ihre Krankheit wird erst sp\u00e4ter diagnostiziert, oder der Verlauf ist fulminanter und f\u00fchrt entweder zum Tod oder erfordert schon in fr\u00fchem Alter eine Lebertransplantation. Die Krankheit kann auch als sp\u00e4t beginnende chronische Cholestasse in Erscheinung treten. Bei solchen Patienten ist eine Lebererkrankung oft nicht sichtbar, und die Patienten zeigen lediglich Folgen einer Malabsorption fettl\u00f6slicher Vitamine, durch Vitamin-Supplementierung korrigierbare Rachitis und/oder andere Komplikationen wie Blutungsneigung (Stuhl mit rotem Blut oder intrakraniale Blutungen), neuro-axonale Dystrophie und Nachtblindheit. Die Leberenzyme sind anfangs oft normal, steigen aber sp\u00e4ter, mit Fortentwicklung der Lebererkrankung zur Fibrose, an. Bei Kindern und Jugendlichen kann die Krankheit auch mit ausgedehnter Fibrose und/oder Zirrhose in Erscheinung treten.", "etiology": "Ursache der Krankheit sind Mutationen im HSD3B7-Gen (16p12-p11.2), das f\u00fcr die 3-Beta-Hydoxy-Delta(5)-C27-Steroid-Oxidoreduktase kodiert. Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchrt der Nachweis der Sulfat- und Glykosulfatsalze der 3-Beta-Hydroxy-Delta(5)-Gallens\u00e4uren (Schl\u00fcsselmetaboliten des BAS-Defekts Typ 1) im Urin mit liquid secondary ionization- Massenspektrometrie (LSIMS). Diagnostisch gleichwertige Verfahren sind Gaschromatographie-Massenspektrometrie oder Elektrospray- und Tandem-Massenspektrometrie.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind Progressive famili\u00e4re intrahepatische Cholestase und Krankheiten mit neonataler Cholestase, darunter der ZZ-Ph\u00e4notyp des Alpha-1-Antitrypsin-Mangels, das Alagille-Syndrom, bili\u00e4re Atresie, Zystische Fibrose und Stoffwechselkrankheiten (Tyrosin\u00e4mie Typ 1, Galaktos\u00e4mie, Heredit\u00e4re Fruktoseintoleranz), Krankheiten mit Malabsorption von Fett und fettl\u00f6slichen Vitaminen, darunter andere Krankheiten der Leber und des Darms, und Krankheiten, die mit Wachstumsst\u00f6rungen manifest werden.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Wenn bereits ein Kind erkrankt ist, k\u00f6nnen die meisten Defekte vorgeburtlich in embryonalen Geweben diagnostiziert werden. Bei klinischem Verdacht ist eine Analyse des Urins des Kindes mit LSIMS schon in den ersten Tagen nach der Geburt m\u00f6glich.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung erfolgt durch Zufuhr von Chols\u00e4ure. Dadurch kommt es zu gradueller R\u00fcckbildung der biochemischen und histologischen Anomalien, und selbst in F\u00e4llen mit Leberfibrose und Zirrhose wird einer weiteren Progredienz vorgebeugt. Die Therapie mit Chols\u00e4ure stimuliert den Gallefluss und unterdr\u00fcckt die Synthese toxischer Zwischenprodukte, die in Verbindung mit der Pathogenese der Erkrankung stehen.", "prognosis": "Bei fr\u00fchem Behandlungsbeginn haben die Patienten eine exzellente Prognose.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, f\u00fcr alle BAS-Defekte zusammen und ohne die Zerebro-tendin\u00f6se Xanthomathose wird eine Pr\u00e4valenz von etwa 1-9:1.000.000 angenommen."}, {"name": "BASD2", "sub_name": "Gallens\u00e4uresynthesedefekt, kongenitaler, Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Typ 2 der Kongenitalen Defekte der Gallens\u00e4ure-Synthese (BAS-Defekt Typ 2) ist eine Anomalie der Gallens\u00e4uren-Synthese und gekennzeichnet durch schwere und schnell progrediente cholestatische Hepatopathie.mit Malabsorption von Fett und fettl\u00f6slichen Vitaminen.", "synonyms": "BASD2, Cholestase mit delta(4)-3-Oxosteroid 5-beta-Reduktase-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "K76.8", "OMIM": "235555", "UMLS": "C1856127", "MeSH": "C535443", "GARD": "10045", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Die Krankheit ist sicher selten, aber dennoch die zweith\u00e4ufigste BAS-Anomalie unter S\u00e4uglingen mit Cholestase.", "clinical_description": "Die Krankheit beginnt mit neonataler Cholestase, die schnell zur Zirrhose fortschreitet. Unbehandelt sterben die Kinder im S\u00e4uglingsalter. Die Symptome \u00e4hneln denen des kongenitalen BAS-Defektes Typ 1 mit Hepatosplenomegalie, Ikterus, Malabsorption fettl\u00f6slicher Vitamine und Steatorrhoe. Aber das mittlere Diagnosealter ist fr\u00fcher, und die Krankheit ist schwerer und schneller progredient. Ergebnisse der Leberfunktionstests sind erh\u00f6hte Serum-Transaminasen (GOT, GPT) und -Gamma-GT, stark vermehrte konjugierte Bilirubin\u00e4mie und Gerinnungsst\u00f6rung.", "etiology": "Ursache des BAS-Defektes Typ 2 sind Mutationen im AKR1D1-Gen (7q32-q33), das f\u00fcr die Delta(4)-3-Oxosteroid 5-Beta-Reduktase kodiert. Die Vererbung ist autosomal-rezessiv. Als Ursache des Leberschadens wird verminderte Synthese der prim\u00e4ren Gallens\u00e4uren und die daraus folgende Anh\u00e4ufung hepatotoxischer atypischer Gallens\u00e4uren (Delta(4)-3-Oxo- Gallens\u00e4uren) angenommen.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchrt die Untersuchung des Urins mit liquid secondary ionization-Massenspektrometrie (LSIMS) und Gaschromatographie-Massenspektrometrie (GC-MS). Mittels LSIMS werden im Urin erh\u00f6hte Konzentrationen von Delta(4)-3-Oxo-Gallens\u00e4uren, einschlie\u00dflich 3-Oxo-7-Alpha-Hydroxy-4-Cholenon- und 3-Oxo-7-Alpha-12-Alpha-Dihydroxy-4-Cholenons\u00e4uren, nachgewiesen. Eine vermehrte Produktion von Delta(4)-3-Oxo-Gallens\u00e4uren wird bei S\u00e4uglingen in den ersten Lebenswochen und bei Patienten mit terminaler Leberinsuffizienz anderer Ursache gesehen. Es ist wichtig, die LSIMS-Analyse mehrfach durzuf\u00fchren, da sich in seltenen F\u00e4llen die Hepatopathie zur\u00fcckbildet und die atypischen Gallens\u00e4uren dann nicht mehr nachweisbar sind.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind die Progressive famili\u00e4re intrahepatische Cholestase und Krankheiten, die als neonatale Cholestase in Erscheinung treten. Dazu geh\u00f6ren der ZZ-Ph\u00e4notyp des Alpha-1-Antitrypsin-Mangels, Tyrosin\u00e4mie Typ 1, bili\u00e4re Atresie, Choledochus-Zysten, Zystische Fibrose, Alagille-Syndrom, Galaktos\u00e4mie und Heredit\u00e4re Fruktoseintoleranz oder Krankheiten, die mit fehlendem Wachstum in Erscheinung treten (Panhypopituitarismus).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Wenn schon ein Kind erkrankt war, kann in weiteren Schwangerschaften an embryonalem Gewebe eine vorgeburtliche Diagnose durchgef\u00fchrt werden. Bei Geschwistern betroffener Patienten kann in den ersten Tagen nach der Geburt der Urin mit LSIMS untersucht werden. Dadurch wird schon vor dem Auftreten schwerer Krankheitssymptome eine Behandlung m\u00f6glich.", "management_and_treatment": "Grundlage der Behandlung ist eine orale Therapie mit Gallens\u00e4uren. Sie f\u00fchrt zu gradueller R\u00fcckbildung der biochemischen und histologischen Anomalien und beugt einem Fortschreiten der Krankheit vor. Die Chols\u00e4uretherapie schafft einen Pool von Gallens\u00e4uren, der den Gallefluss anregt, die Resorption fettl\u00f6sicher Vitamine erm\u00f6glicht und die Synthese atypischer Gallens\u00e4uren und hepatotoxischer intermedi\u00e4rer Metaboliten unterdr\u00fcckt. Ursodesoxychols\u00e4ure (UDCA) kann benutzt werden, ist aber nicht die Therapie der Wahl, da UDCA die Synthese atypischer Gallens\u00e4uren und das Auftreten hepatotoxischer Metaboliten nicht unterd\u00fcckt.", "prognosis": "Bei fr\u00fchem Behandlungsbeginn ist die Prognose exzellent. Wenn die Diagnose erst bei fortgeschrittener Lebererkrankung gestellt wird, ist die Chols\u00e4uretherapie evtl. nicht mehr wirksam, und eine Lebertransplantation wird erforderlich. Ohne Behandlung ist die Krankheit in der Regel letal.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Die Krankheit ist sicher selten, aber dennoch die zweith\u00e4ufigste BAS-Anomalie unter S\u00e4uglingen mit Cholestase."}, {"name": "BASD3", "sub_name": "Gallens\u00e4uresynthesedefekt, kongenitaler, Typ 3", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Typ 3 der Kongenitalen Defekte der Gallens\u00e4ure-Synthese (BAS-Defekt Typ 3), eine der Anomalien der Gallens\u00e4uren-Synthese, ist gekennzeichnet durch sehr schweren Verlauf mit cholestatischer Hepatopathie.", "synonyms": "BASD3, Oxysterol 7-alpha-Hydroxylase-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "K76.8", "OMIM": "613812", "UMLS": "C3151147", "MeSH": "C566340", "epidemiology": "Bisher wurden nur 2 F\u00e4lle dieser Krankheit beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Der Indexfall war ein 10 Wochen alter S\u00e4ugling mit schwerer progredienter Cholestase, Hepatosplenomegalie, Koagulopathie, Zirrhose und Ausfall der synthetischen Leberfunktionen schon im fr\u00fchen S\u00e4uglingsalter. Die Serum-Transaminasen (GOT, GPT) waren stark erh\u00f6ht, die Gamma-GT war normal. Die Leberbiopsie zeigte Cholestase, ausgedehnte portale Fibrose, Entz\u00fcndung, Riesenzelltransformation und Proliferation der Galleng\u00e4nge.", "etiology": "Ursache des BAS-Defektes Typ 3 sind Mutationen im CYP7B1-Gen (8q21.3), das f\u00fcr die Oxysterol-7-Alpha-Hydroxylase im Stoffwechselweg der Gallens\u00e4uren kodiert. Der Mangel dieses Enzyms f\u00fchrt zur Akkumulation hepatotoxischer unges\u00e4ttigter Monohydroxy-Gallens\u00e4uren. Vermutlich wird die Krankheit autosomal-rezessiv vererbt.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchrt die Untersuchung des Urins mit liquid- secondary-ionization-Massenspektrometrie (LSIMS) mit Nachweis von Sulfat- und Glykosulfat-Konjugaten unges\u00e4ttigter Monohydroxy-Cholenons\u00e4uren (3-Beta-Hydroxy-5-Cholenon- und 3-Beta-Hydroxy-5-Cholestenon-S\u00e4uren) und dem Fehlen prim\u00e4rer Gallens\u00e4uren.", "management_and_treatment": "Diese Anomalie der Gallens\u00e4uresynthese ist besonders schwer und kann mit prim\u00e4ren Gallens\u00e4uren nicht behandelt werden.", "summary": "Bisher wurden nur 2 F\u00e4lle dieser Krankheit beschrieben."}, {"name": "BASD4", "sub_name": "Gallens\u00e4uresynthesedefekt, kongenitaler, Typ 4", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Typ 4 des Kongenitalen Defektes der Gallens\u00e4uren-Synthese, eine der Anomalien der Gallens\u00e4uren-Synthese (s. dort), ist gekennzeichnet durch leichte cholestatische Lebererkrankung, Malabsorption von Fett und/oder neurologische St\u00f6rungen.", "synonyms": "2-Methylacyl-CoA-Racemase-Mangel, AMACR-Mangel, Alpha-Methylacyl-CoA-Racemase-Mangel, BASD4, Leberkrankheit-Retinitis pigmentosa-Polyneuropathie-Epilepsie-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "K76.8", "OMIM": "214950\u00a0 614307", "UMLS": "C1858328\u00a0 C3280428", "MeSH": "C535444", "GARD": "10046", "epidemiology": "Bisher wurden 5 F\u00e4lle beschrieben, 2 Geschwister mit neonataler Cholestase und 3 Erwachsene mit neurologischen St\u00f6rungen.", "clinical_description": "Dieser Defekt manifestiert sich klinisch unterschiedlich: S\u00e4uglinge haben einen schweren Mangel von Fett und fettl\u00f6slichen Vitaminen, H\u00e4matochezie (rotes Blut im Stuhl) und leichte Cholestase, bei Erwachsenen bestehen unterschiedliche neurologische St\u00f6rungen. M\u00f6glicherweise hatten die Erwachsenen eine unbemerkte leichte Lebererkrankung und einen Mangel fettl\u00f6slicher Vitamine, der zu den neurologischen St\u00f6rungen f\u00fchrte.", "etiology": "Ursache des Typ 4-Defektes sind Mutationen im AMACR-Gen (5p13.2-q11.1). Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose wird durch Untersuchung von Urin, Serum und Galle mit liquid secondary ionization-Massenspektrometrie (LSIMS), Gaschromatographie-Massenspektrometrie (GC-MS) und Elektrospray-Ionisation-Tandem- Massenspektrometrie gestellt.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung erfolgt prim\u00e4r mit Chols\u00e4ure. Zur Verh\u00fctung neurologischer Sch\u00e4den ist wahrscheinlich die langfristige di\u00e4tetische Einschr\u00e4nkung von Phytan- und Pristans\u00e4ure erforderlich.", "summary": "Bisher wurden 5 F\u00e4lle beschrieben, 2 Geschwister mit neonataler Cholestase und 3 Erwachsene mit neurologischen St\u00f6rungen."}, {"name": "Basel-Vanagaite-Sirota-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Mikrolissenzephalie-Mikromelie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Basel-Vanagaite-Sirota-Syndrom wurde k\u00fcrzlich bei 2 Schwestern beschrieben. Symptome sind kurze Arme, Dysmorphien, Krampfanf\u00e4lle, postnatal sich entwickelnde Mikrozephalie mit vereinfachtem Gyrierungsmuster und scheinbar fehlender Gyrierung des Frontalhirns. Die Patienten sterben fr\u00fch. Bei den Neugeborenen fehlen die primitiven Reflexe. Die Kinder entwickeln ein therapieresistentes Krampfleiden. Hypoparathyreoidismus und Hypertrichose sind weitere m\u00f6gliche Symptome. Die Vererbung ist wahrscheinlich autosomal-rezessiv. Die Neugeborenen bed\u00fcrfen der Intensivpflege. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Microlissencephaly-micromelia syndrome is a syndrome of abnormal cortical development, characterized by severe prenatal polyhydramnios, postnatal microcephaly, lissencephaly, upper limb micromelia, dysmorphic facies (coarse face, hypertrichosis, and short nose with long philtrum), intractable seizures, and early death. Hypoparathyroidism was noted in one case.", "synonyms": "Basel-Vanagaite-Sirota syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q04.3"}, {"name": "Basel-Vanagaite-Smirin-Yosef-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic intellectual disability syndrome characterized by severe global developmental delay with intellectual disability, microcephaly, growth retardation, ocular defects such as congenital cataract, and nevus flammeus simplex on the forehead. Cardiac, urogenital, and skeletal abnormalities, as well as seizures are present in most patients. Dysmorphic craniofacial features include sparse hair, downslanting palpebral fissures, hypertelorism, broad and overhanging nasal tip and short philtrum, among others.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal, Antenatal", "omim": "616449", "epidemiology": "To date, 22 patients have been described with common clinical features and biallelic variants in MED25.", "clinical_description": "Patients present with some common clinical features. From infancy, almost all have severe global developmental delay with inability to walk and speech, and is followed by intellectual disability (ID). Dysmorphic craniofacial features include sparse hair, high forehead, high frontal hairline, sparse eyebrows, epicanthus, hypertelorism, broad and overhanging nasal tip, short philtrum, exaggerated cupid's bow, retrognathia/micrognathia and nevus flammeus simplex of the forehead. Microcephaly, short stature and feeding difficulties are also reported in some patients, and mandibular prognathia has been reported in various adult individuals from the same family. Other common features that have been described and include 2-3 toe syndactyly, congenital heart diseases (septal defects), urogenital and ocular anomalies (cataract, microcornea, microphthalmia), hypotonia and seizures. Cleft palate, hearing loss, hypospadias, kyphosis / scoliosis, camptodactyly, adducted thumb, tapered fingers with ulnar deviation, overlapping fingers / toes and hyperconvex nails have been described more rarely. Brain imaging abnormalities such as thin corpus callosum, ventriculomegaly and cerebral atrophy are common. Polymicrogyria has recently been reported as a distinctive neuro-radiological finding.", "etiology": "The syndrome is caused by homozygous variants in the MED25 gene (19q13.33), coding for a component of the mediator complex. This complex is required for transcription of most RNA polymerase II-dependent genes.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical examination, brain imaging, cytogenetic and molecular studies.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis include other genetic syndromes characterized by intellectual disability accompanied by eye and brain abnormalities.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible where a known pathogenic variant has previously been identified in a family member.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing variant) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Management requires a lifelong multidisciplinary approach and includes physical, occupational and speech therapy, in particular non-verbal methods of communication. Treatment is symptomatic and supportive. Antiepileptic drugs may be used to control seizures. Particular attention should be paid to monitoring feeding and growth, particularly as feeding problems tend to occur early on.", "prognosis": "Some adult patients are reported; however, current data is limited with regard to life expectancy. Prognosis depends on disease severity."}, {"name": "Basilarimpression, prim\u00e4re", "sub_name": "Prim\u00e4re basil\u00e4re Invagination", "german_description": "Die basil\u00e4re Impression ist radiologisch erkennbar als eine Invagination des kranio-vertebralen \u00dcberganges in den Sch\u00e4del hinein, mit resultierender Verk\u00fcrzung des Halses und abnormer Kopfhaltung.Die seltene prim\u00e4re Form wurde bei etwa 100 Patienten beschrieben. Wahrscheinlich ist die Vererbung autosomal-dominant. Etwa die H\u00e4lfte der F\u00e4lle sind frei von Symptomen. Bei den \u00fcbrigen bestehen ein Horner-Syndrom, Pyramidenzeichen oder die Symptome einer Syringomyelie (Empfindungsst\u00f6rungen, Schw\u00e4che der Gliedma\u00dfen). ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Primary basilar impression (PBI) is a very rare skeletal developmental defect characterized by congenital upward translocation of the upper cervical spine and clivus into the foramen magnum. PBI can be asymptomatic or associated with severe neurological dysfunction.", "synonyms": "Bull-Nixon syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "Q75.8", "omim": "109500", "umls": "C1862299", "gard": "1037"}, {"name": "BASM-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Bili\u00e4re Atresie-Milzfehlbildung-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Syndrom mit bili\u00e4rer Atresie und Milz-Fehlbildung (BASM) bezeichnet die Assoziation von Gallengangs-Atresie (s. dort) und Anomalien der Milz (vor allem Polysplenie und seltener Asplenie und gedoppelte Milz). Weitere m\u00f6gliche Symptome sind Herzfehler, Situs inversus und pr\u00e4-duodenale Pfortader. Das Syndrom repr\u00e4sentiert die embryonale oder syndromale Form der Gallengangs-Atresie. Neugeborene oder S\u00e4uglinge erkranken mit Ikterus, hellen St\u00fchlen, dunklem Urin, Gedeihst\u00f6rung, Hepatomegalie, Gerinnungsst\u00f6rung, An\u00e4mie und oft tastbarer Milz.", "synonyms": "BASM-Syndrom, Gallengangatresie - Milzfehlbildung, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q44.2"}, {"name": "Bassen-Kornzweig-Krankheit", "sub_name": "Abetalipoprotein\u00e4mie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Akanthozytose, Bassen-Kornzweig-Krankheit, Bassen-Kornzweig-Syndrom, Hypobetalipoprotein\u00e4mie, famili\u00e4re homozygote, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "E78.6", "OMIM": "200100\u00a0 605019\u00a0 615558", "UMLS": "C0000744", "MeSH": "D000012", "GARD": "5", "summary": "Die Abetalipoprotein\u00e4mie oder homozygote Famili\u00e4re Hypobetalipoprotein\u00e4mie (ABL/HoFHBL) ist eine schwere Form der Famili\u00e4ren Hypobetalipoprotein\u00e4mie (s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch dauerhaft niedrige Spiegel (unterhalb der 5. Perzentile) von Apolipoprotein B und LDL-Cholesterin, durch verz\u00f6gertes Wachstum, Malabsorption, Hepatomegalie und neurologische und neuromuskul\u00e4re St\u00f6rungen. Die Krankheit ist sehr selten, die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf weniger als 1:1.000.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die ABL/HoFHBL wird im ersten Lebensjahr oder in der fr\u00fchen Kindheit manifest. Oft ist sie mit verz\u00f6gertem Wachstum, mit Hepatomegalie und Steatose, mit Diarrhoe und Steatorrhoe und mit Fett-Malabsorption assoziiert. M\u00f6gliche Symptome sind spastische Ataxie, atypische Retinitis pigmentosa, Akanthozytose, niedrige Spiegel der fettl\u00f6slichen Vitamine (A, E, K), erhebliche Zytolyse und evtl. sogar Leberzirrhose. Die Abetalipoprotein\u00e4mie wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache sind Mutationen im MTTP-Gen (4q22-q24), das f\u00fcr das mikrosomale Triglycerid-Transferprotein MTP kodiert. Andere schwere fr\u00fche famili\u00e4re Hyperlipoprotein\u00e4mien werden kodominant vererbt und sind verursacht durch Mutationen im Apolipoprotein B-Gen (APOB; 2p24.1). Die Diagnose beruht auf der Lipidanalyse des Patienten und seiner Eltern nach jeweils zw\u00f6lfst\u00fcndigem Fasten. Gemessen werden der Serumspiegel des LDL (<0,10 g/L), Triglyzeride (<0,20 g/L) und Apolipoprotein B (<0,10 g/L). Weitere diagnostische Verfahren sind: Beurteilung der Steatorrhoe und des trunkierten Apolipoprotein B nach oraler Lipidbelastung, Messung der lipidl\u00f6slichen Vitamine (A, E, K), Test auf Akanthozytose im Blutausstrich, vollst\u00e4ndige neurologische Untersuchung, Lebersonographie und ophthalmologische Untersuchung. Durch den Nachweis von Mutationen im MTTP- oder im APOB-Gen wird die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt. Differentialdiagnosen sind Stoffwechselkrankheiten mit hepatischer \u00dcberlast, mit Steatose und/oder Hepatomegalie, atypisch verlaufende Krankheiten des zentralen und peripheren Nervensystems und sekund\u00e4re (iatrogene oder systemische) Ursachen einer Hypercholesterin\u00e4mie. Bei Kenntnis der urs\u00e4chlichen Mutation beider Eltern ist eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik m\u00f6glich. Die Behandlung soll in einem Spezialzentrum erfolgen. Die Prognose ist ung\u00fcnstig, die Lebenserwartung ist signifikant verringert."}, {"name": "Bassen-Kornzweig-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Abetalipoprotein\u00e4mie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Akanthozytose, Bassen-Kornzweig-Krankheit, Bassen-Kornzweig-Syndrom, Hypobetalipoprotein\u00e4mie, famili\u00e4re homozygote, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "E78.6", "OMIM": "200100\u00a0 605019\u00a0 615558", "UMLS": "C0000744", "MeSH": "D000012", "GARD": "5", "summary": "Die Abetalipoprotein\u00e4mie oder homozygote Famili\u00e4re Hypobetalipoprotein\u00e4mie (ABL/HoFHBL) ist eine schwere Form der Famili\u00e4ren Hypobetalipoprotein\u00e4mie (s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch dauerhaft niedrige Spiegel (unterhalb der 5. Perzentile) von Apolipoprotein B und LDL-Cholesterin, durch verz\u00f6gertes Wachstum, Malabsorption, Hepatomegalie und neurologische und neuromuskul\u00e4re St\u00f6rungen. Die Krankheit ist sehr selten, die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf weniger als 1:1.000.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die ABL/HoFHBL wird im ersten Lebensjahr oder in der fr\u00fchen Kindheit manifest. Oft ist sie mit verz\u00f6gertem Wachstum, mit Hepatomegalie und Steatose, mit Diarrhoe und Steatorrhoe und mit Fett-Malabsorption assoziiert. M\u00f6gliche Symptome sind spastische Ataxie, atypische Retinitis pigmentosa, Akanthozytose, niedrige Spiegel der fettl\u00f6slichen Vitamine (A, E, K), erhebliche Zytolyse und evtl. sogar Leberzirrhose. Die Abetalipoprotein\u00e4mie wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache sind Mutationen im MTTP-Gen (4q22-q24), das f\u00fcr das mikrosomale Triglycerid-Transferprotein MTP kodiert. Andere schwere fr\u00fche famili\u00e4re Hyperlipoprotein\u00e4mien werden kodominant vererbt und sind verursacht durch Mutationen im Apolipoprotein B-Gen (APOB; 2p24.1). Die Diagnose beruht auf der Lipidanalyse des Patienten und seiner Eltern nach jeweils zw\u00f6lfst\u00fcndigem Fasten. Gemessen werden der Serumspiegel des LDL (<0,10 g/L), Triglyzeride (<0,20 g/L) und Apolipoprotein B (<0,10 g/L). Weitere diagnostische Verfahren sind: Beurteilung der Steatorrhoe und des trunkierten Apolipoprotein B nach oraler Lipidbelastung, Messung der lipidl\u00f6slichen Vitamine (A, E, K), Test auf Akanthozytose im Blutausstrich, vollst\u00e4ndige neurologische Untersuchung, Lebersonographie und ophthalmologische Untersuchung. Durch den Nachweis von Mutationen im MTTP- oder im APOB-Gen wird die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt. Differentialdiagnosen sind Stoffwechselkrankheiten mit hepatischer \u00dcberlast, mit Steatose und/oder Hepatomegalie, atypisch verlaufende Krankheiten des zentralen und peripheren Nervensystems und sekund\u00e4re (iatrogene oder systemische) Ursachen einer Hypercholesterin\u00e4mie. Bei Kenntnis der urs\u00e4chlichen Mutation beider Eltern ist eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik m\u00f6glich. Die Behandlung soll in einem Spezialzentrum erfolgen. Die Prognose ist ung\u00fcnstig, die Lebenserwartung ist signifikant verringert."}, {"name": "Bassoe-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Muskeldystrophie, kongenitale - infantile Katarakt - Hyogonadismus", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch kongenitale Muskeldystrophie, infantile Katarkt und Hypogonadismus. Es wurde bei 7 Personen aus einer isolierten norwegischen Kleinstadt und bei einer nicht mit diesen verwandten Person beschrieben. Das Syndrom scheint autosomal-rezessiv vererbt zu werden. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Congenital muscular dystrophy-infantile cataract-hypogonadism syndrome is characterized by congenital muscular dystrophy, infantile cataract and hypogonadism. It has been described in seven individuals from an isolated Norwegian village and in one unrelated individual. Transmission appears to be autosomal recessive.", "synonyms": "Bassoe syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "G71.0", "omim": "254000", "umls": "C1850864\u00a0 C2931578", "gard": "835"}, {"name": "Bathing-suit-Ichthyose", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Badeanzug-Ichthyose (BSI) ist eine seltene Variante der autosomal-rezessiven kongenitalen Ichthyose (ARCI) und gekennzeichnet durch gro\u00dfe dunkle Schuppen in spezifischen Bereichen des K\u00f6rpers.", "synonyms": "BSI, Badeanzug-Ichthyose, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q80.2", "OMIM": "242300", "epidemiology": "In der Literatur wurden bisher weniger als 20 Patienten beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Der besondere Hautbefund erscheint nach dem Abwerfen der seit der Geburt bestehenden Kollodiummembran: Anders als bei anderen Formen der ARCI sind die Gliedmassen (mit Ausnahme der Falten) und das Gesicht durch die Ichthyose nicht betroffen. Die Schuppen treten in w\u00e4rmeren Hautbereichen auf, an Stamm, Kopfhaut und in den Achseln. In den betroffenen Bereichen haben die Patienten wie bei lamell\u00e4rer Ichthyose (LI) gro\u00dfe dunkle Schuppen.", "etiology": "Ursache der BSE sind spezifische temperatur-sensitive Mutationen im TGM1-Gen, das f\u00fcr die an der Verhornung des Stratum corneum beteiligte Transglutaminase 1 kodiert. In den betroffenen (w\u00e4rmeren) Hautbereichen ist die Enzymaktivit\u00e4t deutlich reduziert, im Gegensatz zur normalen Haut mit nahezu normaler Enzymaktivit\u00e4t. Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt.", "summary": "In der Literatur wurden bisher weniger als 20 Patienten beschrieben."}, {"name": "Battaglia-Neri-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Epilepsie-Mikrozephalie-Skelettdysplasie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Battaglia-Neri-Syndrom ist charakterisiert durch das Zusammentreffen einer mittel- bis hochgradigen geistigen Retardierung, Mikrozephalie, Epilepsie, grober Gesichtsz\u00fcgen, Hirsutismus und Skelettanomalien (Skoliose, verz\u00f6gerte Skelettreifung). Es wurde bisher nur 1 Mal, bei 2 Geschwistern (Bruder und Schwester) beschrieben.Wahrscheinlich wird das Syndrom autosomal-rezessiv vererbt, soda\u00df man in (bisher) sporadischen F\u00e4llen die Eltern \u00fcber die M\u00f6glichkeit eines 25%igen Wiederholungsrisikos f\u00fcr weitere Kinder informieren mu\u00df. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare multiple congenital anomalies/dysmorphic syndrome characterized by global developmental delay, intellectual disability, hypotonia, seizures, microcephaly, delayed bone maturation, and skeletal abnormalities (such as scoliosis or pectus excavatum, among others). Dysmorphic features include coarse face, hirsutism, thick eyebrows, broad nasal septum, short philtrum, large mouth, and prominent ears. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1996.", "synonyms": "Battaglia-Neri syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "601352", "umls": "C2931579", "mesh": "C537662", "gard": "836"}, {"name": "Batten-Krankheit", "sub_name": "Ceroid-Lipofuszinose, neuronale, juvenile", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Juvenilen Neuronalen Ceroidlipofuscinosen (JNCLs) sind eine genetisch heterogene Gruppe der Neuronalen Ceroidlipofuscinosen (NCLs; s. dort). Typische F\u00e4lle sind gekennzeichnet durch Beginn der Symptome (Visusverlust mit Retinopathie, zerebrale Kr\u00e4mpfe und Abbau der motorischen und geistigen F\u00e4higkeiten) im fr\u00fchen Schulalter.", "synonyms": "Batten-Krankheit, JNCL, NCL, juvenile, Spielmeyer-Vogt-Krankheit, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "E75.4", "OMIM": "204200\u00a0 204500\u00a0 256730\u00a0 600143\u00a0 609055\u00a0 610127", "UMLS": "C0751383", "GARD": "5897", "MedDRA": "10052073", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist in den meisten L\u00e4ndern nicht bekannt. H\u00e4ufiger sind diese Krankheiten in skandinavischen L\u00e4ndern: In Schweden wurde die Pr\u00e4valenz in der Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung zu ca. 1:217.000 und bei der Geburt zu ca. 1:45.000 bestimmt. In Deutschland betr\u00e4gt die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt etwa 1:143.000.", "clinical_description": "Die klassische Form der JNCLs (auch als Batten-Krankheit und Spielmeyer-Vogt-Krankheit bezeichnet) wird bei sonst noch gesunden, etwa 6 Jahre alten Kindern mit Verschlechterung des Visus manifest. Die Kinder erblinden innerhalb weniger Jahre. Mehrere Jahre nach Beginn der Visusprobleme nehmen die kognitiven F\u00e4higkeiten ab und eine Epilepsie setzt ein. Der dementive Abbau und motorische St\u00f6rungen schreiten zunehmend fort. Auch \u00fcber psychiatrische St\u00f6rungen (aggressives Verhalten, Schlafst\u00f6rungen) wurde berichtet. In seltenen F\u00e4llen von JNCL sind die Augen weniger stark beteiligt. Epilepsie und Demenz ohne Visusverlust muss bei diesen Patienten an die Epilepsie-Variante 'Northern' der JNCL (Progressive Epilepsie - intellektuelles Defizit, Finnischer Typ; s. dort) denken lassen.", "etiology": "Die JNCLs werden autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Mutationen in den folgenden Genen f\u00fchren zur JNCL mit klassischem und/oder varianten Ph\u00e4notyp: PPT1/CLN1 (1p32), TPP1/CLN2/i> (11p15), CLN3/i> (16p12), CLN8/i> (8p23; verantwortlich f\u00fcr die Epilepsie-Variante 'Northern') und CTSD/CLN10/i> (11p15.5). Zus\u00e4tzlich wurde eine Entit\u00e4t als CLN9-Krankheit beschrieben, deren Ph\u00e4notyp der klassischen JNCL gleicht,  deren urs\u00e4chliches Gen aber noch nicht gefunden wurde. H\u00e4ufigste Ursache der cJNCL sind Mutationen im CLN3/i>-Gen (16p12), das f\u00fcr ein Protein mit putativen Transmembran-Dom\u00e4nen kodiert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnostisches Hauptmerkmal der Patienten mit CLN3-Krankheit sind im Blutausstrich Lymphozyten mit gro\u00dfen Vakuolen. Enzymatische Tests stehen zum Nachweis des Mangels der Palmitoyl-Protein-Thioesterase 1 (PPT1-Mutationen), der Tripeptidyl-Peptidase 1 (TPP1-Mutationen) und des Cathepsins D (CTSD-Mutationen) zur Verf\u00fcgung. Mit Ausnahme der CLN9-Krankheit kann die Diagnose durch molekulare Analyse best\u00e4tigt werden. Im initialen Stadium der Krankheit wird evtl. an das Vorliegen einer Retinitis pigmentosa (s. dort) gedacht.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen im sp\u00e4teren Krankheitsverlauf sind andere Ursachen von Demenz und zerebralen Kr\u00e4mpfen im Schulalter, einschlie\u00dflich Mitochondriopathien und Subakute sklerosierende Panenzephalitis (s. dort).", "management_and_treatment": "Die Betreuung besteht in palliativer Pflege, der Anwendung von Antikonvulsiva, sowie p\u00e4dagogischer, psychologischer und psychiatrischer Begleitung.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose der JNCL ist schwer, aber die Lebenserwartung unterschiedlich. Einige Patienten errreichen das vierte Lebensjahrzehnt.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist in den meisten L\u00e4ndern nicht bekannt. H\u00e4ufiger sind diese Krankheiten in skandinavischen L\u00e4ndern: In Schweden wurde die Pr\u00e4valenz in der Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung zu ca. 1:217.000 und bei der Geburt zu ca. 1:45.000 bestimmt. In Deutschland betr\u00e4gt die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt etwa 1:143.000."}, {"name": "Bauchspeicheldr\u00fcsenkrebs, seltener", "sub_name": "Seltenes Pankreaskarzinom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Bauchspeicheldr\u00fcsenkrebs, seltener, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "UMLS": "C0235974\u00a0 C0346647", "MeSH": "D010190", "MedDRA": "10033604\u00a0 10033609", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Baughman-Syndrom", "sub_name": "CHAND-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare ectodermal dysplasia syndrome characterized by the association of sparse, woolly, curly hair, ankyloblepharon, and nail dysplasia. Additional reported features include abnormal oral frenula, bifid tongue, lip pits, adhesions between upper and lower lips, hypertelorism and flat nasal bridge, alveolar synechia, and imperforate vagina.", "synonyms": "Baughman syndrome, CHANDS, Curly hair-ankyloblepharon-nail dysplasia syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q82.8", "omim": "214350", "umls": "C0406733", "gard": "1233"}, {"name": "Bazex-Dupr\u00e9-Christol-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Atrophodermie, follikul\u00e4re - Basaliome, BDCS, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "L98.8", "OMIM": "301845", "UMLS": "C0346104", "MeSH": "C537663", "GARD": "838", "summary": "Das Bazex-Dupr\u00e9-Christol-Syndrom ist eine seltene Genodermatose mit Pr\u00e4disposition zu fr\u00fch auftretenden Basalzell-Karzinomen. Bisher wurden 143 F\u00e4lle beschrieben, haupts\u00e4chlich aus Frankreich und Belgien. Die Krankheit wird in der Neonatalperiode oder im S\u00e4uglingsalter manifest. Charakteristische Symptome sind Hypotrichose, Hypohidrose, Milien und fr\u00fch-manifeste Basalzell-Karzinome. Oft besteht ein follikul\u00e4res Atrophoderm, am h\u00e4ufigsten an Hand- und Fu\u00dfr\u00fccken, an den Streckseiten von Ellenbogen und Knien und im Gesicht. Die Hypotrichose betrifft den Kopf und manchmal die Augenbrauen. Die papul\u00f6sen Milien und Basalzell-Karzinome sind \u00fcberwiegend im Gesicht. Basalzell-Karzinome treten bei 40% der Patienten und meist w\u00e4hrend des zweiten und dritten Lebensjahrzehntes auf. Weitere h\u00e4ufige Merkmale des Syndroms sind Basalzell-Hamartome und Trichoepitheliome. Sehr selten bestehen Atopie, Keratosis pilaris, Ichthyose, Arachnodaktylie mit schlaffen Gelenken, Osteochondritis, Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit und Lernprobleme. Die Vererbung ist X-chromosomal-dominant. Das Gen wurde in die Chromosomenregion Xq24-q27.1 kartiert. Als Kandidatengen wird UBE2A (Xq24) angesehen. Dieses Gen ist an der Reparatur UV-gesch\u00e4digter DNA beteiligt. Differentialdiagnostisch zu erw\u00e4gen sind das Gorlin-Syndrom, bei dem ebenfalls schon fr\u00fch multiple Basalzell-Karzinome auftreten, und die X-chromosomale Chondrodysplasia punctata (s. diese Termini), bei der auch ein follikul\u00e4res Atrophoderm gesehen werden kann. Weiterhin ist an das Rombo-Syndrom und an das Syndrom der generalisierten basaloid-follikul\u00e4ren Hamartome zu denken (s. diese Termini). Die Betreuung schlie\u00dft Lichtschutz und fr\u00fche Erkennung von Basalzellkarzinomen ein. Bei Basalzell-Karzinomen sind chirurgische Interventionen und manchmal Kryochirurgie oder topische Anwendung von Imiquimod indiziert. Strahlentherapie ist kontraindiziert. "}, {"name": "Bazex-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Acrokeratosis paraneoplastica von Bazex, Akrokeratose Typ Bazex, Akrokeratose, paraneoplastische, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "UMLS": "C0346104\u00a0 C0406355", "summary": "Das Bazex-Syndrom ist ein seltenes paraneoplastisches Syndrom mit psoriasiformen L\u00e4sionen an den Akren. Bisher wurden in der Literatur etwa 145 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Am h\u00e4ufigsten sind M\u00e4nner \u00fcber 40 betroffen (mittleres Erkrankungsalter 61 Jahre), bisher wurden nur 12 weibliche Patienten beschrieben. Die Patienten werden mit asymptomatischen, symmetrischen erythemat\u00f6s-schuppenden psoriasiformen Exanthemen an den Akren auff\u00e4llig. Die am h\u00e4ufigsten betroffenen Orte sind die Ohren (79%), N\u00e4gel (75%), Nase (63%), Finger (61%), H\u00e4nde (57%) und F\u00fc\u00dfe (50%). Typisch ist ein zun\u00e4chst isolierter Befall der Ohrmuscheln. Die L\u00e4sionen k\u00f6nnen sich auf Wangen, Ellenbogen, Knie und Stamm ausbreiten. Bei bis zu 18% der Patienten besteht ein Pruritus. Die histologischen Befunde sind unspezifisch, mit psoriasiformer Hyperplasie der Epidermis, Hyperkeratose mit Parakeratose und perivaskul\u00e4ren lymphozyt\u00e4ren Infiltraten in der Dermis. In 70% der F\u00e4lle gehen die Hautver\u00e4nderungen den Symptomen/der Diagnose des Malignoms voraus, bei dem es sich oft um ein Plattenepithelkarzinom der oberen Atem- oder Verdauungswege handelt. Die Pathogenese des Bazex-Syndroms ist nicht bekannt. M\u00f6glich ist eine Produktion von Epidermalem Wachstumsfaktor durch die Tumorzellen oder eine Kreuzreaktivit\u00e4t zwischen Epidermis- und Tumorantigenen. Die Diagnose basiert auf den klinischen und histologischen Befunden. Eine detaillierte Untersuchung der oberen Atem- und Verdauungswege dient dem Nachweis des urs\u00e4chlichen Malignoms. Differentialdiagnosen sind Psoriasis, allergische Kontaktdermatitis, Photosensitivit\u00e4t, Dermatomyositis (s. dort), Arzneimittelexanthem, kutaner Lupus erythematodes (s. dort) und Mykosis fungoides. Die Dermatose spricht evtl. auf Acitretin allein oder in Kombination mit UVA-Phototherapie an. Mit der Behandlung des Malignoms bilden sich die Hautver\u00e4nderungen zur\u00fcck, w\u00e4hrend die Nagelver\u00e4nderungen bestehen bleiben k\u00f6nnen. Das erneute Auftreten von Hautver\u00e4nderungen bei einem erfolgreich behandelten Patienten signalisiert einen R\u00fcckfall der Krebserkrankung. Die Prognose wird durch das Neoplasma bestimmt."}, {"name": "BBGD", "sub_name": "Biotin-Thiamin-responsive St\u00f6rung der Basalganglien", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic neurological disorder characterized by subacute encephalopathy with confusion, seizures, and movement disorder, often following a history of febrile illness. Imaging may reveal bilateral lesions in the basal ganglia. The disease usually becomes symptomatic in childhood and is life-threatening if left untreated, but symptoms can be reversed and progression prevented by treatment with high doses of biotin and thiamine.", "synonyms": "BBGD, BTBGD, Biotin-responsive basal ganglia disease, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "icd_10": "G93.8", "omim": "607483", "umls": "C1843807", "mesh": "C537658", "gard": "10237"}, {"name": "BBIS", "sub_name": "THOC6-assoziierte Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung mit Mikrozephalie und Gesichtsdysmorphien", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, autosomal recessive, syndromic intellectual disability disorder characterized by global development delay, mild microcephaly, mild to severe intellectual disability and non-specific facial dysmorphism in association with variable multiple congenital anomalies including congenital heart defects, dental anomalies, cryptorchidism, renal and cerebral malformations. Short stature is frequent.", "synonyms": "BBIS, Beaulieu-Boycott-Innes syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.0", "omim": "613680", "epidemiology": "First described in two Hutterite families, there are now approximately 20 affected individuals reported worldwide.", "clinical_description": "Affected individuals have mild to severe intellectual disability and are non-verbal or have limited speech. The most relevant congenital anomalies include cardiac malformations (atrial and/or ventricular septal defects, patent ductus arteriosus), renal anomalies (unilateral agenesis or ectopic kidney), multiple teeth caries and/or malocclusion, cryptorchidism, anteriorly displaced anus, ventriculomegaly and corpus callosus dysgenesis. Short stature is reported in approximately half of individuals. Several recurrent craniofacial features have been described including mild microcephaly, tall forehead, high anterior hairline, short upslanting palpebral fissures, deep-set eyes, a long nose with low-hanging columella. The facial features are non-specific. More rarely, affected individuals could have hypergonadotropic hypogonadism (in females), seizures, low birth weight, feeding difficulties, hearing loss and/or eye abnormalities.", "etiology": "The syndrome is caused by homozygous mutations in THOC6, encoding for a protein of the THO/TREX (transcription/export) complex, which is involved in the transcription of mRNA as well as the export of spliced mRNA from the nucleus; it is supposed to play a crucial role in both embryogenesis and human neurodevelopment.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on molecular studies: for Hutterite communities, testing the specific c.136G>A variant can be considered; for non-Hutterite individuals, multigene panels for intellectual disability, chromosome microarray analysis, or exome array are indicated.", "differential_diagnosis": "Due to the non-specific characteristics of the syndrome, all disorders with intellectual disability and without other distinctive features should be investigated.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal testing is possible when a pathogenic variant is already known in the family.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy. Carrier testing is possible where the pathogenic variant has been previously identified in a family member.", "management_and_treatment": "Management requires a lifelong multidisciplinary approach, including a pediatrician, neurologist, otorhinolaryngologist (assessment for hearing loss), ophthalmologist, cardiologist, radiologist and gastroenterologist (to evaluate feeding problems and consider gastrostomy). Developmental assessments are needed to tailor medical services, develop an individualized education plan, and promote occupational therapy. Moreover, a behavioral assessment for signs of autism spectrum disorder is recommended. Annual evaluation of renal function should be considered in those with anomaly of kidney/urinary tract. Surgery is required in case of cryptorchidism while females older than 12 require an endocrine consultation. Need for family support (e.g. social work involvement, palliative care, home nursing) should be evaluated at each visit. No specific pharmacological therapy is available.", "prognosis": "The course of the disease is non-progressive. Longitudinal data are insufficient to determine life expectancy, although survival into adulthood is possible. Need for life-long support from caregivers depends on the severity of intellectual disability."}, {"name": "BBS", "sub_name": "Bardet-Biedl-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Bardet-Biedl-Syndrom (BBS) ist eine Zilienst\u00f6rung mit Beteiligung vieler Systeme. Sch\u00e4tzungen der Pr\u00e4valenz in Europa liegen zwischen 1:125.000 und 1:175.000. Charakteristische Symptome sind Adipositas, Pigment-Retinopathie, postaxiale Polydaktylie, polyzystische Nieren, Hypogenitalismus und Lernprobleme. Viele dieser Symptome treten erst mehrere Jahre nach Beginn der Krankheit auf. Die klinische Auspr\u00e4gung ist unterschiedlich, aber die meisten Patienten manifestieren im Verlauf der Krankheit die \u00fcberwiegende Zahl der Symptome, aber das einzige konstante Symptom nach der Kindheit ist die Pigment-Retinopathie. Weitere m\u00f6gliche Symptome des BBS sind: Diabetes mellitus, Bluthochdruck, kongenitale Kardiopathie und Hirschsprung-Krankheit (s. dort). Das weite klinische Spektrum des BBS geht einher mit einer signifikanten genetischen Heterogenit\u00e4t. Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt, bei einigen F\u00e4llen wurde oligogene Vererbung nachgewiesen. Bisher konnten f\u00fcr diesen Ph\u00e4notyp 12 verschiedene Gene (BBS1 bis BBS12) verantwortlich gemacht werden. Sie kodieren f\u00fcr Proteine, die an Entwicklug und Funktion prim\u00e4rer Zilien beteiligt sind. Fehlen oder Dysfunktion von BBS-Proteinen f\u00fchrt zu Zilienanomalien in Organen wie Niere oder Auge. F\u00fcr einige Symptome des BBS kann bisher aber kein Zusammenhang mit einer Ziliendysfunktion hergestellt werden. Das Erkennen des klinischen Bildes ist wichtig, da die klinische Diagnose durch molekulare Analyse gesichert werden kann. Das erm\u00f6glicht eine valide genetische Beratung und eine pr\u00e4natale Diagnostik. Differentialdiagnosen sind Alstr\u00f6m-, McKusick-Kaufmann und Meckel-Gruber-Syndrom (s. diese Termini). Patienten mit BBS ben\u00f6tigen eine multidisziplin\u00e4re medizinische Betreuung. Lebensbedrohlich sind die Nieren-Anomalien: Sie schreiten bis zum terminalen Nierenversagen fort und erfordern eine Nierentransplantation. Progredienter Visusverlust durch die Netzhautdystrophie, eine eventuell vorhandenes moderates intellektuelles Defizit, Verhaltensanomalien, Hypomimie und Adipositas schr\u00e4nken das soziale Leben dieser Patienten ein.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic multisystem disorder characterized by the variable association of retinal dystrophy, obesity, polydactyly, genitourinary and kidney anomalies, learning disability and hypogonadism, with a wide spectrum of other minor manifestations.", "synonyms": "BBS, ", "inheritance": "Oligogenic\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Infancy, Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "209900\u00a0 600151\u00a0 605231\u00a0 615981\u00a0 615982\u00a0 615983\u00a0 615984\u00a0 615985\u00a0 615986\u00a0 615987\u00a0 615988\u00a0 615989\u00a0 615990\u00a0 615991\u00a0 615992\u00a0 615993\u00a0 615994\u00a0 615995\u00a0 615996\u00a0 617119\u00a0 617406", "umls": "C0752166", "mesh": "D020788", "gard": "6866", "meddra": "10056715", "epidemiology": "In the USA, the prevalence is estimated at 1/100,000. Whilst epidemiological data is limited in Europe, a prevalence of 1/59,000 has been estimated in Denmark and 1/45,000-66,000 in the Reunion Island, France (due to a founder effect).", "clinical_description": "The clinical manifestations are highly variable, even within affected families. Post-axial polydactyly, sometimes associated with brachydactyly and/or syndactyly, is a common congenital feature. Other manifestations develop gradually over the first decade of life. Rapid weight gain is often described in early childhood, with obesity/overweight present in over 90% of individuals after 5 years of age; it is often difficult to treat and is associated with the metabolic syndrome in adults. Rod-cone or choroidal dystrophy causes decreased visual acuity, night blindness, photophobia and loss of central and color vision by late childhood/early adulthood. Other ocular manifestations include strabismus, cataracts, and astigmatism. Kidney and urinary tract abnormalities are common and may lead a progressive decline of kidney function: stage II-V chronic kidney disease (CKD) is described in 30 to over 40% of affected individuals. Developmental delay, cognitive deficit and behavioral disorders (autism, psychosis) are frequent features. Hypogonadism is often reported, especially in males. Minor signs include diabetes mellitus, heart (valvular stenoses, patent ductus arteriosus, cardiomyopathy), gastrointestinal tract (Hirschsprung disease), central nervous system (clumsiness, ataxia), liver (fibrosis, biliary cirrhosis, portal hypertension), and dentition (dental crowding, hypodontia, malocclusion, enamel hypoplasia) abnormalities. Subtle and inconsistent dysmorphic features (brachycephaly, macrocephaly, hypertelorism, midface hypoplasia, retrognathia) have also been reported. Anosmia or hyposmia may also be found as well as bilateral sensorineural hearing loss.", "etiology": "Bardet-Biedl syndrome (BBS) is a ciliopathy associated with abnormalities in proteins involved in the development and function of primary cilia. Pathogenic or likely pathogenic variants in at least 24 different genes have been associated with BBS to date. Depending on the population origin, BBS1 (11q13.2) and BBS10 (12q21.2) are the most frequent genes, respectively accounting for ~23% and 15% of genotyped BBS patients.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis of BBS is based on the clinical manifestations (at least four major clinical signs or 3 major and 2 minor clinical signs) and can be confirmed by molecular genetic testing of the causative genes in more than 80% of patients. Visual manifestations are often the first sign leading to diagnosis in patients with no polydactyly; polydactyly and kidney anomalies (hyperechoic or multicystic kidneys) can be antenatal presenting signs.", "differential_diagnosis": "Main differential diagnoses include Alstr\u00f6m syndrome, McKusick-Kaufman syndrome, Joubert syndrome, Jeune syndrome, Sensenbrenner syndrome and Senior-L\u00f8ken syndrome.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Genetic prenatal testing for BBS is possible in families with an identified gene mutation.", "genetic_counseling": "BBS is inherited in an autosomal recessive manner. Oligogenic inheritance has also been reported is some affected families. Genetic counseling should be provided to affected families.", "management_and_treatment": "Multidisciplinary management and treatment are required. No targeted treatment is available. Most manifestations are treated following standard practice for the general population (obesity, learning disability, kidney anomalies). Genital abnormalities and polydactyly may be treated with surgery.", "prognosis": "Chronic kidney disease is considered the main cause of morbidity and mortality; its severity varies among patients but may potentially lead to end-stage kidney disease requiring dialysis or transplantation. Progressive vision loss due to retinal dystrophy, together with moderate intellectual deficit (when present), behavioral anomalies, hypomimia and obesity will affect the social life of these patients."}, {"name": "BCD", "sub_name": "Bietti-Kristalldystrophie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Bietti-Kristall Dystrophie (BCD) ist eine seltene progrediente, autosomal-rezessiv vererbte tapetoretinale Degeneration, die im 3. Lebensjahrzehnt auftritt. Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch kleine gl\u00e4nzende kristalline Ablagerungen in der hinteren Retina und im Kornea-Limbus, und durch Sklerose der Choroidea-Gef\u00e4\u00dfe. Die Folge sind Nachtblindheit, verminderte Sehkraft, parazentrales Skotom und, im Endstadium, legale Blindheit.", "synonyms": "BCD, Bietti`s kristalline Retinopathie, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "ICD-10": "H15.5", "OMIM": "210370", "UMLS": "C1859486", "MeSH": "C535440", "GARD": "10050"}, {"name": "BCD-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Blepharo-cheilo-dentales Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden mehr als 50 F\u00e4lle in der Literatur beschrieben.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare ectodermal dysplasia syndrome characterized by the association of lower eyelid ectropion, upper eyelid distichiasis, euryblepharon, bilateral cleft lip and palate, and conical teeth.", "synonyms": "BCD syndrome, Blepharocheilodontic syndrome, Clefting-ectropion-conical teeth syndrome, Ectropion inferior-cleft lip and/or palate syndrome, Elschnig syndrome, Lagophthalmia-cleft lip and palate syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "119580\u00a0 617681", "umls": "C1861536", "gard": "2071\u00a0 3167", "epidemiology": "Over 50 cases have been described in literature to date.", "clinical_description": "Blepharocheilodontic syndrome (BCD) syndrome is characterized by eyelid malformations, cleft lip with or without cleft palate (CLP), and dental anomalies. CLP is usually bilateral and eyelid malformations are typical (ectropion of the lower eyelids, euryblepharon, and lagophthalmia). Patients harbor variable expression of ectodermal dysplasia, with constant dental anomalies corresponding to conical teeth and tooth agenesis. Additional variable features have been reported, including congenital hypothyroidism due to thyroid gland hypoplasia or aplasia, imperforate anus, neural tube defect, and syndactyly. Patients have normal intellectual development. Significant interindividual and intrafamilial variability have been reported, as well as incomplete penetrance. Diffuse gastric cancer and lobular breast cancer have been reported in two families so far. To date, the risk of cancer in BCD syndrome is not precisely known, since cancers were not reported in the other reported families.", "etiology": "BCD syndrome is due to either heterozygous CDH1 or CTNND1 variants. CDH1 encodes the E-cadherin, a transmembrane glycoprotein. CTNND1 encodes the Delta-Catenin, a protein linked to the cytoplasmic domain of E-cadherin. Both proteins are involved in a cell-cell adhesion complex, critical for establishing and maintaining polarized and differentiated epithelia during development. Recurrent missense CDH1 variants have been identified in BCD syndrome, probably impairing ion calcium binding. Variations in CTNND1 correspond predominantly to truncating variants, but missense variants have also been reported. BCD-related to CDH1 and CTNND1 variants are clinically indistinguishable, although the latter usually shows a milder phenotype. CDH1 variants also cause hereditary diffuse gastric cancer (HDGC), and diffuse gastric cancer and lobular breast cancer have been reported in two BCD families with CDH1 variants. Since cancers have not been reported in other reported families to date, the risk of cancer development is not precisely known. No HDGC-related cancer has been reported in patients with CTNND1 variants.", "diagnostic_methods": "The syndrome is suspected on the association of CLP, typical eyelid malformations and ectodermal dysplasia features. Molecular genetic testing approaches include targeted sequencing of the entire CDH1 and CTNND1 coding regions.", "differential_diagnosis": "BSD presents with a unique constellation of features and there are no relevant differential diagnoses.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal testing is possible if the pathogenic variant has been identified in an affected family member. However if the pathogenic variant is identified in the fetus, the severity of the condition is not predictable.", "genetic_counseling": "BCD syndrome is usually sporadic, but large families have been described. The disorder is autosomal dominant and patients harboring BCD syndrome features and carrying a CDH1 variant or a CTNND1 variant have 50% risk to transmit the pathogenic variant to their offspring. Due to intrafamilial variability and incomplete penetrance, prediction of the severity is difficult.", "management_and_treatment": "Management of BCD syndrome is supportive and symptomatic. CLP management is surgical, dental, and orthodontic. Early orthodontic follow-up should be proposed. Blepharoplasty is required for ankyloblepharon and for severe eyelid anomalies. Lagophthalmos can lead to corneal abrasion. Ophthalmologic evaluation is recommended to assess eye movement and possible tearing reduction. Congenital hypothyroidism is usually diagnosed through neonatal screening and treated with thyroid replacement therapy. Assessment of risk of cancer is challenging. Currently, there are no clear guidelines for surveillance or prophylactic total gastrectomy.", "prognosis": "The prognosis and functional consequences are variable and dependent on the associated anomalies. In families carrying a CDH1 variant and with a positive familial history of CDH1-related cancers, or fitting criteria for hereditary diffuse gastric cancer (HDGC), prognosis can be worsened by the occurrence of cancer."}, {"name": "BCIE", "sub_name": "Ichthyose, epidermolytische, autosomal-dominante", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Epidermolytische Ichthyose (EI) ist eine seltene keratinopathische Ichthyose (KPI, siehe dort), mit einen blasenbildenden Ph\u00e4notyp bei der Geburt, der sich fortschreitend zu einem hyperkeratotischen Ph\u00e4notyp entwickelt", "synonyms": "BCIE, Bull\u00f6se kongenitale ichthyosiforme Erythrodermie Brocq, EHK, EI, Erythrodermie, ichthyosiforme kongenitale, bull\u00f6se Form, Hyperkeratose, epidermolytische, Ichthyose, bull\u00f6se, Ichthyosis hystrix Typ Brocq, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q80.3", "OMIM": "113800\u00a0 607602", "UMLS": "C0079153", "GARD": "1039", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz aller Typen der KPI wird auf 1/909.000 in Frankreich gesch\u00e4tzt. Die genaue Pr\u00e4valenz der EI ist unbekannt.", "clinical_description": "S\u00e4uglinge weisen bei Geburt oder kurz danach eine generalisierte Erythrodermie, schwere Blasenbildung, milde Abschuppung und oberfl\u00e4chliche Hauterosionen an Stellen mit kleinerem Trauma und in Beugebereichen auf. Sp\u00e4ter entwickeln sich gelbbraune hyperkeratotische Plaques, oft assoziiert mit milder Hintergrund-Erythrodermie, meist in den ersten Lebensmonaten. Mit der Zeit verschlimmert sich die Hyperkeratose, w\u00e4hrend die Blasenbildung in der Regel abnimmt, trotz Rezidiven nach einem Hauttrauma oder im Sommer. Die Hyperkeratose ist oft generalisiert, jedoch weisen einige Patienten begrenzte Hautl\u00e4sionen auf, insbesondere in den Gelenkbereichen, am vorderen Hals, der Bauchwand und den infraglut\u00e4alen Falten. Eine palmoplantare Beteiligung wird bei einigen Patienten beobachtet. Die Haut weist h\u00e4ufig einen Juckreiz auf uns ist \u00fcbelriechend; Hautinfektionen k\u00f6nnen auftreten. Weitere m\u00f6gliche Merkmale sind: Hypohidrose, Abschuppung der Kopfhaut und Nageldystrophie. Bei schweren F\u00e4llen kann eine Wachstumsst\u00f6rung beobachtet werden. Die EI dauert, mit einer Hyperkeratose unterschiedlicher Intensit\u00e4t und Ausdehnung, bis in das Erwachsenenalter an. Eine klinische Variante der EI, die ringf\u00f6rmige EI (AEI, siehe dort), weist eine ringf\u00f6rmige Verteilung polyzyklischer erythemat\u00f6ser Abschuppungen auf, die sich in der Regel am Rumpf und den Extremit\u00e4ten entwickeln und sich meist wieder aufl\u00f6sen.", "etiology": "Die Erkrankung wird durch Mutationen in den Genen verursacht, die f\u00fcr die epidermalen suprabasalen Keratine 1 (KRT1; 12q13.13) und 10 (KRT10; 17q21-q23) kodieren. Hierdurch wird die Bildung des Keratin-Zwischenfilaments in den suprabasalen Keratinozyten beeintr\u00e4chtigt. Es besteht eine Genotyp-Ph\u00e4notyp-Korrelation, wobei eine palmoplantare Beteiligung in der Regel mit KRT1-Mutationen assoziiert ist. Die Lage der Mutation beeinflusst m\u00f6glicherweise den Schweregrad des Ph\u00e4notyps.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf dem klinischen Bild und der histologischen Untersuchung der Hautl\u00e4sionen, die eine Hyperkeratose mit Orthokeratose, Hypergranulose und Zytolyse in den oberen Schichten des Stratum spinosum und Stratum granulosum (epidermolytische Hyperkeratose) zeigt. Die Elektronenmikroscopie zeigt suprabasale Keratinozyten mit unregelm\u00e4\u00dfig geformten Klumpen von Keratin-Zwischenfilamenten. Gentests best\u00e4tigen die Diagnose.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen bei der Geburt sind: Toxische epidermale Nekrolyse, erbliche Epidermolysis bullosa, Incontinentia pigmenti (siehe jeweils dort) oder Herpesinfektionen, w\u00e4hrend sie in sp\u00e4teren Stadien andere KI, wie die oberfl\u00e4chliche EI und die Ichthyosis hystrix Curth-Macklin (siehe jeweils dort) umfasst.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine genetische pr\u00e4natale Diagnose ist m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Die meisten F\u00e4lle sind sporadisch. Die \u00fcbrigen sind autosomal-dominante, seltener autosomal-rezessive F\u00e4lle. Betroffenen Familien soll eine genetische Beratung angeboten werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung ist symptomatisch. H\u00e4ufig werden Emollientien eingesetzt, jedoch ist deren Wirksamkeit begrenzt. Topische Keratolytika oder orales Acitretin bei schweren Formen kann hyperkeratotische L\u00e4sionen bessern, ist jedoch mit schweren Nebenwirkungen verbunden, darunter Hautbr\u00fcchigkeit und verst\u00e4rkte Blasenbildung. Antiseptische Waschungen verringern die bakterielle Besiedlung und den K\u00f6rpergeruch. Eine antibiotische Therapie ist in F\u00e4llen einer bakteriellen Infektion erforderlich.", "prognosis": "Der Schweregrad der Erkrankung variiert. Eine EI kann die Lebensqualit\u00e4t beeintr\u00e4chtigen und zu einer sozialen Behinderung aufgrund der Hautaspekte, der Schmerzen, des Juckreizes, des K\u00f6rpergeruchs und/oder der rekurrierenden Infektionen f\u00fchren. Eine EI kann au\u00dferdem im neonatalen Zeitraum aufgrund von Infektionen und/oder Dehydrierung lebensbedrohlich sein.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz aller Typen der KPI wird auf 1/909.000 in Frankreich gesch\u00e4tzt. Die genaue Pr\u00e4valenz der EI ist unbekannt."}, {"name": "BCKDH-Mangel", "sub_name": "Ahornsirup-Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Ahornsirupkrankheit (englisch Maple syrup urine disease/MSUD) ist eine seltene genetische Erkrankung im Stoffwechsel verzweigtkettiger Aminos\u00e4uren und ist klassischerweise gekennzeichnet durch geringe Nahrungsaufnahme, Lethargie, Erbrechen und einen Ahornsirup-\u00e4hnlichen Geruch im Ohrschmalz (und sp\u00e4ter im Urin) kurz nach der Geburt. Wenn die Krankheit unbehandelt bleibt, dann folgen progressive Enzephalopathie und zentrales Atemversagen. Die vier klinisch \u00fcberlappenden Subtypen sind: klassische Form, Intermedi\u00e4rform, intermittierende Form und Thiamin-responsive Form (s. diese Termini).", "synonyms": "Alpha-Ketos\u00e4uredecarboxylase-Mangel, BCKD-Mangel, BCKDH-Mangel, MSUD, Verzweigtkettenketoazidurie, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "E71.0", "OMIM": "248600\u00a0 615135", "UMLS": "C0024776\u00a0 C0268576", "MeSH": "D008375", "GARD": "3228", "MedDRA": "10026817", "epidemiology": "Die gesch\u00e4tzte Pr\u00e4valenz betr\u00e4gt etwa 1:150.000 Lebendgeburten (publizierte und unpublizierte Daten aus Neugeborenen-Screenings).", "clinical_description": "Die klassische Ahornsirupkrankheit \u00e4u\u00dfert sich in den ersten Lebenstagen in geringer Nahrungsaufnahme und Schl\u00e4frigkeit, gefolgt von einer sich verschlechternden Enzephalopathie mit Lethargie, intermittierender Apnoe, stereotypen Bewegungen (,,Fechten'', ,,Fahrad fahren'' und Opisthotonus. Koma und zentrals Atemversagen kommen sieben bis zehn Tage nach Geburt hinzu. Die einzige biochemische Auff\u00e4lligkeit ist eine Ketose. Die Intermedi\u00e4rform entspricht der klassischen Form, aber sie kann sp\u00e4ter beginnen und weniger schwere Symptome zeigen. Patienten mit intermittierendem Typ sind bei Geburt symptomlos, k\u00f6nnen aber Episoden akuter Dekompensation erleiden oder neurologische Symptome und Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung w\u00e4hrend der Kindheit zeigen. Die Thiamin-responsive Form \u00e4hnelt klinisch der Intermedi\u00e4rform, wobei eine Thiamintherapie die Toleranz gegen\u00fcber Leucin in der Nahrung verbessert.", "etiology": "Die Ahornsirupkrankheit wird durch Mutationen in den Genen f\u00fcr die Untereinheiten E1a, E1B und E2 des BCKAD (branched chain 2-ketoacid dehydrogenase)-Komplexes verursacht, die am zweiten enzymatischen Schritt des Abbaus der verzweigtkettigen Aminos\u00e4uren Leucin, Isoleucin und Valin beteiligt sind. Der BKAD-Komplex hat vier Untereinheiten: E1a, E1b, E2 und E3, die durch die Gene BCKDHA auf Chromosom (19q13.1-q13.2), BCKDHB (6q14.1), DBT (1p31) and DLD (7q31-q32) kodiert werden. Mutationen in diesen Genen f\u00fchren zu Anh\u00e4ufung verzweigtkettiger Aminos\u00e4uren (v. a. Leucin) und ihren verzweigtkettigen Alpha-Ketons\u00e4uren. Mutationen im E3-Gen (DLD) sind nicht mit der Ahornsirupkrankheit assoziiert, aber verursachen die Pyruvatdehydrogenase-E3-Defizienz (s. diesen Terminus). In einem Fall von milder intermittierender Ahornsirupkrankheit wurde eine Mutation im PPM1K-Gen (4q22.1) nachgewiesen.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Ahornsirupkrankheit folgt einem autosomal-rezessiven Erbgang, und eine genetische Beratung ist m\u00f6glich.", "summary": "Die gesch\u00e4tzte Pr\u00e4valenz betr\u00e4gt etwa 1:150.000 Lebendgeburten (publizierte und unpublizierte Daten aus Neugeborenen-Screenings)."}, {"name": "BCKD-Mangel", "sub_name": "Ahornsirup-Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Ahornsirupkrankheit (englisch Maple syrup urine disease/MSUD) ist eine seltene genetische Erkrankung im Stoffwechsel verzweigtkettiger Aminos\u00e4uren und ist klassischerweise gekennzeichnet durch geringe Nahrungsaufnahme, Lethargie, Erbrechen und einen Ahornsirup-\u00e4hnlichen Geruch im Ohrschmalz (und sp\u00e4ter im Urin) kurz nach der Geburt. Wenn die Krankheit unbehandelt bleibt, dann folgen progressive Enzephalopathie und zentrales Atemversagen. Die vier klinisch \u00fcberlappenden Subtypen sind: klassische Form, Intermedi\u00e4rform, intermittierende Form und Thiamin-responsive Form (s. diese Termini).", "synonyms": "Alpha-Ketos\u00e4uredecarboxylase-Mangel, BCKD-Mangel, BCKDH-Mangel, MSUD, Verzweigtkettenketoazidurie, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "E71.0", "OMIM": "248600\u00a0 615135", "UMLS": "C0024776\u00a0 C0268576", "MeSH": "D008375", "GARD": "3228", "MedDRA": "10026817", "epidemiology": "Die gesch\u00e4tzte Pr\u00e4valenz betr\u00e4gt etwa 1:150.000 Lebendgeburten (publizierte und unpublizierte Daten aus Neugeborenen-Screenings).", "clinical_description": "Die klassische Ahornsirupkrankheit \u00e4u\u00dfert sich in den ersten Lebenstagen in geringer Nahrungsaufnahme und Schl\u00e4frigkeit, gefolgt von einer sich verschlechternden Enzephalopathie mit Lethargie, intermittierender Apnoe, stereotypen Bewegungen (,,Fechten'', ,,Fahrad fahren'' und Opisthotonus. Koma und zentrals Atemversagen kommen sieben bis zehn Tage nach Geburt hinzu. Die einzige biochemische Auff\u00e4lligkeit ist eine Ketose. Die Intermedi\u00e4rform entspricht der klassischen Form, aber sie kann sp\u00e4ter beginnen und weniger schwere Symptome zeigen. Patienten mit intermittierendem Typ sind bei Geburt symptomlos, k\u00f6nnen aber Episoden akuter Dekompensation erleiden oder neurologische Symptome und Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung w\u00e4hrend der Kindheit zeigen. Die Thiamin-responsive Form \u00e4hnelt klinisch der Intermedi\u00e4rform, wobei eine Thiamintherapie die Toleranz gegen\u00fcber Leucin in der Nahrung verbessert.", "etiology": "Die Ahornsirupkrankheit wird durch Mutationen in den Genen f\u00fcr die Untereinheiten E1a, E1B und E2 des BCKAD (branched chain 2-ketoacid dehydrogenase)-Komplexes verursacht, die am zweiten enzymatischen Schritt des Abbaus der verzweigtkettigen Aminos\u00e4uren Leucin, Isoleucin und Valin beteiligt sind. Der BKAD-Komplex hat vier Untereinheiten: E1a, E1b, E2 und E3, die durch die Gene BCKDHA auf Chromosom (19q13.1-q13.2), BCKDHB (6q14.1), DBT (1p31) and DLD (7q31-q32) kodiert werden. Mutationen in diesen Genen f\u00fchren zu Anh\u00e4ufung verzweigtkettiger Aminos\u00e4uren (v. a. Leucin) und ihren verzweigtkettigen Alpha-Ketons\u00e4uren. Mutationen im E3-Gen (DLD) sind nicht mit der Ahornsirupkrankheit assoziiert, aber verursachen die Pyruvatdehydrogenase-E3-Defizienz (s. diesen Terminus). In einem Fall von milder intermittierender Ahornsirupkrankheit wurde eine Mutation im PPM1K-Gen (4q22.1) nachgewiesen.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Ahornsirupkrankheit folgt einem autosomal-rezessiven Erbgang, und eine genetische Beratung ist m\u00f6glich.", "summary": "Die gesch\u00e4tzte Pr\u00e4valenz betr\u00e4gt etwa 1:150.000 Lebendgeburten (publizierte und unpublizierte Daten aus Neugeborenen-Screenings)."}, {"name": "BCKD-Mangel, intermedi\u00e4rer", "sub_name": "Ahornsirup-Krankheit, intermedi\u00e4re", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Intermedi\u00e4rform der Ahornsirupkrankheit (intermedi\u00e4re MSUD) ist eine mildere Form der MSUD (s. diesen Terminus) und zeichnet sich durch persistierend erh\u00f6hte verzweigtkettige Aminos\u00e4uren und Ketos\u00e4uren aber seltenere oder gar keine Stoffwechselentgleisungen aus.", "synonyms": "BCKD-Mangel, intermedi\u00e4rer, MSUD, intermedi\u00e4r, Verzweigtkettige alpha-Ketos\u00e4uredehydrogenase-Mangel, intermedi\u00e4r, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "E71.0", "OMIM": "248600\u00a0 615135", "UMLS": "C1621920", "epidemiology": "Die gesch\u00e4tzte H\u00e4ufigkeit der MSUD bei Geburt betr\u00e4gt 1:150.000. Man vermutet, dass etwa 30 % der Krankheitsf\u00e4lle zum intermedi\u00e4ren Typ z\u00e4hlen.", "clinical_description": "Das Einsetzen klinischer Symptome bei der intermedi\u00e4ren Form variiert zwischen den fr\u00fchen Lebensmonaten und den ersten Kindheitsjahren. Kleinkinder k\u00f6nnen Essst\u00f6rungen und Wachstumsverz\u00f6gerung haben, einen Ahornsirupgeruch im Urin oder eine Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung aufweisen. \u00c4ltere Kinder zeigen \u00fcblicherweise Lernschwierigkeiten. Wie bei der klassischen Form der MSUD (s. diesen Terminus) kann kataboler Stress zur akuten Stoffwechselentgleisung f\u00fchren, die - falls unbehandelt - mit Anorexie, Erbrechen, Ataxie (bei Babys/Kleinkindern), kognitiven Einschr\u00e4nkungen, Schlafst\u00f6rungen, Halluzinationen, Hyperaktivit\u00e4t, Launenhaftigkeit, akuter Dystonie, Choreoathetose (bei Erwachsenen), Benommenheit, Koma und Hirn\u00f6dem einhergeht.", "etiology": "Die MSUD wird verursacht durch Mutationen in den Genen, die f\u00fcr drei der vier Untereinheiten des BCKAD-Komplexes (verzweigtkettiger 2-Ketos\u00e4ure-Dehydrogenase-Komplex) kodieren. Bei den Genen handelt es sich um BCKDHA auf 19q13.1-q13.2), das die E1a-Untereinheit kodiert, BCKDHB (6q14.1) f\u00fcr E1b und DBT (1p31), das f\u00fcr E2 kodiert. Mutationen bewirken eine Anh\u00e4ufung verzweigtkettiger Aminos\u00e4uren (insbesondere Leucin) und verzweigtkettiger Alpha-Ketos\u00e4uren. Bei der intermdi\u00e4ren Form \u00fcberwiegen Mutation in den Genen BCKDHA und DBT. In einem einzigen Fall wurde eine Mutation im PPM1K-Gen auf Chromosom 4q22.1 nachgewiesen.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die intermedi\u00e4re Form der Ahornsirupkrankheit kann durch Tandem-Massenspektrometrie beim Neugeborenen-Screening festgestellt werden. Ansonsten findet eine Analyse der Aminos\u00e4uren im Blutplasma statt. Die Konzentration von Leucin im Plasma ist erh\u00f6ht, w\u00e4hrend der Gehalt von Isoleucin und Valin normal sein kann. Die Aktivit\u00e4t des BCKAD-Komplexes betr\u00e4gt bei den Betroffenen 3-30 %, so dass die Konzentration verzweigtkettiger Aminos\u00e4uren im Blut nicht so hoch wie bei der klassischen Form (diesen Terminus nachschlagen) ist. Ein DNA-Test kann krankheitsverursachende Mutationen identifizieren und so die Diagnose best\u00e4tigen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Zu den Differentialdiagnosen der klinischen Symptome z\u00e4hlen andere angeborene St\u00f6rungen des Intermedi\u00e4rstoffwechsels, wie z. B. N-Azetylglutamat-Synthase-Mangel, Arginiosuccinat-Azidurie (und weitere St\u00f6rungen des Harnzyklus), neonatale Glycin-Enzephalopathie, Propionazid\u00e4mie, Methylmalonazid\u00e4mie und Beta-Ketothiolase-Defizienz (s. diese Termini).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik ist in Familien mit bekannter krankheitsverursachender Mutation m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Der Erbgang ist autosomal-rezessiv, eine genetische Beratung ist m\u00f6glich.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung der intermedi\u00e4ren MSUD \u00e4hnelt derjeningen der klassischen Form. S\u00e4uglinge brauchen eine hochkalorische Di\u00e4t ohne verzweigtkettige Aminos\u00e4uren, eine Leucin-arme Nahrung, und eine ambulante \u00dcberwachung an einer Stoffwechselklinik. Die Behandlung einer akuten Stoffwechselentgleisung erfordert eine aggressive Steigerung des Proteinanabolismus mit Glukose und Insulin, einer intraven\u00f6sen Lipidzufuhr, Kontrolle der Aminos\u00e4uren im Blutplasma und Erg\u00e4nzung von Isoleucin und Valin. Patienten m\u00fcssen sich an eine strenge lebenslange Di\u00e4t halten, um eine akute Stoffwechselentgleisung zu verhindern. Eine spezielle \u00dcberwachung w\u00e4hrend der Schwangerschaft ist unerl\u00e4sslich.", "prognosis": "Unter der Voraussetzung einer fr\u00fchzeitigen Diagnose und einer ad\u00e4quaten Therapie ist die Prognose g\u00fcnstig, aber da die Erkrankung mild verl\u00e4uft, wird eine Diagnose oft sp\u00e4t gestellt und gewisse neurologische Sch\u00e4den k\u00f6nnen auftreten.", "summary": "Die gesch\u00e4tzte H\u00e4ufigkeit der MSUD bei Geburt betr\u00e4gt 1:150.000. Man vermutet, dass etwa 30 % der Krankheitsf\u00e4lle zum intermedi\u00e4ren Typ z\u00e4hlen."}, {"name": "BCKD-Mangel, intermittierender", "sub_name": "Ahornsirup-Krankheit, intermittierende", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die intermittierende Ahornsirupkrankheit (intermittierende MSUD) ist eine milde Form der MSUD (diesen Terminus nachschlagen), bei der Patienten keine Symptome haben und normale Konzentration verzweigtkettiger Aminos\u00e4uren aufweisen, aber unter katabolem Stress eine akute Stoffwechselentleisung mit Ketoazidose riskieren, die zu Hirn\u00f6demem und Koma f\u00fchren kann wenn sie unbehandelt bleibt.", "synonyms": "BCKD-Mangel, intermittierender, MSUD, intermittierend, Verzweigtkettige alpha-Ketos\u00e4uredehydrogenase-Mangel, intermittierend, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "E71.0", "OMIM": "248600", "UMLS": "C0268569", "epidemiology": "Die Ahornsirupkrankheit hat eine gesch\u00e4tzte H\u00e4ufigkeit von 1:150.000 Lebendgeburten. Die Anzahl der Patienten mit intermittierender Form ist unbekannt, aber sie ist sehr wahrscheinlich unterdiagnostiziert.", "clinical_description": "Anders als bei der klassischen Form der Ahornsirupkrankheit zeigen Patienten mit der intermittierenden Form ein normales Wachstum und eine normale geistige Entwicklung w\u00e4hrend des Kleinkindalters und der Kindheit. Sie k\u00f6nnen (v. a. w\u00e4hrend der Kindheit) Symptome bei katabolem Stress entwickeln (z. B. Fasten, Dehydration, Fieber, Infektionen oder Schwangerschaft bei Erwachsenen). Diese ausl\u00f6senden Faktoren k\u00f6nnen zu einer potentiell t\u00f6dlichen akuten Stoffwechselentgleisung f\u00fchren, welche durch Anorexie, \u00dcbelkeit, Erbrechen, Lethargie, Ataxie (bei S\u00e4uglingen, Kleinkindern), kognitiver Einschr\u00e4nkung, Schlafst\u00f6rungen, Halluzinationen, Hyperaktivit\u00e4ten, Stimmungsschwankungen, akuter Dystonie und Choreoathetose (bei Erwachsenen) charakterisiert ist. Diese k\u00f6nnen sich weiterentwickeln zu Benommenheit, Koma und Hirn\u00f6demen. Intelligenz und Entwicklung werden durch diese Episoden gew\u00f6hnlich nicht beeintr\u00e4chtigt.", "etiology": "Die MSUD wird verursacht durch Mutationen in den Genen, die f\u00fcr drei der vier Untereinheiten des BCKAD-Komplexes (verzweigtkettiger 2-Ketos\u00e4ure-Dehydrogenase-Komplex) kodieren. Bei den Genen handelt es sich um BCKDHA auf 19q13.1-q13.2), das die E1a-Untereinheit kodiert, BCKDHB (6q14.1) f\u00fcr E1b und DBT (1p31), das f\u00fcr E2 kodiert. Mutationen bewirken eine Anh\u00e4ufung verzweigtkettiger Aminos\u00e4uren (insbesondere Leucin) und verzweigtkettiger Alpha-Ketos\u00e4uren. Bei der intermittierenden Form \u00fcberwiegen Mutation im DBT-Gen.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die intermittierende Form kann durch die Tandem-Massenspektrometrie beim Neugeborenen-Screening \u00fcbersehen werden. Die Konzentrationen der verzweigtkettigen Aminos\u00e4uren ist \u00fcblicherweise normal oder nur leicht erh\u00f6ht, abgesehen von Zeiten mit physiologischem Stress, w\u00e4hrenddessen das biochemische Profil dem einer klassischen Ahornsirupkrankheit \u00e4hnelt. Mittels Gaschromatographen-Spektrometrie kann man verzweigtkettige Alpha-Ketos\u00e4uren im Urin nur im Lauf einer Stoffwechselentgleisung nachweisen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Zu den Differentialdiagnosen der klinischen Symptome z\u00e4hlen andere angeborene St\u00f6rungen des Intermedi\u00e4rstoffwechsels, wie z. B. N-Azetylglutamat-Synthase-Mangel, Arginiosuccinat-Azidurie (und weitere St\u00f6rungen des Harnzyklus), neonatale Glycin-Enzephalopathie, Propionazid\u00e4mie, Methylmalonazid\u00e4mie und Beta-Ketothiolase-Mangel (s. diese Termini).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik ist in Familien mit bekannter krankheitsverursachender Mutation m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Der Erbgang ist autosomal-rezessiv, eine genetische Beratung ist m\u00f6glich.", "management_and_treatment": "Patienten mit intermittierender MSUD tolerieren eine normale Leucinzufuhr, und eine besondere Behandlung ist nicht n\u00f6tig. Unabh\u00e4ngig davon m\u00fcssen sie sich regelm\u00e4\u00dfig an einer Stoffwechselklinik vorstellen und sie brauchen eine Strategie um akute Stoffwechselentgleisungen zu vermeiden, wozu eine energiereiche aber proteinarme Di\u00e4t w\u00e4hrend der Krankheitsepisoden geh\u00f6rt. Die Behandlung einer akuten Stoffwechselentgleisung erfordert eine aggressive Steigerung des Proteinanabolismus mit Glukose und Insulin, einer intraven\u00f6sen Lipidzufuhr, Kontrolle der Aminos\u00e4uren im Blutplasma und Erg\u00e4nzung von Isoleucin und Valin.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist g\u00fcnstig unter der Bedingung, das die Stoffwechselkontrolle w\u00e4hrend Stressepisoden aufrechterhalten wird und jegliche Stoffwechselentgleisung unverz\u00fcglich behandelt wird.", "summary": "Die Ahornsirupkrankheit hat eine gesch\u00e4tzte H\u00e4ufigkeit von 1:150.000 Lebendgeburten. Die Anzahl der Patienten mit intermittierender Form ist unbekannt, aber sie ist sehr wahrscheinlich unterdiagnostiziert."}, {"name": "BCKD-Mangel, klassischer", "sub_name": "Ahornsirup-Krankheit, klassische", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die klassische Ahornsirupkrankheit (klassische MSUD) ist die schwerwiegendste und wahrscheinlich h\u00e4ufigste Form der MSUD (s. diesen Terminus), die charakterisiert ist durch Ahornsirupgeruch im Ohrenschmalz bei der Geburt, geringe Nahrungsaufnahme, Lethargie und fokale Dystonie gefolgt von einer progressiven Enzephalopathie und zentralem Atmungsversagen, falls sie unbehandelt bleibt.", "synonyms": "BCKD-Mangel, klassischer, MSUD, klassisch, Verzweigtketten-Ketoazidurie, klassische, Verzweigtketten-Ketonurie, klassische, Verzweigtkettige alpha-Ketos\u00e4uredehydrogenase-Mangel, klassisch, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "E71.0", "OMIM": "248600", "UMLS": "C0268568", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz der MSUD bei Geburt wird auf etwa 1:150.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die klassische Form ist f\u00fcr etwa 50-75 % der F\u00e4lle verantwortlich.", "clinical_description": "Die klassische MSUD beginnt im Neugeborenenstadium (gew\u00f6hnlich 12 Stunden nach der Geburt) mit Ahornsirup-Geruch im Ohrenschmalz und sp\u00e4ter im Urin, geringer Nahrungsaufnahme und Schl\u00e4frigkeit. Eine progressive Enzephalopathie mit Lethargie, intermittierender Apnoe, stereotypen Bewegungen (als ,,Fechten'' und ,,Fahrrad fahren'' beschrieben) und Opisthothonus treten in den ersten Lebenstagen auf. Ohne Behandlung setzen Koma und zentrales Atemversagen um den siebten bis zehnten Lebenstag ein. Sp\u00e4ter k\u00f6nnen katabolischer Stress, Infektionen oder Verwundungen eine akute, potentiell t\u00f6dliche Leucinvergiftung mit Erbrechen, Bewusstseinstr\u00fcbungen, Ataxie und akute Dystonie bei S\u00e4uglingen und Halluzinationen, Hyperaktivit\u00e4t, fokale Dystonie, Ataxie und Choreoathetose bei Kindern und Erwachsenen verursachen.", "etiology": "Die MSUD wird verursacht durch Mutationen in den Genen, die f\u00fcr drei der vier Untereinheiten des BCKAD-Komplexes (verzweigtkettiger 2-Ketos\u00e4ure-Dehydrogenase-Komplex) kodieren. Bei den Genen handelt es sich um BCKDHA auf 19q13.1-q13.2), das die E1a-Untereinheit kodiert, BCKDHB (6q14.1) f\u00fcr E1b und DBT (1p31), das f\u00fcr E2 kodiert. Mutationen bewirken eine Anh\u00e4ufung verzweigtkettiger Aminos\u00e4uren (insbesondere Leucin) und verzweigtkettiger Alpha-Ketos\u00e4uren. Bei der klassischen Form \u00fcberwiegen Mutation im BCKDHA-Gen.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die klassische MSUD wird durch Tandem-Massenspektrometrie w\u00e4hrend des Neugeborenen-Screenings abgekl\u00e4rt. Eine isolierte Ketose und Enzephalopathie oder Ahornsirupgeruch sind richtungsdeutend f\u00fcr die Krankheit. Plasma-Leucin ist stark erh\u00f6ht, mit einem Verh\u00e4ltnis von Leucin/Valin/Isoleucin von etwa 4/2/1. Eine Allo-Isoleucin-Konzentration \u00fcber 5 \u00b5mol/L im Plasma sichert die Diagnose. Im Urin ist die Konzentration verzweigtkettiger Alpha 2-Ketos\u00e4uren (BCKA) in der Gaschromatographen-Massenspektrometrie erh\u00f6ht. Ein molekulargenetischer Test kann urs\u00e4chliche Mutation nachweisen und eventuell Hinweise auf einen Subtyp liefern.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen umfassen weitere angeborene Stoffwechselst\u00f6rungen, die mit haupts\u00e4chlich neurologischen Ausf\u00e4llen assoziiert sind, wie z. B. Harnzyklusdefekte, organische Azid\u00e4mien (z. B. Propion- oder Isovalerianazid\u00e4mie, Methylmalonazid\u00e4mie mit Homozystinurie, multiple Carboxylase-Defizienz) und Beta-Ketohiolase-Mangel (s. dort). Bei Kleinkindern schlie\u00dft eine Ketose ohne deutliche metabolische Azidose, Hyperammon\u00e4mie und Hypoglyk\u00e4mie viele angeborene Stoffwechselst\u00f6rungen aus. Bei \u00e4lteren Kindern mit diabetischer Ketoazidose findet sich mehr Valin als Leucin im Blutplasma.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik ist in Familien mit bekannter krankheitsverursachender Mutation m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Der Erbgang ist autosomal-rezessiv, und eine genetische Beratung ist m\u00f6glich.", "management_and_treatment": "Die klassische Ahornsirupkrankheit bei Neugeborenen ist ein medizinischer Notfall. Die akute Behandlung erfordert eine aggressive Steigerung des Proteinanabolismus mit Glukose und Insulin, einer intraven\u00f6sen Lipidzufuhr, Kontrolle der Aminos\u00e4uren im Blutplasma und Erg\u00e4nzung von Isoleucin und Valin. Oft ist eine Blutdialyse erforderlich. Stabilisierte Kleinkinder brauchen eine hochkalorische Di\u00e4t ohne verzweigtkettige Aminos\u00e4uren, eine Leucin-arme Ern\u00e4hrung und eine ambulante \u00dcberwachung durch eine Stoffwechselklinik.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist g\u00fcnstig f\u00fcr Patienten, die fr\u00fchzeitig diagnostiziert und unverz\u00fcglich behandelt wurden, und die eine strenge, lebenslange Di\u00e4t befolgen.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz der MSUD bei Geburt wird auf etwa 1:150.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die klassische Form ist f\u00fcr etwa 50-75 % der F\u00e4lle verantwortlich."}, {"name": "BCKD-Mangel, Thiamin-responsiver", "sub_name": "Ahornsirup-Krankheit, Thiamin-responsive", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Thiamin-responsive Ahornsirupkrankheit (Thiamin-responsive MSUD) ist eine weniger schwerwiegende Variante der MSUD (s. dort), die sich mit einem Ph\u00e4notyp \u00e4hnlich dem der intermedi\u00e4ren Form (s. dort) manifestiert, aber positiv auf ein Thiaminbehandlung reagiert.", "synonyms": "BCKD-Mangel, Thiamin-responsiver, MSUD, Thiamin-responsiv, Verzweigtkettige alpha-Ketos\u00e4uredehydrogenase-Mangel, Thiamin-responsiv, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "E71.0", "OMIM": "248600", "UMLS": "C0751285", "epidemiology": "Die H\u00e4ufigkeit der Ahornsirupkrankheit wird auf 1:150.000 Lebendgeburten gesch\u00e4tzt. Der Thiamin-responsive Typ scheint sehr selten zu sein.", "clinical_description": "Die Thiamin-responsive Form der Ahornsirupkrankheit ist wenig erforscht. Sie tritt \u00fcblicherweise nach dem Kleinkindalter auf und wird von klinischen Symptomen begleitet, die denjenigen der intermedi\u00e4ren Form sehr \u00e4hneln. Zu den Krankheitssymptomen z\u00e4hlen Essst\u00f6rungen, geringes Wachstum, ein Ahornsirupgeruch im Urin und eine Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung. \u00c4ltere Kinder zeigen \u00fcblicherweise Lernschwierigkeiten. Wie bei der klassischen MSUD kann physiologischer Stress eine Stoffwechselentgleisung verursachen mit Anorexie, \u00dcbelkeit und Erbrechen (in jedem Alter), Ataxie (bei S\u00e4uglingen, Kleinkindern), kognitiver Einschr\u00e4nkung, Schlafst\u00f6rungen, Halluzinationen, Hyperaktivit\u00e4t, Stimmungsschwankungen, akuter Dystonie und Choreoathetose (bei Erwachsenen), die sich weiterentwickeln zu Benommenheit, Koma und Hirn\u00f6dem wenn sie unbehandelt bleiben. Thiamin (t\u00e4gliche Dosen von 10-1000 mg) hat die Leucintoleranz in den wenigen beschriebenen F\u00e4llen dieses MSUD-Subtyps verbessert, aber eine gewisse Einschr\u00e4nkung an verzweigtkettigen Aminos\u00e4uren ist weiterhin n\u00f6tig.", "etiology": "Die MSUD wird verursacht durch Mutationen in den Genen, die f\u00fcr drei der vier Untereinheiten des BCKAD-Komplexes (verzweigtkettiger 2-Ketos\u00e4ure-Dehydrogenase-Komplex) kodieren. Bei den Genen handelt es sich um BCKDHA auf 19q13.1-q13.2), das die E1a-Untereinheit kodiert, BCKDHB (6q14.1) f\u00fcr E1b und DBT (1p31), das f\u00fcr E2 kodiert. Mutationen bewirken eine Anh\u00e4ufung verzweigtkettiger Aminos\u00e4uren (insbesondere Leucin) und verzweigtkettiger Alpha-Ketos\u00e4uren. Bei der Thiamin-responsiven Form \u00fcberwiegen Mutation im DBT-Gen.", "genetic_counseling": "Der Erbgang ist autosomal-rezessiv und eine genetische Beratung ist m\u00f6glich.", "summary": "Die H\u00e4ufigkeit der Ahornsirupkrankheit wird auf 1:150.000 Lebendgeburten gesch\u00e4tzt. Der Thiamin-responsive Typ scheint sehr selten zu sein."}, {"name": "B-CLL", "sub_name": "B-Zell-Leuk\u00e4mie, chronische lymphatische", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "B-cell chronic lymphocytic leukemia (B-CLL) is a type of B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma (see this term), and the most common form of leukemia in Western countries, affecting elderly adults (mean age of 67 and 72 years) with a slight male predominance (1.7:1), and characterized by a highly variable clinical presentation that can include asymptomatic disease or non-specific B-symptoms such as unintentional weight loss, severe fatigue, fever (without evidence of infection), and night sweats as well as cervical lymphadenopathy, splenomegaly and frequent infections. Some patients can also develop autoimmune complications such as autoimmune hemolytic anemia or immune thrombocytopenia (see these terms). The clinical course is extremely heterogeneous with survival ranging from a few months to several decades.", "synonyms": "B-CLL, B-cell chronic lymphoid leukemia, Small lymphocytic lymphoma, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Multigenic/multifactorial\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "C91.1", "omim": "109543\u00a0 151400\u00a0 609630\u00a0 612557\u00a0 612558\u00a0 612559", "umls": "C0023434\u00a0 C0855095\u00a0 C1868683", "mesh": "D015451", "gard": "8227", "meddra": "10008958"}, {"name": "BCR-ABL1-\u00e4hnliche B-ALL", "sub_name": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(9;22)(q34.1;q11.2)", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "B-ALL mit t(9;22)(q34.1;q11.2), BCR-ABL1-\u00e4hnliche B-ALL, Philadelphia-Chromosom-\u00e4hnliche B-ALL, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter, \u00c4ltere Erwachsene", "ICD-10": "C91.0", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "BDCS", "sub_name": "Bazex-Dupr\u00e9-Christol-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Atrophodermie, follikul\u00e4re - Basaliome, BDCS, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "L98.8", "OMIM": "301845", "UMLS": "C0346104", "MeSH": "C537663", "GARD": "838", "summary": "Das Bazex-Dupr\u00e9-Christol-Syndrom ist eine seltene Genodermatose mit Pr\u00e4disposition zu fr\u00fch auftretenden Basalzell-Karzinomen. Bisher wurden 143 F\u00e4lle beschrieben, haupts\u00e4chlich aus Frankreich und Belgien. Die Krankheit wird in der Neonatalperiode oder im S\u00e4uglingsalter manifest. Charakteristische Symptome sind Hypotrichose, Hypohidrose, Milien und fr\u00fch-manifeste Basalzell-Karzinome. Oft besteht ein follikul\u00e4res Atrophoderm, am h\u00e4ufigsten an Hand- und Fu\u00dfr\u00fccken, an den Streckseiten von Ellenbogen und Knien und im Gesicht. Die Hypotrichose betrifft den Kopf und manchmal die Augenbrauen. Die papul\u00f6sen Milien und Basalzell-Karzinome sind \u00fcberwiegend im Gesicht. Basalzell-Karzinome treten bei 40% der Patienten und meist w\u00e4hrend des zweiten und dritten Lebensjahrzehntes auf. Weitere h\u00e4ufige Merkmale des Syndroms sind Basalzell-Hamartome und Trichoepitheliome. Sehr selten bestehen Atopie, Keratosis pilaris, Ichthyose, Arachnodaktylie mit schlaffen Gelenken, Osteochondritis, Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit und Lernprobleme. Die Vererbung ist X-chromosomal-dominant. Das Gen wurde in die Chromosomenregion Xq24-q27.1 kartiert. Als Kandidatengen wird UBE2A (Xq24) angesehen. Dieses Gen ist an der Reparatur UV-gesch\u00e4digter DNA beteiligt. Differentialdiagnostisch zu erw\u00e4gen sind das Gorlin-Syndrom, bei dem ebenfalls schon fr\u00fch multiple Basalzell-Karzinome auftreten, und die X-chromosomale Chondrodysplasia punctata (s. diese Termini), bei der auch ein follikul\u00e4res Atrophoderm gesehen werden kann. Weiterhin ist an das Rombo-Syndrom und an das Syndrom der generalisierten basaloid-follikul\u00e4ren Hamartome zu denken (s. diese Termini). Die Betreuung schlie\u00dft Lichtschutz und fr\u00fche Erkennung von Basalzellkarzinomen ein. Bei Basalzell-Karzinomen sind chirurgische Interventionen und manchmal Kryochirurgie oder topische Anwendung von Imiquimod indiziert. Strahlentherapie ist kontraindiziert. "}, {"name": "Beals-Hecht-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Arachnodaktylie, kongenitale kontrakturale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Arthrogrypose, distale, Typ 9, Beals-Hecht-Syndrom, Beals-Syndrom, CCA-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q68.8", "OMIM": "121050", "UMLS": "C0220668", "MeSH": "C536211", "GARD": "5899", "summary": "Die Kongenitale Kontrakturale Arachnodaktylie (CCA, Beals-Syndrom), ist eine Krankheit des Bindegewebes. Symptome sind vielfache Beugekontrakturen, Arachnodaktylie, schwere Kyphoskoliose, abnorme Ohrmuscheln und Hypoplasie der Muskulatur. Die klinischen Symptome k\u00f6nnen denen des Marfan-Syndroms (MFS) \u00e4hneln, aber multiple Gelenkkontrakturen (besonders Ellenbogen-, Knie- und Fingergelenke) und 'zerknautschte' (crumpled) Ohren bei fehlender Erweiterung der Aortenwurzel sind charakteristisch f\u00fcr das Beals-Syndrom und finden sich beim MFS nur selten. Die H\u00e4ufigkeit der CCA bei Geburt ist nicht bekannt, und wegen der \u00dcberlappung des Ph\u00e4notyps mit dem MFS ist die Pr\u00e4valenz der CCA schwierig zu bestimmen. Das Beals-Syndrom wird autosomal-dominant vererbt. Ursache sind Mutationen im FBN2-Gen in der Chromosomenregion 5q23. Seit es m\u00f6glich ist, nach diesen Mutationen zu suchen, hat die Zahl der beschriebenen F\u00e4lle zugenommen. Eine molekulare Pr\u00e4nataldiagnostik ist m\u00f6glich. In Verdachtsf\u00e4llen ist der sonographische Nachweis von Gelenkkontrakturen und Bewegungsarmut diagnostisch hilfreich. Die Behandlung der Kinder mit CCA ist symptomorientiert. Spontane Besserungen der Kamptodaktylie und der Kontrakturen sind m\u00f6glich, aber die Kamptodaktylie bildet sich niemals vollst\u00e4ndig zur\u00fcck. Fr\u00fche Intervention bei einer Skoliose kann einer Morbidit\u00e4t im sp\u00e4teren Leben vorbeugen. Empfohlen werden Untersuchungen des Herzens und der Augen. "}, {"name": "Beals-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Arachnodaktylie, kongenitale kontrakturale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Arthrogrypose, distale, Typ 9, Beals-Hecht-Syndrom, Beals-Syndrom, CCA-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q68.8", "OMIM": "121050", "UMLS": "C0220668", "MeSH": "C536211", "GARD": "5899", "summary": "Die Kongenitale Kontrakturale Arachnodaktylie (CCA, Beals-Syndrom), ist eine Krankheit des Bindegewebes. Symptome sind vielfache Beugekontrakturen, Arachnodaktylie, schwere Kyphoskoliose, abnorme Ohrmuscheln und Hypoplasie der Muskulatur. Die klinischen Symptome k\u00f6nnen denen des Marfan-Syndroms (MFS) \u00e4hneln, aber multiple Gelenkkontrakturen (besonders Ellenbogen-, Knie- und Fingergelenke) und 'zerknautschte' (crumpled) Ohren bei fehlender Erweiterung der Aortenwurzel sind charakteristisch f\u00fcr das Beals-Syndrom und finden sich beim MFS nur selten. Die H\u00e4ufigkeit der CCA bei Geburt ist nicht bekannt, und wegen der \u00dcberlappung des Ph\u00e4notyps mit dem MFS ist die Pr\u00e4valenz der CCA schwierig zu bestimmen. Das Beals-Syndrom wird autosomal-dominant vererbt. Ursache sind Mutationen im FBN2-Gen in der Chromosomenregion 5q23. Seit es m\u00f6glich ist, nach diesen Mutationen zu suchen, hat die Zahl der beschriebenen F\u00e4lle zugenommen. Eine molekulare Pr\u00e4nataldiagnostik ist m\u00f6glich. In Verdachtsf\u00e4llen ist der sonographische Nachweis von Gelenkkontrakturen und Bewegungsarmut diagnostisch hilfreich. Die Behandlung der Kinder mit CCA ist symptomorientiert. Spontane Besserungen der Kamptodaktylie und der Kontrakturen sind m\u00f6glich, aber die Kamptodaktylie bildet sich niemals vollst\u00e4ndig zur\u00fcck. Fr\u00fche Intervention bei einer Skoliose kann einer Morbidit\u00e4t im sp\u00e4teren Leben vorbeugen. Empfohlen werden Untersuchungen des Herzens und der Augen. "}, {"name": "Bean-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Blue rubber bleb-Naevus", "german_description": "Der Blue rubber bleb-Naevus (BRBNS) ist eine seltene vaskul\u00e4re Fehlbildung mit vor allem kutanen und viszeralen L\u00e4sionen, die h\u00e4ufig zu schweren und potentiell t\u00f6dlichen Blutungen und An\u00e4mie f\u00fchren. Bisher wurden mehr als 200 F\u00e4lle beschrieben, aber die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Multifokale ven\u00f6se Fehlbildungen bestehen am h\u00e4ufigsten in der Haut und im Gastrointestinaltrakt (GIT), aber auch im Gehirn, in den Nieren, Lungen, Augen, Knochen uns anderen Organen. Beschrieben wurden auch Gerinnungsst\u00f6rungen (Verbrauchskoagulopathie, Thrombozytopenie). Die L\u00e4sionen sind in der Regel schon im Kindesalter ausgepr\u00e4gt, k\u00f6nnen sich aber auch erst im sp\u00e4teren Leben entwickeln. Sie pulsieren leicht, sind blau gef\u00e4rbt und komprimierbar. Wichtigste klinische Manifestation sind akute oder chronische Blutungen aus multiplen vaskul\u00e4ren Fehlbildungen im GIT, in der Regel im D\u00fcnndarm. Akute Blutungen werden manifest mit Bluterbrechen, Mel\u00e4na (Blutstuhl) oder rektale Blutungen. Ohne radikale Behandlung werden die Patienten mit BRBNS durch chronische Magendarmblutungen an\u00e4misch und m\u00fcssen ihr ganzes Leben mit Eisen und Bluttransfusionen behandelt werden. Eine maligne Umwandlung der L\u00e4sionen wurde bisher nicht beschrieben. Seltene Komplikationen der gastrointestinalen Malformationen sind Volvulus, Intussuszeption und Darminfarkt. Die Ursache des Syndroms ist nicht bekannt. Die meisten F\u00e4lle erscheinen isoliert, aber mehrere Familien mit autosomal-dominanter Vererbung wurden beschrieben. Mutationen im TEK/TIE2-Gen (9p21), das f\u00fcr eine endotheliale Rezeptor-Tyrosinkinase kodiert, sind wahrscheinlich f\u00fcr die famili\u00e4ren F\u00e4lle verantwortlich. Methoden zur Diagnose des BRBNS sind H\u00e4matologie, Endoskkopie, Ultraschall, CT, MRI und Histopathologie. Differentialdiagnosen sind: Gef\u00e4\u00dftumoren, entweder benigne (H\u00e4mangiome) oder maligne (Kaposi-Sarkom, Angiosarkom); Gef\u00e4\u00dfanomalien bei angeborenen oder systemischen Erkrankungen (Klippel-Trenaunay-Weber, Ehlers-Danlos, die CREST-Variante der Sklerodermie, Osler-Weber-Rendu-Syndrom) und erworbene oder sporadische L\u00e4sionen (Angiodysplasien, vaskul\u00e4re Ektasie des Antrum pyloricum, strahleninduzierte vaskul\u00e4re Ektasie und Dieulafoy-L\u00e4sionen (sh. diese Termini). Naevi der Haut bluten in der Regel nicht: Chirurgische Resektion, Sklerotherapie oder Embolisation ergeben gute kosmetische Resultate. Wenn keine massiven gastrointestinalen Blutungen auftreten, ist eine konservative Behandlung mit Eisengaben und/oder Bluttransfusionen ausreichend. Wenig wirksam sind Kortikosteroide, anti-fibrinolytische Agentien, hochdosierte intraven\u00f6se Gaben von Gammaglobulin und Interferon-alpha. Langzeitbehandlung mit dem Somatostatin-Analogon Octreotid reduziert den Blutverlust aus den Naevi und anderen vaskul\u00e4ren L\u00e4sionen des Magendarmtraktes. Intraoperative Enteroskopie ist die sicherste diagnostische und/oder therapeutische Methode mit endoskopischer Koagulation oder vollst\u00e4ndiger chirurgischer Keilekzision. Es wird empfohlen, die Indikation f\u00fcr einen operativen Eingriff mit drahtloser Kapsel-Endoskopie abzukl\u00e4ren. Diese Methode kann auch f\u00fcr die Kontrolle des Therapieeffektes n\u00fctzlich sein.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare vascular malformation disorder with cutaneous and visceral lesions frequently associated with serious, potentially fatal bleeding and anemia.", "synonyms": "BRBN, Bean syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q27.8", "omim": "112200", "umls": "C0346072", "mesh": "C536240", "gard": "5940", "epidemiology": "More than 200 cases have been published so far, but prevalence is unknown.", "clinical_description": "Multifocal venous malformations most commonly involve the skin and gastrointestinal tract (GIT), but can also affect the brain, kidneys, lungs, eyes, bones and other organs. Hemostatic abnormalities due to consumption coagulopathy and thrombocythemia have also been described. The lesions are generally present in childhood but can develop later in life. They are usually blue colored and easily compressible with light palpation. The main clinical manifestation is acute or chronic bleeding from the multiple GIT vascular malformations, with the small intestine usually being involved. The acute bleeding presents as hematemesis, melena, or rectal bleeding. Unless treated radically, patients with BRBN develop anemia from chronic gastrointestinal bleeding and require lifelong treatment with iron and blood transfusions. Malignant transformation of the lesions has not been reported so far. Infrequent complications of the gastrointestinal malformations are volvulus, intussusception and intestinal infarction.", "etiology": "The cause of the syndrome is still unknown. Although most cases show no apparent hereditary pattern, autosomal dominant expression has been reported in several families. A gene mutation has been mapped to the short arm of chromosome 9 and might be involved in these familial cases.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnostic methods include: blood counts, endoscopy, ultrasound, CT, MRI, and histopathology.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include vascular tumors, either benign (hemangiomas) or malignant (Kaposi's sarcoma, angiosarcoma); vascular anomalies associated with congenital or systemic diseases (Klippel-Trenaunay-Weber, Ehlers-Danlos, the CREST variant of scleroderma, and Osler-Weber-Rendu syndrome) and acquired and sporadic lesions (angiodysplasias, gastric antral vascular ectasia, radiation-induced vascular ectasias, and Dieulafoy's lesions) (see these terms).", "management_and_treatment": "Cutaneous lesions do not usually bleed: surgery, sclerotherapy or embolization provide a good cosmetic result. In the absence of massive GIT bleeding, a conservative treatment is sufficient (iron supplementation and/or blood transfusions). Corticosteroids, antifibrinolytic agents, high-dose intravenous gamma globulin and interferon alpha are of poor effect. Long-term use of octreotide has been found to reduce blood loss from BRBN and other vascular gastrointestinal lesions. Intra-operative enteroscopy is the accepted ultimate diagnostic and/or therapeutic procedure, allowing immediate resolution of pathological findings by endoscopic coagulation or surgical full-thickness wedge excision. It is recommended to start with capsule wireless endoscopy to specify the indication for the procedure. Capsule endoscopy may also be a useful tool for monitoring the effects of therapy."}, {"name": "Beare-Stevenson-Cutis gyrata-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Cutis gyrata-Acanthosis nigricans-Kraniosynostose-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Cutis gyrata-Acanthosis nigricans-Kraniosynostose-Syndrom, auch bekannt als Beare-Stevenson-Syndrom (BSS), ist eine schwere Form der syndromalen Kraniosynostose, die durch einen unterschiedlichen Grad an Kraniosynostose (in \u00fcber 50% der F\u00e4lle ein Kleeblattsch\u00e4del), Cutis gyrata, Cord-\u00e4hnliche lineare Streifen in der Haut, Acanthosis nigricans, Hautanh\u00e4ngsel und Choanalstenose oder Atresie gekennzeichnet ist. Weitere Merkmale sind charakteristische Gesichtsz\u00fcge (\u00e4hnlich des Crouzon-Syndroms), Ohrdefekte (Schallleitungsschwerh\u00f6rigkeit, nach hinten abgewinkelte Ohren, stenotische Geh\u00f6rg\u00e4nge, pr\u00e4aurikul\u00e4re Furchen und enge Ohrkan\u00e4le), Hirsutismus, ein markanter Nabelstumpf und urogenitale Anomalien (anterior platzierter Anus, hypoplastische Schamlippen, Hypospadie). BSS ist mit einer schlechten Prognose verbunden, da die Patienten ein erh\u00f6htes Risiko f\u00fcr einen pl\u00f6tzlichen Tod im ersten Lebensjahr aufweisen. Bei den meisten Patienten, die die S\u00e4uglingszeit \u00fcberleben, werden erhebliche Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerungen und Intelligenzminderung beobachtet.", "synonyms": "Beare-Stevenson-Cutis gyrata-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "123790", "UMLS": "C1852406", "GARD": "1635\u00a0 332"}, {"name": "Beatmungsinduzierter Zwerchfellschaden", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "VIDD, Ventilator-induzierter Zwerchfellschaden, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Beaulieu-Boycott-Innes-Syndrom", "sub_name": "THOC6-assoziierte Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung mit Mikrozephalie und Gesichtsdysmorphien", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, autosomal recessive, syndromic intellectual disability disorder characterized by global development delay, mild microcephaly, mild to severe intellectual disability and non-specific facial dysmorphism in association with variable multiple congenital anomalies including congenital heart defects, dental anomalies, cryptorchidism, renal and cerebral malformations. Short stature is frequent.", "synonyms": "BBIS, Beaulieu-Boycott-Innes syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.0", "omim": "613680", "epidemiology": "First described in two Hutterite families, there are now approximately 20 affected individuals reported worldwide.", "clinical_description": "Affected individuals have mild to severe intellectual disability and are non-verbal or have limited speech. The most relevant congenital anomalies include cardiac malformations (atrial and/or ventricular septal defects, patent ductus arteriosus), renal anomalies (unilateral agenesis or ectopic kidney), multiple teeth caries and/or malocclusion, cryptorchidism, anteriorly displaced anus, ventriculomegaly and corpus callosus dysgenesis. Short stature is reported in approximately half of individuals. Several recurrent craniofacial features have been described including mild microcephaly, tall forehead, high anterior hairline, short upslanting palpebral fissures, deep-set eyes, a long nose with low-hanging columella. The facial features are non-specific. More rarely, affected individuals could have hypergonadotropic hypogonadism (in females), seizures, low birth weight, feeding difficulties, hearing loss and/or eye abnormalities.", "etiology": "The syndrome is caused by homozygous mutations in THOC6, encoding for a protein of the THO/TREX (transcription/export) complex, which is involved in the transcription of mRNA as well as the export of spliced mRNA from the nucleus; it is supposed to play a crucial role in both embryogenesis and human neurodevelopment.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on molecular studies: for Hutterite communities, testing the specific c.136G>A variant can be considered; for non-Hutterite individuals, multigene panels for intellectual disability, chromosome microarray analysis, or exome array are indicated.", "differential_diagnosis": "Due to the non-specific characteristics of the syndrome, all disorders with intellectual disability and without other distinctive features should be investigated.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal testing is possible when a pathogenic variant is already known in the family.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy. Carrier testing is possible where the pathogenic variant has been previously identified in a family member.", "management_and_treatment": "Management requires a lifelong multidisciplinary approach, including a pediatrician, neurologist, otorhinolaryngologist (assessment for hearing loss), ophthalmologist, cardiologist, radiologist and gastroenterologist (to evaluate feeding problems and consider gastrostomy). Developmental assessments are needed to tailor medical services, develop an individualized education plan, and promote occupational therapy. Moreover, a behavioral assessment for signs of autism spectrum disorder is recommended. Annual evaluation of renal function should be considered in those with anomaly of kidney/urinary tract. Surgery is required in case of cryptorchidism while females older than 12 require an endocrine consultation. Need for family support (e.g. social work involvement, palliative care, home nursing) should be evaluated at each visit. No specific pharmacological therapy is available.", "prognosis": "The course of the disease is non-progressive. Longitudinal data are insufficient to determine life expectancy, although survival into adulthood is possible. Need for life-long support from caregivers depends on the severity of intellectual disability."}, {"name": "Becherzellkarzinoid", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Goblet cell carcinoma (GCC) is an aggressive type of endocrine tumor of the appendix (see this term) presenting equally in males and females in the fifth decade of life and manifesting with a palpable mass and abdominal pain or acute appendicitis. Metastasis to the ovaries, peritoneum or right colon has usually already occurred in half of patients at the time of diagnosis.", "synonyms": "GCC, Goblet cell adenocarcinoid, Goblet cell carcinoid, Goblet cell tumor, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "C18.1", "umls": "C0205695", "gard": "10414"}, {"name": "Becherzellkarzinom", "sub_name": "Becherzellkarzinoid", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Goblet cell carcinoma (GCC) is an aggressive type of endocrine tumor of the appendix (see this term) presenting equally in males and females in the fifth decade of life and manifesting with a palpable mass and abdominal pain or acute appendicitis. Metastasis to the ovaries, peritoneum or right colon has usually already occurred in half of patients at the time of diagnosis.", "synonyms": "GCC, Goblet cell adenocarcinoid, Goblet cell carcinoid, Goblet cell tumor, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "C18.1", "umls": "C0205695", "gard": "10414"}, {"name": "Becken-Scapula-Dysplasie, famili\u00e4re", "sub_name": "Dysplasie, pelvi-skapul\u00e4re", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Becken-Scapula-Dysplasie, famili\u00e4re, Cousin-Syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.5", "OMIM": "260660", "UMLS": "C1850040", "MeSH": "C535550", "GARD": "1555", "summary": "Die Pelvi-skapul\u00e4re Dysplasie (Cousin-Syndrom) ist gekennzeichnet durch die Assoziation von pelvi-skapul\u00e4rer Dysplasie mit Anomalien der Epiphysen, angeborenem Kleinwuchs und fazialen Dysmorphien. Das Syndrom wurde zuerst bei einem Geschwisterpaar (m.+w.) aus Nordafrika beschrieben. K\u00fcrzlich wurden zwei weitere nicht verwandte Patienten (1 deutsches und 1 t\u00fcrkisches M\u00e4dchen) aus konsanguinen Familien beschrieben. Faziale Dysmorphien sind Balkonstirn, Hypertelorismus, schmale Lidspalten, tiefliegende Augen, Strabismus, tiefsitzende und nach hinten rotierte und malformierte Ohren, kleines Kinn, kurzer Hals mit \u00fcbersch\u00fcssigen Hautfalten und tiefer Haaransatz. Die Intelligenz variiert zwischen normal und m\u00e4\u00dfig eingeschr\u00e4nkt R\u00f6ntgenbefunde sind Aplasie des Scapulak\u00f6rpers, Hypoplasie der Beckenschaufeln, humero-radiale Synostose, Dislokation der Femurk\u00f6pfe und moderate Brachydaktylie. Autosomal-rezessive Vererbung wird vermutet. Als m\u00f6gliche Ursache wurden Mutationen im TBX15-Gen (1p13) gefunden. Die Pelvi-skapul\u00e4re Dysplasie \u00e4hnelt ph\u00e4notypisch der Becken-Schulter-Dysplasie (Kosenow-Syndrom, Skapulo-iliakale Dysostose, s. dort), und die beiden Syndrome sind evtl. unterschiedliche Auspr\u00e4gungen der gleichen Krankheit. Beim Kosenow-Syndrom bestehen jedoch keine kranio-zervikalen Anomalien und die Vererbung ist autosomal-dominant. "}, {"name": "Becken-Schulter-Dysplasie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Dysostose, skapulo-iliakale, Kosenow-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.5", "OMIM": "169550", "UMLS": "C1868508", "summary": "Die Becken-Schulter-Dysplasie ist eine seltene fokale Dysostose. Charakteristisch ist eine symmetrische Hypoplasie der Schulterbl\u00e4tter und der Beckenschaufeln. Bisher wurden etwa 10 Patienten beschrieben. M\u00f6gliche weitere Skelettanomalien sind Hypoplasie der Schl\u00fcsselbeine, Rippen, des Femur und der Fibula, zusammen mit Spina bifida und Lendenlordose. Gelegentlich wurden Augenanomalien (Iris- und Netzhautkolobom) beschrieben. Die Intelligenz wurde als normal beschrieben. Die Becken-Schulter-Dysplasie scheint eine genetisch heterogene Krankheit zu sein, aber urs\u00e4chliche Gene wurden bisher nicht gefunden. In einigen F\u00e4llen wurde autosomal-dominante Vererbung beschrieben. Die Becken-Schulter-Dysplasie \u00e4hnelt ph\u00e4notypisch der Becken-Scapula-Dysplasie (Cousin-Syndrom, s. dort), das ebenfalls mit kranio-zervikalen Anomalien auftritt. Nach Meinung einiger Autoren sind die beiden Syndrome evtl. unterschiedliche Auspr\u00e4gungen der gleichen Krankheit. "}, {"name": "Becker Naevus-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, syndromic, benign, epidermal nevus syndrome characterized by the association of a Becker nevus (i.e. circumscribed, unilateral, irregularly shaped, hyperpigmented macules, with or without hypertrichosis and/or acneiform lesions, occuring predominantly on the anterior upper trunk or scapular region) with ipsilateral breast hypoplasia or other, typically hypoplastic, skeletal, cutaneous, and/or muscular defects, such as pectoralis major hypoplasia, supernumerary nipples, vertebral defects, scoliosis, limb asymmetry, odontomaxillary hypoplasia and lipoatrophy.", "synonyms": "Pigmentary hairy epidermal nevus, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "D22.5", "omim": "604919", "umls": "C0263579\u00a0 C1858042", "gard": "3856\u00a0 5901"}, {"name": "Beckwith-Wiedemann-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Beckwith-Wiedemann-Syndrom (BWS) ist eine genetische Erkrankung mit Gro\u00dfwuchs, Tumor-Pr\u00e4disposition und angeborenen Fehlbildungen.", "synonyms": "BWS, Exomphalos - Makroglossie - Gigantismus, Wiedemann-Beckwith-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Unbekannt\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q87.3", "OMIM": "130650", "UMLS": "C0004903", "MeSH": "D001506", "GARD": "3343", "MedDRA": "10050344", "epidemiology": "Die Krankheit tritt in allen Ethnien auf, ihre Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1:13.700 gesch\u00e4tzt. Sie ist in beiden Geschlechtern gleich h\u00e4ufig, nur bei eineiigen Zwillingen \u00fcberwiegt das weibliche Geschlecht.", "clinical_description": "In der zweiten H\u00e4lfte der Schwangerschaft und in den ersten Lebensjahren wachsen die Patienten beschleunigt, w\u00e4hrend die typische Erwachsenengr\u00f6\u00dfe im Normalbereich liegt. M\u00f6gliche Zeichen abnormen Wachstums sind auch Hemihyperplasie und/oder Makroglossie (die zu Schwierigkeiten beim F\u00fcttern und Sprechen und, seltener, zu Schlafapnoe f\u00fchrt). Bei 30-50 % der Neugeborenen besteht eine Hypoglyk\u00e4mie. H\u00e4ufig bestehen erkennbare Gesichtsz\u00fcge, die sich im Erwachsenenalter oft normalisieren. Charakteristische Befunde sind, neben Makrosomie, Makroglossie, Hemihyperplasie und Hypoglyk\u00e4mie, Omphalozele/Nabelhernie/Rektusdiastase, embryonaler Tumor, Furche(n) an der Vorderseite der Ohrl\u00e4ppchen und Gr\u00fcbchen an der hinteren Helix, Naevus flammeus oder andere Gef\u00e4\u00dffehlbildungen, Viszeromegalie der Bauchorgane, fetale adrenokortikale Zytomegalie (pathognomonisch), Nierenfehlbildungen, positive Familienanamnese und, selten, Gaumenspalte. Herzfehler werden bei 9-34 % der F\u00e4lle gefunden, und etwa die H\u00e4lfte von diesen hat eine sich spontan zur\u00fcckbildende Kardiomegalie. Eine Kardiomyopathie ist selten. Die Patienten haben ein hohes Risiko f\u00fcr das Auftreten b\u00f6sartiger embryonaler Tumoren, besonders in den ersten 8 Lebensjahren, wenn das Risiko 7,5 % (Bereich 4-21 %) betr\u00e4gt.", "etiology": "Ursache des BWS sind verschiedene epigenetische und/oder genetische Ver\u00e4nderungen, mit gest\u00f6rter Regulation von genomisch gepr\u00e4gten (imprint) Genen auf Chromosom 11p15.5. Die Krankheit tritt sporadisch in 85 % und famili\u00e4r in 15 % auf. Molekulare Untergruppen sind mit unterschiedlichen Wiederholungsrisiken und unterschiedlichen klinischen Befunden verbunden.", "diagnostic_methods": "In der Regel wird die Diagnose durch das Vorhandensein von mindestens drei charakteristischen klinischen Befunden gest\u00fctzt, aber embryonale Tumoren treten auch bei milden Verl\u00e4ufen auf. Positive molekulare Befunde k\u00f6nnen die Diagnose best\u00e4tigen; negative Ergebnisse schlie\u00dfen aber ein BWS nicht aus.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind Simpson-Golabi-Behmel-, Costello-, Perlman- und Sotos-Syndrom und die MPS Typ VI.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik durch Chorionzottenbiopsie oder Amniozentese kann angeboten werden, besonders wenn eine zytogenetische oder genomische Ver\u00e4nderung identifiziert wurde. Ver\u00e4nderungen der Methylierung sind z. Zt. verl\u00e4sslicher nach Amniozentese nachzuweisen. Eine Amniozentese ist eventuell auch indiziert, wenn im fetalen Ultraschall BWS-assoziierte Befunde (z. B. fetale Omphalozele) erhoben wurden. Wenn der molekulare Defekt nicht bekannt ist, dienen die Messung des Alpha-Feto-Proteins im m\u00fctterlichen Serum und die gezielte Ultraschalluntersuchung als Suchtest.", "genetic_counseling": "Im Rahmen einer genetischen Beratung wird das Wiederholungsrisiko abgesch\u00e4tzt.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Patienten werden standardgem\u00e4\u00df mit unterst\u00fctzend medizinischen und chirurgischen Verfahren versorgt. Wenn ein BWS vermutet/diagnostiziert wird, soll mit der Tumor\u00fcberwachung begonnen werden, auch bei einem klinisch nicht betroffenen eineiigen Zwilling eines Patienten. Zu diesem Zeitpunkt sollen Genotyp/Ph\u00e4notyp-Korrelationen f\u00fcr diesen Zweck unber\u00fccksichtigt bleiben. Bei verd\u00e4chtigen oder diagnostischen pr\u00e4natalen Befunden soll in der Neugeborenenzeit regelm\u00e4\u00dfig auf m\u00f6gliche Hypoglyk\u00e4mie untersucht werden. In gleicher Weise soll bei klinisch nicht betroffenen Neugeborenen verfahren werden, die nach der Familienanamnese ein erh\u00f6htes Risiko tragen.", "prognosis": "Am schweren Ende des klinischen Spektrums tragen die Patienten das Risiko f\u00fcr einen fr\u00fchen Tod im Gefolge der Komplikationen, die aus Hypoglyk\u00e4mie, Fr\u00fchgeburtlichkeit, Kardiomyopathie, Makroglossie oder Tumoren resultieren. Patienten, die das Kindesalter \u00fcberleben, haben in der Regel eine gute Prognose.", "summary": "Die Krankheit tritt in allen Ethnien auf, ihre Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1:13.700 gesch\u00e4tzt. Sie ist in beiden Geschlechtern gleich h\u00e4ufig, nur bei eineiigen Zwillingen \u00fcberwiegt das weibliche Geschlecht."}, {"name": "Beckwith-Wiedemann-Syndrom durch 11p15 Translokation/Inversion", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.3", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Beckwith-Wiedemann-Syndrom"}, {"name": "Beckwith-Wiedemann-Syndrom durch CDKN1C-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.3", "OMIM": "130650", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Beckwith-Wiedemann-Syndrom"}, {"name": "Beckwith-Wiedemann-Syndrom durch Imprintingdefekt von 11p15", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.3", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Beckwith-Wiedemann-Syndrom"}, {"name": "Beckwith-Wiedemann-Syndrom durch Mikrodeletion 11p15", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "ICD-10": "Q87.3", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Beckwith-Wiedemann-Syndrom"}, {"name": "Beckwith-Wiedemann-Syndrom durch Mikroduplikation 11p15", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Duplikation 11p15, distale, ", "ICD-10": "Q87.3", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Beckwith-Wiedemann-Syndrom"}, {"name": "Beckwith-Wiedemann-Syndrom durch NSD1-Genmutation", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "ICD-10": "Q87.3", "OMIM": "130650", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Beckwith-Wiedemann-Syndrom"}, {"name": "Beckwith-Wiedemann-Syndrom durch paternale uniparentale Disomie 11", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Paternale UPD(11) im Mosaik, UPD(11)pat, ", "ICD-10": "Q87.3", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Beckwith-Wiedemann-Syndrom"}, {"name": "BECRS", "sub_name": "Rolando-Epilepsie", "german_description": "Die Benigne Epilepsie des Kindesalters mit Rolandischen (zentro-temporalen) Spikes (BECRS) ist das h\u00e4ufigste Epilepsiesyndrom im Kindesalter. Es ist charakterisiert durch Partial-Anf\u00e4lle, meist w\u00e4hrend des Schlafes oder kurz vor dem Aufwachen, mit Beteiligung von Mund, Gesicht und Sprachorganen. Auch eine Generalisierung ist m\u00f6glich. Das EEG ist typisch und bildet das haupts\u00e4chliche diagnostische Kriterium. Es ist biphasisch und setzt sich aus hochgespannten Spikes und scharfen Wellen mit nachfolgenden langsamen Wellen zusammen. Dieses Muster wurde 'zentrotemporal' genannt, oder auch 'Rolandische Spikes'. Regelm\u00e4\u00dfig sistieren die Anf\u00e4lle in der Adoleszenz. Antikonvulsiva werden selten ben\u00f6tigt. BECRS macht 13-23% aller F\u00e4lle von Epilepsie des Kindesalters aus. Die Inzidenz ist 21 / 100.000 Kinder unter 15. Das dominant vererbte Einzelgen mit niedriger Penetranz und Expressivit\u00e4t und mit Altersbegrenzung liegt in der Chromosomenregion 15q14. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Rolandic epilepsy (RE) is a focal childhood epilepsy characterized by seizures consisting of unilateral facial sensory-motor symptoms, with electroencephalogram (EEG) showing sharp biphasic waves over the rolandic region. It is an age-related epilepsy, with excellent outcome.", "synonyms": "BECRS, BECTS, BRE, Benign epilepsy of childhood with centrotemporal spikes, Benign familial epilepsy of childhood with rolandic spikes, Benign rolandic epilepsy, Centrotemporal epilepsy, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G40.0", "omim": "117100\u00a0 245570", "umls": "C0376532\u00a0 C2363129", "gard": "10287", "epidemiology": "RE is the most common childhood epilepsy and accounts for 8-25% of all childhood epilepsies. Its incidence has been estimated to be approximately 1/5,000 in children within 15 years.", "clinical_description": "Onset is between 3 and 12 years, in otherwise normal children (peak of onset is 5-8 years). Seizures typically occur during sleep or drowsy states; they are brief with unilateral sensorimotor (such as numbness, tingling, drooling) that involves pharynx, tongue, face, lips and sometimes hand. Speech arrest often occurs, while comprehension is preserved. Seizures may alternate from one side to the other and may become generalized. Longer attacks can be followed by post-ictal hemiplegia. Some children may have selective neuropsychological impairment affecting language, attention, visuomotor skills and behavior. They usually do not outlast the period of active seizures. Seizure remission occurs within 2-4 years from the onset. The majority of patients have <10 seizures and 10-20% have a single seizure.", "etiology": "Etiology of RE is still unknown. There is probably a genetic predisposition: an increased rate of RE, febrile seizures, and epilepsy-aphasia spectrum disorders were found among relatives. Pathogenesis seems to be related with the critical and vulnerable phase of brain maturation.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis of RE relies on the clinical features and on EEG findings that show slow, diphasic, high voltage, centrotemporal spikes, activated by sleep. Brain magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) is normal.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes other idiopathic focal childhood epilepsies (benign childhood occipital epilepsy, Panayiotopoulos type and Gastaut type. Other etiologies causing similar symptoms are excluded with brain MRI.", "genetic_counseling": "Autosomal dominant transmission has been reported in some cases.", "management_and_treatment": "The majority of patients, who have a single or few seizures, do not require treatment. Differently, patients with frequent seizures (10-20%) may need treatment for a short time. In such cases, carbamazepine or valproate are preferred even if, in rare cases, carbamazepine may have a paradoxical effect.", "prognosis": "Prognosis of RE is favorable since nearly 90% of patients remit before puberty. In rare cases (<1%), RE may evolve to atypical RE with linguistic, behavioral and neuropsychological deficits. An aggressive treatment with steroids, in these cases might change the evolution of the disease and a remission of neuropsychological deficits might be seen."}, {"name": "BECRS, autosomal-dominant", "sub_name": "Rolando-Epilepsie", "german_description": "Die Benigne Epilepsie des Kindesalters mit Rolandischen (zentro-temporalen) Spikes (BECRS) ist das h\u00e4ufigste Epilepsiesyndrom im Kindesalter. Es ist charakterisiert durch Partial-Anf\u00e4lle, meist w\u00e4hrend des Schlafes oder kurz vor dem Aufwachen, mit Beteiligung von Mund, Gesicht und Sprachorganen. Auch eine Generalisierung ist m\u00f6glich. Das EEG ist typisch und bildet das haupts\u00e4chliche diagnostische Kriterium. Es ist biphasisch und setzt sich aus hochgespannten Spikes und scharfen Wellen mit nachfolgenden langsamen Wellen zusammen. Dieses Muster wurde 'zentrotemporal' genannt, oder auch 'Rolandische Spikes'. Regelm\u00e4\u00dfig sistieren die Anf\u00e4lle in der Adoleszenz. Antikonvulsiva werden selten ben\u00f6tigt. BECRS macht 13-23% aller F\u00e4lle von Epilepsie des Kindesalters aus. Die Inzidenz ist 21 / 100.000 Kinder unter 15. Das dominant vererbte Einzelgen mit niedriger Penetranz und Expressivit\u00e4t und mit Altersbegrenzung liegt in der Chromosomenregion 15q14. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Rolandic epilepsy (RE) is a focal childhood epilepsy characterized by seizures consisting of unilateral facial sensory-motor symptoms, with electroencephalogram (EEG) showing sharp biphasic waves over the rolandic region. It is an age-related epilepsy, with excellent outcome.", "synonyms": "BECRS, BECTS, BRE, Benign epilepsy of childhood with centrotemporal spikes, Benign familial epilepsy of childhood with rolandic spikes, Benign rolandic epilepsy, Centrotemporal epilepsy, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G40.0", "omim": "117100\u00a0 245570", "umls": "C0376532\u00a0 C2363129", "gard": "10287", "epidemiology": "RE is the most common childhood epilepsy and accounts for 8-25% of all childhood epilepsies. Its incidence has been estimated to be approximately 1/5,000 in children within 15 years.", "clinical_description": "Onset is between 3 and 12 years, in otherwise normal children (peak of onset is 5-8 years). Seizures typically occur during sleep or drowsy states; they are brief with unilateral sensorimotor (such as numbness, tingling, drooling) that involves pharynx, tongue, face, lips and sometimes hand. Speech arrest often occurs, while comprehension is preserved. Seizures may alternate from one side to the other and may become generalized. Longer attacks can be followed by post-ictal hemiplegia. Some children may have selective neuropsychological impairment affecting language, attention, visuomotor skills and behavior. They usually do not outlast the period of active seizures. Seizure remission occurs within 2-4 years from the onset. The majority of patients have <10 seizures and 10-20% have a single seizure.", "etiology": "Etiology of RE is still unknown. There is probably a genetic predisposition: an increased rate of RE, febrile seizures, and epilepsy-aphasia spectrum disorders were found among relatives. Pathogenesis seems to be related with the critical and vulnerable phase of brain maturation.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis of RE relies on the clinical features and on EEG findings that show slow, diphasic, high voltage, centrotemporal spikes, activated by sleep. Brain magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) is normal.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes other idiopathic focal childhood epilepsies (benign childhood occipital epilepsy, Panayiotopoulos type and Gastaut type. Other etiologies causing similar symptoms are excluded with brain MRI.", "genetic_counseling": "Autosomal dominant transmission has been reported in some cases.", "management_and_treatment": "The majority of patients, who have a single or few seizures, do not require treatment. Differently, patients with frequent seizures (10-20%) may need treatment for a short time. In such cases, carbamazepine or valproate are preferred even if, in rare cases, carbamazepine may have a paradoxical effect.", "prognosis": "Prognosis of RE is favorable since nearly 90% of patients remit before puberty. In rare cases (<1%), RE may evolve to atypical RE with linguistic, behavioral and neuropsychological deficits. An aggressive treatment with steroids, in these cases might change the evolution of the disease and a remission of neuropsychological deficits might be seen."}, {"name": "BECTS", "sub_name": "Rolando-Epilepsie", "german_description": "Die Benigne Epilepsie des Kindesalters mit Rolandischen (zentro-temporalen) Spikes (BECRS) ist das h\u00e4ufigste Epilepsiesyndrom im Kindesalter. Es ist charakterisiert durch Partial-Anf\u00e4lle, meist w\u00e4hrend des Schlafes oder kurz vor dem Aufwachen, mit Beteiligung von Mund, Gesicht und Sprachorganen. Auch eine Generalisierung ist m\u00f6glich. Das EEG ist typisch und bildet das haupts\u00e4chliche diagnostische Kriterium. Es ist biphasisch und setzt sich aus hochgespannten Spikes und scharfen Wellen mit nachfolgenden langsamen Wellen zusammen. Dieses Muster wurde 'zentrotemporal' genannt, oder auch 'Rolandische Spikes'. Regelm\u00e4\u00dfig sistieren die Anf\u00e4lle in der Adoleszenz. Antikonvulsiva werden selten ben\u00f6tigt. BECRS macht 13-23% aller F\u00e4lle von Epilepsie des Kindesalters aus. Die Inzidenz ist 21 / 100.000 Kinder unter 15. Das dominant vererbte Einzelgen mit niedriger Penetranz und Expressivit\u00e4t und mit Altersbegrenzung liegt in der Chromosomenregion 15q14. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Rolandic epilepsy (RE) is a focal childhood epilepsy characterized by seizures consisting of unilateral facial sensory-motor symptoms, with electroencephalogram (EEG) showing sharp biphasic waves over the rolandic region. It is an age-related epilepsy, with excellent outcome.", "synonyms": "BECRS, BECTS, BRE, Benign epilepsy of childhood with centrotemporal spikes, Benign familial epilepsy of childhood with rolandic spikes, Benign rolandic epilepsy, Centrotemporal epilepsy, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G40.0", "omim": "117100\u00a0 245570", "umls": "C0376532\u00a0 C2363129", "gard": "10287", "epidemiology": "RE is the most common childhood epilepsy and accounts for 8-25% of all childhood epilepsies. Its incidence has been estimated to be approximately 1/5,000 in children within 15 years.", "clinical_description": "Onset is between 3 and 12 years, in otherwise normal children (peak of onset is 5-8 years). Seizures typically occur during sleep or drowsy states; they are brief with unilateral sensorimotor (such as numbness, tingling, drooling) that involves pharynx, tongue, face, lips and sometimes hand. Speech arrest often occurs, while comprehension is preserved. Seizures may alternate from one side to the other and may become generalized. Longer attacks can be followed by post-ictal hemiplegia. Some children may have selective neuropsychological impairment affecting language, attention, visuomotor skills and behavior. They usually do not outlast the period of active seizures. Seizure remission occurs within 2-4 years from the onset. The majority of patients have <10 seizures and 10-20% have a single seizure.", "etiology": "Etiology of RE is still unknown. There is probably a genetic predisposition: an increased rate of RE, febrile seizures, and epilepsy-aphasia spectrum disorders were found among relatives. Pathogenesis seems to be related with the critical and vulnerable phase of brain maturation.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis of RE relies on the clinical features and on EEG findings that show slow, diphasic, high voltage, centrotemporal spikes, activated by sleep. Brain magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) is normal.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes other idiopathic focal childhood epilepsies (benign childhood occipital epilepsy, Panayiotopoulos type and Gastaut type. Other etiologies causing similar symptoms are excluded with brain MRI.", "genetic_counseling": "Autosomal dominant transmission has been reported in some cases.", "management_and_treatment": "The majority of patients, who have a single or few seizures, do not require treatment. Differently, patients with frequent seizures (10-20%) may need treatment for a short time. In such cases, carbamazepine or valproate are preferred even if, in rare cases, carbamazepine may have a paradoxical effect.", "prognosis": "Prognosis of RE is favorable since nearly 90% of patients remit before puberty. In rare cases (<1%), RE may evolve to atypical RE with linguistic, behavioral and neuropsychological deficits. An aggressive treatment with steroids, in these cases might change the evolution of the disease and a remission of neuropsychological deficits might be seen."}, {"name": "BEEC", "sub_name": "Ekstrophie-Epispadie-Komplex", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "BEEC, Blasenekstrophie-Epispadie-Kloakenekstrophie-Komplex, EEC, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q64.1", "OMIM": "258040\u00a0 600057", "UMLS": "C1838703", "GARD": "2207", "summary": "Der Ekstrophie-Epispadie-Komplex (EEC) repr\u00e4sentiert ein Spektrum von Urogenital-Fehlbildungen deren Schweregrad von Epispadie (E) und klassischer Blasenekstrophie (CEB) bis zur Kloaken-Ekstrophie (EC) als schwerster Manifestation reicht. Abh\u00e4ngig vom Schweregrad sind beim EEC die Harnwege, das Muskel- und Skelettsystem, das Becken, der Beckenboden, die Bauchwand und manchmal die Wirbels\u00e4ule und der Anus betroffen. Die Pr\u00e4valenz f\u00fcr das ganze Spektrum bei Geburt wurde als 1:10.000 bestimmt , mit 1:30.000 f\u00fcr CEB und 1:200.000 f\u00fcr EC. Insgesamt sind Knaben h\u00e4ufiger als M\u00e4dchen betroffen. Der EEC ist gekennzeichnet durch sichtbare Defekte der unteren Bauchwand, entweder mit evaginierter Blasenplatte (CEB) oder mit einer offenen Urethraplatte bei Knaben und einer Spalte bei M\u00e4dchen (E). Der Urin tropft sichtbar auf der Oberfl\u00e4che der Blase aus den Ureter\u00f6ffnungen oder durch die Urethra. In den seltenen F\u00e4llen von CE sind nach der Geburt zwei ekstrophierte Blasenh\u00e4lften sichtbar, sowie Omphalozele, Anus imperforatus und Wirbels\u00e4ulendefekte. Auch atypische Formen des EEC (duplizierte Ekstrophie, bedeckte Ekstrophie und Pseudo-Ekstrophie) wurden beschrieben. Der EEC resultiert aus einer mechanischen Ruptur oder einer Vergr\u00f6\u00dferung der Kloakenmembran, wodurch, mit der Folge der Ekstrophie, das Einwachsen mesodermaler Zellen entlang der subumbilikalen Mittellinie verhindert wird. Der Schweregrad der Fehlbildung wird durch den Zeitpunkt der Ruptur bestimmt. Die zugrundeliegende Ursache ist nicht bekannt. Famili\u00e4re F\u00e4lle sind selten. Wahrscheinlich sind Erb- als auch Umweltfaktoren an der Genese des EEC beteiligt. Die Diagnose wird bei Geburt klinisch gestellt. Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnose ist durch sorgf\u00e4ltigen Fehlbildungs-Ultraschall mit dem Befund m\u00f6glich, dass mehrfach eine normal gef\u00fcllte fetale Blase fehlt. Die Eltern m\u00fcssen sorgf\u00e4ltig beraten werden, wegen der guten Ergebnisse bei angemessener chirurgischer Behandlung soll ein Abbruch der Schwangerschaft nicht mehr grunds\u00e4tzlich angeboten werden. Die Behandlung ist prim\u00e4r chirurgisch. Die Ziele sind ein sicherer Verschluss der Bauchwand, Harnkontinenz und Erhalt der Nierenfunktion und schlie\u00dflich eine kosmetisch und funktionell ad\u00e4quate Rekonstruktion des Genitales. Gegenw\u00e4rtig werden weltweit mehrere Methoden der Blasenrekonstruktion in der Neugeborenenzeit mit Formung eines Auslasswiderstandes (in einem oder mehreren Schritten) erfolgreich angewendet. Eine Alternative ist die Entfernung der Blasenanlage mit vollst\u00e4ndiger Umleitung des Urins in ein rektales Reservoir. Nach Rekonstruktion der Blase sind im Kindesalter Kontinenzraten von etwa 80% zu erwarten. Das spontane Wasserlassen ist das Hauptproblem, und zus\u00e4tzliche chirurgische Eingriffe sind evtl. erforderlich, um die Speicher- und Entleerungsfunktion zu optimieren. In F\u00e4llen von definitivem Versagen der Rekonstruktion soll eine Umleitung des Urins erfolgen. In der Pubert\u00e4t sind f\u00fcr beide Geschlechter die Geschlechts- und Fortpflanzungsfunktion ein zunehmend wichtiges Thema. F\u00fcr die psychosoziale und psychosexuelle Anpassung und eine angemessene Lebensqualit\u00e4t ist die Langzeitbetreuung der Eltern und Kinder mit EEC von der Geburt bis zum Erwachsenenalter durch ein multidisziplin\u00e4res Expertenteam entscheidend wichtig."}, {"name": "Beemer-Ertbruggen-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Beemer-Ertbruggen-Syndrom ist ein letales Fehlbildungs-Syndrom. Es wurde bei 2 Br\u00fcdern mit blutsverwandten Eltern (Vetter und Cousine 1. Grades) beschrieben. Kennzeichnende Symptome sind: Hydrozephalus, Herzfehlbildungen, dichte Knochensubstanz und faziale Dysmorphien (schr\u00e4g abw\u00e4rts verlaufende Lidspalten, kolbige Nase, breiter Nasenr\u00fccken, Mikrogenie und lange Oberlippe). Wahrscheinlich wird das Syndrom autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Weitere F\u00e4lle sind seit 1984 nicht mehr beschrieben worden.", "synonyms": "Hydrozephalus - Herzfehlbildung - hohe Knochendichte, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "209970", "UMLS": "C1859526", "MeSH": "C537668", "GARD": "846"}, {"name": "Beerenaneurysma, famili\u00e4res", "sub_name": "Famili\u00e4res zerebrales sakkul\u00e4res Aneurysma", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic neurovascular malformation characterized by sac-like bulging of cerebral arteries due to weakening of the endothelial layer. Familial occurrence is suspected when two or more affected first- to third-degree relatives are present in a family. Aneurysms may remain asymptomatic throughout life, or rupture and thereby cause potentially life-threatening subarachnoid hemorrhage. Patients with familial cerebral saccular aneurysm are more likely to develop more than one brain aneurysm, are at greater risk of rupture, and tend to have poorer outcome after rupture than patients with sporadic cerebral aneurysms.", "synonyms": "Familial berry aneurysm, Familial intracranial saccular aneurysm, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "I67.1", "omim": "105800\u00a0 300870\u00a0 608542\u00a0 609122\u00a0 610213\u00a0 611892\u00a0 612161\u00a0 612162\u00a0 612586\u00a0 612587\u00a0 614252\u00a0 618734"}, {"name": "Behaarte-Ellenbogen-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Hypertrichosis cubiti", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Hypertrichosis cubiti is a rare hair anomaly characterized by symmetrical, congenital or early-onset, bilateral hypertrychosis localized on the externsor surfaces of the upper extremities (especially the elbows). Short stature, or other abnormalities, such as developmental delay, facial anomalies and intellectual disability, may or may not be associated.", "synonyms": "Hairy elbows syndrome, MacDermot-Patton-Williams syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q84.2", "omim": "139600", "umls": "C1841696", "gard": "143", "meddra": "10068636"}, {"name": "Beh\u00e7et-\u00e4hnliche Krankheit des Kindes, heredit\u00e4re", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autosomal dominant autoinflammatory syndrome characterized by early onset systemic inflammation with autoimmune manifestations and more rarely, humoral immune deficiency and increased production of circulating proinflammatory cytokines, variably manifesting with recurrent oral aphthous ulcers, genital ulcers, arthralgia or arthritis, periodic fever, uveitis, and severe gastrointestinal involvement (pain, diarrhea, vomiting, rectal bleeding).", "synonyms": "Beh\u00e7et-like disease due to HA20, Beh\u00e7et-like disease due to haploinsufficiency of A20, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent", "icd_10": "D89.8", "omim": "616744"}, {"name": "Beh\u00e7et-\u00e4hnliche Krankheit durch A20-Haploinsuffizienz", "sub_name": "Beh\u00e7et-\u00e4hnliche Krankheit des Kindes, heredit\u00e4re", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autosomal dominant autoinflammatory syndrome characterized by early onset systemic inflammation with autoimmune manifestations and more rarely, humoral immune deficiency and increased production of circulating proinflammatory cytokines, variably manifesting with recurrent oral aphthous ulcers, genital ulcers, arthralgia or arthritis, periodic fever, uveitis, and severe gastrointestinal involvement (pain, diarrhea, vomiting, rectal bleeding).", "synonyms": "Beh\u00e7et-like disease due to HA20, Beh\u00e7et-like disease due to haploinsufficiency of A20, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent", "icd_10": "D89.8", "omim": "616744"}, {"name": "Beh\u00e7et-\u00e4hnliche Krankheit durch HA20", "sub_name": "Beh\u00e7et-\u00e4hnliche Krankheit des Kindes, heredit\u00e4re", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autosomal dominant autoinflammatory syndrome characterized by early onset systemic inflammation with autoimmune manifestations and more rarely, humoral immune deficiency and increased production of circulating proinflammatory cytokines, variably manifesting with recurrent oral aphthous ulcers, genital ulcers, arthralgia or arthritis, periodic fever, uveitis, and severe gastrointestinal involvement (pain, diarrhea, vomiting, rectal bleeding).", "synonyms": "Beh\u00e7et-like disease due to HA20, Beh\u00e7et-like disease due to haploinsufficiency of A20, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent", "icd_10": "D89.8", "omim": "616744"}, {"name": "Beh\u00e7et-Krankheit", "sub_name": "Beh\u00e7et-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die BD wird am h\u00e4ufigsten bei Populationen entlang der Seidenstra\u00dfe beschrieben, wobei die h\u00f6chste Pr\u00e4valenz in der T\u00fcrkei mit >1/1.000 berichtet wird, im Vergleich zu 1/10.000 in Japan. Europ\u00e4ische F\u00e4lle werden h\u00e4ufiger in L\u00e4ndern des Mittelmeerraumes beschrieben.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, chronic, relapsing, multisystemic vasculitis characterized by mucocutaneous lesions, as well as articular, vascular, ocular and central nervous system manifestations.", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Multigenic/multifactorial\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Adolescent, Childhood", "icd_10": "M35.2", "omim": "109650", "umls": "C0004943", "mesh": "D001528", "gard": "848", "meddra": "10004213", "epidemiology": "Beh\u00e7et disease (BD) is most often reported in populations along the Silk Road, with highest prevalence reported in Turkey at >1/1,000, versus 1/10,000 in Japan. European cases are more often described in Mediterranean countries.", "clinical_description": "Onset most commonly occurs in adults (mean 30 years of age), but pediatric cases have been reported. Relapsing episodes of round oral aphthae with sharp erythematous and elevated borders (1-3 cm diameter) may be accompanied by genital aphthae (>50% of cases); cutaneous features may include pseudo-folliculitis and erythema nodosum. Ocular disorders (posterior uveitis, retinal vasculitis) occur in over 50% of BD patients. Arthralgia and/or non-erosive, asymmetric, arthritis affecting mainly large articulation (knees, ankles ect.) are frequent (45%) and can occur as an initial symptom. Vasculitis in BD is more frequent in the venous system where thromboses in femoro-iliac, superior and inferior vena cava and cerebral territories may occur. Rarer arterial thromboses and aneurysms primarily affect the pulmonary and aorta vessels. Neurological manifestations (neuro-BD) are frequent (>20%), and may include headache, fever, pyramidal signs with hemiparesis, cranial nerve damage, meningitis, behavioral changes and sphincter dysfunction. Aphthoid and/or ulcerative lesions may affect the whole digestive tract but mainly the ileo-caecum and ascending colon, potentially leading to hemorrhages and perforations.", "etiology": "Of unknown origin, genetic predisposition in BD may allow certain infectious (in particular Streptococcus sanguis) and/or environmental insults to trigger symptoms involving sporadic inflammatory attacks reminiscent of auto-inflammatory disorders due to cross reactions with oral mucosa antigens. HLAB5101 antigen is associated to BD in 50-60% of patients. NF-kB activation and aberrant cytokine levels (eg- IL-6, TNF-a, IL-8, IL-12, IL-17 and IL-21) have been implicated in the pathogenesis of BD. A familial, autosomal dominant form of BD, A20 haploinsufficiency, is linked to mutations in TNFAIP3(6q23.3).", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis of BD is essentially clinical and is based on the international classification criteria, which are sensitive and specific. The presence of recurrent oral ulceration (at least 3 times over 12 months; 2 points), genital ulceration (2 points), uveitis (2 points), skin lesions (1 point), cardiovascular (1 point), neurologic (1 point) and/or pathergy reaction (1 point). Beh\u00e7et disease is retained with 4 or more points. Other elements may contribute to the diagnosis. Isolated severe visceral involvement (e.g. vena cava, cerebral and/or subhepatic vein thrombosis, pulmonary aneurysms, neurological involvement and/or retinal vasculitis) can be inaugural and should evoke BD; therefore, systematic request of an expert opinion is recommended. A family history of BD also increases the probability of diagnosis. Searching for the HLA-B51 haplotype is not a strong diagnostic element, but can be useful in situations of diagnostic uncertainty.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis depends on upon the manifestations, herpes ulcerations, spondylo-arthropathies, infectious uveitis, relapsing polychondritis, sarcoidosis, antiphospholipid syndrome, Takayasu arteritis, Crohn's disease, infectious meningo-encephalitis or multiple sclerosis may be considered.", "management_and_treatment": "Anti-inflammatory steroids are the basis of treatment; however, corticodependance and relapses may occur upon discontinuation. Concurrent administration of immunosuppresive drugs (e.g. azathioprine, cyclophosphamide, methotrexate or mycophenolate mofetil), are also prescribed but their action is delayed. Anti-TNF and alpha-interferon (2a or 2b) are efficient, particularly in severe uveitis, and antiplatelet or anticoagulation treatments are discussed in case of vascular thrombosis. Colchicine relieves mucocutaneous symptoms. Apremilast has been recently approved in refractory oral ulceration of BD. Efficacy is dependent upon rapid initiation and patient compliance.", "prognosis": "In the absence of treatment, the prognosis is severe due to ocular involvement leading potentially to blindness, the risk of lethal arterial rupture, large vessel thrombosis and neurological symptoms potentially causing encephalopathy or cerebral hypertension that may lead to a loss of autonomy. Intensive care coupled with close multidisciplinary follow-up, and adapted immunosuppressive treatment has been shown to reduce morbidity and mortality."}, {"name": "Beh\u00e7et-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die BD wird am h\u00e4ufigsten bei Populationen entlang der Seidenstra\u00dfe beschrieben, wobei die h\u00f6chste Pr\u00e4valenz in der T\u00fcrkei mit >1/1.000 berichtet wird, im Vergleich zu 1/10.000 in Japan. Europ\u00e4ische F\u00e4lle werden h\u00e4ufiger in L\u00e4ndern des Mittelmeerraumes beschrieben.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, chronic, relapsing, multisystemic vasculitis characterized by mucocutaneous lesions, as well as articular, vascular, ocular and central nervous system manifestations.", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Multigenic/multifactorial\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Adolescent, Childhood", "icd_10": "M35.2", "omim": "109650", "umls": "C0004943", "mesh": "D001528", "gard": "848", "meddra": "10004213", "epidemiology": "Beh\u00e7et disease (BD) is most often reported in populations along the Silk Road, with highest prevalence reported in Turkey at >1/1,000, versus 1/10,000 in Japan. European cases are more often described in Mediterranean countries.", "clinical_description": "Onset most commonly occurs in adults (mean 30 years of age), but pediatric cases have been reported. Relapsing episodes of round oral aphthae with sharp erythematous and elevated borders (1-3 cm diameter) may be accompanied by genital aphthae (>50% of cases); cutaneous features may include pseudo-folliculitis and erythema nodosum. Ocular disorders (posterior uveitis, retinal vasculitis) occur in over 50% of BD patients. Arthralgia and/or non-erosive, asymmetric, arthritis affecting mainly large articulation (knees, ankles ect.) are frequent (45%) and can occur as an initial symptom. Vasculitis in BD is more frequent in the venous system where thromboses in femoro-iliac, superior and inferior vena cava and cerebral territories may occur. Rarer arterial thromboses and aneurysms primarily affect the pulmonary and aorta vessels. Neurological manifestations (neuro-BD) are frequent (>20%), and may include headache, fever, pyramidal signs with hemiparesis, cranial nerve damage, meningitis, behavioral changes and sphincter dysfunction. Aphthoid and/or ulcerative lesions may affect the whole digestive tract but mainly the ileo-caecum and ascending colon, potentially leading to hemorrhages and perforations.", "etiology": "Of unknown origin, genetic predisposition in BD may allow certain infectious (in particular Streptococcus sanguis) and/or environmental insults to trigger symptoms involving sporadic inflammatory attacks reminiscent of auto-inflammatory disorders due to cross reactions with oral mucosa antigens. HLAB5101 antigen is associated to BD in 50-60% of patients. NF-kB activation and aberrant cytokine levels (eg- IL-6, TNF-a, IL-8, IL-12, IL-17 and IL-21) have been implicated in the pathogenesis of BD. A familial, autosomal dominant form of BD, A20 haploinsufficiency, is linked to mutations in TNFAIP3(6q23.3).", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis of BD is essentially clinical and is based on the international classification criteria, which are sensitive and specific. The presence of recurrent oral ulceration (at least 3 times over 12 months; 2 points), genital ulceration (2 points), uveitis (2 points), skin lesions (1 point), cardiovascular (1 point), neurologic (1 point) and/or pathergy reaction (1 point). Beh\u00e7et disease is retained with 4 or more points. Other elements may contribute to the diagnosis. Isolated severe visceral involvement (e.g. vena cava, cerebral and/or subhepatic vein thrombosis, pulmonary aneurysms, neurological involvement and/or retinal vasculitis) can be inaugural and should evoke BD; therefore, systematic request of an expert opinion is recommended. A family history of BD also increases the probability of diagnosis. Searching for the HLA-B51 haplotype is not a strong diagnostic element, but can be useful in situations of diagnostic uncertainty.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis depends on upon the manifestations, herpes ulcerations, spondylo-arthropathies, infectious uveitis, relapsing polychondritis, sarcoidosis, antiphospholipid syndrome, Takayasu arteritis, Crohn's disease, infectious meningo-encephalitis or multiple sclerosis may be considered.", "management_and_treatment": "Anti-inflammatory steroids are the basis of treatment; however, corticodependance and relapses may occur upon discontinuation. Concurrent administration of immunosuppresive drugs (e.g. azathioprine, cyclophosphamide, methotrexate or mycophenolate mofetil), are also prescribed but their action is delayed. Anti-TNF and alpha-interferon (2a or 2b) are efficient, particularly in severe uveitis, and antiplatelet or anticoagulation treatments are discussed in case of vascular thrombosis. Colchicine relieves mucocutaneous symptoms. Apremilast has been recently approved in refractory oral ulceration of BD. Efficacy is dependent upon rapid initiation and patient compliance.", "prognosis": "In the absence of treatment, the prognosis is severe due to ocular involvement leading potentially to blindness, the risk of lethal arterial rupture, large vessel thrombosis and neurological symptoms potentially causing encephalopathy or cerebral hypertension that may lead to a loss of autonomy. Intensive care coupled with close multidisciplinary follow-up, and adapted immunosuppressive treatment has been shown to reduce morbidity and mortality."}, {"name": "Beidseitige H\u00fcft- und Radiusk\u00f6pfchen-Dislokation-Kleinwuchs-Skoliose-Karpalfusionen-Pes cavus-Gesichtsdysmorphie-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Steel-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic bone disease characterized by short stature, bilateral congenital hip dislocation, radial head dislocation, carpal coalition, scoliosis, pes cavus, and atlantoaxial subluxation. Dysmorphic facial features include broad forehead, broad nasal bridge, hypertelorism, and mild midface hypoplasia. Association with bilateral sensorineural hearing loss has also been described.", "synonyms": "Bilateral hip and radial head dislocations-short stature-scoliosis-carpal coalitions-pes cavus-facial dysmorphism syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "Q87.5", "omim": "615155"}, {"name": "Beindeformit\u00e4t - Katarakt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Beindeformit\u00e4t - Katarakt ist eine sehr seltene syndromale Gliedmassenfehlbildung, die bei 2 entfernt miteinander verwandten Knaben beschrieben wurde. Charakteristisch sind eine Verlust-Deformit\u00e4t des linken Beins, progrediente Skoliose, Kleinwuchs, kongenitale Katarakt und Sehnerven-Dysplasie. Ein intellektuelles Defizit wurde nicht gesehen.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich", "OMIM": "246000", "UMLS": "C1855523"}, {"name": "Beinverdoppelung - Fu\u00dfverdoppelung", "sub_name": "Fibul\u00e4re Dimelie-Diplopodie-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein sehr seltenes, genetisch bedingtes, kongenitales Fehlbildungssyndrom der Gliedma\u00dfen, das durch eine Duplikation der Fibula in Verbindung mit einer pr\u00e4axialen Spiegelpolydaktylie des Fu\u00dfes gekennzeichnet ist. Sie kann isoliert auftreten, oder zusammen mit einer ulnaren Dimelie, fazialen Anomalien und Stei\u00dfbeinteratom.", "synonyms": "Beinverdoppelung - Fu\u00dfverdoppelung, Spiegelbildliche Polydaktylie - Duplikation des Fu\u00dfes, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q74.8"}, {"name": "Belastungsintoleranz mit Laktatazidose", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Bellini-Chiumello-Rinoldi-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Akroscyphodysplasie, metaphys\u00e4re", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die metaphys\u00e4re Akroscyphodysplasie ist eine \u00e4u\u00dferst seltene Form der metaphys\u00e4ren Dysplasie. Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch typische radiologische Auff\u00e4lligkeiten in Form von kegelf\u00f6rmigen oberen Schienbein- und unteren Oberschenkelepiphysen, die in gro\u00dfe becherf\u00f6rmige Metaphysen eingebettet sind und mit Kleinwuchs und Mikromelien einher gehen. Die Beteiligung der oberen Extremit\u00e4ten umfasst Brachydaktylie und kegelf\u00f6rmige Epiphysen der Phalangeal- und Mittelhandknochen. Der Zusammenhang von metaphys\u00e4rer Akroscyphodysplasie mit psychomotorischer Verz\u00f6gerung und Alopezie wurde ebenfalls in einigen F\u00e4llen berichtet.", "synonyms": "Bellini-Chiumello-Rinoldi-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q78.5", "OMIM": "250215", "UMLS": "C1855243", "MeSH": "C537350", "GARD": "3519"}, {"name": "Benallegue-Lacete-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Kleeblattsch\u00e4del - asphyxierende Thoraxdysplasie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare syndromic craniosynostosis characterized by prenatal presentation with cloverleaf skull, micromelia and asphyxiating thoracic dysplasia. Radiologic features include short ribs, horizontal roof of the acetabulum with a rounded median prominence and lateral spurs, deformed long bones with broad metaphyses, and absent ossification of the terminal phalanges. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1987.", "synonyms": "Benallegue-Lacete syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.5", "gard": "853"}, {"name": "Bencze-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Bencze-Syndrom oder Hemifaziale Hyperplasie mit Strabismus ist ein Fehlbildungs-Syndrom mit abnormem Wachstum des Gesichtsskeletts und seiner Weichteilstrukturen und Organe. Charakteristische Symptome sind: Leichte Gesichtsasymmetrie (Hirnsch\u00e4del und Aug\u00e4pfel sind nicht betroffen), Esotropie, Amblyopie und/oder Strabismus convergens und gelegentlich eine submuk\u00f6se Gaumenspalte. Das Syndrom wird autosomal-dominant vererbt seit 1979 wurden keine weiteren F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "synonyms": "Hemifaziale Hyperplasie mit Stratumbildung, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "Q67.4", "OMIM": "141350", "UMLS": "C1841640", "GARD": "2633"}, {"name": "Benigne famili\u00e4re Epilepsie des Kindesalters", "sub_name": "Epilepsie, benigne famili\u00e4re infantile", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Benigne famili\u00e4re infantile Epilepsie (BFIE) ist ein erblich-epileptisches Syndrom, das durch das Auftreten von wiederholten fieberfreien Anf\u00e4llen bei gesunden S\u00e4uglingen zwischen dem dritten und achten Lebensmonat gekennzeichnet ist.", "synonyms": "BFIE, BFIS, Benigne famili\u00e4re Epilepsie des Kindesalters, Benigne famili\u00e4re infantile Krampfanf\u00e4lle, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G40.3", "OMIM": "601764\u00a0 605751\u00a0 607745\u00a0 612627\u00a0 617080", "UMLS": "C0220669", "GARD": "856\u00a0 857", "epidemiology": "Obwohl weltweit BFIE-F\u00e4lle beschrieben wurden, sind Pr\u00e4valenz und Inzidenz unbekannt. In einer argentinischen Fallserie wurde BFIE als dritth\u00e4ufigster Epilepsie-Typ in den ersten zwei Lebensjahren aufgelistet.", "clinical_description": "Anf\u00e4lle treten normalerweise zwischen dem dritten und dem achten Lebensmonat auf, wobei H\u00e4ufungen (Cluster, 8-10 am Tag) wiederholter und kurzer Episoden (2-5 Minuten) \u00fcber einen Zeitraum von wenigen Tagen auftreten. Sie sind meist fokal, k\u00f6nnen aber manchmal auch generalisieren. Patienten weisen eine motorische Hemmung, Unansprechbarkeit, Kopf- und/oder Augenabweichungen zu einer Seite hin, Vor-sich-hinstarren, flatternde Augenlider, Grunzen, Cyanose, eine diffuse Hypertonie und unilaterale oder bilaterale klonische Zuckungen der Extremit\u00e4ten auf. Im interiktalen Zeitraum erlangt der Patient wieder sein volles Bewusstsein und ist normal aktiv. Die psychomotorische Entwicklung ist normal. Regelm\u00e4\u00dfig werden in der Familie F\u00e4lle gleichen Epilepsietyps gefunden. Es wurde ein Syndrom namens Famili\u00e4re infantile Krampfanf\u00e4lle und Choreoathetose (ICCA; siehe dort) beobachtet, bei dem BFIE-Patienten in der Kindheit und/oder Adoleszenz choreoathetotische dyskinetische Anf\u00e4lle zeigen, die spontan oder nach verschiedenen Stimuli (z.B. Sport, Stress) auftreten. In einigen wenigen F\u00e4llen tritt BFIE zusammen mit famili\u00e4rer oder sporadischer hemiplegischer Migr\u00e4ne auf.", "etiology": "Die BFIE ist eine genetisch heterogene Krankheit. In der Mehrzahl der F\u00e4lle wurden Mutationen im PRRT2-Gen (16p11.2) gefunden. Dieses Gen kodiert das Prolinreiche Transmembranprotein 2, ein Membranprotein, das mit dem pr\u00e4synaptischen Protein SNAP-25 interagiert. Mutationen wurden au\u00dferdem im SCN2A-Gen (2q24.3) gefunden, das den Hirn-Natriumkanal NaV1.2 kodiert, sowie selten auch in den Kaliumkanal-Genen KCNQ2 (20q13.33) und KCNQ3 (8q24). Schlie\u00dflich wurden in den Chromosomen-Regionen 19q, 16p und 1p drei weitere Loci identifiziert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf dem Elektroenzephalogramm (EEG) und Videoaufnahmen, die Familienanamnese ist dabei ein wichtiger Hinweis. Das Anfalls-EEG lokalisiert den Ursprung der partiellen Anf\u00e4lle in die parietal-okzipitale Region und zeigt, dass die betroffene Hemisph\u00e4re sich von Episode zu Episode unterscheiden kann. Die Anf\u00e4lle k\u00f6nnen sich manchmal generalisieren und das gesamte Gehirn befallen. W\u00e4hrend eines Anfall-Clusters zeigt das post-iktale EEG lateralisierte okzipito-parietale Deltawellen und Spikes. Au\u00dferhalb des Clusters ist das interiktale EEG im Wachen und Schlafen normal. Die interiktale neurologische Untersuchung und die Bildgebung des Gehirns (Gehirn-CT und/oder MRI) sind normal. Gentests best\u00e4tigen die Diagnose.", "differential_diagnosis": "Eine Differentialdiagnose sind die Benignen famili\u00e4ren neonatal-infantilen Krampfanf\u00e4lle (siehe dort), ein epileptisches Syndrom mit Beginn zwischen dem S\u00e4uglings- und Kleinkindalter, das mit der BFIE gemeinsame Merkmale hat und vor allem durch Mutationen im SCN2A-Gen verursacht wird. Weitere Differentialdiagnosen sind die Benignen nicht-famili\u00e4ren infantilen Krampfanf\u00e4lle, die Benignen infantilen Anf\u00e4lle, die mit einer milden Gastroenteritis assoziiert sind, und die Benigne fokale Epilepsie mit Mittellinien-Spikes und Wellen w\u00e4hrend des Schlafs (BIMSE) (siehe jeweils dort).", "genetic_counseling": "Die BFIE wird als autosomal-dominantes Merkmal mit unvollst\u00e4ndiger Penetranz vererbt.", "management_and_treatment": "Bei einer anti-epileptischen Behandlung (z.B. Carbamazepin, Valproat, Phenobarbital) verschwinden die Symptome rasch und den Berichten zufolge kommt es auch nicht zu einem erneuten Auftauchen eines anderen Epilepsietyps. Bei Patienten mit einer eindeutigen Familienanamnese kann die Behandlung nach wenigen Monaten abgebrochen werden.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist gut. Die Anf\u00e4lle verschwinden meist nach den ersten Lebensjahren und zeigen keinerlei neurologische Sp\u00e4tfolgen.", "summary": "Obwohl weltweit BFIE-F\u00e4lle beschrieben wurden, sind Pr\u00e4valenz und Inzidenz unbekannt. In einer argentinischen Fallserie wurde BFIE als dritth\u00e4ufigster Epilepsie-Typ in den ersten zwei Lebensjahren aufgelistet."}, {"name": "Benigne famili\u00e4re infantile Krampfanf\u00e4lle", "sub_name": "Epilepsie, benigne famili\u00e4re infantile", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Benigne famili\u00e4re infantile Epilepsie (BFIE) ist ein erblich-epileptisches Syndrom, das durch das Auftreten von wiederholten fieberfreien Anf\u00e4llen bei gesunden S\u00e4uglingen zwischen dem dritten und achten Lebensmonat gekennzeichnet ist.", "synonyms": "BFIE, BFIS, Benigne famili\u00e4re Epilepsie des Kindesalters, Benigne famili\u00e4re infantile Krampfanf\u00e4lle, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G40.3", "OMIM": "601764\u00a0 605751\u00a0 607745\u00a0 612627\u00a0 617080", "UMLS": "C0220669", "GARD": "856\u00a0 857", "epidemiology": "Obwohl weltweit BFIE-F\u00e4lle beschrieben wurden, sind Pr\u00e4valenz und Inzidenz unbekannt. In einer argentinischen Fallserie wurde BFIE als dritth\u00e4ufigster Epilepsie-Typ in den ersten zwei Lebensjahren aufgelistet.", "clinical_description": "Anf\u00e4lle treten normalerweise zwischen dem dritten und dem achten Lebensmonat auf, wobei H\u00e4ufungen (Cluster, 8-10 am Tag) wiederholter und kurzer Episoden (2-5 Minuten) \u00fcber einen Zeitraum von wenigen Tagen auftreten. Sie sind meist fokal, k\u00f6nnen aber manchmal auch generalisieren. Patienten weisen eine motorische Hemmung, Unansprechbarkeit, Kopf- und/oder Augenabweichungen zu einer Seite hin, Vor-sich-hinstarren, flatternde Augenlider, Grunzen, Cyanose, eine diffuse Hypertonie und unilaterale oder bilaterale klonische Zuckungen der Extremit\u00e4ten auf. Im interiktalen Zeitraum erlangt der Patient wieder sein volles Bewusstsein und ist normal aktiv. Die psychomotorische Entwicklung ist normal. Regelm\u00e4\u00dfig werden in der Familie F\u00e4lle gleichen Epilepsietyps gefunden. Es wurde ein Syndrom namens Famili\u00e4re infantile Krampfanf\u00e4lle und Choreoathetose (ICCA; siehe dort) beobachtet, bei dem BFIE-Patienten in der Kindheit und/oder Adoleszenz choreoathetotische dyskinetische Anf\u00e4lle zeigen, die spontan oder nach verschiedenen Stimuli (z.B. Sport, Stress) auftreten. In einigen wenigen F\u00e4llen tritt BFIE zusammen mit famili\u00e4rer oder sporadischer hemiplegischer Migr\u00e4ne auf.", "etiology": "Die BFIE ist eine genetisch heterogene Krankheit. In der Mehrzahl der F\u00e4lle wurden Mutationen im PRRT2-Gen (16p11.2) gefunden. Dieses Gen kodiert das Prolinreiche Transmembranprotein 2, ein Membranprotein, das mit dem pr\u00e4synaptischen Protein SNAP-25 interagiert. Mutationen wurden au\u00dferdem im SCN2A-Gen (2q24.3) gefunden, das den Hirn-Natriumkanal NaV1.2 kodiert, sowie selten auch in den Kaliumkanal-Genen KCNQ2 (20q13.33) und KCNQ3 (8q24). Schlie\u00dflich wurden in den Chromosomen-Regionen 19q, 16p und 1p drei weitere Loci identifiziert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf dem Elektroenzephalogramm (EEG) und Videoaufnahmen, die Familienanamnese ist dabei ein wichtiger Hinweis. Das Anfalls-EEG lokalisiert den Ursprung der partiellen Anf\u00e4lle in die parietal-okzipitale Region und zeigt, dass die betroffene Hemisph\u00e4re sich von Episode zu Episode unterscheiden kann. Die Anf\u00e4lle k\u00f6nnen sich manchmal generalisieren und das gesamte Gehirn befallen. W\u00e4hrend eines Anfall-Clusters zeigt das post-iktale EEG lateralisierte okzipito-parietale Deltawellen und Spikes. Au\u00dferhalb des Clusters ist das interiktale EEG im Wachen und Schlafen normal. Die interiktale neurologische Untersuchung und die Bildgebung des Gehirns (Gehirn-CT und/oder MRI) sind normal. Gentests best\u00e4tigen die Diagnose.", "differential_diagnosis": "Eine Differentialdiagnose sind die Benignen famili\u00e4ren neonatal-infantilen Krampfanf\u00e4lle (siehe dort), ein epileptisches Syndrom mit Beginn zwischen dem S\u00e4uglings- und Kleinkindalter, das mit der BFIE gemeinsame Merkmale hat und vor allem durch Mutationen im SCN2A-Gen verursacht wird. Weitere Differentialdiagnosen sind die Benignen nicht-famili\u00e4ren infantilen Krampfanf\u00e4lle, die Benignen infantilen Anf\u00e4lle, die mit einer milden Gastroenteritis assoziiert sind, und die Benigne fokale Epilepsie mit Mittellinien-Spikes und Wellen w\u00e4hrend des Schlafs (BIMSE) (siehe jeweils dort).", "genetic_counseling": "Die BFIE wird als autosomal-dominantes Merkmal mit unvollst\u00e4ndiger Penetranz vererbt.", "management_and_treatment": "Bei einer anti-epileptischen Behandlung (z.B. Carbamazepin, Valproat, Phenobarbital) verschwinden die Symptome rasch und den Berichten zufolge kommt es auch nicht zu einem erneuten Auftauchen eines anderen Epilepsietyps. Bei Patienten mit einer eindeutigen Familienanamnese kann die Behandlung nach wenigen Monaten abgebrochen werden.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist gut. Die Anf\u00e4lle verschwinden meist nach den ersten Lebensjahren und zeigen keinerlei neurologische Sp\u00e4tfolgen.", "summary": "Obwohl weltweit BFIE-F\u00e4lle beschrieben wurden, sind Pr\u00e4valenz und Inzidenz unbekannt. In einer argentinischen Fallserie wurde BFIE als dritth\u00e4ufigster Epilepsie-Typ in den ersten zwei Lebensjahren aufgelistet."}, {"name": "Benigne famili\u00e4re Neugeborenenepilepsie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Benigne Famili\u00e4re Neugeborenenepilepsie (BFNE) ist eine seltene genetisch bedingte Form der Epilepsie, die durch das Auftreten von nicht-fiebrigen Kr\u00e4mpfen in den ersten Lebenstagen bei sonst gesunden Neugeborenen gekennzeichnet ist.", "synonyms": "BFNE, BFNS, Krampfanf\u00e4lle, benigne neonatale, famili\u00e4re Form, Neugeborenenkr\u00e4mpfe, benigne famili\u00e4re, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G40.3", "OMIM": "121200\u00a0 121201\u00a0 269720\u00a0 608217", "UMLS": "C0220669\u00a0 C2930911", "MeSH": "C535466\u00a0 D020936", "GARD": "1519", "MedDRA": "10067866", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist noch unbekannt, da die Krankheit wahrscheinlich h\u00e4ufig gar nicht erkannt wird. Bislang wurden 100 betroffene Familien beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Bei sonst gesunden Neugeborenen treten die Krampfanf\u00e4lle erstmalig zwischen dem zweiten und achten Lebenstag auf. Die Anf\u00e4lle sind meist fokal, beeintr\u00e4chtigen wahlweise beide K\u00f6rperh\u00e4lften und f\u00fchren h\u00e4ufig zur Apnoe. Sie k\u00f6nnen isoliert oder in Clustern auftreten und sind meist von kurzer Dauer (1-2 Minuten). Allerdings k\u00f6nnen sie bis zu 20-mal pro Tag auftreten und zum Status Epilepticus f\u00fchren. Anf\u00e4lle k\u00f6nnen w\u00e4hrend des Wach- oder Schlafzustands auftreten. Initial ist oft eine tonische Haltung und Apnoe zu beobachten, welche sekund\u00e4r h\u00e4ufig durch klonische Bewegungen und motorische Automatismen abgel\u00f6st wird. Zwischen den Anf\u00e4llen weisen die Neugeborenen keine neurologischen Besonderheiten auf, wobei eine geringf\u00fcgige Sedierung unter antikonvulsiver Therapie zu beobachten ist. Meist erhalten die Kinder in der Neugeborenenperiode eine antikonvulsive Medikation, obwohl die Krampfanf\u00e4lle h\u00e4ufig nach den ersten Lebensmonaten selbstlimitierend sind und nach dem ersten Lebensjahr in der Regel nicht mehr auftreten. Bei 10-15 % der Patienten zeigen sich jedoch auch sp\u00e4ter in der Kindheit noch fiebrige oder fieberfreie Krampfanf\u00e4lle. Die weitere psychomotorische Entwicklung ist normal.", "etiology": "BFNE ist eine genetisch heterogene Erkrankung aufgrund von Mutationen in den Genen KCNQ2 (20q13.33) und KCNQ3 (8q24), die beide f\u00fcr Untereinheiten spannungsgesteuerter Kaliumkan\u00e4le kodieren. Mutationen in KCNQ2 f\u00fchren au\u00dferdem zu der KCNQ2-assoziierten epileptischen Enzephalopathie, die eine schwere Form von neonataler Epilepsie darstellt.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Kombination aus EEG-Ver\u00e4nderungen und klinischer Pr\u00e4sentation deuten auf die Krankheit hin: Der typische Krampfanfall beginnt mit asymmetrisch-tonischer Haltung und Apnoe gefolgt von beidseitigen rhythmischen Myoklonien. Die Neugeborenen sind neurologisch unauff\u00e4llig und auch die weitere neurologische und kognitive Entwicklung ist in der Regel normal. Das iktal aufgezeichnete Elektroenzephalogramm (EEG) ist meist unspezifisch, wobei sich interiktale Auff\u00e4lligkeiten haupts\u00e4chlich \u00fcber den zentralen Regionen zeigen k\u00f6nnen. Die Diagnose wird durch eine genetische Untersuchung gesichert.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Differentialdiagnose beinhaltet die benigne famili\u00e4re fr\u00fchkindliche Epilepsie sowie benigne famili\u00e4re neonatal-infantile Krampfanf\u00e4lle.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Die pr\u00e4natale Diagnostik ist nur m\u00f6glich, wenn die krankheitsverursachende Mutation in der Familie bereits bekannt ist.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Vererbung erfolgt autosomal-dominant mit reduzierter Penetranz. Eine humangenetische Beratung sollte betroffenen Familien angeboten werden und \u00fcber die 50%-ige Vererbungswahrscheinlichkeit der krankheitsausl\u00f6senden Mutation informieren. In seltenen F\u00e4llen tritt die Erkrankung de novo auf.", "management_and_treatment": "Zur Unterdr\u00fcckung der Anf\u00e4lle in der Neugeborenenzeit ist eine antikonvulsive Therapie (z. B. mit Phenobarbital, Phenytoin, Valproat, Carbamazepin) insbesondere bei F\u00e4llen mit h\u00e4ufigen Anf\u00e4llen oder Status Epilepticus indiziert. Die Behandlung erfolgt \u00fcblicherweise w\u00e4hrend der ersten 6-12 Lebensmonate. Jedoch sollten die Familie und behandelnden \u00c4rzte beachten, dass es in Ausnahmef\u00e4llen einer Behandlung \u00fcber den 12. Lebensmonat hinaus bedarf.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist gut. In der Regel kommt es im ersten Lebensjahr zur Spontanremission und die Patienten zeigen keine bleibenden neurologischen Sch\u00e4digungen. Es gibt Berichte \u00fcber sp\u00e4tere Anf\u00e4lle in der Kindheit, darunter gelegentliche Fieberkr\u00e4mpfe und idiopathische Epilepsiesydrome (z. B. Rolando-Epilepsie).", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist noch unbekannt, da die Krankheit wahrscheinlich h\u00e4ufig gar nicht erkannt wird. Bislang wurden 100 betroffene Familien beschrieben."}, {"name": "Benigne fokale Epilepsie des Erwachsenen", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare epilepsy typically characterized by isolated focal motor and somatosensory seizures. Less frequently other focal seizure types, with or without secondary generalization, have been described. The seizures usually happen when the patient is awake and take a benign course. The condition is transitory, interictal examinations are normal, and there is usually no family history of epilepsy.", "synonyms": "Adolescent benign focal crisis, ", "icd_10": "G40.8"}, {"name": "Benigne kindliche Epilepsie mit zentrotemporalen Spikes", "sub_name": "Rolando-Epilepsie", "german_description": "Die Benigne Epilepsie des Kindesalters mit Rolandischen (zentro-temporalen) Spikes (BECRS) ist das h\u00e4ufigste Epilepsiesyndrom im Kindesalter. Es ist charakterisiert durch Partial-Anf\u00e4lle, meist w\u00e4hrend des Schlafes oder kurz vor dem Aufwachen, mit Beteiligung von Mund, Gesicht und Sprachorganen. Auch eine Generalisierung ist m\u00f6glich. Das EEG ist typisch und bildet das haupts\u00e4chliche diagnostische Kriterium. Es ist biphasisch und setzt sich aus hochgespannten Spikes und scharfen Wellen mit nachfolgenden langsamen Wellen zusammen. Dieses Muster wurde 'zentrotemporal' genannt, oder auch 'Rolandische Spikes'. Regelm\u00e4\u00dfig sistieren die Anf\u00e4lle in der Adoleszenz. Antikonvulsiva werden selten ben\u00f6tigt. BECRS macht 13-23% aller F\u00e4lle von Epilepsie des Kindesalters aus. Die Inzidenz ist 21 / 100.000 Kinder unter 15. Das dominant vererbte Einzelgen mit niedriger Penetranz und Expressivit\u00e4t und mit Altersbegrenzung liegt in der Chromosomenregion 15q14. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Rolandic epilepsy (RE) is a focal childhood epilepsy characterized by seizures consisting of unilateral facial sensory-motor symptoms, with electroencephalogram (EEG) showing sharp biphasic waves over the rolandic region. It is an age-related epilepsy, with excellent outcome.", "synonyms": "BECRS, BECTS, BRE, Benign epilepsy of childhood with centrotemporal spikes, Benign familial epilepsy of childhood with rolandic spikes, Benign rolandic epilepsy, Centrotemporal epilepsy, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G40.0", "omim": "117100\u00a0 245570", "umls": "C0376532\u00a0 C2363129", "gard": "10287", "epidemiology": "RE is the most common childhood epilepsy and accounts for 8-25% of all childhood epilepsies. Its incidence has been estimated to be approximately 1/5,000 in children within 15 years.", "clinical_description": "Onset is between 3 and 12 years, in otherwise normal children (peak of onset is 5-8 years). Seizures typically occur during sleep or drowsy states; they are brief with unilateral sensorimotor (such as numbness, tingling, drooling) that involves pharynx, tongue, face, lips and sometimes hand. Speech arrest often occurs, while comprehension is preserved. Seizures may alternate from one side to the other and may become generalized. Longer attacks can be followed by post-ictal hemiplegia. Some children may have selective neuropsychological impairment affecting language, attention, visuomotor skills and behavior. They usually do not outlast the period of active seizures. Seizure remission occurs within 2-4 years from the onset. The majority of patients have <10 seizures and 10-20% have a single seizure.", "etiology": "Etiology of RE is still unknown. There is probably a genetic predisposition: an increased rate of RE, febrile seizures, and epilepsy-aphasia spectrum disorders were found among relatives. Pathogenesis seems to be related with the critical and vulnerable phase of brain maturation.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis of RE relies on the clinical features and on EEG findings that show slow, diphasic, high voltage, centrotemporal spikes, activated by sleep. Brain magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) is normal.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes other idiopathic focal childhood epilepsies (benign childhood occipital epilepsy, Panayiotopoulos type and Gastaut type. Other etiologies causing similar symptoms are excluded with brain MRI.", "genetic_counseling": "Autosomal dominant transmission has been reported in some cases.", "management_and_treatment": "The majority of patients, who have a single or few seizures, do not require treatment. Differently, patients with frequent seizures (10-20%) may need treatment for a short time. In such cases, carbamazepine or valproate are preferred even if, in rare cases, carbamazepine may have a paradoxical effect.", "prognosis": "Prognosis of RE is favorable since nearly 90% of patients remit before puberty. In rare cases (<1%), RE may evolve to atypical RE with linguistic, behavioral and neuropsychological deficits. An aggressive treatment with steroids, in these cases might change the evolution of the disease and a remission of neuropsychological deficits might be seen."}, {"name": "Benigne kongenitale Parese des sechsten Hirnnerven", "sub_name": "Abduzensparese, kongenitale", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare neuro-ophthalmological disease characterized by dysfunction of the ipsilateral lateral rectus muscle with esotropia in primary position, limited or no abduction of the eyeball, and compensatory horizontal face turn toward the palsied eye. The condition commonly resolves spontaneously.", "synonyms": "Benign congenital sixth cranial nerve palsy, Congenital CNVI palsy, ", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q07.8"}, {"name": "Benigne myoklonische Epilepsie des Kindesalters", "sub_name": "Myoklonusepilepsie des Kindesalters", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare infantile epilepsy syndrome characterized by infancy-onset of myoclonic seizures in otherwise neurologically and developmentally normal patients. Jerks may vary in severity, can be singular or occur in a series, and occur spontaneously or (less commonly) after sensory stimuli. Seizures are self-limiting and remit within several months to years from onset, although generalized tonic-clonic seizures or other forms of epilepsy may be seen later in life. Developmental delay and cognitive and behavioral difficulties have been reported in a considerable percentage of patients.", "synonyms": "Benign myoclonic epilepsy of infancy, Benign myoclonus epilepsy of infancy, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G40.3", "umls": "C0751120\u00a0 C0917800"}, {"name": "Benigne n\u00e4chtliche alternierende Hemiplegie im Kindesalter", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die beninge n\u00e4chtliche alternierende Hemiplegie im Kindesalter ist eine seltene neurologische Erkrankung, die durch wiederholte Anf\u00e4lle von n\u00e4chtlichem Schreien oder Weinen gekennzeichnet ist, gefolgt oder begleitet von einseitiger oder manchmal bilateraler Hemiplegie. Die Krankheit ist nicht mit neurologischen oder entwicklungsbedingten Beeintr\u00e4chtigungen verbunden, kann aber mit leichten Verhaltensst\u00f6rungen einhergehen.", "synonyms": "BNAHC, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unbekannt\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "G81.9"}, {"name": "Benigne neonatal-infantile Epilepsie", "sub_name": "Krampfanf\u00e4lle, benigne famili\u00e4re neonatal-infantile", "german_description": "Die Benignen neonatal-infantilen Kr\u00e4mpfe (BFNIS) sind ein gutartiges famili\u00e4res Epilepsie-Syndrom. Im Ph\u00e4notyp stehen die BFNIS zwischen den Benignen famili\u00e4ren neonatalen Kr\u00e4mpfen (BFNS) und den Benignen famili\u00e4ren infantilen Kr\u00e4mpfen (BFIS; s. diese Termini). Bisher wurde das Syndrom in 10 Familien bei jeweils mehreren Mitgliedern beschrieben. In diesen Familien begannen die BFNIS zwischen dem Tag 2 postnatal und dem 6. Lebensmonat. Bei den meisten F\u00e4llen kam es innerhalb des ersten Lebensjahres zur Spontanremission. Wie bei den BFNS und BFIS treten die Kr\u00e4mpfe in Serien an einem oder wenigen Tagen mit posterior-fokalem Beginn auf. Ursache der BFNIS sind Mutationen im SCN2A-Gen (2q24.3), das f\u00fcr die Alpha-Untereinheit Na(V)1.2 eines spannungsgesteuerten Natriumkanals kodiert. Die Vererbung ist autosomal-dominant. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Benign familial neonatal-infantile seizures (BFNIS) is a benign familial epilepsy syndrome with an intermediate phenotype between benign familial neonatal seizures (BFNS) and benign familial infantile seizures (BFIS; see these terms). So far, this syndrome has been described in multiple members of 10 families. Age of onset in these BFNIS families varied from 2 days to 6 months, with spontaneous resolution in most cases before the age of 12 months. Like BFNS and BFIS, seizures in BFNIS generally occur in clusters over one or a few days with posterior focal seizure onset. BFNIS is caused by mutations in the SCN2A gene (2q24.3), encoding the voltage-gated sodium channel alpha-subunit Na(V)1.2. Transmission is autosomal dominant.", "synonyms": "BFNIS, Benign neonatal-infantile epilepsy, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G40.4", "omim": "607745", "umls": "C0220669", "gard": "1518", "meddra": "10067866"}, {"name": "Benigne okzipitale Epilepsie des Kindesalters Typ Gastaut", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Benign childhood occipital epilepsy, Gastaut type is a rare, genetic neurological disorder characterized by childhood to mid-adolescence onset of frequent, brief, diurnal simple partial seizures which usually begin with visual hallucinations (e.g. phosphenes) and/or ictal blindness and may associate non visual seizures (such as deviation of the eyes, oculoclonic seizures), forced eyelid closure and blinking and sensory hallucinations. Post-ictal headache is common while impairment of consciousness is rare.", "synonyms": "Late-onset benign childhood occipital epilepsy, ", "icd_10": "G40.0"}, {"name": "Benigne okzipitale Epilepsie des Kindesalters Typ Panayiotopoulos", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Benign childhood occipital epilepsy, Panayiotopoulos type is a rare, genetic neurological disorder characterized by late infancy to early-adolescence onset of prolonged, nocturnal seizures which begin with autonomic features (e.g. vomiting, pallor, sweating) and associate tonic eye deviation, impairment of consciousness and may evolve to a hemi-clonic or generalized convulsion. Autonomic status epilepticus may be the only clinical event in some cases.", "synonyms": "Early-onset benign childhood occipital epilepsy, Panayiotopoulos syndrome, ", "icd_10": "G40.0"}, {"name": "Benigne Partialepilepsie der fr\u00fchen Kindheit mit komplex fokalen Anf\u00e4llen", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Benign partial epilepsy of infancy with complex partial seizures is a rare infantile epilepsy syndrome characterized by complex partial seizures presenting with motion arrest, decreased responsiveness, staring, automatisms and mild clonic movements, with or without apneas, normal interictal EEG and focal, mostly temporal discharges in ictal EEG. Most often, seizures occur in clusters and have a good response to treatment. Psychomotor development is normal.", "icd_10": "G40.2"}, {"name": "Benigne Partialepilepsie der fr\u00fchen Kindheit mit sekund\u00e4r generalisierten Anf\u00e4llen", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Benign partial epilepsy with secondarily generalized seizures in infancy is a rare infantile epilepsy syndrome characterized by seizures presenting with motion arrest and staring. They are followed by generalized tonic-clonic convulsions with normal interictal EEG and focal paroxysmal discharges, followed by generalization in ictal EEG. Seizures usually occur in clusters and are responsive to treatment. Psychomotor development is normal.", "icd_10": "G40.1"}, {"name": "Benigne Rolando-Epilepsie", "sub_name": "Rolando-Epilepsie", "german_description": "Die Benigne Epilepsie des Kindesalters mit Rolandischen (zentro-temporalen) Spikes (BECRS) ist das h\u00e4ufigste Epilepsiesyndrom im Kindesalter. Es ist charakterisiert durch Partial-Anf\u00e4lle, meist w\u00e4hrend des Schlafes oder kurz vor dem Aufwachen, mit Beteiligung von Mund, Gesicht und Sprachorganen. Auch eine Generalisierung ist m\u00f6glich. Das EEG ist typisch und bildet das haupts\u00e4chliche diagnostische Kriterium. Es ist biphasisch und setzt sich aus hochgespannten Spikes und scharfen Wellen mit nachfolgenden langsamen Wellen zusammen. Dieses Muster wurde 'zentrotemporal' genannt, oder auch 'Rolandische Spikes'. Regelm\u00e4\u00dfig sistieren die Anf\u00e4lle in der Adoleszenz. Antikonvulsiva werden selten ben\u00f6tigt. BECRS macht 13-23% aller F\u00e4lle von Epilepsie des Kindesalters aus. Die Inzidenz ist 21 / 100.000 Kinder unter 15. Das dominant vererbte Einzelgen mit niedriger Penetranz und Expressivit\u00e4t und mit Altersbegrenzung liegt in der Chromosomenregion 15q14. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Rolandic epilepsy (RE) is a focal childhood epilepsy characterized by seizures consisting of unilateral facial sensory-motor symptoms, with electroencephalogram (EEG) showing sharp biphasic waves over the rolandic region. It is an age-related epilepsy, with excellent outcome.", "synonyms": "BECRS, BECTS, BRE, Benign epilepsy of childhood with centrotemporal spikes, Benign familial epilepsy of childhood with rolandic spikes, Benign rolandic epilepsy, Centrotemporal epilepsy, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G40.0", "omim": "117100\u00a0 245570", "umls": "C0376532\u00a0 C2363129", "gard": "10287", "epidemiology": "RE is the most common childhood epilepsy and accounts for 8-25% of all childhood epilepsies. Its incidence has been estimated to be approximately 1/5,000 in children within 15 years.", "clinical_description": "Onset is between 3 and 12 years, in otherwise normal children (peak of onset is 5-8 years). Seizures typically occur during sleep or drowsy states; they are brief with unilateral sensorimotor (such as numbness, tingling, drooling) that involves pharynx, tongue, face, lips and sometimes hand. Speech arrest often occurs, while comprehension is preserved. Seizures may alternate from one side to the other and may become generalized. Longer attacks can be followed by post-ictal hemiplegia. Some children may have selective neuropsychological impairment affecting language, attention, visuomotor skills and behavior. They usually do not outlast the period of active seizures. Seizure remission occurs within 2-4 years from the onset. The majority of patients have <10 seizures and 10-20% have a single seizure.", "etiology": "Etiology of RE is still unknown. There is probably a genetic predisposition: an increased rate of RE, febrile seizures, and epilepsy-aphasia spectrum disorders were found among relatives. Pathogenesis seems to be related with the critical and vulnerable phase of brain maturation.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis of RE relies on the clinical features and on EEG findings that show slow, diphasic, high voltage, centrotemporal spikes, activated by sleep. Brain magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) is normal.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes other idiopathic focal childhood epilepsies (benign childhood occipital epilepsy, Panayiotopoulos type and Gastaut type. Other etiologies causing similar symptoms are excluded with brain MRI.", "genetic_counseling": "Autosomal dominant transmission has been reported in some cases.", "management_and_treatment": "The majority of patients, who have a single or few seizures, do not require treatment. Differently, patients with frequent seizures (10-20%) may need treatment for a short time. In such cases, carbamazepine or valproate are preferred even if, in rare cases, carbamazepine may have a paradoxical effect.", "prognosis": "Prognosis of RE is favorable since nearly 90% of patients remit before puberty. In rare cases (<1%), RE may evolve to atypical RE with linguistic, behavioral and neuropsychological deficits. An aggressive treatment with steroids, in these cases might change the evolution of the disease and a remission of neuropsychological deficits might be seen."}, {"name": "Benigner Tumor der Eileiter", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A group of rare uterine adnexal tumors comprising non-metastasizing neoplasms arising from the fallopian tube. This includes epithelial tumors (benign serous tumors such as serous adenofibroma and papilloma) and mature teratomas. Patients may be asymptomatic or present with tubal obstruction.", "icd_10": "D28.2", "umls": "C0346190", "meddra": "10053865"}, {"name": "Bennion-Patterson-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Palmoplantarkeratose - \u00d6sophageales Karzinom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic disease characterized by thickening of the skin on palms and soles restricted to areas of weight bearing and/or friction (focal, non-epidermolytic palmoplantar keratoderma) and oral and esophageal leukokeratosis, associated with a very high lifetime risk of developing squamous cell carcinoma of the esophagus. The skin lesions appear in childhood and can be complicated by fissuring and infection.", "synonyms": "Bennion-Patterson syndrome, Howell-Evans syndrome, Keratosis palmoplantaris-esophageal carcinoma syndrome, Palmoplantar hyperkeratosis-esophageal carcinoma syndrome, Tylosis-oesophageal carcinoma syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Adult", "omim": "148500", "umls": "C1835664", "gard": "3102"}, {"name": "Benson-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Atrophie, kortikale posteriore", "german_description": "Das Benson-Syndrom, die Posteriore Kortikale Atrophie (PCA), ist eine neurodegenerative Krankheit, die sich klinisch von der Alzheimer-Krankheit unterscheidet. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Es handelt sich um ein klinisches Syndrom, bei dem die zentrale Verarbeitung visueller Informationen durch neurodegenerative Prozesse unterbrochen ist. Die Patienten manifestieren eine progrediente und schwere visuelle Agnosie (sie sind nicht mehr in der Lage, bekannte Gegenst\u00e4nde und Personen zu identifizieren) und Apraxie (sie verlieren die F\u00e4higkeit, bekannte und fr\u00fcher gut beherrschte Bewegungen auszuf\u00fchren). Zu den Symptomen geh\u00f6ren Simultan-Agnosie, Bilickataxie, okulomotorische Apraxie, Prosopagnosie, Alexie und fehlende Orientierung in der Umgebung. Dazu haben die Patienten die F\u00e4higkeit zum Zusammenf\u00fcgen von Sachen und zum Anziehen verloren, es bestehen eine ideomotorische Apraxie, Agraphie und Akalkulie. Ged\u00e4chtnis, Sprache, Einsichtsf\u00e4higkeit und Urteilskraft sind bis in die sp\u00e4ten Krankheitsstadien hinein relativ gut erhalten. Die kraniale Magnetresonanz-Bildgebung (MRI) zeigt beidseitige Atrophie in den parieto- und temporo-okzipitalen Arealen, st\u00e4rker ausgepr\u00e4gt in der rechten Hirnh\u00e4lfte. Die kraniale Single-Photon-Emissions-Computer-Tomographie (SPECT) und Positronen-Emissions-Tomographie (PET) zeigen in den hinteren Hirnregionen eine Verminderung des Stoffwechsels an. Neuropathologisch \u00fcberwiegen meist die Zeichen der AD. Die Ablagerung neuritischer Plaques und neurofibrill\u00e4rer Tangles erfolgt spezifisch in den hinteren Hirnregionen und manchmal auch in der prim\u00e4ren Sehrinde. Die Behandlung der PCA basiert auf Sehhilfen und Antidepressiva. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare neurologic disease characterized by impairment of higher visual processing skills and other posterior cortical functions without any evidence of ocular abnormalities, relatively intact memory and language in the early stages, and atrophy of posterior brain regions.", "synonyms": "Benson syndrome, Biparietal Alzheimer disease, PCA, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G31.1", "epidemiology": "Posterior Cortical Atrophy (PCA) prevalence is unknown, largely due to the lack of awareness of the syndrome, delayed diagnosis and the variable terminology referring to it (now partially addressed through international consensus criteria).", "clinical_description": "Early PCA symptoms include visuoperceptual and visuospatial dysfunction, apraxia and alexia. Features of B\u00e1lint syndrome (simultanagnosia, optic ataxia and oculomotor apraxia) and Gerstmann syndrome (acalculia, agraphia, finger agnosia and left-right disorientation) are commonly described. The disorder typical onset is between 50-65 years of age. Earliest reported symptoms include difficulties with complex visual behaviors (e.g. driving, reading, and telling the time from an analogue watch). Reading problems include getting lost on the page (visual disorientation), overlapping or miscombined letters (visual crowding) or better reading of small than large print. Odd visual manifestations like abnormally prolonged color after-images and perception of movement of static stimuli are also reported. People with PCA tend to have relatively well preserved memory, insight, and judgment early in the disease course, though language (word finding problems, phonological errors) often emerge early. It should also be noted that PCA is a relatively heterogenous syndrome with some experiencing a very focal visual syndrome, whilst others show a more mixed cognitive picture with prominent visual but also evident episodic memory deficits from early in the disease course. Individuals with PCA often experience anxiety and depression from early on. Extrapyramidal signs, myoclonus, and grasp reflex have also been reported in PCA patients. An international consensus classification framework distinguishes two syndromic description levels. Classification 1 (PCA) defines the core clinical, cognitive, and neuroimaging features and exclusion criteria of the clinico-radiological syndrome. Classification level 2 (PCA-pure, PCA-plus) establishes whether, in addition to the core PCA syndrome, the core features of any other neurodegenerative syndromes are present.", "etiology": "A third level of the international classification framework provides disease-level descriptions of the underlying causes of the PCA syndrome, based on available pathophysiological biomarker evidence. This distinguishes between Alzheimer's disease as the most common underlying pathology (PCA-AD), and other causes including Lewy Body disease (PCA-LBD), corticobasal degeneration (PCA-CBD) and prion disease (PCA-prion).", "diagnostic_methods": "PCA is an under-recognized disorder resulting often in a significant delay in diagnosis. Diagnosis of this clinico-radiological syndrome is based on neurological assessment, specific visual and cognitive testing, and (optional supportive) brain imaging and routine blood tests. MRI characteristically shows bilateral atrophy in the occipital, parietal and posterior temporal lobes, often asymmetric being more pronounced in the right hemisphere. Single photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) or PET show hypometabolism of the posterior cerebral areas as well as in the frontal eye fields in more advanced stages. Conclusive diagnosis of the underlying disease is confirmed on brain autopsy, though CSF and amyloid imaging may help to refine the clinical diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes the most commonly associated neuropathology Alzheimer disease, but may also include Lewy body disease, cortico-basal degeneration, and prion diseases such as Creutzfeldt-Jakob disease.", "management_and_treatment": "There is currently no cure for any of the neurodegenerative conditions that most commonly underly the PCA syndrome. Medications like acetylcholinesterase inhibitors, used in the treatment of Alzheimer's disease, are available and might bring relief for some symptoms. Management of PCA is based on visual aids, rehabilitation programs that include psychoeducation, compensatory strategies, and cognitive exercises to cope with visual disabilities. Antidepressant treatments may benefit individuals with PCA who have relatively preserve insight into their decline and often deal with depression, irritability, frustration and a loss of self-confidence. People with PCA and their caregivers are likely to have different needs to people with more typical presentations of Alzheimer's disease, and may benefit from specialized support groups.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is poor as PCA is progressive disorder. Life expectancy after PCA diagnosis is thought to be similar (8-12 years) to individuals affected with Alzheimer's disease."}, {"name": "BENTA-Krankheit", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare primary immunodeficiency characterized by infantile onset of generalized lymphadenopathy, splenomegaly, and lymphocytosis, with excessive polyclonal expansion of B-cells. Patients present recurrent infections and impaired T-cell and antibody responses, while overt autoimmune manifestations are usually absent. Occurrence of B-cell malignancy later in life has been reported.", "synonyms": "B-cell expansion with NF-kB and T-cell anergy disease, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "D81.8", "omim": "616452"}, {"name": "Berant-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Kraniosynostose - Hydrozephalus - Chiari-Fehlbildung I - radioulnare Synostose", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare syndromic craniosynostosis characterized by sagittal craniosynostosis, hydrocephalus, Chiari I malformation and radioulnar synostosis. Other clinical findings include blepharophimosis, small low-set ears, hypoplastic philtrum, kidney malformation, and hypogenitalism.", "synonyms": "Berant syndrome, Capra-DeMarco syndrome, Familial scaphocephaly-radioulnar synostosis syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "umls": "C3267187"}, {"name": "Berardinelli-Seip-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Lipodystrophie, generalisierte kongenitale", "german_description": "Die Kongenitale Lipodystrophie Berardinelli-Seip (BSCL) ist gekennzeichnet durch Lipatrophie, Hypertriglyzerid\u00e4mie, Hepatomegalie und akromegaloide Zeichen. Sie geh\u00f6rt zusammen mit Leprechaunismus, Rabson-Mendenhall-Syndrom, Erworbener generalisierter Lipodystrophie und den Typen A und B der Insulinresistenz (s. diese Termini) zu den Syndromen mit extremer Insulinresistenz. Die Pr\u00e4valenz der BSCL in der Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung Europas wird auf 1:400.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die BSCL ist mit einer Insulinresistenz assoziiert, diese wird, beginnend im zweiten Lebensjahrzehnt, klinisch als Diabetes mellitus manifest. Zu den Komplikationen geh\u00f6ren hypertrophe Kardiomyopathie, Fettleber mit Leberfunktionsst\u00f6rung, Muskelhypertrophie, verschiedene hormonelle St\u00f6rungen (u.a. akzeleriertes Wachstum der Kleinkinder und vorzeitige Pubert\u00e4t) und Knochenzysten mit Spontanfrakturen. Zwei urs\u00e4chliche Gene wurden identifiziert: AGPAT2 (9q34), das f\u00fcr ein Schl\u00fcsselenzym der Triglyzerid-Biosynthese kodiert (1-Acyl-glycerol-3-phosphate-O-Acyltransferase-2) und BSCL2(11q13), das f\u00fcr das Protein Seipin kodiert. Die meisten Patienten mit BSCL2-Mutationen sind geistig retardiert. Die Vererbung ist autosomal-rezessiv. Zur Diagnose f\u00fchrt das klinische Bild zusammen mit den biochemischen Ver\u00e4nderungen. Durch Mutationsnachweis kann die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt werden. Differentialdiagnosen sind die Laminopathien und das Parry-Romberg-Syndrom (s. diese Termini). Die Behandlung besteht in fettarmer Di\u00e4t und in der Kontrolle der Insulinresistenz und des Diabetes. Die Prognose wird durch die begleitenden Komplikationen bestimmt ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autosomal recessive form of lipodystrophy characterized by the association of generalized lipoatrophy with acromegaloid features, muscle hypertrophy, insulin resistance, hypertriglyceridemia, and liver steatosis.", "synonyms": "BSCL, Berardinelli-Seip congenital lipodystrophy, Berardinelli-Seip syndrome, CGL, Lipoatrophic diabetes, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "E88.1", "omim": "269700\u00a0 606721\u00a0 608594\u00a0 612526\u00a0 613327", "umls": "C0011859\u00a0 C0221032", "meddra": "10024603", "clinical_description": "Presentation is typically in the first months of life with failure to thrive, hepatomegaly, generalized lipoatrophy, prominent musculature, umbilical prominence, acromegaloid features of extremities. Hypertriglyceridemia, insulin resistance, hyperglycemia and liver steatosis can be present in infancy, or diagnosed in late childhood, adolescence or adulthood. Accelerated growth in infancy, virilization of female patients and precocious puberty have been reported in some cases. High blood pressure, hypertrophic cardiomyopathy and bone cysts are frequent complications. Mild intellectual disability can be present, mainly in CGL related to BSCL2. Muscular dystrophy and cardiac arrhythmia are reported in CGL related to CAVIN1.", "etiology": "Two main causative genes have been identified: AGPAT2 (9q34), encoding a key enzyme in triglyceride biosynthesis (1-acyl-glycerol-3-phosphate-O-acyltransferase-2), BSCL2 (11q13), encoding the reticulum endoplasmic seipin protein. A few cases of CGL are due to biallelic pathogenic variants in CAV1 (7q31.2) and CAVIN1 (17q21.2), encoding respectively caveolin-1 and cavin-1, which are major components of specialized plasma membrane microdomains called caveolae. Generalized lipodystrophy is described in rare patients with biallelic pathogenic variants in the genes PPARG (3p25.2) or LMNA (1q22), for which heterozygous mutations are associated with familial partial lipodystrophy.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis of CGL is based on recognition of the clinical picture and associated metabolic disturbances including low serum leptin levels. The differential diagnosis of each monogenic form of the disease requires genetic testing.", "differential_diagnosis": "CGL may occur as a feature in other diseases. Differential diagnoses include acquired generalized lipodystrophy (which occurs mainly in the context of auto-immune diseases), monogenic syndromes of insulin resistance, autoinflammatory diseases, partial forms of lipodystrophy and premature ageing syndromes.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis can be discussed in families with a known disease causing mutation.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Couples in which each member carries at least one pathogenic variant should be informed that the risk of disease transmission to their offspring is 25%. A positive genetic test in an adult patient may lead to test the carriership of his/her partner.", "management_and_treatment": "Diet should be carefully managed, avoiding overfeeding in patients with CGL who are typically hyperphagic due to leptin deficiency. A low glycemic-index and low fat diet, supplemented with medium chain triglycerides in infants/children, is usually needed to manage insulin resistance, diabetes and hypertriglyceridemia. Exercise should be encouraged in the absence of cardiac complications. Insulin sensitizers (mainly metformin) and lipid-lowering drugs (statins, or fibrates in case of major hypertriglyceridemia) are helpful. Diabetes may require other non-specific treatments, along with insulin. The orphan drug metreleptin is authorized in Europe, as a therapeutic option in addition to diet, for the treatment of metabolic complications of generalized lipodystrophy associated with leptin deficiency, in adults and children above the age of 2 years. Regular metabolic, hepatic and cardiac monitoring is recommended. Ethinylestradiol should be avoided in women with CGL.", "prognosis": "Prognosis depends on the presence of associated complications. Complications of diabetes, liver disease, and hypertrophic cardiomyopathy are significant causes of morbidity and early mortality."}, {"name": "Berdon-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Megazystis-Mikrokolon-intestinale Hypoperistaltik-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Megazystis-Mikrokolon-Intestinale Hypoperistaltik-Syndrom (MMIHS) ist eine seltene kongenitale Erkrankung und gekennzeichnet durch massive abdominale Auftreibung. Diese ist verursacht durch eine stark erweiterte Harnblase ohne Verengung der Harnr\u00f6hre, ein Mikrokolon und verringerte oder fehlende Darmperistaltik.", "synonyms": "Berdon-Syndrom, MMIHS, Megazystis - Mikrokolon - intestinale Hypoperistaltik - Hydronephrose, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q43.8", "OMIM": "249210\u00a0 619351", "UMLS": "C1608393", "GARD": "3442", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des MMIHS ist nicht bekannt. Sie wurde bisher bei 230 Patienten beschrieben, von denen 71% weiblich waren.", "clinical_description": "Eine vergr\u00f6\u00dferte und nicht obstruierte Blase ist das erste Symptom des MMIHS und kann schon pr\u00e4natal erkannt werden. Sie f\u00fchrt zur Auftreibung des Abdomens, einem fr\u00fchen konstanten Befund. Das klinische Erscheinungsbild \u00e4hnelt in seiner h\u00e4ufigsten Form dem anderer neonataler Darmverschl\u00fcsse: Galliges Erbrechen und fehlendes Mekonium. Patienten weisen verschiedene Anomalien des Verdauungstraktes auf, darunter Mikrokolon, Fehlrotation des Darms, generalisierte Hypo- oder Aperistaltik des Darms und Kurzdarm. Neben der schweren Megazystis werden h\u00e4ufig Fehlbildungen des Harntraktes (dysplastische Nieren, Hydronephrose, Ureter-Erweiterung und Hydroureter) beschrieben. Ein Hodenhochstand oder bilaterale Stranggonaden, Fehlbildungen des Herzens, Nabelbr\u00fcche oder Omphalozele wurden in einigen F\u00e4llen beschrieben.", "etiology": "Die \u00c4tiologie des MMIHS ist nicht bekannt. Pathogenetische Hypothesen diskutieren genetische, neurogene, myogene und hormonelle Faktoren. Die Region 15q11.2 ist m\u00f6glicherweise mit MMIHS assoziiert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Postnatal wird das MMIHS vor allem durch das klinische Erscheinungsbild und unterst\u00fctzende radiologische und chirurgische Befunde diagnostiziert. Histologisch wurden eine vakuol\u00e4re Degeneration in der Mitte der glatten Muskulatur des Darms und der Blase beschrieben.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die St\u00f6rung sollte nicht mit einer milderen, autosomal-dominant verebten St\u00f6rung, der chronischen intestinalen Pseudoobstruktion (CIPO), bei der ebenfalls eine Megazystis auftritt, oder mit dem Prune-Belly-Syndrom (siehe jeweils dort) verwechselt werden.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Die pr\u00e4natale Diagnose des MMIHS st\u00fctzt sich in der Regel auf die f\u00f6tale Ultraschalluntersuchung, bei der eine vergr\u00f6\u00dferte Harnblase und eine Hydronephrose erkannt werden. In j\u00fcngsten Berichten wurde vorgeschlagen, dass pr\u00e4natale Magnetresonanzuntersuchungen (MRI) in Kombination mit einer Analyse der enzymatischen Ver\u00e4nderungen zur pr\u00e4natalen Diagnose des MMIHS beitragen k\u00f6nnen. Die vergr\u00f6\u00dferte Blase kann ab dem zweiten Trimenon und das Polyhydramnion ab dem dritten Trimenon beobachtet werden.", "genetic_counseling": "Es wird bisher nur vermutet, dass das MMIHS autosomal-rezessiv vererbt wird.", "management_and_treatment": "Es existiert keine kurative Behandlung des MMIHS. Verschiedene chirurgische Eingriffe, darunter die Gastrostomie, die Jejunostomie und die Vesikostomie, wurden beschrieben, waren aber bislang bei den meisten Patienten in der Regel nicht erfolgreich. Ebenfalls beschrieben wurden verschiedene Mehrfach-Transplantationen innerer Organe. Bei der Mehrzahl der Patienten ist eine totale parenterale Ern\u00e4hrung erforderlich.", "prognosis": "Das \u00dcberleben bei MMIHS scheint sich dank einer spezialisierteren Pflege, Innovationen bei der parenteralen Ern\u00e4hrung und durch die Einf\u00fchrung der Multi-Organtransplantation verbessert zu haben. Jedoch bleiben die Prognose und die Lebenserwartung dieser in der Regel t\u00f6dlichen Erkrankung schlecht. Der Tod wird vor allem durch Sepsis, Mangelern\u00e4hrung oder multiples Organversagen verursacht.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des MMIHS ist nicht bekannt. Sie wurde bisher bei 230 Patienten beschrieben, von denen 71% weiblich waren."}, {"name": "Berlin-breakage-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Nijmegen-Chromosomenbruch-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die H\u00e4ufigkeit des NBS ist nicht bekannt. In der Literatur wurden bisher etwa 150 Patienten beschrieben, weitaus mehr Patienten sind in Patienregistern dokumentiert. Die Krankheit kommt wahrscheinlich weltweit vor, wegen einer Gr\u00fcndermutation ist sie in mittel- und osteurop\u00e4ischen slawischen Populationen besonders h\u00e4ufig.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic chromosomal instability syndrome presenting at birth with microcephaly, dysmorphic facial features which become more noticeable with age, growth delay, recurring sinopulmonary infections and extremely high frequency of malignancies.", "synonyms": "AT V1, Ataxia-telangiectasia, variant 1, Berlin breakage syndrome, Immunodeficiency-microcephaly-chromosomal instability syndrome, Microcephaly-immunodeficiency-lymphoid malignancy syndrome, NBS, Seemanova syndrome type 2, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "251260", "umls": "C0398791\u00a0 C2930831", "mesh": "C531759\u00a0 D049932", "gard": "3904", "meddra": "10067857", "epidemiology": "Whilst global prevalence is unknown, the disease seems to occur worldwide, but has a much higher prevalence among Central and Eastern European Slavic populations due to a founder mutation. Average prevalence of NBS in patients with Eastern Slavic origin (Belarus, Ukraine, Russia, and Latvia) was recently estimated as 1/1,000,000 and, based on carrier frequency, the prevalence in the Western Slavic region (Poland, Slovakia and Czech Republic) is estimated at 1/330,000.", "clinical_description": "Clinical manifestations are not pathognomonic and may vary in severity. The main signs are microcephaly, present at birth and progressing with age, dysmorphic facial features (prominent midface emphasized by a sloping forehead and receding mandible), mild growth retardation and, in females, premature ovarian insufficiency are common. Various congenital anomalies have been reported, including central nervous system (hydrocephaly, schizencephaly, arachnoid cysts), respiratory tract (cleft lip/palate, choanal atresia), urogenital system (horseshoe kidney, ectopic/dystopic kidneys, hypospadias, cryptorchidism, ovary hypoplasia), mild skeletal anomalies (pre- and postaxial polydactyly, hypoplastic or duplicated thumb, clinodactyly of 5th fingers). Caf\u00e9 au lait and/or vitiligo spots are frequently observed and, in some patients, multiple pigmented nevi occur. Other principal manifestations include immune deficiency with recurrent respiratory tract infections, a strong predisposition to malignancies (predominantly lymphoid, but solid tumors also occur), and radiosensitivity. By age 20, over 40% of patients develop a malignant disease and are prone to develop secondary malignancies. Cognitive development is close to the average (normal/borderline) in infancy and preschool age, but intellectual skills gradually decline with age (from mild to moderate).", "etiology": "Nijmegen breakage syndrome (NBS) is caused by mutations in the NBN gene (8q21-q24), specifically within exons 6-10, which lead to partially functional truncated fragments of nibrin, the gene product involved in repairing DNA double strand breaks. Over 90% of patients are homozygous for the founder mutation of Slavic origin (c.657_661del5).", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on the clinical manifestations and confirmed by either single gene sequencing (typically for Slavic populations) or multigene next generation sequencing panels. Where genetic testing is unavailable, diagnosis can be supported by evidence of chromosomal instability (spontaneous and induced), increased cellular sensitivity to ionizing radiation in vitro, combined immunodeficiency, and complete absence of full-length nibrin. A family history (malignancies, microcephaly or hydrocephaly, early death of a sibling) can also support diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes Fanconi anemia, LIG4 syndrome, Cernunnos-XLF deficiency, NBS-like disorder, ataxia-telangiectasia-like disorder, Bloom syndrome.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Affected families may be offered prenatal diagnosis by molecular analysis if both disease-causing gene mutations are known.", "genetic_counseling": "The pattern of inheritance is autosomal recessive. Parents of an affected child are obligate carriers of NBN mutations and thus, for each pregnancy, there is a 25% risk that offspring inherit the disease. Carriers of a Slavic founder mutation should be offered monitoring for cancer, in particular breast in women and prostate in men.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no specific therapy. Early diagnosis is important to avoid severe recurrent infections, unnecessary radiation exposure for diagnostic purposes and adverse effects of radiotherapy of tumors. Patients require multidisciplinary management and long-term follow-up (malignancy, immunodeficiency, growth, hypergonadotropic hypogonadism in females). Monitoring of the immune system is extremely important throughout life; specific modes and types of immunization are necessary (acellular vaccines are recommended). In case of lymphoid malignancy, hematopoietic stem cell transplantation (HSCT) is recommended after the first complete remission. Females should be monitored for puberty progress from the age of 12 (endocrinologist/ gynecologist) and hormonal replacement therapy should be offered at appropriate age.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is poor, with malignancy as the major cause of death. Patients who developed lymphoma or leukemia die from disease progression, relapses and secondary malignancies. A beneficial effect of HSCT on the long-term survival has been confirmed in recent studies."}, {"name": "Berlin-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Leukomelanodermie-Infantilismus-Intelligenzminderung-Hypodontie-Hypotrichose-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Leukomelanoderma-infantilism-intellectual disability-hypodontia-hypotrichosis syndrome is a rare ectodermal dysplasia syndrome characterized by congenital generalized melanoleukoderma, hypodontia and hypotrichosis associated with infantilism, intellectual disability and growth delay. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1961.", "synonyms": "Berlin syndrome, Ectodermal dysplasia, Berlin type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q82.4", "omim": "246500", "umls": "C1855504", "gard": "2044"}, {"name": "Bernard-Soulier-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Bernard-Soulier-Syndrom (BSS) ist auch bekannt als H\u00e4morrhagische Thrombozytendystrophie. Das BSS ist eine vererbte Blutungsneigung mit einer St\u00f6rung in der Megakaryozyten-Thrombozyten-Linie. Das Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch Blutungsneigung, sog. Riesen-Thrombozyten und verminderte Thrombozytenzahl. Das Syndrom ist au\u00dferordentlich selten, bisher wurden nur etwa 100 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Symptome sind Purpura, Nasenbluten, verst\u00e4rkte und verl\u00e4ngerte Regelblutung (Menorrhagie), Zahnfleisch- und Magen-Darm-Blutungen. Das BSS wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache des Syndroms ist Mangel oder Dysfunktion des Glykoprotein GPIb-V-IX-Komplexes, einem nur in den Thrombozyten exprimierten, aus mehreren Untereinheiten bestehenden, in der prim\u00e4ren Blutgerinnung unentbehrlichen Rezeptor f\u00fcr den von-Willebrand-Faktor. Nach Bindung des von-Willebrand-Faktors sind die Adh\u00e4sion der Pl\u00e4ttchen an verletztes Endothel und die Aggregation unter hohen Scherkr\u00e4ften m\u00f6glich. Die 4 Untereinheiten des Komplexes werden von den GPIb-Alpha- (17pter-p12), GPIb-Beta- (22q11.2), GPV- (3q29) und GPIX- Genen (3q21) kodiert. Au\u00dfer im GPV-Gen wurden in allen diesen Genen urs\u00e4chliche Mutationen gefunden. Die Diagnose beruht auf dem Nachweis einer verl\u00e4ngerten Blutungszeit an der Haut, einer verminderten Zahl der gleichzeitig sehr gro\u00dfen Pl\u00e4ttchen (Makro-Thrombozytopenie), einer defekten Induktion der Pl\u00e4ttchenaggregation durch Ristocetin, sowie niedriger oder fehlender Expression des GPIb-V-IX-Komplexe. Der Prothrombinverbrauch ist stark vermindert. Mit angemessener Betreuung ist die Prognose in der Regel gut, Episoden mit schweren Blutungen sind aber m\u00f6glich bei der Menstruation, bei Verletzungen und bei Operationen. Die Behandlung von Blutungen und die Prophylaxe vor Operationen erfolgt in der Regel durch Transfusion von Thrombozytenkonzentraten. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Bernard Soulier syndrome (BSS) is an inherited platelet disorder characterized by mild to severe bleeding tendency , macrothrombocytopenia and absent ristocetin-induced platelet agglutination.", "synonyms": "Giant platelet syndrome, Hemorrhagiparous thrombocytic dystrophy, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "D69.1", "omim": "153670\u00a0 231200", "umls": "C0005129", "mesh": "D001606", "gard": "2470", "meddra": "10057473"}, {"name": "Bernsteins\u00e4ure-Semialdehyd-Dehydrogenase-Mangel", "sub_name": "Succinat-Semialdehyd-Dehydrogenase-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Succinat-Semialdehyd-Dehydrogenase (SSADH)-Mangel ist eine seltene neurometabolische St\u00f6rung des Gamma-Aminobutters\u00e4ure (GABA)-Stoffwechsels mit einer unspezifischen klinischen Pr\u00e4sentation (von leicht bis schwer). Die h\u00e4ufigsten Symptome sind kognitive Einschr\u00e4nkung mit ausgepr\u00e4gtem Defizit der expressiven Sprache, Hypotonie, Ataxie, Epilepsie und Verhaltensst\u00f6rung.", "synonyms": "4-Hydroxybutyrazidurie, Bernsteins\u00e4ure-Semialdehyd-Dehydrogenase-Mangel, Gamma-Hydroxybutyrazidurie, SSADH-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "E72.8", "OMIM": "271980", "UMLS": "C0268631", "GARD": "7695", "epidemiology": "In der Literatur sind bisher ungef\u00e4hr 450 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Das durchschnittliche Alter bei Krankheitsbeginn betr\u00e4gt 11 Monate. Im Gegensatz zu vielen anderen metabolischen Enzephalopathien zeigen Patienten keine Hypoglyk\u00e4mie, Hyperammon\u00e4mie oder intermittierende Lethargie. S\u00e4uglinge zeigen f\u00fcr gew\u00f6hnlich eine langsam progrediente oder statische Enzephalopathie, welche sich in Hypotonie, Hyporeflexie, Ataxie und verz\u00f6gertem Erreichens von Meilensteinen der motorischen und Sprachentwicklung in den ersten beiden Lebensjahren \u00e4u\u00dfert. Krampfanf\u00e4lle treten bei mehr als der H\u00e4lfte aller Betroffenen auf; \u00fcblicherweise als tonisch-klonische Anf\u00e4lle oder atypische Absencen. Geistige Behinderung, psychiatrische Manifestationen (z. B. Aufmerksamkeitsdefizit-Hyperaktivit\u00e4tssyndrom und Aggressivit\u00e4t im Kindesalter, Zwangs- und Angstst\u00f6rungen im Jugend- und Erwachsenenalter) und Schlafst\u00f6rungen werden h\u00e4ufig beobachtet. Hyperkinetisches Verhalten, selbstverletzendes Verhalten und Halluzinationen werden bei der H\u00e4lfte aller Patienten beschrieben. Eine pl\u00f6tzlich auftretende und fr\u00fch beginnende Variante der Erkrankung findet sich bei bis zu 10 % der Patienten und ist durch extrapyramidale Zeichen und einem mitunter progredienten Verlauf gekennzeichnet.", "etiology": "Ursache f\u00fcr SSADH-Mangel sind Mutationen im ALDH5A1-Gen (6p22), welches f\u00fcr die mitochondriale Succinat-Semialdehyd-Dehydrogenase kodiert, ein am Aminos\u00e4ureabbau beteiligtes Protein. Eine mangelhafte SSADH-Enzymaktivit\u00e4t hemmt den Abbau von GABA, des wichtigsten inhibitorischen Transmitters im Gehirn. Dies f\u00fchrt zu erh\u00f6hten Konzentrationen eines vermutlich toxischen Metabolitens, Gamma-Hydroxybutyrat (GHB), welches sich in K\u00f6rperfl\u00fcssigkeiten einschlie\u00dflich Blut, Urin und Liquor nachweisen l\u00e4sst.", "diagnostic_methods": "Der wichtigste laborchemische diagnostische Hinweis auf einen SSADH-Mangel ist der Nachweis erh\u00f6hter GHB bei der Bestimmung organischer S\u00e4uren im Urin. Im Plasma ist GHB erh\u00f6ht, Lymphozyten zeigen eine verringerte SSADH-Enzymaktivit\u00e4t. Im Liquor sind GHB und GABA erh\u00f6ht. Die kraniale MR-Bildgebung zeigt in der T2-Wichtung bilaterale oft symmetrische Signalverst\u00e4rkungen im Globus Pallidus, den zerebell\u00e4ren Nuclei dentati und den subthalamischen Nuclei. Das Elektroenzephalogramm zeigt vor allem eine Grundaktivit\u00e4tsverlangsamung und Spike-Entladungen. Der molekulargenetische Nachweis einer Mutation im ALDH5A1-Gen best\u00e4tigt die Diagnose.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die wichtigsten Differentialdiagnosen beinhalten Gamma-Aminobutters\u00e4ure-Transaminase-Mangel und Homocarnosinose (siehe dort).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine Pr\u00e4natal-Diagnostik in Familien mit bekannter krankheitsverursachender Mutation ist m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "SSADH-Mangel wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Eine genetische Beratung wird empfohlen.", "management_and_treatment": "Da es bislang noch keine effektive kausale Behandlung gibt, zielt die Langzeitbehandlung auf die pharmakologische Kontrolle der Begleiterkrankungen (typischerweise Krampfanf\u00e4lle und neuropsychiatrische St\u00f6rungen). Carbamazepin und Lamotrigin sind effektive Mittel zur Kontrolle der Krampfanf\u00e4lle. Angstst\u00f6rungen, Aggressivit\u00e4t, Unaufmerksamkeit und Halluzinationen k\u00f6nnen mit Benzodiazepinen, Methylphenidat, Thioridazin, Risperidon oder Fluoxetin behandelt werden. Physio- und Ergotherapie, sensorische Integrationstherapie und/oder Logop\u00e4die k\u00f6nnen den Verlauf g\u00fcnstig beeinflussen.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist variabel. Die meisten Patienten erreichen das Erwachsenenalter. Einschr\u00e4nkend k\u00f6nnen neuropsychiatrische Symptome und geringe Lebensqualit\u00e4t sein. Fr\u00fche Mortalit\u00e4t, einschlie\u00dflich pl\u00f6tzlichem unerwarteten Tod bei Epilepsiepatienten (sudden unexpected death in epilepsy patients, SUDEP), sind beschrieben.", "summary": "In der Literatur sind bisher ungef\u00e4hr 450 F\u00e4lle beschrieben."}, {"name": "Berti-Lymphom", "sub_name": "T-Zell-Lymphom, prim\u00e4r kutanes, aggressives epidermotropes, CD8+", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das prim\u00e4re kutane aggressive epidermotrope CD8+ T-Zell-Lymphom ist eine seltene Form des prim\u00e4ren kutanen T-Zell-Lymphoms, das durch schnell fortschreitende, lokalisierte oder disseminierte Kn\u00f6tchen, Tumore oder ekzemat\u00f6se Hautl\u00e4sionen gekennzeichnet ist. Es hat einen besonders aggressiven klinischen Verlauf mit einer hohen Tendenz zur Ausbreitung in fortgeschrittenen Stadien auf extrakutane Lokalisationen (zentrales Nervensystem, Lunge, Hoden). Lymphknoten werden oft verschont.", "synonyms": "Berti-Lymphom, Prim\u00e4res kutanes epidermotrophes zytotoxisches CD8+ T-Zell-Lymphom, ", "ICD-10": "C84.5"}, {"name": "Berylliose", "sub_name": "Beryllium-Krankheit, chronische", "german_description": "Die chronische Berylliose (CBD) ist eine Berufserkrankung mit \u00dcberempfindlichkeit gegen Beryllium durch Exposition am Arbeitsplatz. In den betroffenen Organen treten nicht-verk\u00e4sende und nicht-nekrotisierende Granulome auf, am h\u00e4ufigsten in Lunge und Haut. Haupts\u00e4chliche Symptome sind trockener Husten, Schw\u00e4che, Gewichtsverlust, Thoraxschmerzen und zunehmende Atemnot. Beryllium wird prim\u00e4r durch Inhalation von berylliumhaltigem Staub oder Rauch oder durch Kontakt der Haut mit Beryllium oder seinen Verbindungen in den K\u00f6rper aufgenommen. Die akute Berylliose ist extrem selten geworden. Die CBD ist eine genaue Ph\u00e4nokopie der Sarkoidose. Die Differentialdiagnose beruht daher auf der Erhebung der Berufs-Anamnese mit Hinweisen auf eine Beryllium-Exposition und auf Tests zum Nachweis einer Sensibilisierung gegen Beryllium (Beryllium-Lymphozyten-Transformationstest). Erbliche Faktoren scheinen eine wesentliche Bedeutung f\u00fcr die Enstehung der CBD zu haben. Die Diagnose folgt aus dem Zusammentreffen von Beryllium-Exposition und -Sensibilisierung mit den Symptomen der Krankheit, einschlie\u00dflich eingeschr\u00e4nkter Lungenfunktion und entsprechenden radiologischen Zeichen. Bei progredientem Verlauf werden Kortikosteroide gegeben. Es wird empfohlen, bei allen Patienten mit Verdacht auf das Vorliegen einer CBD die Symptome und die Lungenfunktion engmaschig zu \u00fcberwachen. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A pneumoconiosis, characterized by granulomatous inflammation, that occurs in individuals who develop beryllium sensitization (BeS), a cell-mediated immune response to environmental and occupational beryllium exposure. BeS precedes the lung disease that may present with chronic dry cough, fatigue, weight loss, chest pain, and increasing dyspnea.", "synonyms": "Berylliosis, Chronic berylliosis, Chronic beryllium lung disease, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "J63.2", "umls": "C0005138\u00a0 C0221052", "mesh": "D001607", "gard": "867", "meddra": "10004485", "epidemiology": "The number of workers exposed to beryllium has been estimated at 1 million in the US, although no accurate figure exists for the US or globally. The prevalence of BeS in those exposed ranges from 1 - 20%. Chronic beryllium disease (CBD) among those with BeS ranges from 15-100%.", "clinical_description": "Patients with CBD can range from those who are asymptomatic to those with severe lung dysfunction. Manifestations occur a few months to many years after exposure to beryllium and include chronic dry cough, dyspnea on exertion, chest pain, fatigue, fever, night sweats and weight loss. Additional extrapulmonary manifestations of dermatitis and skin granulomas have been reported. Progressive pulmonary fibrosis can eventually lead to cor pulmonale and respiratory failure. An increased risk of lung cancer among workers exposed to high levels of beryllium has also been observed.", "etiology": "CBD is caused by occupational or environmental exposure to beryllium and beryllium-containing alloys (usually by inhalation of dust or fumes but also via contact with skin). Over time, in a subset of individuals, a cell-mediated immune response to beryllium may occur, causing the development of sensitized T cells that accumulate within the lungs and eventually form granulomas which can lead to fibrosis. A genetic variant in the HLA-DPB1 gene (6p21.3) with the presence of a glutamic acid at amino acid position 69 has been associated with the development of BeS and CBD.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on a history of exposure to beryllium, characteristic clinical findings and laboratory testing. BeS can be detected with the beryllium lymphocyte proliferation test (BeLPT). Chest x-ray, CT scan of the lungs, exercise tolerance testing and pulmonary function tests can also aid in the diagnosis. Sampling of the lung with for example bronchoscopy with biopsy and bronchoalveolar lavage is usually required to demonstrate granulomatous inflammation in the lungs and or sensitization to beryllium", "differential_diagnosis": "The main differential diagnoses are sarcoidosis (most common), hypersensitivity pneumonitis and tuberculosis as well as other occupational lung diseases (such as silicosis).", "management_and_treatment": "There is no cure for CBD. Treatment involves recommendations for cessation of beryllium exposure as medically prudent, and the use of immunosuppressive therapies, such as corticosteroids (prednisone). Early symptomatic disease may be treated with inhaled corticosteroids along with a short acting bronchodilator. Methotrexate and other immunosuppressive therapies can reduce steroid side effects. The efficacy of corticosteroids may be limited and relapses can occur after cessation of therapy or when dose is lowered. Those with advanced disease and major breathing difficulties may require oxygen supplementation. In severe cases, a lung transplant may be suggested. Patients should refrain from smoking. CBD may be prevented by providing exposed workers with respiratory protective devices and protective clothing and by minimizing exposure through use of workplace administration and engineering controls. The BeLPT is used to identify patients early on and to define workplace areas for modification in order to ultimately reduce additional BeS and CBD cases.", "prognosis": "Prognosis varies, with some patients remaining clinically stable for many years and some experiencing a gradual worsening of symptoms over time. A debilitating course resulting in respiratory failure is also possible but regular monitoring and treatment can slow down the disease process."}, {"name": "Berylliose, chronische", "sub_name": "Beryllium-Krankheit, chronische", "german_description": "Die chronische Berylliose (CBD) ist eine Berufserkrankung mit \u00dcberempfindlichkeit gegen Beryllium durch Exposition am Arbeitsplatz. In den betroffenen Organen treten nicht-verk\u00e4sende und nicht-nekrotisierende Granulome auf, am h\u00e4ufigsten in Lunge und Haut. Haupts\u00e4chliche Symptome sind trockener Husten, Schw\u00e4che, Gewichtsverlust, Thoraxschmerzen und zunehmende Atemnot. Beryllium wird prim\u00e4r durch Inhalation von berylliumhaltigem Staub oder Rauch oder durch Kontakt der Haut mit Beryllium oder seinen Verbindungen in den K\u00f6rper aufgenommen. Die akute Berylliose ist extrem selten geworden. Die CBD ist eine genaue Ph\u00e4nokopie der Sarkoidose. Die Differentialdiagnose beruht daher auf der Erhebung der Berufs-Anamnese mit Hinweisen auf eine Beryllium-Exposition und auf Tests zum Nachweis einer Sensibilisierung gegen Beryllium (Beryllium-Lymphozyten-Transformationstest). Erbliche Faktoren scheinen eine wesentliche Bedeutung f\u00fcr die Enstehung der CBD zu haben. Die Diagnose folgt aus dem Zusammentreffen von Beryllium-Exposition und -Sensibilisierung mit den Symptomen der Krankheit, einschlie\u00dflich eingeschr\u00e4nkter Lungenfunktion und entsprechenden radiologischen Zeichen. Bei progredientem Verlauf werden Kortikosteroide gegeben. Es wird empfohlen, bei allen Patienten mit Verdacht auf das Vorliegen einer CBD die Symptome und die Lungenfunktion engmaschig zu \u00fcberwachen. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A pneumoconiosis, characterized by granulomatous inflammation, that occurs in individuals who develop beryllium sensitization (BeS), a cell-mediated immune response to environmental and occupational beryllium exposure. BeS precedes the lung disease that may present with chronic dry cough, fatigue, weight loss, chest pain, and increasing dyspnea.", "synonyms": "Berylliosis, Chronic berylliosis, Chronic beryllium lung disease, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "J63.2", "umls": "C0005138\u00a0 C0221052", "mesh": "D001607", "gard": "867", "meddra": "10004485", "epidemiology": "The number of workers exposed to beryllium has been estimated at 1 million in the US, although no accurate figure exists for the US or globally. The prevalence of BeS in those exposed ranges from 1 - 20%. Chronic beryllium disease (CBD) among those with BeS ranges from 15-100%.", "clinical_description": "Patients with CBD can range from those who are asymptomatic to those with severe lung dysfunction. Manifestations occur a few months to many years after exposure to beryllium and include chronic dry cough, dyspnea on exertion, chest pain, fatigue, fever, night sweats and weight loss. Additional extrapulmonary manifestations of dermatitis and skin granulomas have been reported. Progressive pulmonary fibrosis can eventually lead to cor pulmonale and respiratory failure. An increased risk of lung cancer among workers exposed to high levels of beryllium has also been observed.", "etiology": "CBD is caused by occupational or environmental exposure to beryllium and beryllium-containing alloys (usually by inhalation of dust or fumes but also via contact with skin). Over time, in a subset of individuals, a cell-mediated immune response to beryllium may occur, causing the development of sensitized T cells that accumulate within the lungs and eventually form granulomas which can lead to fibrosis. A genetic variant in the HLA-DPB1 gene (6p21.3) with the presence of a glutamic acid at amino acid position 69 has been associated with the development of BeS and CBD.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on a history of exposure to beryllium, characteristic clinical findings and laboratory testing. BeS can be detected with the beryllium lymphocyte proliferation test (BeLPT). Chest x-ray, CT scan of the lungs, exercise tolerance testing and pulmonary function tests can also aid in the diagnosis. Sampling of the lung with for example bronchoscopy with biopsy and bronchoalveolar lavage is usually required to demonstrate granulomatous inflammation in the lungs and or sensitization to beryllium", "differential_diagnosis": "The main differential diagnoses are sarcoidosis (most common), hypersensitivity pneumonitis and tuberculosis as well as other occupational lung diseases (such as silicosis).", "management_and_treatment": "There is no cure for CBD. Treatment involves recommendations for cessation of beryllium exposure as medically prudent, and the use of immunosuppressive therapies, such as corticosteroids (prednisone). Early symptomatic disease may be treated with inhaled corticosteroids along with a short acting bronchodilator. Methotrexate and other immunosuppressive therapies can reduce steroid side effects. The efficacy of corticosteroids may be limited and relapses can occur after cessation of therapy or when dose is lowered. Those with advanced disease and major breathing difficulties may require oxygen supplementation. In severe cases, a lung transplant may be suggested. Patients should refrain from smoking. CBD may be prevented by providing exposed workers with respiratory protective devices and protective clothing and by minimizing exposure through use of workplace administration and engineering controls. The BeLPT is used to identify patients early on and to define workplace areas for modification in order to ultimately reduce additional BeS and CBD cases.", "prognosis": "Prognosis varies, with some patients remaining clinically stable for many years and some experiencing a gradual worsening of symptoms over time. A debilitating course resulting in respiratory failure is also possible but regular monitoring and treatment can slow down the disease process."}, {"name": "Beryllium-Krankheit, chronische", "german_description": "Die chronische Berylliose (CBD) ist eine Berufserkrankung mit \u00dcberempfindlichkeit gegen Beryllium durch Exposition am Arbeitsplatz. In den betroffenen Organen treten nicht-verk\u00e4sende und nicht-nekrotisierende Granulome auf, am h\u00e4ufigsten in Lunge und Haut. Haupts\u00e4chliche Symptome sind trockener Husten, Schw\u00e4che, Gewichtsverlust, Thoraxschmerzen und zunehmende Atemnot. Beryllium wird prim\u00e4r durch Inhalation von berylliumhaltigem Staub oder Rauch oder durch Kontakt der Haut mit Beryllium oder seinen Verbindungen in den K\u00f6rper aufgenommen. Die akute Berylliose ist extrem selten geworden. Die CBD ist eine genaue Ph\u00e4nokopie der Sarkoidose. Die Differentialdiagnose beruht daher auf der Erhebung der Berufs-Anamnese mit Hinweisen auf eine Beryllium-Exposition und auf Tests zum Nachweis einer Sensibilisierung gegen Beryllium (Beryllium-Lymphozyten-Transformationstest). Erbliche Faktoren scheinen eine wesentliche Bedeutung f\u00fcr die Enstehung der CBD zu haben. Die Diagnose folgt aus dem Zusammentreffen von Beryllium-Exposition und -Sensibilisierung mit den Symptomen der Krankheit, einschlie\u00dflich eingeschr\u00e4nkter Lungenfunktion und entsprechenden radiologischen Zeichen. Bei progredientem Verlauf werden Kortikosteroide gegeben. Es wird empfohlen, bei allen Patienten mit Verdacht auf das Vorliegen einer CBD die Symptome und die Lungenfunktion engmaschig zu \u00fcberwachen. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A pneumoconiosis, characterized by granulomatous inflammation, that occurs in individuals who develop beryllium sensitization (BeS), a cell-mediated immune response to environmental and occupational beryllium exposure. BeS precedes the lung disease that may present with chronic dry cough, fatigue, weight loss, chest pain, and increasing dyspnea.", "synonyms": "Berylliosis, Chronic berylliosis, Chronic beryllium lung disease, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "J63.2", "umls": "C0005138\u00a0 C0221052", "mesh": "D001607", "gard": "867", "meddra": "10004485", "epidemiology": "The number of workers exposed to beryllium has been estimated at 1 million in the US, although no accurate figure exists for the US or globally. The prevalence of BeS in those exposed ranges from 1 - 20%. Chronic beryllium disease (CBD) among those with BeS ranges from 15-100%.", "clinical_description": "Patients with CBD can range from those who are asymptomatic to those with severe lung dysfunction. Manifestations occur a few months to many years after exposure to beryllium and include chronic dry cough, dyspnea on exertion, chest pain, fatigue, fever, night sweats and weight loss. Additional extrapulmonary manifestations of dermatitis and skin granulomas have been reported. Progressive pulmonary fibrosis can eventually lead to cor pulmonale and respiratory failure. An increased risk of lung cancer among workers exposed to high levels of beryllium has also been observed.", "etiology": "CBD is caused by occupational or environmental exposure to beryllium and beryllium-containing alloys (usually by inhalation of dust or fumes but also via contact with skin). Over time, in a subset of individuals, a cell-mediated immune response to beryllium may occur, causing the development of sensitized T cells that accumulate within the lungs and eventually form granulomas which can lead to fibrosis. A genetic variant in the HLA-DPB1 gene (6p21.3) with the presence of a glutamic acid at amino acid position 69 has been associated with the development of BeS and CBD.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on a history of exposure to beryllium, characteristic clinical findings and laboratory testing. BeS can be detected with the beryllium lymphocyte proliferation test (BeLPT). Chest x-ray, CT scan of the lungs, exercise tolerance testing and pulmonary function tests can also aid in the diagnosis. Sampling of the lung with for example bronchoscopy with biopsy and bronchoalveolar lavage is usually required to demonstrate granulomatous inflammation in the lungs and or sensitization to beryllium", "differential_diagnosis": "The main differential diagnoses are sarcoidosis (most common), hypersensitivity pneumonitis and tuberculosis as well as other occupational lung diseases (such as silicosis).", "management_and_treatment": "There is no cure for CBD. Treatment involves recommendations for cessation of beryllium exposure as medically prudent, and the use of immunosuppressive therapies, such as corticosteroids (prednisone). Early symptomatic disease may be treated with inhaled corticosteroids along with a short acting bronchodilator. Methotrexate and other immunosuppressive therapies can reduce steroid side effects. The efficacy of corticosteroids may be limited and relapses can occur after cessation of therapy or when dose is lowered. Those with advanced disease and major breathing difficulties may require oxygen supplementation. In severe cases, a lung transplant may be suggested. Patients should refrain from smoking. CBD may be prevented by providing exposed workers with respiratory protective devices and protective clothing and by minimizing exposure through use of workplace administration and engineering controls. The BeLPT is used to identify patients early on and to define workplace areas for modification in order to ultimately reduce additional BeS and CBD cases.", "prognosis": "Prognosis varies, with some patients remaining clinically stable for many years and some experiencing a gradual worsening of symptoms over time. A debilitating course resulting in respiratory failure is also possible but regular monitoring and treatment can slow down the disease process."}, {"name": "Beschleunigte Knochenalterung - Gesichtsanomalien - Gedeihst\u00f6rungen", "sub_name": "Marshall-Smith-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Marshall-Smith-Syndrom ist eine genetische Krankheit mit Gro\u00dfwuchs und einem bei Geburt akzelerierten Knochenalter. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, bisher wurden in der Literatur etwa 30 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Die Patienten haben eine Reihe von Dysmorphien: prominente Stirn, vorstehende Augen, blaue Skleren, nach vorn gerichtete Nasenl\u00f6cher und Mikrogenie. Die klinischen Symptome sind schwerwiegend: F\u00fctterprobleme, Gedeihst\u00f6rungen und eine starke Neigung zu Atemwegsinfekten. R\u00f6ntgenologische Befunde sind ein akzeleriertes Knochenalter und kurze, konische Phalangen. Die Ursache der Krankheit ist noch nicht bekannt, aber ihr sporadisches Auftreten l\u00e4\u00dft an die Wirkung dominanter Neumutationen denken. Die Diagnose basiert auf sorgf\u00e4ltiger klinischer und radiologischer Untersuchung. Differentialdiagnostisch m\u00fcssen Weaver- und Sotos-Syndrom ausgeschlossen werden, die \u00e4hnliche Skelettbefunde aufweisen, aber keine rezidivierende Atemwegsdefekte und nicht das charakteristische Gesicht Merkmale haben. Es gibt f\u00fcr das Syndrom keine spezifische Therapie. Mangelern\u00e4hrung und Atemwegsinfekte m\u00fcssen symptomatisch behandelt werden. Die Prognose ist schlecht, der Tod tritt meist schon in den ersten Lebensjahren ein. Einige wenige F\u00e4lle ohne Atemwegskomplikationen \u00fcberlebten l\u00e4nger und waren geistig retardiert. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic multiple congenital anomalies syndrome characterized by abnormal bone maturation with skeletal anomalies, airway obstructions, failure to thrive, developmental delay, moderate to severe intellectual disability and characteristic facial features with macrocephaly, prominent forehead, shallow orbits, proptosis and blue sclerae.", "synonyms": "Accelerated skeletal maturation-facial dysmorphism-failure to thrive syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.3", "omim": "602535", "umls": "C0265211", "mesh": "C536026", "gard": "6985", "epidemiology": "Less than 60 cases have been reported in the literature to date.", "clinical_description": "Marshall-Smith syndrome was originally considered as an overgrowth condition based on advanced bone maturation. It is characterized by a dysostosis with skeletal anomalies including progressive kyphoscoliosis, postnatal failure to thrive in weight, short stature, and osteopenia with fractures. Wide bullet-shaped phalanges as well as large hands and feet are observed. Neonates and infants usually manifest with feeding difficulties and upper airway obstruction with respiratory distress due to glossoptosis, laryngomalacia and/or choanal stenosis. The majority of patients die in the neonatal period or early infancy from respiratory compromise. Respiratory infections are frequent. Patients surviving infancy also have developmental delay, moderate to severe intellectual disability and behavioral abnormalities such as anxiety and stereotyped movements. Brain MRI may show corpus callosum anomalies, macrogyria, pachygyria, delayed myelination, ventricular dilatation, hydrocephalus and periventricular leukomalacia. Characteristic facial features include high forehead, proptosis, blue sclerae, midface hypoplasia, short nose, depressed nasal bridge, anteverted nostrils and retrognathia. Vision impairment may occur as a result of optic nerve hypoplasia. Hypertrichosis, umbilical hernia, connective tissue, endocrine and cardiovascular anomalies may be associated. In a single case a concomitant Wilms tumor had developed, otherwise an increased risk of neoplasm development is not known.", "etiology": "Marshall-Smith syndrome is cause by heterozygous de novo variants in the NFIX (Nuclear Factor I X; 19p13.13) gene. NFIX variants escape nonsense-mediated mRNA decay leading to abnormal proteins with an abnormal C-terminus (dominant-negative mechanism). The NFIX gene acts as the transcription factor in the nuclear factor one family, and is implicated in replication, signal transduction, and transcriptional processes, with, currently not fully elucidated mechanisms.", "diagnostic_methods": "The syndrome is clinically recognizable. The genetic diagnosis is established by identification of a heterozygous pathogenic variant in the NFIX gene. Most of the variants have been identified in exons 6-10 of the gene.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnoses for Marshall-Smith syndrome are Sotos syndrome, Malan overgrowth syndrome, Weaver syndrome, and bone fragility disorders. Radiological findings distinguish them based on skeletal findings.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible if the disease-causing variant has been identified in the family. The recent implementation of prenatal whole exome sequencing could lead to molecular diagnostics during pregnancy.", "genetic_counseling": "Marshall-Smith syndrome is inherited in an autosomal dominant manner. All known pathogenic variants have occurred de novo, and in these cases the risk to sibs of the proband is very low due to a possible germinal mosaicism (<1%).", "management_and_treatment": "Management of Marshall-Smith syndrome required a multidisciplinary approach with appropriate specialists. Patients need symptomatic treatment for airway obstruction, respiratory infections, and feeding difficulties, as well as specific management for bone fragility.", "prognosis": "The prognosis is poor and most patients will die in the neonatal period or early infancy due to respiratory compromise. A few cases of prolonged survival have been reported in patients without respiratory complications."}, {"name": "Besnier-Boeck-Schaumann-Krankheit", "sub_name": "Sarkoidose", "german_description": "Die Sarkoidose ist eine multisystemische Krankheit mit unbekannter Ursache. Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch Bildung von Immun-Granulomen in den betroffenen Organen. Die Sarkoidose ist weltweit verbreitet. Die Inzidenz h\u00e4ngt vom, Alter, Geschlecht, ethnischem Hintergrund und geographischer Herkunft ab und wurde bei M\u00e4nnern zu etwa 1:6.300 und bei Frauen zu 1:5.300 bestimmt. Bevorzugt betroffen sind Lunge und lymphatisches System, aber auch praktisch jedes andere Organ kann in den Krankheitsprozess einbezogen sein. Schwere Verl\u00e4ufe resultieren aus der Beteiligung des Herzens, des Nervensystems, der Augen, der Nieren und des Kehlkopfes. In den meisten F\u00e4llen wird die Sarkoidose durch anhaltenden tockenen Husten, Augen- und Hautsymptome, Schwellung der peripheren Lymphknoten, Mattigkeit, Gewichtsverlust, Fieber oder Nachtschwei\u00df und Erythema nodosum manifest. Ein abnormer Stoffwechsel des Vitamins D3 in den Granulomen und Hyperkalz\u00e4mie sind m\u00f6gliche Befunde. Die R\u00f6ntgen-Thorax-Befunde sind in 90% auff\u00e4llig und definieren mit Lymphadenopathie und/oder Lungeninfiltraten (ohne oder mit Fibrose) die Sarkoidose-Stadien I bis IV. Die \u00c4tiologie ist noch unbekannt. In der am meisten favorisierte Hypothese wird angenommen, dass verschiedene unbekannte und schwer abbaubare Antigene aus Infektionen oder Umwelt bei genetisch pr\u00e4disponierten Personen eine \u00fcberstarke Immunreaktion ausl\u00f6sen. Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren charakteristische klinische und radiologische Befunde, der Nachweis nicht-verk\u00e4sender Granulome (in Biopsaten unter tracheo-bronchialer Endoskopie oder an anderen Stellen) und der Ausschluss aller anderen granulomat\u00f6sen Erkrankungen. Verlauf und Schweregrad der Sarkoidose sind sehr unterschiedlich. In den gutartigsten F\u00e4llen mit spontaner Remission innerhalb von 24-36 Monaten ist eine Behandlung nicht erforderlich, aber bis zur Heilung m\u00fcssen regelm\u00e4\u00dfige Kontrollen stattfinden. In schwereren F\u00e4llen erfolgt eine medikament\u00f6se Behandlung, entweder sofort oder im Verlauf der Kontrolluntersuchungen, wenn die Entwicklung der Krankheit es erfordert. Die Behandlung st\u00fctzt sich auf systemische Anwendung von Kortikosteroiden. Diese Behandlung muss mindestens 12 Monate lang erfolgen. Einige Patienten machen wiederholte Rezidive durch und ben\u00f6tigen \u00fcber lange Zeit (mehrere Jahre) niedrig dosiert Kortikosteroide. Bei mangelhaftem Ansprechen auf Kortikosteroide, bei Unvertr\u00e4glichkeit oder zur Einsparung hoher Steroiddosen, wenn diese \u00fcber lange Zeit erforderlich sind, haben sich Immunsuppressiva und Aminochinoline als n\u00fctzlich erwiesen. In streng ausgew\u00e4hlten F\u00e4llen, die auf Standardtherapie nicht ansprechen, k\u00f6nnen evtl. spezifische Anti-TNF-alpha-Agentien wertvolle Besserung bringen. Einige Patienten profitieren von topischen Kortikosteroiden. Die Mortalit\u00e4t der Sarkoidose wird auf 0,5-5% gesch\u00e4tzt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare multisystemic, autoinflammatory disorder of unknown etiology characterized by the formation of immune, non-caseating granulomas in any organ(s), leading to variable clinical symptoms and severity. Clinical presentation is typically with persistent dry cough, eye or skin manifestations, peripheral lymph nodes, fatigue, weight loss, fever or night sweats, and L\u00f6fgren syndrome.", "synonyms": "Besnier-Boeck-Schaumann disease, Boeck sarcoid, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Multigenic/multifactorial\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent, Elderly, Adult", "icd_10": "D86.0\u00a0 D86.1\u00a0 D86.2\u00a0 D86.3\u00a0 D86.8\u00a0 D86.9", "omim": "181000\u00a0 612387\u00a0 612388", "umls": "C0036202", "mesh": "D012507", "meddra": "10039486", "epidemiology": "Sarcoidosis is a ubiquitous disease with incidence varying according to age, sex, race and geographic origin. The highest rates are reported in Northern Europe and in African-American individuals, the lowest rates in Asia. In Europe, incidence ranges between 1/625 to 500,000 inhabitants. There is a slight predominance in females.", "clinical_description": "Presentation, severity and evolution of sarcoidosis is highly variable. Diagnosis typically occurs in the fourth and fifth decade of life with a second peak of incidence occurring in women older than 50 years of age, but presentation may occur anywhere between childhood and elderly age. The disease is classed as either acute, resolving within 2 years, or chronic, persisting for 3-5 years or longer. The lung and the lymphatic system are predominantly affected, but virtually every organ may be involved. Other severe manifestations result from cardiac, neurological, ocular, kidney or laryngeal localizations. In most cases, sarcoidosis is revealed by persistent dry cough, eye or skin manifestations, peripheral lymph nodes, fatigue, weight loss, fever or night sweats, and L\u00f6fgren syndrome (an acute form characterized by fever, bilateral ankle arthritis and/or erythema nodosum and bilateral hilar lymphadenopathy). Abnormal metabolism of vitamin D3 within granulomatous lesions and hypercalcemia are possible. Chest radiography is abnormal in about 90% of cases and shows lymphadenopathy and/or pulmonary infiltrates (without or with fibrosis), defining sarcoidosis stages from I to IV. African-Americans present a more severe disease, and in Scandinavian countries, about one third of cases have L\u00f6fgren syndrome.", "etiology": "The etiology remains unknown. The prevailing hypothesis is that various, unidentified antigens of either infectious or environmental origin could trigger an exaggerated immune reaction in genetically susceptible hosts.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis relies on compatible clinical and radiographic manifestations, biopsy showing non-caseating granulomas and exclusion of all other causes of granulomatous disease. Some situations do not require biopsy such as Lofgren's syndrome or the presence of typical asymptomatic bilateral mediastino-hilar adenopathies. Biopsies from easily accessible areas (skin, peripheral lymphadenopathies, conjunctival nodules) should be considered. However, bronchoscopy with bronchial and transbronchial biopsies has a good diagnostic performance. Endobronchial ultrasonography-guided transbronchial needle aspiration (EBUS-TBNA) provide a high yield in case of mediastino-hilar lymphadenopathies.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes infections, chronic beryllium disease, common variable immunodeficiency, hypersensitivity pneumonitis, granulomatous polyangiitis, Crohn disease, sarcoid-like reactions (cancer or lymphomas), as well as drug-induced granulomatosis.", "genetic_counseling": "Sarcoidosis results from a complex interaction of multiple genes and thus does not require genetic counseling.", "management_and_treatment": "Depending on the evolution and severity of sarcoidosis, patients may not require systemic therapy. Therapy is considered where there is a possibility of severe complications (i.e. functional organ failure) or to reduce persistent symptoms of discomfort that impact on quality of life. Discomfort may be due to fibrosis, para-sarcoidosis syndrome or comorbidities as well as active disease. Treatment is principally with systemic corticosteroids, and generally maintained for 12 months; however, the duration and minimal efficient dose should be adapted to each patient. Patients with repeated relapses may require long-term, low-dose corticosteroid therapy. Other treatments including immunosuppressive drugs (methotrexate, azathioprine, or leflunomide) and aminoquinolins may be useful in case of unsatisfactory response to corticosteroids, poor tolerance or as sparing agents. In some strictly selected cases refractory to standard therapy, specific anti-TNF-alpha agents (infliximab or adalimumab) may offer improvement. Some patients benefit from topical corticosteroids.", "prognosis": "In at least half of cases, sarcoidosis resolves spontaneously within 2 years. Remission is less likely where diseases persists for five years after presentation. Mortality is estimated at 6-8% and typically due to organ failure (typically respiratory or cardiac). The extent of pulmonary fibrosis and pulmonary hypertension are predictive of mortality."}, {"name": "Bessel-Hagen-Krankheit", "sub_name": "Osteochondrome, multiple", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1:50.000 gesch\u00e4tzt, das Geschlechtsverh\u00e4ltnis ist m:w=1,5:1.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A primary bone disorder characterized by development of two or more cartilage capped bony outgrowths (osteochondromas) at the surface of the bones.", "synonyms": "Bessel-Hagen disease, Multiple cartilaginous exostoses, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q78.6", "omim": "133700\u00a0 133701\u00a0 600209", "umls": "C0015306\u00a0 C0206641", "gard": "7035", "epidemiology": "Multiple osteochondromas (MO) prevalence is estimated at 1:50,000, and seems to be higher in males (male-to-female ratio 1.5:1).", "clinical_description": "Osteochondromas develop and increase in size in the first decade of life, and usually cease to grow when the growth plates close at puberty. They are pedunculated or sessile (broad base) and can vary widely in size. The number of osteochondromas may vary significantly within and between families, the mean number of locations is 15-18. The majority are asymptomatic and located in bones that develop from cartilage, especially the long bones of the extremities, predominantly around the knee. The facial bones are not affected. Bone lesions on flat bones, vertebrae, and the ribs are less common and the skull is usually not involved. Osteochondromas may cause pain, functional problems and deformities (especially of the forearm), which may provide reason for surgical removal. The most important complication is malignant transformation of osteochondroma towards secondary peripheral atypical cartilaginous tumor or chondrosarcoma, which is estimated to occur in 0.5-5% of cases.", "etiology": "Germline mutations in the tumor suppressor genes, EXT1 (8q24.11) or EXT2 (11p11.2), are found in almost 90% of MO patients. The EXT genes encode glycosyltransferases, catalyzing heparan sulphate polymerization.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis is based on radiological and clinical documentation, supplemented with, if available, histological evaluation of the osteochondromas. Diagnostic criteria (WHO 2020) include radiological findings of at least two osteochondromas of the juxta-epiphyseal region of long bones, and a positive family history and/or a proven germline mutation in one of the EXT genes.", "differential_diagnosis": "MO should be distinguished from metachondromatosis, dysplasia epiphysealis hemimelica and Ollier disease.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "If the exact mutation is known antenatal diagnosis is technically possible.", "genetic_counseling": "MO is an autosomal dominant disorder and is genetically heterogeneous. Genetic counseling should be proposed to individuals having the disease-causing mutation informing them that there is 50% risk of passing the mutation to offspring.", "management_and_treatment": "Management includes removal of osteochondromas when they are the cause of complaints. Removed osteochondromas should be examined for malignant transformation towards secondary peripheral atypical cartilaginous tumor or chondrosarcoma. Patients should be well instructed and regular follow-up for early detection of malignancy seems justified. For secondary peripheral chondrosarcoma, en-bloc resection of the lesion and its pseudocapsule with tumor-free margins should be performed, preferably in a bone tumor referral centre.", "prognosis": "Osteochondromas are benign lesions and do not affect life expectancy."}, {"name": "Best-Krankheit", "sub_name": "Best vitelliforme Makuladegeneration", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Best Vitelliforme Makuladegeneration (BVMD) ist eine genetisch bedingte Makuladegeneration mit Verlust der zentralen Sehkraft, Metamorphopsie (ver\u00e4nderte Wahrnehmung von Gegenst\u00e4nden) und vermindertem Arden-Verh\u00e4ltnis im Elektrookulogramm. Ursache ist eine eigelb-\u00e4hnliche L\u00e4sion der Fovea und ihrer Umgebung.", "synonyms": "BMD, BVMD, Best Makuladegeneration, Best-Krankheit, Dystrophia vitelliformis, Fr\u00fch beginnende vitelliforme Makuladystrophie, Juvenile vitelliforme Makuladystrophie, Makuladegeneration, vitelliforme, Typ 2, Polymorpe vitelline Makuladegeneration, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "H35.5", "OMIM": "153700", "UMLS": "C0339510\u00a0 C2745945", "GARD": "182", "epidemiology": "Sch\u00e4tzungen der Pr\u00e4valenz liegen zwischen 1:5.000 in Nordschweden und 1:67.000 in D\u00e4nemark. Das m\u00e4nnliche Geschlecht ist h\u00e4ufiger betroffen (m:w = 3:1).", "clinical_description": "Die BVMD beginnt im Kindesalter, manchmal auch erst sp\u00e4ter (5-13 Jahre). Bei Geburt ist der Visus noch normal. Die BVMD schreitet in mehreren Stadien fort: Stadium 1:Asymptomatische pr\u00e4vitelliforme Phase; Stadium 2: Bildung einer dotter-gelben (vitelliformen) L\u00e4sion in der Makula; Stadium 2a: Der Inhalt der Fovea wird weniger homogen ('R\u00fchrei-artig'); Stadium 3 (Pseudo-Hypopyon): Die vitelliforme Substanz in der L\u00e4sion wird fl\u00fcssig. Schlie\u00dflich l\u00f6st sich die L\u00e4sion auf und hinterl\u00e4sst eine Narbe, wodurch der zentrale Visus verloren geht (20/200). Weiter kompliziert wird dieser Verlauf durch eine subfoveale choroidale neovaskul\u00e4re (CNV) Membran (bei Kindern selten). M\u00f6gliche Symptome sind gest\u00f6rte Unterscheidung von Farben (vor allem der Protanachse) und Metamorphopsie. Der periphere Visus und die Dunkeladaptation bleiben erhalten. Einige Mutationstr\u00e4ger bleiben symptomfrei.", "etiology": "Die BVMD ist gekennzeichnet durch Atrophie des Pigmentepithels der Netzhaut (RPE) mit gest\u00f6rtem zentralen Visus. In den meisten F\u00e4llen ist die BVMD verursacht dirch Mutationen im BEST1-Gen (11q12). Es kodiert f\u00fcr Bestrophin-1, einen im RPE exprimierten Chlorid-Kanal. Der Defekt dieses Proteins f\u00fchrt im Gefolge des gest\u00f6rten Ionenaustausches zur Ablagerung von Lipofuszin.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren Familienanamnese, Testung der Sehsch\u00e4rfe und Inspektion des Augenhintergrundes (mit Nachweis gelber, runder Ablagerungen von Lipofuszin im Zentrum der Makula). Das Vollfeld-Elektroretinogramm (ERG) ist normal. Im Elektrookulogramm (EOG) wird das Ruhepotential des Auges durch Bestimmung des Arden-Quotienten (AR: Verh\u00e4ltnis Lichtpeak/Dunkelminimum; normal \u22651.8) gekennzeichnet. Bei BVMD ist der AR in der Regel vermindert (1.0-1.3). Durch hochaufl\u00f6sende optische Koh\u00e4renztomographie kann die abnorme Ablagerung von Lipofuszin zwischen den Photorezeptoren und dem RPE nachgewiesen werden. Durch Mutationsanalyse im BEST1-Gen wird die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen der BVMD sind die Foveo-makul\u00e4re vitelliforme Dystrophie mit Beginn im Erwachsenenalter, die Altersabh\u00e4ngige Makuladegeneration, die autosomal-rezessive Bestrophinopathie, die autosomal-dominante Vitreo-retino-choroidopathie, Retinitis pigmentosa (s. diese Termini) und die Ochsenaugen-Makulopathie.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Pr\u00e4nataldiagnose und Pr\u00e4implantationsdiagnostik sind m\u00f6glich, wenn in der Familie die urs\u00e4chliche Mutation bekannt ist.", "genetic_counseling": "Die BVMD wird autosomal-dominant mit vollst\u00e4ndiger Penetranz vererbt. Erkrankungsalter und Ausma\u00df des Visusverlustes variieren innerhalb und zwischen den Familien.", "management_and_treatment": "Teil der symptomatischen Behandlung sind Sehhilfen bei signifikant eingeschr\u00e4nktem Visus. F\u00fcr Patienten aller Altersstufen werden j\u00e4hrliche ophthalmologische Kontrollen empfohlen. Tabakkonsum soll vermieden werden, da er das Risiko f\u00fcr neovaskul\u00e4re Makuladegeneration erh\u00f6ht. Optionen f\u00fcr die Behandlung einer CNV sind: Photodynamische Therapie mit Verteporfin, direkte Laser-Photokoagulation oder Anti-VEGF-Agentien (Bevacizumab). Eine Behandlungsart der BVMD ist die trans-korneale elekrische Retina-Stimulation.", "prognosis": "Die BVMD kann bis zu geographischer Atrophie fortschreiten und ist in einigen F\u00e4llen durch die Entwicklung einer CNV kompliziert. 7-9% der Patienten erfahren keinen Visusverlust aber haben bei normalem ERG ein ver\u00e4ndertes EOG.", "summary": "Sch\u00e4tzungen der Pr\u00e4valenz liegen zwischen 1:5.000 in Nordschweden und 1:67.000 in D\u00e4nemark. Das m\u00e4nnliche Geschlecht ist h\u00e4ufiger betroffen (m:w = 3:1)."}, {"name": "Best Makuladegeneration", "sub_name": "Best vitelliforme Makuladegeneration", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Best Vitelliforme Makuladegeneration (BVMD) ist eine genetisch bedingte Makuladegeneration mit Verlust der zentralen Sehkraft, Metamorphopsie (ver\u00e4nderte Wahrnehmung von Gegenst\u00e4nden) und vermindertem Arden-Verh\u00e4ltnis im Elektrookulogramm. Ursache ist eine eigelb-\u00e4hnliche L\u00e4sion der Fovea und ihrer Umgebung.", "synonyms": "BMD, BVMD, Best Makuladegeneration, Best-Krankheit, Dystrophia vitelliformis, Fr\u00fch beginnende vitelliforme Makuladystrophie, Juvenile vitelliforme Makuladystrophie, Makuladegeneration, vitelliforme, Typ 2, Polymorpe vitelline Makuladegeneration, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "H35.5", "OMIM": "153700", "UMLS": "C0339510\u00a0 C2745945", "GARD": "182", "epidemiology": "Sch\u00e4tzungen der Pr\u00e4valenz liegen zwischen 1:5.000 in Nordschweden und 1:67.000 in D\u00e4nemark. Das m\u00e4nnliche Geschlecht ist h\u00e4ufiger betroffen (m:w = 3:1).", "clinical_description": "Die BVMD beginnt im Kindesalter, manchmal auch erst sp\u00e4ter (5-13 Jahre). Bei Geburt ist der Visus noch normal. Die BVMD schreitet in mehreren Stadien fort: Stadium 1:Asymptomatische pr\u00e4vitelliforme Phase; Stadium 2: Bildung einer dotter-gelben (vitelliformen) L\u00e4sion in der Makula; Stadium 2a: Der Inhalt der Fovea wird weniger homogen ('R\u00fchrei-artig'); Stadium 3 (Pseudo-Hypopyon): Die vitelliforme Substanz in der L\u00e4sion wird fl\u00fcssig. Schlie\u00dflich l\u00f6st sich die L\u00e4sion auf und hinterl\u00e4sst eine Narbe, wodurch der zentrale Visus verloren geht (20/200). Weiter kompliziert wird dieser Verlauf durch eine subfoveale choroidale neovaskul\u00e4re (CNV) Membran (bei Kindern selten). M\u00f6gliche Symptome sind gest\u00f6rte Unterscheidung von Farben (vor allem der Protanachse) und Metamorphopsie. Der periphere Visus und die Dunkeladaptation bleiben erhalten. Einige Mutationstr\u00e4ger bleiben symptomfrei.", "etiology": "Die BVMD ist gekennzeichnet durch Atrophie des Pigmentepithels der Netzhaut (RPE) mit gest\u00f6rtem zentralen Visus. In den meisten F\u00e4llen ist die BVMD verursacht dirch Mutationen im BEST1-Gen (11q12). Es kodiert f\u00fcr Bestrophin-1, einen im RPE exprimierten Chlorid-Kanal. Der Defekt dieses Proteins f\u00fchrt im Gefolge des gest\u00f6rten Ionenaustausches zur Ablagerung von Lipofuszin.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren Familienanamnese, Testung der Sehsch\u00e4rfe und Inspektion des Augenhintergrundes (mit Nachweis gelber, runder Ablagerungen von Lipofuszin im Zentrum der Makula). Das Vollfeld-Elektroretinogramm (ERG) ist normal. Im Elektrookulogramm (EOG) wird das Ruhepotential des Auges durch Bestimmung des Arden-Quotienten (AR: Verh\u00e4ltnis Lichtpeak/Dunkelminimum; normal \u22651.8) gekennzeichnet. Bei BVMD ist der AR in der Regel vermindert (1.0-1.3). Durch hochaufl\u00f6sende optische Koh\u00e4renztomographie kann die abnorme Ablagerung von Lipofuszin zwischen den Photorezeptoren und dem RPE nachgewiesen werden. Durch Mutationsanalyse im BEST1-Gen wird die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen der BVMD sind die Foveo-makul\u00e4re vitelliforme Dystrophie mit Beginn im Erwachsenenalter, die Altersabh\u00e4ngige Makuladegeneration, die autosomal-rezessive Bestrophinopathie, die autosomal-dominante Vitreo-retino-choroidopathie, Retinitis pigmentosa (s. diese Termini) und die Ochsenaugen-Makulopathie.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Pr\u00e4nataldiagnose und Pr\u00e4implantationsdiagnostik sind m\u00f6glich, wenn in der Familie die urs\u00e4chliche Mutation bekannt ist.", "genetic_counseling": "Die BVMD wird autosomal-dominant mit vollst\u00e4ndiger Penetranz vererbt. Erkrankungsalter und Ausma\u00df des Visusverlustes variieren innerhalb und zwischen den Familien.", "management_and_treatment": "Teil der symptomatischen Behandlung sind Sehhilfen bei signifikant eingeschr\u00e4nktem Visus. F\u00fcr Patienten aller Altersstufen werden j\u00e4hrliche ophthalmologische Kontrollen empfohlen. Tabakkonsum soll vermieden werden, da er das Risiko f\u00fcr neovaskul\u00e4re Makuladegeneration erh\u00f6ht. Optionen f\u00fcr die Behandlung einer CNV sind: Photodynamische Therapie mit Verteporfin, direkte Laser-Photokoagulation oder Anti-VEGF-Agentien (Bevacizumab). Eine Behandlungsart der BVMD ist die trans-korneale elekrische Retina-Stimulation.", "prognosis": "Die BVMD kann bis zu geographischer Atrophie fortschreiten und ist in einigen F\u00e4llen durch die Entwicklung einer CNV kompliziert. 7-9% der Patienten erfahren keinen Visusverlust aber haben bei normalem ERG ein ver\u00e4ndertes EOG.", "summary": "Sch\u00e4tzungen der Pr\u00e4valenz liegen zwischen 1:5.000 in Nordschweden und 1:67.000 in D\u00e4nemark. Das m\u00e4nnliche Geschlecht ist h\u00e4ufiger betroffen (m:w = 3:1)."}, {"name": "Bestrophinopathie, autosomal-rezessive", "german_description": "Die Retinopathie Typ Burgess-Black ist gekennzeichnet durch Verlust des zentralen Visus, fehlenden Anstieg des Elektrookulogramms im Licht und Anomalien des Elektroretinogramms. Bisher wurden 5 Familien beschrieben. Die Vererbung ist autosomal-rezessiv. Ursache des Syndroms sind bi-allelische Mutationen im BEST1-Gen (11q13), das f\u00fcr das Transmembranprotein Bestrophin-1 kodiert. Heterozygote Mutationen im BEST1-Gen sind Ursache der Makuladystrophie Best und der autosomal-dominanten Vitreo-Retino-Choroideopathie (s. diese Termini). ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare retinal dystrophy, characterized by central visual loss in the first 2 decades of life, associated with an absent electrooculogram (EOG) light rise and a reduced electroretinogram (ERG).", "synonyms": "Retinopathy, Burgess-Black type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "H35.5", "omim": "611809", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of ARB is still unknown; to date less than 20 cases have been described in the world literature.", "clinical_description": "ARB generally manifests in the first 2 decades of life, but patients may also first become symptomatic as late as the fifth decade of life. Most affected individuals initially present with central visual loss (visual acuity ranging from 20/200 to 20/25) and are usually mildly to highly hyperopic. Additional ocular findings may include short axial length with angle-closure glaucoma, amblyopia, anterior uveitis, strabismus, and color vision defects. Choroidal neovascularization (CNV) has been described in one case. Leukokoria and esotropia have also been reported.", "etiology": "ARB is caused by compound heterozygous or homozygous mutations in the BEST1 gene (11q12) which encodes the chloride ion channel bestrophin-1 (expressed in the retinal pigment epithelium (RPE)). Mutations in BEST1 reduce or abolish the activity of the channel. It has been proposed that ARB may represent the null phenotype of bestrophin-1 in humans.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis of ARB relies on ophthalmologic examination, familial history and visual electrophysiology revealing an abnormal full-field ERG (reduced amplitudes and delayed implicit times of the rod and cone ERGs). Absent or severe reduction in EOG light rise (Arden ratio= 1.0) is commonly observed. Irregularity of the RPE throughout the posterior fundus, often with scattered punctate flecks (observed by autofluorescence imaging) is also found. Optical coherence tomography (OCT) imaging shows retinal edema, serous subretinal fluid, subretinal yellowish lesions and scars. Classic vitelliform lesions are not present. Fluorescein angiography reveals widespread patchy areas of hyperfluorescence and signs of mild perivascular leakage in the peripheral retina. Cystoid macular edema may be observed. Diagnosis is confirmed by the genetic screening of BEST1.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes Stargardt disease, familial drusen, Best vitelliform macular dystrophy, age-related macular degeneration (see these terms), central serous chorioretinopathy and chorioretinitis.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them of the 25% risk of having an affected child.", "management_and_treatment": "Management of ARB is mainly symptomatic and includes treatment of amblyopia, surgical strabismus correction, prophylactic laser (YAG) peripheral iridotomy to prevent angle closure and treat glaucoma, and intravitreal bevacizumab for the treatment for CNV. Cystoid macular edema may be treated with oral administration of acetazolamide. Gene therapy may offer a possible treatment for ARB in the future. Close monitoring of ARB patients is recommended, including repeated gonioscopy to judge the risk of angle closure.", "prognosis": "Onset of vision loss in patients has been reported to vary between the ages of 4 to 40, and is coincident with initial presentation."}, {"name": "Best vitelliforme Makuladegeneration", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Best Vitelliforme Makuladegeneration (BVMD) ist eine genetisch bedingte Makuladegeneration mit Verlust der zentralen Sehkraft, Metamorphopsie (ver\u00e4nderte Wahrnehmung von Gegenst\u00e4nden) und vermindertem Arden-Verh\u00e4ltnis im Elektrookulogramm. Ursache ist eine eigelb-\u00e4hnliche L\u00e4sion der Fovea und ihrer Umgebung.", "synonyms": "BMD, BVMD, Best Makuladegeneration, Best-Krankheit, Dystrophia vitelliformis, Fr\u00fch beginnende vitelliforme Makuladystrophie, Juvenile vitelliforme Makuladystrophie, Makuladegeneration, vitelliforme, Typ 2, Polymorpe vitelline Makuladegeneration, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "H35.5", "OMIM": "153700", "UMLS": "C0339510\u00a0 C2745945", "GARD": "182", "epidemiology": "Sch\u00e4tzungen der Pr\u00e4valenz liegen zwischen 1:5.000 in Nordschweden und 1:67.000 in D\u00e4nemark. Das m\u00e4nnliche Geschlecht ist h\u00e4ufiger betroffen (m:w = 3:1).", "clinical_description": "Die BVMD beginnt im Kindesalter, manchmal auch erst sp\u00e4ter (5-13 Jahre). Bei Geburt ist der Visus noch normal. Die BVMD schreitet in mehreren Stadien fort: Stadium 1:Asymptomatische pr\u00e4vitelliforme Phase; Stadium 2: Bildung einer dotter-gelben (vitelliformen) L\u00e4sion in der Makula; Stadium 2a: Der Inhalt der Fovea wird weniger homogen ('R\u00fchrei-artig'); Stadium 3 (Pseudo-Hypopyon): Die vitelliforme Substanz in der L\u00e4sion wird fl\u00fcssig. Schlie\u00dflich l\u00f6st sich die L\u00e4sion auf und hinterl\u00e4sst eine Narbe, wodurch der zentrale Visus verloren geht (20/200). Weiter kompliziert wird dieser Verlauf durch eine subfoveale choroidale neovaskul\u00e4re (CNV) Membran (bei Kindern selten). M\u00f6gliche Symptome sind gest\u00f6rte Unterscheidung von Farben (vor allem der Protanachse) und Metamorphopsie. Der periphere Visus und die Dunkeladaptation bleiben erhalten. Einige Mutationstr\u00e4ger bleiben symptomfrei.", "etiology": "Die BVMD ist gekennzeichnet durch Atrophie des Pigmentepithels der Netzhaut (RPE) mit gest\u00f6rtem zentralen Visus. In den meisten F\u00e4llen ist die BVMD verursacht dirch Mutationen im BEST1-Gen (11q12). Es kodiert f\u00fcr Bestrophin-1, einen im RPE exprimierten Chlorid-Kanal. Der Defekt dieses Proteins f\u00fchrt im Gefolge des gest\u00f6rten Ionenaustausches zur Ablagerung von Lipofuszin.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren Familienanamnese, Testung der Sehsch\u00e4rfe und Inspektion des Augenhintergrundes (mit Nachweis gelber, runder Ablagerungen von Lipofuszin im Zentrum der Makula). Das Vollfeld-Elektroretinogramm (ERG) ist normal. Im Elektrookulogramm (EOG) wird das Ruhepotential des Auges durch Bestimmung des Arden-Quotienten (AR: Verh\u00e4ltnis Lichtpeak/Dunkelminimum; normal \u22651.8) gekennzeichnet. Bei BVMD ist der AR in der Regel vermindert (1.0-1.3). Durch hochaufl\u00f6sende optische Koh\u00e4renztomographie kann die abnorme Ablagerung von Lipofuszin zwischen den Photorezeptoren und dem RPE nachgewiesen werden. Durch Mutationsanalyse im BEST1-Gen wird die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen der BVMD sind die Foveo-makul\u00e4re vitelliforme Dystrophie mit Beginn im Erwachsenenalter, die Altersabh\u00e4ngige Makuladegeneration, die autosomal-rezessive Bestrophinopathie, die autosomal-dominante Vitreo-retino-choroidopathie, Retinitis pigmentosa (s. diese Termini) und die Ochsenaugen-Makulopathie.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Pr\u00e4nataldiagnose und Pr\u00e4implantationsdiagnostik sind m\u00f6glich, wenn in der Familie die urs\u00e4chliche Mutation bekannt ist.", "genetic_counseling": "Die BVMD wird autosomal-dominant mit vollst\u00e4ndiger Penetranz vererbt. Erkrankungsalter und Ausma\u00df des Visusverlustes variieren innerhalb und zwischen den Familien.", "management_and_treatment": "Teil der symptomatischen Behandlung sind Sehhilfen bei signifikant eingeschr\u00e4nktem Visus. F\u00fcr Patienten aller Altersstufen werden j\u00e4hrliche ophthalmologische Kontrollen empfohlen. Tabakkonsum soll vermieden werden, da er das Risiko f\u00fcr neovaskul\u00e4re Makuladegeneration erh\u00f6ht. Optionen f\u00fcr die Behandlung einer CNV sind: Photodynamische Therapie mit Verteporfin, direkte Laser-Photokoagulation oder Anti-VEGF-Agentien (Bevacizumab). Eine Behandlungsart der BVMD ist die trans-korneale elekrische Retina-Stimulation.", "prognosis": "Die BVMD kann bis zu geographischer Atrophie fortschreiten und ist in einigen F\u00e4llen durch die Entwicklung einer CNV kompliziert. 7-9% der Patienten erfahren keinen Visusverlust aber haben bei normalem ERG ein ver\u00e4ndertes EOG.", "summary": "Sch\u00e4tzungen der Pr\u00e4valenz liegen zwischen 1:5.000 in Nordschweden und 1:67.000 in D\u00e4nemark. Das m\u00e4nnliche Geschlecht ist h\u00e4ufiger betroffen (m:w = 3:1)."}, {"name": "Beta-1,4-Galaktosyltransferase-Mangel", "sub_name": "B4GALT1-CDG", "german_description": "Die Kongenitalen Glykosylierungs-Defekt (CDG)-Syndrome sind eine Gruppe von autosomal-rezessiv vererbten Krankheiten mit gest\u00f6rter Synthese von Glykoproteinen. Das CDG-Syndrom Typ IId (CDG 2D) ist gekennzeichnet durch Dandy-Walker-Malformation mit Makrozephalie, Hydrozephalus, Muskelhypotonie, Myopathie und Gerinnungsst\u00f6rungen. Bisher wurde nur 1 Patient beschrieben. Ursache des CDG 2D dieses Patienten waren inaktivierende Mutationen im GALT1 -Gen, das in der Chromosomenregion 9q13 liegt und die Beta-1,4-Galaktosyltransferase des Golgi-Apparates kodiert. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "B4GALT1-CDG is a congenital disorder of glycosylation characterised by macrocephaly due to Dandy-Walker malformation, hydrocephaly, hypotonia, myopathy and coagulation anomalies. To date, only one case has been reported. The syndrome is associated with mutations in the GALT1 gene (localised to region q13 of chromosome 9) leading to a deficiency in the Golgi apparatus enzyme beta-1,4-galactosyl transferase.", "synonyms": "Beta-1,4-galactosyltransferase deficiency, CDG syndrome type IId, CDG-IId, CDG2D, Carbohydrate deficient glycoprotein syndrome type IId, Congenital disorder of glycosylation type 2d, Congenital disorder of glycosylation type IId, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "E77.8", "omim": "607091", "umls": "C2931009", "gard": "9841"}, {"name": "Beta2-Mikroglobulin-Amyloidose", "sub_name": "ABeta2M-Amyloidose, Wild-Typ", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Dialysis-related amyloidosis (DRA), is a type of amyloidosis (see this term) affecting patients with chronic kidney disease (CKD), on long term dialysis characterized by the accumulation of amyloid fibrils consisting of beta 2 microglobulin (\u03b22M) deposits in the musculoskeletal system leading to carpal tunnel syndrome (CTS), chronic arthropathy, cystic bone lesions, destructive osteoarthropathy, and pathologic fractures.", "synonyms": "ABeta2Mwt amyloidosis, Dialysis-related amyloidosis, Dialysis-related arthropathy, Wild type ABeta2-microglobulinic amyloidosis, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "E85.3"}, {"name": "Beta-2-Mikroglobulin-Amyloidose", "sub_name": "ABeta2M-Amyloidose", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Beta-2-Mikroglobulin-Amyloidose, ", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Beta-2-Mikroglobulin-Amyloidose, autosomal-dominante", "sub_name": "ABeta2M-Amyloidose, variante", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare form of amyloidosis characterized by accumulation and extensive visceral deposition of anamyloidogenic variant of beta 2 microglobulin leading to progressive gastrointestinal dysfunction, Sj\u00f6gren syndrome and autonomic neuropathy.", "synonyms": "Autosomal dominant beta2-microglobulinic amyloidosis, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "E85.1"}, {"name": "Beta3GalT6-defizientes EDS", "sub_name": "Ehlers-Danlos-Syndrom, spondylodysplastischer Typ, B3GALT6-assoziiert", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of spondylodysplastic Ehlers-Danlos syndrome due to variants in  and characterized by short stature, variable degrees of muscle hypotonia, joint hypermobility, especially of the hands, bowing of limbs and congenital or early onset, progressive kyphoscoliosis. Additional features include the typical craniofacial gestalt (prominent forehead, sparse hair, mid-face hypoplasia, blue sclerae, proptosis and abnormal dentition), hyperextensible, soft, thin, translucent and doughy skin, delayed motor and/or cognitive development, characteristic radiographic findings (spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia, platyspondyly, anterior beak of vertebral body, short ilia, elbow malalignment and generalized osteoporosis), joint contractures and ascending aortic aneurysm.", "synonyms": "B3GALT6-related spEDS, B3GALT6-related spondylodysplastic EDS, Beta3GalT6-deficient EDS, Ehlers-Danlos syndrome progeroid type 2, spEDS-B3GALT6, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q79.6", "omim": "615349", "epidemiology": "To date, 41 individuals with molecularly diagnosed B3GALT6-related spondylodysplastic EDS, have been reported.", "clinical_description": "The main features are short stature, variable degrees of muscle hypotonia, joint hypermobility, bowing of limbs and congenital or early onset, progressive kyphoscoliosis. Joint hypermobility, especially of the hands and feet, and soft, doughy and hyperextensible skin are some of the most striking characteristics. Facial dysmorphism includes prominent forehead, sparse hair, mid-face hypoplasia, blue sclerae, proptosis and abnormal dentition with discoloration of teeth. Most affected children present from infancy with delayed motor development and hypotonia; half of patients have delayed cognitive development. The majority of patients display severe kyphoscoliosis, which is usually congenital or early onset and progressive. Skeletal anomalies include platyspondyly, short iliac bones and elbow dislocation. Osteopenia has been frequently reported, usually in conjunction with fractures and luxations. Less frequent skeletal anomalies include cervical spine instability, pectus carinatum/excavatum, joint contractures, radioulnar synostosis, limited elbow extension, carpal synostosis, short metacarpals, ulnar deviation of fingers, oligodactyly, hip dysplasia, epiphyseal dysplasia of femoral heads, genu valgus, pes planus, talipes equinovarus, recurrent luxation of the toes and hallux valgus. Approximately one third of the patients have ophthalmological abnormalities, such as myopia, corneal opacity, sclerocornea, blue sclerae, microcornea, glaucoma, optic nerve atrophy and retinal detachment. Cardiovascular anomalies infrequently reported include mitral valve prolapse, aortic valve stenosis and aortic root aneurysm. Other less common features include urinary defects with nephroptosis, bilateral caliceal and ureteral dilatation, laryngeal cleft, tracheomalacia, spontaneous repeated pneumothoraces, chronic respiratory insufficiency, Wilms tumor, cryptorchidism, prominent superficial veins, hypoplastic nails. There are rare reports of sensorineural and conductive hearing loss and cleft palate.", "etiology": "The disorder is due to variants of the B3GALT6 gene (1p36.33), encoding for galactosyltransferase II. This gene is responsible for the synthesis of the linker region of proteoglycans, which are essential components of the extracellular matrix of connective tissues.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical examination, radiological studies and molecular findings.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasias (e.g due to KIF22 or EXOC6B), the other forms of spondylodysplastyic EDSs, as well as other genetic syndromes characterized by kyphoscoliosis, joint hypermobility, skin hyperextensibility and short stature.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible where a known pathogenic variant has previously been identified in a family member.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing variant) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Management requires a multidisciplinary approach. Musculoskeletal anomalies, in particular kyphoscoliosis, may require a precocious orthopedic intervention. Specific regular follow-up is recommended based on the patient's clinical manifestation. Rehabilitation therapies must be tailored to the patient's characteristics.", "prognosis": "Currently, data is limited with regard to life expectancy. Whilst four cases of death in infancy have been described, there are no known reasons to suspect reduced life expectancy. Functional consequences and quality of life depend on disease severity."}, {"name": "Beta-Alanin-Synthase-Mangel", "sub_name": "Beta-Ureidopropionase-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Beta-Ureido-Propionase-Mangel, ist eine sehr seltene, bisher bei weniger als 10 Patienten beschriebene St\u00f6rung des Pyrimidin-Stoffwechsels mit extrem unterschiedlicher Symptomatik, von asymptomatischen F\u00e4llen bis zu neurologischen Symptomen (Epilepsie, Autismus) und Entwicklungsst\u00f6rungen (urogenital, kolorektal).", "synonyms": "Beta-Alanin-Synthase-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "E79.8", "OMIM": "613161", "UMLS": "C1291512"}, {"name": "Beta-Amyloidose Typ Piedmont", "sub_name": "ABetaL34V-Amyloidose", "german_description": "Bisher wurde diese Form nur in einer einzigen italienischen Familie gefunden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of hereditary cerebral hemorrhage with amyloidosis characterized by an age of onset between 50-70 years of age, recurrent lobar intracerebral hemorrhages and cognitive decline. This subtype is due to a mutation in the APP gene (21q21.2), encoding the beta-amyloid precursor protein. This mutation causes an increased accumulation of amyloid-beta protein in the walls of the arteries and capillaries of the meninges, cerebellar cortex and cerebral cortex, leading to the weakening and eventual rupture of these vessels.", "synonyms": "ABeta amyloidosis, Piedmont type, ABetaL34V-related amyloidosis, HCHWA, Piedmont type, Hereditary cerebral hemorrhage with amyloidosis, Piedmont type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "E85.4+\u00a0 I68.0*", "omim": "605714"}, {"name": "Beta-Amyloidose vom fl\u00e4mischen Typ", "sub_name": "ABetaA21G-Amyloidose", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of hereditary cerebral hemorrhage with amyloidosis characterized by an age of onset of 45 years of age, progressive Alzheimer's disease-like dementia, and lobar intracerebral hemorrhage in some patients. This subtype is due to a mutation in the APP gene (21q21.2), encoding the beta-amyloid precursor protein. This mutation causes an increased accumulation of amyloid-beta protein in the walls of the arteries and capillaries of the meninges, cerebellar cortex and cerebral cortex, leading to the weakening and eventual rupture of these vessels.", "synonyms": "ABeta amyloidosis, Flemish type, ABetaA21G-related amyloidosis, HCHWA, Flemish type, Hereditary cerebral hemorrhage with amyloidosis, Flemish type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "E85.4+\u00a0 I68.0*", "omim": "605714"}, {"name": "Beta-Amyloidose vom Italienischen Typ", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of hereditary cerebral hemorrhage with amyloidosis characterized by an age of onset of 50 years of age, dementia and lobar intracerebral hemorrhage. This subtype is due to a mutation in the APP gene (21q21.2), encoding the beta-amyloid precursor protein. This mutation causes an increased accumulation of amyloid-beta protein in the walls of the arteries and capillaries of the meninges, cerebellar cortex and cerebral cortex, leading to the weakening and eventual rupture of these vessels.", "synonyms": "ABetaE22K amyloidosis, HCHWA, Italian type, Hereditary cerebral hemorrhage with amyloidosis, Italian type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "E85.4+\u00a0 I68.0*", "omim": "605714"}, {"name": "Beta-D-Galactosidase-Mangel", "sub_name": "Mukopolysaccharidose Typ 4B", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Beta-D-Galactosidase-Mangel, MPS4B, MPSIVB, Morquio-Krankheit Typ B, Mukopolysaccharidose Typ IVB, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "ICD-10": "E76.2", "OMIM": "253010", "UMLS": "C0086652", "GARD": "3786", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Mukopolysaccharidose Typ 4"}, {"name": "Beta-Enolase-Mangel", "sub_name": "Glykogenose durch muskul\u00e4ren beta-Enolase-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Muskel-Beta-Enolase-Mangel ist eine St\u00f6rung der Glykolyse und wurde bisher bei 1 Patienten beschrieben. Klinische Merkmale als Folge des schweren Enolase-Mangels in der Muskulatur sind Belastungsintoleranz und Myalgie.", "synonyms": "Beta-Enolase-Mangel, GSDXIII, Glykogen-Speicherkrankheit durch muskul\u00e4ren Enolase 3-Mangel, Glykogenose Typ 13, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "E74.0", "OMIM": "612932", "UMLS": "C2752027", "GARD": "2125"}, {"name": "Beta-Galaktosidase 1-Mangel", "sub_name": "GM1-Gangliosidose", "german_description": "Die Krankheit tritt in allen Ethnien auf, die weltweite Pr\u00e4valenz ist aber nicht bekannt. Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter Lebendgeborenen wird auf 1:100.000-200.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Hohe Pr\u00e4valenzen wurden in Malta, Brasilien, Zypern und in Populationen der Roma gefunden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "GM1 gangliosidosis is a rare lysosomal storage disorder characterized biochemically by deficient beta-galactosidase activity and clinically by a wide range of variable neurovisceral, ophthalmological and dysmorphic features.", "synonyms": "Beta-galactosidase-1 deficiency, GLB1 deficiency, Landing disease, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "E75.1", "omim": "230500\u00a0 230600\u00a0 230650", "umls": "C0085131\u00a0 C0268271\u00a0 C2718068", "mesh": "D016537", "gard": "10891", "epidemiology": "The disorder is panethnic but worldwide prevalence is not known. Prevalence at birth is estimated to be approximately 1:100,000 to 200,000 live births. High prevalence has been found in Malta and Brazil, and in the Cypriot and Roma populations.", "clinical_description": "There are three types of GM1 gangliosidosis based on the age of onset: a severe rapidly progressive infantile form with onset before six months of age (type 1 GM1 gangliosidosis), a late infantile or juvenile form with onset between seven months and 3 years of age with delayed motor and cognitive development (type 2 GM1 gangliosidosis), and an adult, chronic form with late onset between 3 and 30 years of age (type 3 GM1 gangliosidosis) characterized primarily by generalized dystonia (see these terms). Disease severity appears to be related to the level of beta-galactosidase activity.", "etiology": "The disorder is caused by mutations in the GLB1gene (3p22.3) coding for beta-galactosidase. To date, more than 165 mutations have been identified. Deficient enzyme activity leads to toxic accumulation of gangliosides in body tissues, and particularly in the central nervous system (CNS).", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis may be difficult due to the wide clinical spectrum of the disease. Clinical suspicion is based on signs of storage such as facial coarsening, hypertrophic gums, cherry-red macula, visceromegaly, dysostosis and psychomotor delay. Peripheral blood smear (testing vacuolated lymphocytes) and urine oligosaccharides are good orientation tests. Gaucher-like foam cells have been reported on bone marrow examination. Diagnosis is confirmed by biochemical assay of beta-galactosidase activity and/or by molecular genetic testing. A secondary combined defect of both GLB1 and neuraminidase (NEU1) (causing galactosialidosis; see this term) has to be excluded.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes mucopolysaccharidoses, sphingolipidoses and oligosaccharidoses (see these terms).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis can be performed by analysis of beta-galactosidase activity and/or by GLB1 molecular analysis in either chorionic villus (CV) cells or amniotic fluid cells, if mutations are identified in an index case.", "genetic_counseling": "GM1 gangliosidosis is an autosomal recessive disease. Genetic counseling should be provided to affected families.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment for patients with GM1 gangliosidosis is symptomatic and supportive. Substrate reduction therapy is a potential approach for clinical trials in late-onset forms.", "prognosis": "Prognosis depends on the type of GM1 gangliosidosis and is extremely poor in the severe infantile form and variable in the chronic adult form of the disease."}, {"name": "Beta-Glucuronidasemangel", "sub_name": "Mukopolysaccharidose Typ 7", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene, genetisch bedingte lysosomale Speicherkrankheit, die durch eine Anh\u00e4ufung von Glykosaminoglykanen im Bindegewebe gekennzeichnet ist und zu einer fortschreitenden Multisystembeteiligung f\u00fchrt, deren Schweregrad von leicht bis schwer reicht. Zu den konsistentesten Merkmalen geh\u00f6ren die Beteiligung des Bewegungsapparats (insbesondere Dysostosis multiplex, Gelenkeinschr\u00e4nkungen, Thoraxanomalien und Kleinwuchs), ein eingeschr\u00e4nkter Wortschatz, Intelligenzminderung, grobe Gesichtsz\u00fcge mit kurzem Hals, eine Lungenbeteiligung (\u00fcberwiegend verminderte Lungenfunktion), Hornhauttr\u00fcbung und eine Herzklappenerkrankung.", "synonyms": "Beta-Glucuronidasemangel, MPS7, MPSVII, Mukopolysaccharidose Typ VII, Sly-Krankheit, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich, Neugeborenenzeit, Kindesalter, Kleinkindalter, Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "E76.2", "OMIM": "253220", "UMLS": "C0085132", "MeSH": "D016538", "GARD": "7096", "MedDRA": "10056893", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei der Geburt wird mit 1/345.000 - 5.000.000 angegeben. Allerdings wird die H\u00e4ufigkeit m\u00f6glicherweise untersch\u00e4tzt, da die pr\u00e4natale Form als h\u00e4ufigste Pr\u00e4sentation nach wie vor unterdiagnostiziert ist.", "clinical_description": "Die klinischen Symptome sind extrem variabel: Es gibt pr\u00e4natale Formen mit nicht-immunem Hydrops fetalis und schwere neonatale Formen mit Dysmorphien, Hernien, Hepatosplenomegalie, Klumpf\u00fc\u00dfen, Dysostose, Kleinwuchs und schwerer Hypotonie und neurologischer Beteiligung, die bei \u00fcberlebenden Patienten schlie\u00dflich zu einem tiefgreifenden intellektuellen Defizit f\u00fchren. Am anderen Ende des Spektrums gibt es sehr milde F\u00e4lle, die in der Adoleszenz oder im Erwachsenenalter entdeckt werden, nachdem sie mit einer Thoraxkyphose vorgestellt wurden.", "etiology": "Urs\u00e4chlich f\u00fcr die Krankheit sind Mutationen im GUSB -Gen (7q11.21). Sie resultieren in einem beta-D-Glucuronidase-Mangel, der zu einer Anh\u00e4ufung verschiedener Glykosaminoglykane (Dermatansulfat (DS), Heparansulfat (HS) und Chondroitinsulfat (CS)) in Lysosomen f\u00fchrt.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose wird durch den r\u00f6ntgenologischen Nachweis einer Dysostose multiplex und den Nachweis einer erh\u00f6hten Glykosaminoglykanausscheidung im Urin (entweder CS allein oder CS+HS+DS) unterst\u00fctzt, obwohl dieses Zeichen bei adulten Formen fehlen kann. Die Diagnose wird durch den Nachweis eines Beta-D-Glucuronidase-Mangels in kultivierten Leukozyten oder Fibroblasten best\u00e4tigt. Pseudodefiziente Allele machen milde Formen schwieriger zu identifizieren und die pr\u00e4natale Diagnose schwierig.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Differentialdiagnose umfasst andere Mukopolysaccharidosen und Oligosaccharidosen. Die Messung der Enzymaktivit\u00e4t in Leukozyten erm\u00f6glicht bei schweren Formen den Nachweis von heterozygoten Personen. Wenn beide Mutationen beim Patienten bekannt sind, ist die Identifizierung von verwandten Heterozygoten sehr zuverl\u00e4ssig.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Die Diagnose ist bei Formen mit in utero-Pr\u00e4sentation m\u00f6glich und kann das Wiederauftreten von Schwangerschaften verhindern, die zum in utero-Tod oder zum sp\u00e4ten Abbruch der Schwangerschaft f\u00fchren. Die pr\u00e4natale Diagnose (durch molekulare Analyse oder durch Messung der Enzymaktivit\u00e4t im Trophoblasten oder in den Amniozyten) kann den Eltern eines betroffenen Kindes angeboten werden. Die Eltern sollten \u00fcber die Verf\u00fcgbarkeit einer Enzymersatztherapie (ERT) informiert werden.", "genetic_counseling": "Das Vererbungsmuster ist autosomal-rezessiv.", "management_and_treatment": "Die ERT mit rekombinanter humaner Beta-Glucuronidase ist in Europa und den USA f\u00fcr MPS Typ 7 zugelassen und hat in klinischen Studien Verbesserungen beim Gehen, der Lungenfunktion und der Hepatosplenomegalie gezeigt. Nach wie vor erm\u00f6glicht ein multidisziplin\u00e4res Management eine angepasste symptomatische Behandlung, die f\u00fcr die Verbesserung der Lebensqualit\u00e4t der Patienten unerl\u00e4sslich ist. Bei Sp\u00e4tformen erfolgt die Behandlung haupts\u00e4chlich orthop\u00e4disch. Eine Knochenmarkstransplantation war bei drei von f\u00fcnf Patienten erfolgreich.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist bei den pr\u00e4natalen Formen, die oft zum Tod im Uterus f\u00fchren, generell schlecht. Neugeborene Formen und Formen im Kindesalter haben meist eine sehr begrenzte Lebenserwartung, w\u00e4hrend mildere Formen eine l\u00e4ngere \u00dcberlebenszeit aufweisen. Obwohl die ERT jetzt verf\u00fcgbar ist, liegen noch keine Langzeitdaten f\u00fcr Patienten vor, die mit dieser Therapie behandelt wurden.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei der Geburt wird mit 1/345.000 - 5.000.000 angegeben. Allerdings wird die H\u00e4ufigkeit m\u00f6glicherweise untersch\u00e4tzt, da die pr\u00e4natale Form als h\u00e4ufigste Pr\u00e4sentation nach wie vor unterdiagnostiziert ist."}, {"name": "Beta-Ketothiolase-Mangel", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic organic aciduria affecting ketone body metabolism and the catabolism of isoleucine and characterized by intermittent ketoacidotic episodes associated with vomiting, dyspnea, tachypnoea, hypotonia, lethargy and coma, with an onset during infancy and usually ceasing by adolescence.", "synonyms": "3-ketothiolase deficiency, 3-oxothiolase deficiency, Alpha methylacetoacetic aciduria, Alpha-methyl-acetoacetyl-CoA thiolase deficiency, Mitochondrial acetoacetyl-coenzyme A thiolase deficiency, T2 deficiency, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal, Childhood", "icd_10": "E71.1", "omim": "203750", "umls": "C1536500", "gard": "872", "epidemiology": "The estimated birth prevalence ranges between 1/100,000 to 230,000 worldwide.", "clinical_description": "Children often appear normal at birth with disease presentation typically between the ages of 5 months to 2 years; however, presentation may occur anywhere between birth and childhood. The onset of symptoms usually occurs in the form of a ketoacidotic crisis, most often brought on by stress, fasting, acute illness and/or infections (i.e. gastroenteritis), and rarely by increased dietary protein intake. An acetone or fruity odor on the breath often signals ketoacidosis. These episodes are associated with vomiting, dyspnea, lethargy and unconsciousness, and can lead to coma and death if not treated. Neurological sequelae (such as developmental delay) following severe episodes are common. Rarely, patients present with signs of metabolic encephalopathy (hypotonia, dysarthria, chorea, developmental delay). The occurrence of developmental delay or neurological manifestations before a first ketoacidotic crisis, however, is rare. The frequency of episodes decreases with age, eventually stopping before adolescence. In between episodes, patients are often asymptomatic.", "etiology": "This disease is caused by mutations (over 100 described) in the gene, ACAT1 (11q22.3). This gene encodes the enzyme acetyl-CoA acetyltransferase which, when its activity is reduced or absent, impairs the breakdown of isoleucine and acetoacetyl- CoA, hampering the utilization of ketone bodies and leading to toxic accumulations of isoleucine derived acyl-CoA esters in the body.", "diagnostic_methods": "Most patients are diagnosed by demonstrating metabolic acidosis and ketosis, by urinary organic acid analysis (2-methyl-3-hydroxybutyrate (the most reliable marker), 2- methylacetoacetate and tiglylglycine), or by acylcarnitine analysis during metabolic decompensation. Diagnosis can be confirmed by cultured fibroblast enzyme assays (reduced potassium-dependent acetoacetyl-CoA thiolase activity) and molecular genetic testing. Computed tomography of the brain may reveal basal ganglia lesions that have been reported in some patients. Newborn screening programs are available in certain countries including the U.S. and Australia.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnosis includes sepsis, other organic acidurias, HSD10 disease and succinyl-CoA:3-ketoacid CoA transferase deficiency, and other conditions that cause ketoacidosis in childhood.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "In families with a known disease causing mutation, prenatal testing is possible by molecular genetic testing or enzyme activity assays using cultured amniocytes.", "genetic_counseling": "The pattern of inheritance is autosomal recessive. The risk of inheriting the disease is 25% where both parents are unaffected carriers.", "management_and_treatment": "During a ketoacidotic crisis, intravenous fluids with glucose and electrolytes should be administered immediately. Bicarbonate (initially as 1mmol/kg over 10 minutes followed by continuous infusion) should be given to treat acidosis. Carnitine supplementation may be helpful. Dialysis is effective but usually not necessary. Unconscious patients and those with severe dyspnea may require mechanical ventilation. Long-term management involves avoidance of fasting (and intravenous glucose in cases of fever or vomiting) and, in children, a mildly restricted protein intake (1.5-2g/kg/day), avoidance of fat-rich (ketogenic) diet, and L-carnitine therapy in those with low carnitine levels. Avoidance of isoleucine overload might prevent neurological complications, but currently there is no evidence to support this.", "prognosis": "The prognosis is often good if detected early and treated properly so as to prevent ketoacidotic attacks."}, {"name": "Beta-Mannosidose", "german_description": "Die Beta-Mannosidose ist eine lysosomale Erkrankung aus der Gruppe der Oligosaccharidosen. Wegen der fehlenden Aktivit\u00e4t der lysosomalen Beta-Mannosidase kommt es in der Zelle zur Anh\u00e4ufung eines Disaccharides. Nachdem der Defekt schon l\u00e4ngere Zeit bei Tieren bekannt war, ist er erst vor kurzem auch beim Menschen nachgewiesen worden. Nur ein Dutzend F\u00e4lle dieser autosomal-rezessiv vererbten Erkrankung wurden bisher beschrieben, das klinische Bild ist deshalb bisher nicht vollst\u00e4ndig bekannt. Es ist variabel und beim Menschen insgesamt leichter ausgepr\u00e4gt als bei Tieren. Symptome sind geistige Retardierung, H\u00f6rverlust, manchmal auch neurologische Auff\u00e4lligkeiten (Hypotonie und Krampfanf\u00e4lle), Dysmorphien und rezidivierende Atemwegsinfekte. Die Diagnose erfolgt durch Aktivit\u00e4tsbestimmung der Beta-Mannosidase in Leukozyten des peripheren Blutes, im Plasma und in kultivierten Fibroblasten, sowie durch den Nachweis des Disaccharids im Urin. Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnose ist m\u00f6glich, eine spezifische Behandlung gibt es nicht. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Beta-mannosidosis is a very rare lysosomal storage disease characterized by developmental delay of varying severity and hearing loss, but that can manifest a wide phenotypic heterogeneity.", "synonyms": "Beta-mannosidase deficiency, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal, Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "E77.1", "omim": "248510", "umls": "C0342849\u00a0 C2931893", "mesh": "D044905", "gard": "869"}, {"name": "Beta-Mercaptolaktat-Cystein Disulfidurie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "An extremely rare disorder of methionine cycle and sulfur amino acid metabolism characterized by increased urine excretion of beta-mercaptolactate-cysteine disulfide (due to deficiency of mercaptopyruvate sulfurtransferase activity in erythrocytes), leading to a positive cyanide nitroprusside test. Association with intellectual disability, congenital lens dislocation, and behavioral abnormalities has been reported, however the causal link remains to be established. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1981.", "synonyms": "3-mercaptopyruvate sulfurtransferase deficiency, Ampola syndrome, MCDU, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "No data available", "icd_10": "E72.1", "omim": "249650", "umls": "C0796055", "gard": "654"}, {"name": "Beta-Myosinschwerkette (MYH7), qualitative oder quantitative Defekte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Beta-propeller-Protein-assoziierte Neurodegeneration", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Beta-propeller protein-associated neurodegeneration (BPAN), also known as static encephalopathy of childhood with neurodegeneration in adulthood, is a rare form of neurodegeneration with brain iron accumulation (NBIA) characterized by early-onset developmental delay and further neurological deterioration in early adulthood.", "synonyms": "BPAN, NBIA5, Neurodegeneration with brain iron accumulation type 5, SENDA, Static encephalopathy of childhood with neurodegeneration in adulthood, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G23.0", "omim": "300894", "gard": "12570"}, {"name": "Beta-Sarkoglycan, qualitative oder quantitative Defekte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Beta-Sarkoglykan-assoziierte Gliederg\u00fcrtelmuskeldystrophie R4", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine Unterform der autosomal-rezessiven Gliederg\u00fcrtel-Muskeldystrophie, die durch eine im Kindes- bis Jugendalter beginnende, fortschreitende Muskelschw\u00e4che des Becken- und Schulterg\u00fcrtels gekennzeichnet ist, die insbesondere den Beckeng\u00fcrtel (Adduktoren und H\u00fcftbeuger) betrifft. Normalerweise geh\u00f6rt die Kniemuskulatur zu den fr\u00fchesten und am meisten betroffenen Muskeln. In fortgeschrittenen Stadien wird eine Beteiligung des Schulterg\u00fcrtels (die zu muskul\u00e4rer Schw\u00e4che des Schulterblatts f\u00fchrt) und der distalen Muskelgruppen beobachtet. Wadenhypertrophie, Kardiomyopathie, Beeintr\u00e4chtigung der Atmung, Sehnenkontrakturen, Skoliose und trainingsinduzierte Myoglobinurie k\u00f6nnen ebenfalls beobachtet werden.", "synonyms": "Beta-Sarkoglykan-assoziierte LGMD R4, Beta-Sarkoglykanopathie, Gliederg\u00fcrtelmuskeldystrophie Typ 2E, Gliederg\u00fcrtelmuskeldystrophie durch beta-Sarkoglykan-Mangel, Gliederg\u00fcrtelmuskeldystrophie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 2E, LGMD Typ 2E, LGMD durch beta-Sarkoglykan-Defizienz, LGMD2E, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "G71.0", "OMIM": "604286", "UMLS": "C1858593\u00a0 C2930900", "GARD": "3851\u00a0 870"}, {"name": "Beta-Sarkoglykan-assoziierte LGMD R4", "sub_name": "Beta-Sarkoglykan-assoziierte Gliederg\u00fcrtelmuskeldystrophie R4", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine Unterform der autosomal-rezessiven Gliederg\u00fcrtel-Muskeldystrophie, die durch eine im Kindes- bis Jugendalter beginnende, fortschreitende Muskelschw\u00e4che des Becken- und Schulterg\u00fcrtels gekennzeichnet ist, die insbesondere den Beckeng\u00fcrtel (Adduktoren und H\u00fcftbeuger) betrifft. Normalerweise geh\u00f6rt die Kniemuskulatur zu den fr\u00fchesten und am meisten betroffenen Muskeln. In fortgeschrittenen Stadien wird eine Beteiligung des Schulterg\u00fcrtels (die zu muskul\u00e4rer Schw\u00e4che des Schulterblatts f\u00fchrt) und der distalen Muskelgruppen beobachtet. Wadenhypertrophie, Kardiomyopathie, Beeintr\u00e4chtigung der Atmung, Sehnenkontrakturen, Skoliose und trainingsinduzierte Myoglobinurie k\u00f6nnen ebenfalls beobachtet werden.", "synonyms": "Beta-Sarkoglykan-assoziierte LGMD R4, Beta-Sarkoglykanopathie, Gliederg\u00fcrtelmuskeldystrophie Typ 2E, Gliederg\u00fcrtelmuskeldystrophie durch beta-Sarkoglykan-Mangel, Gliederg\u00fcrtelmuskeldystrophie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 2E, LGMD Typ 2E, LGMD durch beta-Sarkoglykan-Defizienz, LGMD2E, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "G71.0", "OMIM": "604286", "UMLS": "C1858593\u00a0 C2930900", "GARD": "3851\u00a0 870"}, {"name": "Beta-Sarkoglykanopathie", "sub_name": "Beta-Sarkoglykan-assoziierte Gliederg\u00fcrtelmuskeldystrophie R4", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine Unterform der autosomal-rezessiven Gliederg\u00fcrtel-Muskeldystrophie, die durch eine im Kindes- bis Jugendalter beginnende, fortschreitende Muskelschw\u00e4che des Becken- und Schulterg\u00fcrtels gekennzeichnet ist, die insbesondere den Beckeng\u00fcrtel (Adduktoren und H\u00fcftbeuger) betrifft. Normalerweise geh\u00f6rt die Kniemuskulatur zu den fr\u00fchesten und am meisten betroffenen Muskeln. In fortgeschrittenen Stadien wird eine Beteiligung des Schulterg\u00fcrtels (die zu muskul\u00e4rer Schw\u00e4che des Schulterblatts f\u00fchrt) und der distalen Muskelgruppen beobachtet. Wadenhypertrophie, Kardiomyopathie, Beeintr\u00e4chtigung der Atmung, Sehnenkontrakturen, Skoliose und trainingsinduzierte Myoglobinurie k\u00f6nnen ebenfalls beobachtet werden.", "synonyms": "Beta-Sarkoglykan-assoziierte LGMD R4, Beta-Sarkoglykanopathie, Gliederg\u00fcrtelmuskeldystrophie Typ 2E, Gliederg\u00fcrtelmuskeldystrophie durch beta-Sarkoglykan-Mangel, Gliederg\u00fcrtelmuskeldystrophie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 2E, LGMD Typ 2E, LGMD durch beta-Sarkoglykan-Defizienz, LGMD2E, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "G71.0", "OMIM": "604286", "UMLS": "C1858593\u00a0 C2930900", "GARD": "3851\u00a0 870"}, {"name": "Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie", "german_description": "Die Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie (BT) ist gekennzeichnet durch mangelhafte (B+) oder fehlende (B-) Synthese der Beta-Globinkette des H\u00e4moglobins (Hb). Die Pr\u00e4valenz in der Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung ist nicht bekannt. Die Krankheit wurde zuerst in den Mittelmeerl\u00e4ndern beschrieben, aber schwere Formen der BT gibt es auch im Mittleren Osten, in S\u00fcdostasien, Indien und China. Wanderungs-bewegungen haben zur globalen Verbreitung der Krankheit beigetragen. Drei Typen der BT wurden beschrieben: (i) Die Thalassaemia minor (BT-minor) ist die heterozygote Form und in der Regel ohne Symptome; (ii) Die Thalassaemia major (Cooley-An\u00e4mie, BT-major) ist die homozygote Form. Als Folge von Dyserythropoese und H\u00e4molyse haben die Patienten eine mikrozyt\u00e4re hypochrome An\u00e4mie und eine Splenomegalie. Die Krankheitszeichen treten im Alter von 6-24 Monaten auf. Die schwere An\u00e4mie erfordert systematische Transfusionen, um den Hb-Spiegel im Bereich von 90-100 g/L zu halten und eine normale k\u00f6rperliche Aktivit\u00e4t zu erm\u00f6glichen. Die Transfusion von Erythrozytenkonzentraten f\u00fchrt zur Eisen\u00fcberladung. Daraus folgt eine ung\u00fcnstige vitale Prognose (durch Beteiligung des Herzens) und eine signifikante Morbidit\u00e4t (durch Symptome von seiten des Endokriniums und der Leber); (iii) Als Thalassaemia intermedia (BTI) werden etwa 10% der homozygoten Formen und eine gr\u00f6\u00dfere Zahl von Formen mit Compound-Heterozygotie zusammengefasst. Der Grad der An\u00e4mie ist unterschiedlich, aber weniger schwer als bei BT-major, und die Krankheit wird auch sp\u00e4ter diagnostiziert. Manche, aber nicht alle Patienten mit BTI ben\u00f6tigen gelegentliche Transfusionen. Hypersplenismus, Gallensteine, extramedull\u00e4re Blutbildung, thrombotische Komplikationen und progrediente Eisen\u00fcberladung sind m\u00f6gliche Symptome. Die Diagnose der BT basiert auf der Hb-Analyse durch Elektrophorese oder HPLC. Bei der BT-major ist HbA stark reduziert oder fehlt ganz und HbF \u00fcberwiegt. Bei der BT-minor ist HbA2 vermehrt, und der Hb-Spiegel ist in der Regel normal, mit mikrozyt\u00e4rer und hypochromer Pseudo-Polyzyth\u00e4mie. Die BT wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt, rund 200 Mutationen wurden im Beta-Globin-Gen HBB (11p15.5) identifiziert. F\u00fcr Mutationsanalyse, Therapieplanung und evtl. vorgeburtliche Diagnostik wird eine genetische Beratung empfohlen. F\u00fcr die BT existieren zwei Behandlungsstrategien. (i) Eine Kombination von Transfusionen und Chelatbildnern. Durch fr\u00fch beginnende, regelm\u00e4\u00dfige parenterale Gabe von Deferoxamin ist in den letzten 30 Jahren die Lebenserwartung angestiegen. Die orale Anwendung aktiver Eisen-Chelatoren und die Kontrolle der Eisen\u00fcberladung der Gewebe mit Magnetresonanz-Bildgebung wird wahrscheinlich zu einer weiteren Verbesserung f\u00fchren, aber in Langzeitstudien m\u00fcssen Morbidit\u00e4t und Mortalit\u00e4t erfasst werden. Im Jahr 2006 erhielt Deferasirox in der EU die Marktzulassung als Orphan-Medikament zur Behandlung der BT. Trotz seiner kardioprotektiven Eigenschaften ist Deferasirox nur f\u00fcr F\u00e4lle zugelassen, in denen Deferoxamine ohne Wirkung oder kontraindiziert ist. (ii) Die Transplantation h\u00e4matopoetischer Stammzellen ist f\u00fcr die BT das einzige kurative Verfahren: Bei Kindern mit HLA-identischen Familienangeh\u00f6rigen wurden sehr g\u00fcnstige Ergebnisse erzielt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Beta-thalassemia (BT) is characterized by deficiency (Beta+) or absence (Beta0) of synthesis of the beta globin chains of hemoglobin (Hb).", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "D56.1", "omim": "603902\u00a0 613985", "umls": "C0005283", "mesh": "D017086", "gard": "871", "meddra": "10043391", "epidemiology": "Exact prevalence is unknown but annual incidence at birth of symptomatic BT is estimated at 1/100,000 worldwide. The disease was initially described in the Mediterranean basin but severe forms of BT frequently occur throughout the Middle East, South East Asia, India and China. Population migrations have lead to global distribution of the disease.", "clinical_description": "Three main types of BT have been described (minor, intermedia and major; see these terms). 1) Thalassemia minor (BT-minor, BT trait) is the heterozygous form and is usually asymptomatic. 2) Thalassemia major (Cooley anemia; BT-major) is the homozygous form and associates splenomegaly and microcytic and hypochromic anemia resulting from dyserythropoiesis and hemolysis. Onset generally occurs from 6-24 months of age. The severe anemia requires systematic transfusions to maintain Hb levels above the range of 90-100 g/L and to allow normal activity. Long-term transfusion of red cell concentrates results in iron overload which hampers the vital prognosis (mainly due to cardiac involvement) and causes significant morbidity (due to endocrinal and hepatic iron deposition). 3) Thalassemia intermedia (BTI) in which the anemia is less severe and diagnosed later in life compared to BT-major. Patients with BTI may or may not require occasional transfusions. Hypersplenism, cholelithiasis, extramedullary hematopoiesis, thrombotic complications and progressive iron overload are the main clinical features that may complicate the course of BTI. Other forms include BT associated with Hb anomalies (HbE - beta-thalassemia resulting in BTI or less frequently BT-major, HbC - beta-thalassemia, delta-beta-thalassemia and hereditary persistence of fetal Hb with BT resulting in inconstant manifestations of BTI; see these terms). Rare autosomal dominant forms have also been described (dominant beta-thalassemia; see this term). In rare instances, BT trait is associated with trichothiodystrophy or X-linked thrombocytopenia (see these terms).", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis of BT anemia relies on analysis of Hb by electrophoresis or HPLC. In BT-major, HbA is absent or greatly reduced and HbF predominates. In BT-minor, the levels of HbA2 are increased and the levels Hb are usually normal to low with microcytosis and hypochromia.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive and around 200 mutations (B0 or B+) have been identified. Genetic counseling is recommended to permit couples who are at risk an informed choice among available options including prenatal diagnosis.", "management_and_treatment": "There are two major treatment options for BT. 1) A combination of regular transfusions and iron chelation therapy with early and regular parenteral deferoxamine administration has led to increased survival during the last 40 years. Availability of new oral iron chelators and monitoring of cardiac iron overload by MRI result in further clinical improvement and current evaluation is ongoing to determine their impact on morbidity and mortality. In 2006, deferasirox, a once-daily orally administered iron chelator, obtained EU marketing authorization as an Orphan drug for first-line treatment of BT-related iron overload. The marketing authorization for deferiprone, another orally active iron chelator, particularly effective in removing heart iron, is restricted to cases in which treatment with deferoxamine fails or is contraindicated. 2) Hematopoietic stem cell transplant is the curative treatment for BT major: results are very favorable for children displaying an HLA-identical familial donor. Recently, a first patient was successfully treated with gene therapy.", "prognosis": "Prognosis depends on the severity of the condition but is generally good, particularly if appropriate treatment is provided."}, {"name": "Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie, dominante", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Dominante Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie, eine Form der Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie (s. dort), geht mit moderater bis schwerer An\u00e4mie einher.", "synonyms": "Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie mit Einschlussk\u00f6rpern, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "D56.1", "OMIM": "603902", "UMLS": "C1858990", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form ist nicht bekannt.", "clinical_description": "Symptome sind neben der moderaten bis schweren An\u00e4mie Ikterus und Splenomegalie.", "etiology": "Seltene Mutationen im Betaglobin-Gen (HBB; 11p15.5) f\u00fchren zur Synthese extrem instabiler Betaketten, die in den roten Vorstufen pr\u00e4zipitieren, mit der Folge einer ineffektiven Erythropoese. An extrem instabiles H\u00e4moglobin soll bei Patienten mit Beta-Thalassaemia intermedia (s. dort) gedacht werden, wenn die Beta-Thal\u00e4ss\u00e4mie in der Familie autosomal-dominant vererbt wird. Wenn beide Eltern h\u00e4matologisch unauff\u00e4llig sind, ist an eine Neumatation zu denken.", "diagnostic_methods": "Durch Sequenzierung des Beta-Gens wird die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form ist nicht bekannt."}, {"name": "Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie intermedia", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Beta-Thalassaemia (BT) intermedia, eine Form der BT ist gekennzeichnet durch milde oder moderate An\u00e4mie, die nicht oder nur gelegentlich eine Transfusion erfordert. Die BT ist h\u00e4ufig in den Mittelmeerl\u00e4ndern, im Mittleren Osten, Indien, S\u00fcd-China, Nordafrika und S\u00fcdamerika.", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "D56.1", "OMIM": "613985", "UMLS": "C0472767", "MedDRA": "10062923", "epidemiology": "Die Jahres-Inzidenz symptomatischer F\u00e4lle von BT betr\u00e4gt weltweit etwa 1:100.000 und in der EU 1:10.000. Die Pr\u00e4valenz der BT intermedia ist nicht bekannt.", "clinical_description": "Die BT intermedia umfasst ein weites klinisches Spektrum: Eher schwere F\u00e4lle erkranken im Alter zwischen 2 und 6 Jahren mit An\u00e4mie, Splenomegalie und manchmal Hepatomegalie, verlangsamtem Wachstum und verz\u00f6gerter Entwicklung. In anderen F\u00e4llen besteht bei nur leichter An\u00e4mie bis in das Erwachsenenalter hinein Beschwerdefreiheit. Oft hypertrophiert das rote Knochenmark, und es kann zu extramedull\u00e4rer Erythropoese kommen, mit charakteristischen Deformationen der Knochen und des Gesichtes, mit Osteoporose und pathologischen Frakturen der langen Knochen und mit Bildung erythropoetischer Herde vor allem in Milz, Leber, Lymphknoten, Thorax und Wirbels\u00e4ule. Seltener verursacht die extramedull\u00e4re Erythropoese neurologische St\u00f6rungen (Kompression des R\u00fcckenmarks mit Paraplegie). Die Patienten k\u00f6nnen auch Ulcus cruris und Gallensteine entwickeln. Im Vergleich zur BT major besteht nach bisherigen Berichten eine erh\u00f6hte Thromboseneigung, besonders nach Splenektomie. Obwohl die Patienten das Risiko einer Eisen\u00fcberladung tragen, sind dennoch Hypogonadismus, Hypothyreose und Diabetes nicht h\u00e4ufig. Wegen hohen Herzzeitvolumens und Lungenhochdruck ist auch eine Beteiligung des Herzens m\u00f6glich, wobei die systolische Funktion des linken Ventrikels in der Regel erhalten bleibt.", "etiology": "Ursache der BT intermedia sind homozygote oder compound-heterozygote kleine oder stumme Mutationen im HBB-Gen (11p15.5), das f\u00fcr die Betaketten des H\u00e4moglobins (Hb) kodiert. Die Krankheit wird im allgemeinen autosomal-rezessiv, selten autosomal-dominant vererbt.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren das klinische Bild, die Ergebnisse der Blutanalysen (Hb-Konzentration zwischen 7 und 10 g/dl, mittleres korpuskul\u00e4res Volumen (MCV) zwischen 50 und 80 fl, mittleres korpuskul\u00e4res Hb (MCH) zwischen 16 und 24 pg), H\u00e4moglobinanalyse und molekulare Analyse.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Differentialdiagnose umfasst die genetischen Sideroblastenan\u00e4mien, die kongenitalen dyserythropoetischen An\u00e4mien und andere Krankheiten mit hohem HbF-Spiegel (z.B. Myelomonozyt\u00e4re Leuk\u00e4mie und aplastische An\u00e4mie).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Vorgeburtliche Diagnostik ist ausgew\u00e4hlten F\u00e4llen vorbehalten.", "genetic_counseling": "Patienten und Paare mit Risiko werden im Rahmen der genetischen Beratung \u00fcber die Art der Vererbung allgemein und in der Familie und \u00fcber das klinische Bild aufgekl\u00e4rt.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung ist symptomatisch. Eine Supplementierung mit Fols\u00e4ure kann einem Mangel durch die gesteigerte Aktivit\u00e4t des Knochenmarks vorbeugen. Extramedull\u00e4re Erythropoeseherde werden radiologisch, mit Transfusionen oder mit Hydroxycarbamid behandelt. Die wichtigsten Indikationen f\u00fcr die Splenektomie sind klinische Folgen der Splenomegalie (Hypersplenismus), eine Verschlechterung der An\u00e4mie, die nicht durch tempor\u00e4re Faktoren, z.B. Infektion, zu erkl\u00e4ren ist und die manchmal mit Leukopenie und/oder Thrombozytopenie einhergeht, verlangsamtes Wachstum und kardiale St\u00f6rungen. Eisen\u00fcberladung wird mit Chelatbildnern behandelt. Vor chirurgischen Eingriffen ist zur Vermeidung von Thrombosen eine geeignete Antikoagulation erforderlich. Schwangere m\u00fcssen multidisziplin\u00e4r und mit Beteiligung von Spezialisten f\u00fcr die Therapie der Thalass\u00e4mie betreut werden.", "prognosis": "Bei angemessener \u00dcberwachung und Behandlung ist die Prognose in der Regel g\u00fcnstig. Die Patienten haben gew\u00f6hnlich keine schwere H\u00e4mosiderose und neigen weniger zu durch Eisen\u00fcberladung bedingten kardialen Problemen. Jedoch kann die Lebenserwartung durch Lungenhochdruck, thromboembolische Komplikationen, foudroyante Sepsis nach Splenektomie und durch Auftreten eines Leberzellkrebses eingeschr\u00e4nkt sein.", "summary": "Die Jahres-Inzidenz symptomatischer F\u00e4lle von BT betr\u00e4gt weltweit etwa 1:100.000 und in der EU 1:10.000. Die Pr\u00e4valenz der BT intermedia ist nicht bekannt."}, {"name": "Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie major", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Beta-Thalassaemia (BT) major, eine schwere, fr\u00fch manifeste Form der BT, ist gekennzeichnet durch schwere An\u00e4mie, die regelm\u00e4\u00dfige Transfusionen von Erythrozyten erfordert.", "synonyms": "Cooley-An\u00e4mie, Mittelmeeran\u00e4mie, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "D56.1", "OMIM": "613985", "UMLS": "C0002875", "epidemiology": "Die Jahres-Inzidenz symptomatischer F\u00e4lle betr\u00e4gt weltweit etwa 1:100.000 und in der EU 1:10.000. Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form ist nicht bekannt.", "clinical_description": "Die Symptome beginnen im S\u00e4uglingsalter mit schwerer An\u00e4mie, Gedeihst\u00f6rung und zunehmender Bl\u00e4sse. F\u00fctterprobleme, Diarrhoe, Schreckhaftigkeit, rezidivierende Fiebersch\u00fcbe und zunehmende Vergr\u00f6\u00dferung des Abdomens durch Splenomegalie und Hepatomegalie sind weitere m\u00f6gliche Symptome. Unbehandelte oder schlecht transfundierte Patienten wachsen verlangsamt und sind blass und ikterisch. Sie zeigen eine schlecht entwickelte Muskulatur, Genu valgum, Beinulzera und durch extramedull\u00e4re H\u00e4matopoese bedingte Ver\u00e4nderungen: Anschwellung von Weichteilen und Skelettver\u00e4nderungen, z.B. Verformung der langen Beinknochen und typische kranio-faziale Ver\u00e4nderungen wie vorspringende Stirn, prominenten Jochbeinbogen, flachen Nasemr\u00fccken, Tendenz zu schr\u00e4g aufw\u00e4rts verlaufenden Lidspalten und Hypertrophie der Maxilla mit Freilegung der oberen Z\u00e4hne. Bei regelm\u00e4\u00dfig transfundierten Patienten sind Wachstum und Entwicklung eher normal, es entwickeln sich aber im Gefolge der Eisen\u00fcberladung Komplikationen wie retardiertes Wachstum und fehlende oder verz\u00f6gerte Geschlechtsreife. Sp\u00e4ter auftretende Komplikationen der Eisen\u00fcberladung sind dilatative Kardiomyopathie, Arrhythmien, Leberfibrose und -zirrhose, Diabetes mellitus, sowie Insuffizienz von Nebenschilddr\u00fcse, Schilddr\u00fcse, Hypophyse und, seltener, Nebenniere. Andere Komplikationen sind Hypersplenismus, Venenthrombose und Osteoporose.", "etiology": "Ursache der BT sind homozygote oder compound-heterozygote Punktmutationen oder, seltener, Deletionen im HBB-Gen (11p15.5) mit der Folge verminderter (Beta+) oder fehlender (Beta-) Synthese der H\u00e4moglobin (Hb)-Betaketten.", "diagnostic_methods": "Den diagnostischen Verdacht weckt ein weniger als zwei Jahre altes Kind mit schwerer mikrozyt\u00e4rer An\u00e4mie, leichtem Ikterus und Hepatosplenomegalie. Die Blutanalyse ergibt reduzierte Hb-Spiegel (< 7g/dl), ein mittleres korpuskul\u00e4res Volumen (MCV) zwischen 50 und 70 fl, ein mittleres korpuskul\u00e4res Hb (MCH) zwischen 12 und 20 pg, Anisopoikilozytose und Erythroblasten im peripheren Blutausstrich. Durch Hb-Analyse und Mutationsnachweis wird die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Differentialdiagnose ist in der Regel einfach und umfasst die genetischen sideroblastischen An\u00e4mien, die kongenitalen dyserythropoetischen An\u00e4mien und andere Krankheiten mit hohem HbF-Spiegel (z.B. juvenile myelomonozyt\u00e4re Leuk\u00e4mie und aplastische An\u00e4mien).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik nach Amniozentese und Pr\u00e4implantationsdiagnostik sind m\u00f6glich, wenn beide krankheitsverursachenden Mutationen bekant sind.", "genetic_counseling": "Den Eltern und Patienten soll eine genetische Beratung angeboten werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung besteht in lebenslangen Transfusionen (zur Korrektur der An\u00e4mie und zur Unterdr\u00fcckung der Erythropoese), in der Hemmung der Eisenresorption im Magendarmtrakt (die bei nicht transfundierten Patienten Folge einer vermehrten, aber ineffizienten Erythropoese ist). Mit Eisen-Chelierung soll nach 10-15 Transfusionen begonnen werden, wenn die Ferritin-Spiegel \u00fcber 1.000 ng/ml angestiegen sind. Zur Betreuung geh\u00f6rt auch die Behandlung der aus der Eisen\u00fcberladung folgenden Komplikationen (verlangsamtes Wachstum, versp\u00e4tete Pubert\u00e4t. Hypogonadismus, Hypoparathyreoidismus, Hypothyreose, Diabetes und Osteoporose). Eine Splenektomie kann erforderlich werden. Die Knochenmark-Transplantation ist bisher die einzige kurative Ma\u00dfnahme. K\u00fcrzlich wurde bei einem Patienten erfolgreich eine Gentherapie durchgef\u00fchrt.", "prognosis": "Patienten die nicht regelm\u00e4\u00dfig Transfusionen und Eisenchelierung erhalten, versterben in der Regel vor dem 2. oder 3. Lebensjahrzehnt, regelm\u00e4\u00dfig transfundierte und chelierte Patienten haben eine h\u00f6here Lebenserwartung. Immer noch sind Komplikationen des Herzens die h\u00e4ufigste Todesursache.", "summary": "Die Jahres-Inzidenz symptomatischer F\u00e4lle betr\u00e4gt weltweit etwa 1:100.000 und in der EU 1:10.000. Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form ist nicht bekannt."}, {"name": "Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie mit assoziierter sonstiger H\u00e4moglobin-Anomalie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Beta-Thalass\u00e4mien in Verbindung mit H\u00e4moglobin (Hb)-Anomalien manifestieren sich in einem breiten klinischen Spektrum, das, abh\u00e4ngig vom Schweregrad der Thalass\u00e4mie-Mutation und dem Typ der Hb-Anomalie [Heredit\u00e4re Persistenz des fetalen Hb, Delta-Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie, Hb C - Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie, Hb E - Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie und Hb S - Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie (s. diese Termini)], von fehlender bis zu schwerer Symptomatik reicht.", "synonyms": "Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie mit assoziierter sonstiger Hb-Anomalie, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "D58.2"}, {"name": "Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie mit assoziierter sonstiger Hb-Anomalie", "sub_name": "Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie mit assoziierter sonstiger H\u00e4moglobin-Anomalie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Beta-Thalass\u00e4mien in Verbindung mit H\u00e4moglobin (Hb)-Anomalien manifestieren sich in einem breiten klinischen Spektrum, das, abh\u00e4ngig vom Schweregrad der Thalass\u00e4mie-Mutation und dem Typ der Hb-Anomalie [Heredit\u00e4re Persistenz des fetalen Hb, Delta-Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie, Hb C - Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie, Hb E - Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie und Hb S - Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie (s. diese Termini)], von fehlender bis zu schwerer Symptomatik reicht.", "synonyms": "Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie mit assoziierter sonstiger Hb-Anomalie, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "D58.2"}, {"name": "Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie mit Einschlussk\u00f6rpern", "sub_name": "Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie, dominante", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Dominante Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie, eine Form der Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie (s. dort), geht mit moderater bis schwerer An\u00e4mie einher.", "synonyms": "Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie mit Einschlussk\u00f6rpern, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "D56.1", "OMIM": "603902", "UMLS": "C1858990", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form ist nicht bekannt.", "clinical_description": "Symptome sind neben der moderaten bis schweren An\u00e4mie Ikterus und Splenomegalie.", "etiology": "Seltene Mutationen im Betaglobin-Gen (HBB; 11p15.5) f\u00fchren zur Synthese extrem instabiler Betaketten, die in den roten Vorstufen pr\u00e4zipitieren, mit der Folge einer ineffektiven Erythropoese. An extrem instabiles H\u00e4moglobin soll bei Patienten mit Beta-Thalassaemia intermedia (s. dort) gedacht werden, wenn die Beta-Thal\u00e4ss\u00e4mie in der Familie autosomal-dominant vererbt wird. Wenn beide Eltern h\u00e4matologisch unauff\u00e4llig sind, ist an eine Neumatation zu denken.", "diagnostic_methods": "Durch Sequenzierung des Beta-Gens wird die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form ist nicht bekannt."}, {"name": "Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie mit weiteren Manifestationen", "english": 0, "defenition": "Beta-Thalass\u00e4mien mit zus\u00e4tzlichen Symptomen sind eine Gruppe von Beta-Thalass\u00e4mien (s. dort), die mit einer anderen Krankheit assoziiert auftreten.", "ICD-10": "D58.2", "etiology": "Diese Formen haben keine Beziehung zu Defekten im Betaglobin-Gencluster, sondern sind verursacht durch Mutationen im Gen f\u00fcr den Transkriptionsfaktor TFIIH (ERCC2;19q13.2-q13.3) (Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie - Trichothiodystrophie) oder im Gen f\u00fcr den X-chromosomalen Transkriptionsfaktor GATA-1 (GATA1; Xp11.23) (Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie - X-chromosomale Thrombozytopenie; s. diese Termini).", "summary": "Diese Formen haben keine Beziehung zu Defekten im Betaglobin-Gencluster, sondern sind verursacht durch Mutationen im Gen f\u00fcr den Transkriptionsfaktor TFIIH (ERCC2;19q13.2-q13.3) (Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie - Trichothiodystrophie) oder im Gen f\u00fcr den X-chromosomalen Transkriptionsfaktor GATA-1 (GATA1; Xp11.23) (Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie - X-chromosomale Thrombozytopenie; s. diese Termini)."}, {"name": "Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie und verwandte Krankheiten", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "D56.1", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie-X-chromosomale Thrombozytopenie-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie - X-chromosomale Thrombozytopenie, eine Form der Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie (s. dort), ist gekennzeichnet durch Splenomegalie, Petechien, moderate Thrombozytopenie, verl\u00e4ngerte Blutungszeit als Folge einer Funktionsst\u00f6rung der Thrombozyten, Retikulozytose und milde Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie.", "synonyms": "XLTT, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "ICD-10": "D69.4", "OMIM": "314050", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form ist nicht bekannt.", "clinical_description": "Ursache dieser Krankheit sind nicht Mutationen im HBB-Gen (11p15.5), sondern Mutationen im GATA1-Gen (Xp11.23), das f\u00fcr das GATA-bindende Protein 1 kodiert. Die Mutationen bedingen eine verminderte Expression des Betaglobin-Gens. Die Krankheit wird X-chromosomal vererbt.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form ist nicht bekannt."}, {"name": "Beta-Ureidopropionase-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Beta-Ureido-Propionase-Mangel, ist eine sehr seltene, bisher bei weniger als 10 Patienten beschriebene St\u00f6rung des Pyrimidin-Stoffwechsels mit extrem unterschiedlicher Symptomatik, von asymptomatischen F\u00e4llen bis zu neurologischen Symptomen (Epilepsie, Autismus) und Entwicklungsst\u00f6rungen (urogenital, kolorektal).", "synonyms": "Beta-Alanin-Synthase-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "E79.8", "OMIM": "613161", "UMLS": "C1291512"}, {"name": "Bethlem-Myopathie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Bethlem-Myopathie ist eine gutartige, progrediente Muskeldystrophie mit autosomal-dominanter Vererbung.", "synonyms": "Myopathie, benigne dominante, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G71.0", "OMIM": "158810\u00a0 616471", "UMLS": "C1834674", "MeSH": "C535436", "GARD": "873", "epidemiology": "Bislang wurden in der Literatur weniger als 100 F\u00e4lle gemeldet.", "clinical_description": "Sie unterscheidet sich kaum von anderen Formen milder progredienter Muskeldystrophie, lediglich Fingerkontrakturen k\u00f6nnen manchmal ein diagnostischer Hinweis sein.", "etiology": "Mutationen in einer der drei Untereinheiten von Kollagen VI sind f\u00fcr die Erkrankung verantwortlich. Die Gr\u00f6\u00dfe der Gene und deren Expressionsmuster (Splicing) erschweren eine molekulare Diagnostik.", "diagnostic_methods": "Kreatinkinase (CK)-Werte und histologische Befunde sind nicht eindeutig.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung bleibt rein unterst\u00fctzend.", "summary": "Bislang wurden in der Literatur weniger als 100 F\u00e4lle gemeldet."}, {"name": "Bewegungsst\u00f6rung, erworbene periphere", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Bewegungsst\u00f6rung, genetisch bedingte, seltene", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Bewegungsst\u00f6rung, seltene", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C0026650", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Bewegungsst\u00f6rung, seltene paroxysmale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Bewegungsst\u00f6rung, stereotype", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "BFIE", "sub_name": "Epilepsie, benigne famili\u00e4re infantile", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Benigne famili\u00e4re infantile Epilepsie (BFIE) ist ein erblich-epileptisches Syndrom, das durch das Auftreten von wiederholten fieberfreien Anf\u00e4llen bei gesunden S\u00e4uglingen zwischen dem dritten und achten Lebensmonat gekennzeichnet ist.", "synonyms": "BFIE, BFIS, Benigne famili\u00e4re Epilepsie des Kindesalters, Benigne famili\u00e4re infantile Krampfanf\u00e4lle, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G40.3", "OMIM": "601764\u00a0 605751\u00a0 607745\u00a0 612627\u00a0 617080", "UMLS": "C0220669", "GARD": "856\u00a0 857", "epidemiology": "Obwohl weltweit BFIE-F\u00e4lle beschrieben wurden, sind Pr\u00e4valenz und Inzidenz unbekannt. In einer argentinischen Fallserie wurde BFIE als dritth\u00e4ufigster Epilepsie-Typ in den ersten zwei Lebensjahren aufgelistet.", "clinical_description": "Anf\u00e4lle treten normalerweise zwischen dem dritten und dem achten Lebensmonat auf, wobei H\u00e4ufungen (Cluster, 8-10 am Tag) wiederholter und kurzer Episoden (2-5 Minuten) \u00fcber einen Zeitraum von wenigen Tagen auftreten. Sie sind meist fokal, k\u00f6nnen aber manchmal auch generalisieren. Patienten weisen eine motorische Hemmung, Unansprechbarkeit, Kopf- und/oder Augenabweichungen zu einer Seite hin, Vor-sich-hinstarren, flatternde Augenlider, Grunzen, Cyanose, eine diffuse Hypertonie und unilaterale oder bilaterale klonische Zuckungen der Extremit\u00e4ten auf. Im interiktalen Zeitraum erlangt der Patient wieder sein volles Bewusstsein und ist normal aktiv. Die psychomotorische Entwicklung ist normal. Regelm\u00e4\u00dfig werden in der Familie F\u00e4lle gleichen Epilepsietyps gefunden. Es wurde ein Syndrom namens Famili\u00e4re infantile Krampfanf\u00e4lle und Choreoathetose (ICCA; siehe dort) beobachtet, bei dem BFIE-Patienten in der Kindheit und/oder Adoleszenz choreoathetotische dyskinetische Anf\u00e4lle zeigen, die spontan oder nach verschiedenen Stimuli (z.B. Sport, Stress) auftreten. In einigen wenigen F\u00e4llen tritt BFIE zusammen mit famili\u00e4rer oder sporadischer hemiplegischer Migr\u00e4ne auf.", "etiology": "Die BFIE ist eine genetisch heterogene Krankheit. In der Mehrzahl der F\u00e4lle wurden Mutationen im PRRT2-Gen (16p11.2) gefunden. Dieses Gen kodiert das Prolinreiche Transmembranprotein 2, ein Membranprotein, das mit dem pr\u00e4synaptischen Protein SNAP-25 interagiert. Mutationen wurden au\u00dferdem im SCN2A-Gen (2q24.3) gefunden, das den Hirn-Natriumkanal NaV1.2 kodiert, sowie selten auch in den Kaliumkanal-Genen KCNQ2 (20q13.33) und KCNQ3 (8q24). Schlie\u00dflich wurden in den Chromosomen-Regionen 19q, 16p und 1p drei weitere Loci identifiziert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf dem Elektroenzephalogramm (EEG) und Videoaufnahmen, die Familienanamnese ist dabei ein wichtiger Hinweis. Das Anfalls-EEG lokalisiert den Ursprung der partiellen Anf\u00e4lle in die parietal-okzipitale Region und zeigt, dass die betroffene Hemisph\u00e4re sich von Episode zu Episode unterscheiden kann. Die Anf\u00e4lle k\u00f6nnen sich manchmal generalisieren und das gesamte Gehirn befallen. W\u00e4hrend eines Anfall-Clusters zeigt das post-iktale EEG lateralisierte okzipito-parietale Deltawellen und Spikes. Au\u00dferhalb des Clusters ist das interiktale EEG im Wachen und Schlafen normal. Die interiktale neurologische Untersuchung und die Bildgebung des Gehirns (Gehirn-CT und/oder MRI) sind normal. Gentests best\u00e4tigen die Diagnose.", "differential_diagnosis": "Eine Differentialdiagnose sind die Benignen famili\u00e4ren neonatal-infantilen Krampfanf\u00e4lle (siehe dort), ein epileptisches Syndrom mit Beginn zwischen dem S\u00e4uglings- und Kleinkindalter, das mit der BFIE gemeinsame Merkmale hat und vor allem durch Mutationen im SCN2A-Gen verursacht wird. Weitere Differentialdiagnosen sind die Benignen nicht-famili\u00e4ren infantilen Krampfanf\u00e4lle, die Benignen infantilen Anf\u00e4lle, die mit einer milden Gastroenteritis assoziiert sind, und die Benigne fokale Epilepsie mit Mittellinien-Spikes und Wellen w\u00e4hrend des Schlafs (BIMSE) (siehe jeweils dort).", "genetic_counseling": "Die BFIE wird als autosomal-dominantes Merkmal mit unvollst\u00e4ndiger Penetranz vererbt.", "management_and_treatment": "Bei einer anti-epileptischen Behandlung (z.B. Carbamazepin, Valproat, Phenobarbital) verschwinden die Symptome rasch und den Berichten zufolge kommt es auch nicht zu einem erneuten Auftauchen eines anderen Epilepsietyps. Bei Patienten mit einer eindeutigen Familienanamnese kann die Behandlung nach wenigen Monaten abgebrochen werden.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist gut. Die Anf\u00e4lle verschwinden meist nach den ersten Lebensjahren und zeigen keinerlei neurologische Sp\u00e4tfolgen.", "summary": "Obwohl weltweit BFIE-F\u00e4lle beschrieben wurden, sind Pr\u00e4valenz und Inzidenz unbekannt. In einer argentinischen Fallserie wurde BFIE als dritth\u00e4ufigster Epilepsie-Typ in den ersten zwei Lebensjahren aufgelistet."}, {"name": "BFIS", "sub_name": "Epilepsie, benigne famili\u00e4re infantile", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Benigne famili\u00e4re infantile Epilepsie (BFIE) ist ein erblich-epileptisches Syndrom, das durch das Auftreten von wiederholten fieberfreien Anf\u00e4llen bei gesunden S\u00e4uglingen zwischen dem dritten und achten Lebensmonat gekennzeichnet ist.", "synonyms": "BFIE, BFIS, Benigne famili\u00e4re Epilepsie des Kindesalters, Benigne famili\u00e4re infantile Krampfanf\u00e4lle, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G40.3", "OMIM": "601764\u00a0 605751\u00a0 607745\u00a0 612627\u00a0 617080", "UMLS": "C0220669", "GARD": "856\u00a0 857", "epidemiology": "Obwohl weltweit BFIE-F\u00e4lle beschrieben wurden, sind Pr\u00e4valenz und Inzidenz unbekannt. In einer argentinischen Fallserie wurde BFIE als dritth\u00e4ufigster Epilepsie-Typ in den ersten zwei Lebensjahren aufgelistet.", "clinical_description": "Anf\u00e4lle treten normalerweise zwischen dem dritten und dem achten Lebensmonat auf, wobei H\u00e4ufungen (Cluster, 8-10 am Tag) wiederholter und kurzer Episoden (2-5 Minuten) \u00fcber einen Zeitraum von wenigen Tagen auftreten. Sie sind meist fokal, k\u00f6nnen aber manchmal auch generalisieren. Patienten weisen eine motorische Hemmung, Unansprechbarkeit, Kopf- und/oder Augenabweichungen zu einer Seite hin, Vor-sich-hinstarren, flatternde Augenlider, Grunzen, Cyanose, eine diffuse Hypertonie und unilaterale oder bilaterale klonische Zuckungen der Extremit\u00e4ten auf. Im interiktalen Zeitraum erlangt der Patient wieder sein volles Bewusstsein und ist normal aktiv. Die psychomotorische Entwicklung ist normal. Regelm\u00e4\u00dfig werden in der Familie F\u00e4lle gleichen Epilepsietyps gefunden. Es wurde ein Syndrom namens Famili\u00e4re infantile Krampfanf\u00e4lle und Choreoathetose (ICCA; siehe dort) beobachtet, bei dem BFIE-Patienten in der Kindheit und/oder Adoleszenz choreoathetotische dyskinetische Anf\u00e4lle zeigen, die spontan oder nach verschiedenen Stimuli (z.B. Sport, Stress) auftreten. In einigen wenigen F\u00e4llen tritt BFIE zusammen mit famili\u00e4rer oder sporadischer hemiplegischer Migr\u00e4ne auf.", "etiology": "Die BFIE ist eine genetisch heterogene Krankheit. In der Mehrzahl der F\u00e4lle wurden Mutationen im PRRT2-Gen (16p11.2) gefunden. Dieses Gen kodiert das Prolinreiche Transmembranprotein 2, ein Membranprotein, das mit dem pr\u00e4synaptischen Protein SNAP-25 interagiert. Mutationen wurden au\u00dferdem im SCN2A-Gen (2q24.3) gefunden, das den Hirn-Natriumkanal NaV1.2 kodiert, sowie selten auch in den Kaliumkanal-Genen KCNQ2 (20q13.33) und KCNQ3 (8q24). Schlie\u00dflich wurden in den Chromosomen-Regionen 19q, 16p und 1p drei weitere Loci identifiziert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf dem Elektroenzephalogramm (EEG) und Videoaufnahmen, die Familienanamnese ist dabei ein wichtiger Hinweis. Das Anfalls-EEG lokalisiert den Ursprung der partiellen Anf\u00e4lle in die parietal-okzipitale Region und zeigt, dass die betroffene Hemisph\u00e4re sich von Episode zu Episode unterscheiden kann. Die Anf\u00e4lle k\u00f6nnen sich manchmal generalisieren und das gesamte Gehirn befallen. W\u00e4hrend eines Anfall-Clusters zeigt das post-iktale EEG lateralisierte okzipito-parietale Deltawellen und Spikes. Au\u00dferhalb des Clusters ist das interiktale EEG im Wachen und Schlafen normal. Die interiktale neurologische Untersuchung und die Bildgebung des Gehirns (Gehirn-CT und/oder MRI) sind normal. Gentests best\u00e4tigen die Diagnose.", "differential_diagnosis": "Eine Differentialdiagnose sind die Benignen famili\u00e4ren neonatal-infantilen Krampfanf\u00e4lle (siehe dort), ein epileptisches Syndrom mit Beginn zwischen dem S\u00e4uglings- und Kleinkindalter, das mit der BFIE gemeinsame Merkmale hat und vor allem durch Mutationen im SCN2A-Gen verursacht wird. Weitere Differentialdiagnosen sind die Benignen nicht-famili\u00e4ren infantilen Krampfanf\u00e4lle, die Benignen infantilen Anf\u00e4lle, die mit einer milden Gastroenteritis assoziiert sind, und die Benigne fokale Epilepsie mit Mittellinien-Spikes und Wellen w\u00e4hrend des Schlafs (BIMSE) (siehe jeweils dort).", "genetic_counseling": "Die BFIE wird als autosomal-dominantes Merkmal mit unvollst\u00e4ndiger Penetranz vererbt.", "management_and_treatment": "Bei einer anti-epileptischen Behandlung (z.B. Carbamazepin, Valproat, Phenobarbital) verschwinden die Symptome rasch und den Berichten zufolge kommt es auch nicht zu einem erneuten Auftauchen eines anderen Epilepsietyps. Bei Patienten mit einer eindeutigen Familienanamnese kann die Behandlung nach wenigen Monaten abgebrochen werden.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist gut. Die Anf\u00e4lle verschwinden meist nach den ersten Lebensjahren und zeigen keinerlei neurologische Sp\u00e4tfolgen.", "summary": "Obwohl weltweit BFIE-F\u00e4lle beschrieben wurden, sind Pr\u00e4valenz und Inzidenz unbekannt. In einer argentinischen Fallserie wurde BFIE als dritth\u00e4ufigster Epilepsie-Typ in den ersten zwei Lebensjahren aufgelistet."}, {"name": "BFLS", "sub_name": "Borjeson-Forssman-Lehmann-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das B\u00f6rjeson-Forssman-Lehmann-Syndrom (BFLS) ist ein seltenes, X-chromosomales Adipositas-Syndrom mit geistiger Behinderung, stammbetonter Adipositas, charakteristischen Gesichtsmerkmalen, Hypogonadismus und konischen Fingern und kurzen Zehen.", "synonyms": "BFLS, Intelligenzminderung-Epilepsie-endokrine St\u00f6rung-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "301900", "UMLS": "C0265339", "MeSH": "C536575", "GARD": "936", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist unbekannt. Bisher wurden ca. 50 F\u00e4lle aus 24 Familien sowie sporadische F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Das BFLS tritt vor allem bei Jungen auf, es sind jedoch auch mehrere weibliche Patienten mit milder bis gem\u00e4\u00dfigter Symptomatik in betroffenen Familien und bei isolierten F\u00e4llen dokumentiert. Das klinische Bild ist au\u00dferordentlich unterschiedlich. Bei der Geburt zeigen sich gelegentlich gro\u00dfe Ohren und kleine Genitalien. Der Kopfumfang ist unterschiedlich, alle S\u00e4uglinge sind muskelhypoton und trinkschwach. Eine Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung wird h\u00e4ufig vor Ende des ersten Lebensjahres beobachtet. Im sp\u00e4ten Kindesalter zeigt sich eine auffallende stammbetonte Adipositas. Die Finger sind \u00fcberstreckbar und und konisch geformt, die F\u00fc\u00dfe sind in der Regel breit mit gebeugten, kurzen Zehen. Die meisten Patienten sind von kleiner Statur, jedoch sind einige auch normal gro\u00df. In der Adoleszenz entwickelt sich eine Gyn\u00e4komastie und die Genitalien bleiben meist klein. Au\u00dferdem treten in der Adoleszenz charakteristische grobe Gesichtsz\u00fcge auf, mit tiefliegenden Augen, schmaler Stirn, supraorbitalen W\u00fclsten, Ptose und gro\u00dfen, fleischigen Ohrl\u00e4ppchen. Alle diese Merkmale sind im Erwachsenenalter noch deutlicher ausgepr\u00e4gt. Das Ausma\u00df der geistigen Behinderung reicht von leicht bis schwer und ist nicht progredient. Die Patienten sind in der Regel kontaktfreudig und freundlich, einige zeigen jedoch auch Angstst\u00f6rungen, Depressionen und herausforderndes oder hypersexuelles Verhalten. Seltener beschrieben wurden akute T-Zell-Lymphoblasten-Leuk\u00e4mie, Morbus Perthes (LCPD), Lippen-Kiefer- Gaumenspalten (siehe jeweils dort), Hypopituitarismus, Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, Epilepsie und milde bis generalisierte Polyneuropathie. Weibliche Gentr\u00e4ger sind meist symptomfrei, jedoch kann es bei ihnen in seltenen F\u00e4llen zu Lernst\u00f6rungen sowie einigen der bei m\u00e4nnlichen Patienten beobachteten K\u00f6rpermerkmale kommen.", "etiology": "Ursache des BFLS sind Mutationen im PHF6-Gen (Xq26). Das Genprodukt PHF6 ist am Zellwachstum und an der Zellproliferation beteiligt. Im Allgemeinen f\u00fchren Mutationen, die zu einem Verlust oder einer Verringerung der PHF6-Expression f\u00fchren, zu schwereren klinischen Symptomen. Funktionsverlustmutationen und ungleiche X-Inaktivierung werden zur Erkl\u00e4rung des seltenen Vorkommens symptomatischer weiblicher Patienten herangezogen. Die meisten F\u00e4lle famili\u00e4r, aber auch mehrere isolierte F\u00e4lle mit unbekannter \u00c4tiologie wurden beschrieben.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Verdachtsdiagnose BFLS folgt aus der klinischen Untersuchung mit dem Nachweis der charakteristischen Symptome. Eine Familienanamnese mit Hinweis auf X-chromosomal- rezessive Vererbung und schiefe X-Inaktivierung bei obligaten weiblichen \u00dcbertr\u00e4gern sind weitere diagnostische Indikatoren. Der Nachweis einer PHF6-Mutation kann die Diagnose best\u00e4tigen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind: Coffin-Lowry-, Klinefelter-, Prader-Willi-, Bardet-Biedl- und Wilson-Turner-Syndrom (siehe jeweils dort).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Wenn bei der Mutter oder einem betroffenen Vater eine PHF6-Mutation nachgewiesen wurde, ist eine pr\u00e4natale Diagnose m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Das BFLS wird X-chromosomal vererbt. In der genetischen Beratung wird den Familien die X-chromosomale Vererbung erkl\u00e4rt, um weibliche \u00dcbertr\u00e4ger zu identifizieren. Nur sehr wenige BFLS-Patienten sind fertil, jedoch k\u00f6nnen symptomfreie weibliche \u00dcbertr\u00e4ger die Mutation an ihre Kinder weitergeben.", "management_and_treatment": "F\u00fcr das BFLS gibt es keine kurative Therapie. Das Management und die Behandlung von BFLS erfolgt symptomatisch. Die Heilp\u00e4dagogik beginnt fr\u00fchzeitig und dauert \u00fcber die Adoleszenz bis in das Erwachsenenalter an. Es wird eine gesunde Ern\u00e4hrungsweise empfohlen. Erwachsene ben\u00f6tigen ein unterschiedliches Ma\u00df an Betreuung, die in schweren F\u00e4llen auch die Unterbringung in einer Einrichtung einschlie\u00dfen kann. Zur Behandlung einer Gyn\u00e4komastie ist eine Testosteronersatztherapie und/oder eine bilaterale Mastektomie in Betracht zu ziehen. Wenn es zu Anf\u00e4llen kommt, werden Antiepileptika verschrieben. Es existieren symptomatische Behandlungen bei LCPD und Beeintr\u00e4chtigungen des Geh\u00f6rs. Ein soziales Netz ist wichtig, da BFLS-Patienten aus engen sozialen Beziehungen besonderen Nutzen ziehen.", "prognosis": "Das BFLS ist nicht lebensbedrohlich, aber aufgrund der damit verbundenen geistigen Behinderung ist die Lebensqualit\u00e4t eingeschr\u00e4nkt und eine lebenslange Betreuung oft erforderlich.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist unbekannt. Bisher wurden ca. 50 F\u00e4lle aus 24 Familien sowie sporadische F\u00e4lle beschrieben."}, {"name": "BFNE", "sub_name": "Benigne famili\u00e4re Neugeborenenepilepsie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Benigne Famili\u00e4re Neugeborenenepilepsie (BFNE) ist eine seltene genetisch bedingte Form der Epilepsie, die durch das Auftreten von nicht-fiebrigen Kr\u00e4mpfen in den ersten Lebenstagen bei sonst gesunden Neugeborenen gekennzeichnet ist.", "synonyms": "BFNE, BFNS, Krampfanf\u00e4lle, benigne neonatale, famili\u00e4re Form, Neugeborenenkr\u00e4mpfe, benigne famili\u00e4re, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G40.3", "OMIM": "121200\u00a0 121201\u00a0 269720\u00a0 608217", "UMLS": "C0220669\u00a0 C2930911", "MeSH": "C535466\u00a0 D020936", "GARD": "1519", "MedDRA": "10067866", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist noch unbekannt, da die Krankheit wahrscheinlich h\u00e4ufig gar nicht erkannt wird. Bislang wurden 100 betroffene Familien beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Bei sonst gesunden Neugeborenen treten die Krampfanf\u00e4lle erstmalig zwischen dem zweiten und achten Lebenstag auf. Die Anf\u00e4lle sind meist fokal, beeintr\u00e4chtigen wahlweise beide K\u00f6rperh\u00e4lften und f\u00fchren h\u00e4ufig zur Apnoe. Sie k\u00f6nnen isoliert oder in Clustern auftreten und sind meist von kurzer Dauer (1-2 Minuten). Allerdings k\u00f6nnen sie bis zu 20-mal pro Tag auftreten und zum Status Epilepticus f\u00fchren. Anf\u00e4lle k\u00f6nnen w\u00e4hrend des Wach- oder Schlafzustands auftreten. Initial ist oft eine tonische Haltung und Apnoe zu beobachten, welche sekund\u00e4r h\u00e4ufig durch klonische Bewegungen und motorische Automatismen abgel\u00f6st wird. Zwischen den Anf\u00e4llen weisen die Neugeborenen keine neurologischen Besonderheiten auf, wobei eine geringf\u00fcgige Sedierung unter antikonvulsiver Therapie zu beobachten ist. Meist erhalten die Kinder in der Neugeborenenperiode eine antikonvulsive Medikation, obwohl die Krampfanf\u00e4lle h\u00e4ufig nach den ersten Lebensmonaten selbstlimitierend sind und nach dem ersten Lebensjahr in der Regel nicht mehr auftreten. Bei 10-15 % der Patienten zeigen sich jedoch auch sp\u00e4ter in der Kindheit noch fiebrige oder fieberfreie Krampfanf\u00e4lle. Die weitere psychomotorische Entwicklung ist normal.", "etiology": "BFNE ist eine genetisch heterogene Erkrankung aufgrund von Mutationen in den Genen KCNQ2 (20q13.33) und KCNQ3 (8q24), die beide f\u00fcr Untereinheiten spannungsgesteuerter Kaliumkan\u00e4le kodieren. Mutationen in KCNQ2 f\u00fchren au\u00dferdem zu der KCNQ2-assoziierten epileptischen Enzephalopathie, die eine schwere Form von neonataler Epilepsie darstellt.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Kombination aus EEG-Ver\u00e4nderungen und klinischer Pr\u00e4sentation deuten auf die Krankheit hin: Der typische Krampfanfall beginnt mit asymmetrisch-tonischer Haltung und Apnoe gefolgt von beidseitigen rhythmischen Myoklonien. Die Neugeborenen sind neurologisch unauff\u00e4llig und auch die weitere neurologische und kognitive Entwicklung ist in der Regel normal. Das iktal aufgezeichnete Elektroenzephalogramm (EEG) ist meist unspezifisch, wobei sich interiktale Auff\u00e4lligkeiten haupts\u00e4chlich \u00fcber den zentralen Regionen zeigen k\u00f6nnen. Die Diagnose wird durch eine genetische Untersuchung gesichert.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Differentialdiagnose beinhaltet die benigne famili\u00e4re fr\u00fchkindliche Epilepsie sowie benigne famili\u00e4re neonatal-infantile Krampfanf\u00e4lle.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Die pr\u00e4natale Diagnostik ist nur m\u00f6glich, wenn die krankheitsverursachende Mutation in der Familie bereits bekannt ist.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Vererbung erfolgt autosomal-dominant mit reduzierter Penetranz. Eine humangenetische Beratung sollte betroffenen Familien angeboten werden und \u00fcber die 50%-ige Vererbungswahrscheinlichkeit der krankheitsausl\u00f6senden Mutation informieren. In seltenen F\u00e4llen tritt die Erkrankung de novo auf.", "management_and_treatment": "Zur Unterdr\u00fcckung der Anf\u00e4lle in der Neugeborenenzeit ist eine antikonvulsive Therapie (z. B. mit Phenobarbital, Phenytoin, Valproat, Carbamazepin) insbesondere bei F\u00e4llen mit h\u00e4ufigen Anf\u00e4llen oder Status Epilepticus indiziert. Die Behandlung erfolgt \u00fcblicherweise w\u00e4hrend der ersten 6-12 Lebensmonate. Jedoch sollten die Familie und behandelnden \u00c4rzte beachten, dass es in Ausnahmef\u00e4llen einer Behandlung \u00fcber den 12. Lebensmonat hinaus bedarf.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist gut. In der Regel kommt es im ersten Lebensjahr zur Spontanremission und die Patienten zeigen keine bleibenden neurologischen Sch\u00e4digungen. Es gibt Berichte \u00fcber sp\u00e4tere Anf\u00e4lle in der Kindheit, darunter gelegentliche Fieberkr\u00e4mpfe und idiopathische Epilepsiesydrome (z. B. Rolando-Epilepsie).", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist noch unbekannt, da die Krankheit wahrscheinlich h\u00e4ufig gar nicht erkannt wird. Bislang wurden 100 betroffene Familien beschrieben."}, {"name": "BFNIS", "sub_name": "Krampfanf\u00e4lle, benigne famili\u00e4re neonatal-infantile", "german_description": "Die Benignen neonatal-infantilen Kr\u00e4mpfe (BFNIS) sind ein gutartiges famili\u00e4res Epilepsie-Syndrom. Im Ph\u00e4notyp stehen die BFNIS zwischen den Benignen famili\u00e4ren neonatalen Kr\u00e4mpfen (BFNS) und den Benignen famili\u00e4ren infantilen Kr\u00e4mpfen (BFIS; s. diese Termini). Bisher wurde das Syndrom in 10 Familien bei jeweils mehreren Mitgliedern beschrieben. In diesen Familien begannen die BFNIS zwischen dem Tag 2 postnatal und dem 6. Lebensmonat. Bei den meisten F\u00e4llen kam es innerhalb des ersten Lebensjahres zur Spontanremission. Wie bei den BFNS und BFIS treten die Kr\u00e4mpfe in Serien an einem oder wenigen Tagen mit posterior-fokalem Beginn auf. Ursache der BFNIS sind Mutationen im SCN2A-Gen (2q24.3), das f\u00fcr die Alpha-Untereinheit Na(V)1.2 eines spannungsgesteuerten Natriumkanals kodiert. Die Vererbung ist autosomal-dominant. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Benign familial neonatal-infantile seizures (BFNIS) is a benign familial epilepsy syndrome with an intermediate phenotype between benign familial neonatal seizures (BFNS) and benign familial infantile seizures (BFIS; see these terms). So far, this syndrome has been described in multiple members of 10 families. Age of onset in these BFNIS families varied from 2 days to 6 months, with spontaneous resolution in most cases before the age of 12 months. Like BFNS and BFIS, seizures in BFNIS generally occur in clusters over one or a few days with posterior focal seizure onset. BFNIS is caused by mutations in the SCN2A gene (2q24.3), encoding the voltage-gated sodium channel alpha-subunit Na(V)1.2. Transmission is autosomal dominant.", "synonyms": "BFNIS, Benign neonatal-infantile epilepsy, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G40.4", "omim": "607745", "umls": "C0220669", "gard": "1518", "meddra": "10067866"}, {"name": "BFNS", "sub_name": "Benigne famili\u00e4re Neugeborenenepilepsie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Benigne Famili\u00e4re Neugeborenenepilepsie (BFNE) ist eine seltene genetisch bedingte Form der Epilepsie, die durch das Auftreten von nicht-fiebrigen Kr\u00e4mpfen in den ersten Lebenstagen bei sonst gesunden Neugeborenen gekennzeichnet ist.", "synonyms": "BFNE, BFNS, Krampfanf\u00e4lle, benigne neonatale, famili\u00e4re Form, Neugeborenenkr\u00e4mpfe, benigne famili\u00e4re, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G40.3", "OMIM": "121200\u00a0 121201\u00a0 269720\u00a0 608217", "UMLS": "C0220669\u00a0 C2930911", "MeSH": "C535466\u00a0 D020936", "GARD": "1519", "MedDRA": "10067866", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist noch unbekannt, da die Krankheit wahrscheinlich h\u00e4ufig gar nicht erkannt wird. Bislang wurden 100 betroffene Familien beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Bei sonst gesunden Neugeborenen treten die Krampfanf\u00e4lle erstmalig zwischen dem zweiten und achten Lebenstag auf. Die Anf\u00e4lle sind meist fokal, beeintr\u00e4chtigen wahlweise beide K\u00f6rperh\u00e4lften und f\u00fchren h\u00e4ufig zur Apnoe. Sie k\u00f6nnen isoliert oder in Clustern auftreten und sind meist von kurzer Dauer (1-2 Minuten). Allerdings k\u00f6nnen sie bis zu 20-mal pro Tag auftreten und zum Status Epilepticus f\u00fchren. Anf\u00e4lle k\u00f6nnen w\u00e4hrend des Wach- oder Schlafzustands auftreten. Initial ist oft eine tonische Haltung und Apnoe zu beobachten, welche sekund\u00e4r h\u00e4ufig durch klonische Bewegungen und motorische Automatismen abgel\u00f6st wird. Zwischen den Anf\u00e4llen weisen die Neugeborenen keine neurologischen Besonderheiten auf, wobei eine geringf\u00fcgige Sedierung unter antikonvulsiver Therapie zu beobachten ist. Meist erhalten die Kinder in der Neugeborenenperiode eine antikonvulsive Medikation, obwohl die Krampfanf\u00e4lle h\u00e4ufig nach den ersten Lebensmonaten selbstlimitierend sind und nach dem ersten Lebensjahr in der Regel nicht mehr auftreten. Bei 10-15 % der Patienten zeigen sich jedoch auch sp\u00e4ter in der Kindheit noch fiebrige oder fieberfreie Krampfanf\u00e4lle. Die weitere psychomotorische Entwicklung ist normal.", "etiology": "BFNE ist eine genetisch heterogene Erkrankung aufgrund von Mutationen in den Genen KCNQ2 (20q13.33) und KCNQ3 (8q24), die beide f\u00fcr Untereinheiten spannungsgesteuerter Kaliumkan\u00e4le kodieren. Mutationen in KCNQ2 f\u00fchren au\u00dferdem zu der KCNQ2-assoziierten epileptischen Enzephalopathie, die eine schwere Form von neonataler Epilepsie darstellt.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Kombination aus EEG-Ver\u00e4nderungen und klinischer Pr\u00e4sentation deuten auf die Krankheit hin: Der typische Krampfanfall beginnt mit asymmetrisch-tonischer Haltung und Apnoe gefolgt von beidseitigen rhythmischen Myoklonien. Die Neugeborenen sind neurologisch unauff\u00e4llig und auch die weitere neurologische und kognitive Entwicklung ist in der Regel normal. Das iktal aufgezeichnete Elektroenzephalogramm (EEG) ist meist unspezifisch, wobei sich interiktale Auff\u00e4lligkeiten haupts\u00e4chlich \u00fcber den zentralen Regionen zeigen k\u00f6nnen. Die Diagnose wird durch eine genetische Untersuchung gesichert.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Differentialdiagnose beinhaltet die benigne famili\u00e4re fr\u00fchkindliche Epilepsie sowie benigne famili\u00e4re neonatal-infantile Krampfanf\u00e4lle.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Die pr\u00e4natale Diagnostik ist nur m\u00f6glich, wenn die krankheitsverursachende Mutation in der Familie bereits bekannt ist.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Vererbung erfolgt autosomal-dominant mit reduzierter Penetranz. Eine humangenetische Beratung sollte betroffenen Familien angeboten werden und \u00fcber die 50%-ige Vererbungswahrscheinlichkeit der krankheitsausl\u00f6senden Mutation informieren. In seltenen F\u00e4llen tritt die Erkrankung de novo auf.", "management_and_treatment": "Zur Unterdr\u00fcckung der Anf\u00e4lle in der Neugeborenenzeit ist eine antikonvulsive Therapie (z. B. mit Phenobarbital, Phenytoin, Valproat, Carbamazepin) insbesondere bei F\u00e4llen mit h\u00e4ufigen Anf\u00e4llen oder Status Epilepticus indiziert. Die Behandlung erfolgt \u00fcblicherweise w\u00e4hrend der ersten 6-12 Lebensmonate. Jedoch sollten die Familie und behandelnden \u00c4rzte beachten, dass es in Ausnahmef\u00e4llen einer Behandlung \u00fcber den 12. Lebensmonat hinaus bedarf.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist gut. In der Regel kommt es im ersten Lebensjahr zur Spontanremission und die Patienten zeigen keine bleibenden neurologischen Sch\u00e4digungen. Es gibt Berichte \u00fcber sp\u00e4tere Anf\u00e4lle in der Kindheit, darunter gelegentliche Fieberkr\u00e4mpfe und idiopathische Epilepsiesydrome (z. B. Rolando-Epilepsie).", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist noch unbekannt, da die Krankheit wahrscheinlich h\u00e4ufig gar nicht erkannt wird. Bislang wurden 100 betroffene Familien beschrieben."}, {"name": "BH4-responsive HPA/PKU", "sub_name": "Hyperphenylalanin\u00e4mie/Phenylketonurie, Tetrahydrobiopterin-responsive", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form von PKU ist nicht bekannt, aber ein signifikanter Anteil (10-30 %) von Patienten mit PKU profitiert von einer Therapie mit BH4.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of phenylketonuria (PKU), an inborn error of amino acid metabolism, characterized by mild to moderate symptoms of PKU including impaired cognitive function, seizures, and behavioral and developmental disorders, and a marked reduction of elevated phenylalanine concentrations after oral loading with tetrahydrobiopterin (BH4), an essential cofactor of phenylalanine hydroxylase.", "synonyms": "BH4-responsive HPA/PKU, BH4-responsive hyperphenylalaninemia/phenylketonuria, Tetrahydrobiopterin-responsive HPA/PKU, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "E70.1"}, {"name": "BHC", "sub_name": "Chorea, benigne heredit\u00e4re", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, movement disorder characterized by early-onset, very slowly progressive choreiform movements that may involve variable parts of the body, typically aggravated by stress or anxiety, in various members of a family. Additional variable manifestations include hypotonia, often resulting in psychomotor delay (including gait disturbances) and dysarthria, as well as myoclonus, dystonia, behavioral symptoms (ADHD, obsessive-compulsive disorder), learning difficulties (particularly in writing) and spasticity with hyperreflexia and/or flexor/extensor plantar reflexes.", "synonyms": "BHC, Benign familial chorea, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "G25.5", "omim": "118700\u00a0 215450", "umls": "C0393584\u00a0 C1859098", "gard": "1305"}, {"name": "BHMED", "sub_name": "Dysplasie, epiphys\u00e4re multiple, Typ 5", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Multiple epiphyseal dysplasia type 5 is a multiple epiphyseal dysplasia characterized by an early-onset of pain and stiffness (involving knee and hip), progressive deformity of the extremities and precocious osteoarthritis associated with delayed and irregular ossification of epiphyses. Features specific to multiple epiphyseal dysplasia, type 5 include normal stature and lesser incidence of gait abnormalities. Radiographs reveal epiphyseal and metaphyseal irregularities. Multiple epiphyseal dysplasia type 5 follows an autosomal dominant mode of transmission.", "synonyms": "BHMED, Bilateral hereditary micro-epiphyseal dysplasia, EDM5, MED5, Polyepiphyseal dysplasia type 5, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q77.3", "omim": "607078", "umls": "C1846843", "mesh": "C535505", "gard": "9794"}, {"name": "Biber-Haab-Dimmer-Dystrophie", "sub_name": "Hornhautdystrophie, gittrige, Typ 1", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die gittrige Hornhautdystrophie Typ I (LCDI) ist eine h\u00e4ufige Form der Stroma-Hornhautdystrophie (s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch ein Netzwerk von feinen, ineinander verschr\u00e4nkten und verzweigten filament\u00f6sen Tr\u00fcbungen in der Kornea, mit zunehmender Beeintr\u00e4chtigung des Visus und ohne systemische Manifestationen.", "synonyms": "Biber-Haab-Dimmer-Dystrophie, Klassische gittrige Hornhautdystrophie, LCD Typ 1, LCD1, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "H18.5", "OMIM": "122200\u00a0 608471", "UMLS": "C1690006\u00a0 C2931650", "MeSH": "C537881", "GARD": "9678", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form von Hornhautdystrophie ist nicht bekannt. In westlichen L\u00e4ndern ist sie eine der h\u00e4ufigeren Formen, wurde aber weltweit dokumentiert.", "clinical_description": "Die L\u00e4sionen entwickeln sich gegen Ende des ersten Lebensjahrzehnts \u00fcberwiegend beidseitig, k\u00f6nnen aber auch in mittlerem Alter oder, selten, im Kleinkindalter auftreten. Die LCDI ist langsam progredient und f\u00fchrt vor dem sechsten Lebensjahrzehnt zu erheblichem Unwohlsein und zu signifikanten Sehst\u00f6rungen. Die Sensibilit\u00e4t der Kornea ist oft vermindert.", "etiology": "Die meisten F\u00e4lle von LCDI sind verursacht durch Mutationen im multifunktionalen TGFBI-Gen (5q31).", "diagnostic_methods": "Die miteinander verwobenen linearen tr\u00fcben Filamente haben eine gewisse \u00c4hnlichkeit mit Nerven, treten aber nicht bei allen betroffenen Familienmitgliedern auf. Den Hornhauttr\u00fcbungen k\u00f6nnen rezidivierende Hornhauterosionen vorangehen oder sogar bei Individuen ohne erkennbare Stroma-Erkrankung auftreten. Im gesamten Hornhautstroma werden Amyloidablagerungen gefunden. Lineare und anderes anders geformte Areale sind besonders im zentralen Hornhautstroma geh\u00e4uft, die periphere Kornea bleibt dagegen relativ durchsichtig.", "genetic_counseling": "\u00dcber ein autosomal-dominantes Vererbungsmuster wurde berichtet.", "management_and_treatment": "Eine Hornhauttransplantation kann schon im Alter von 20 Jahren erforderlich sein, ist aber in der Regel erst nach dem vierten Lebensjahrzehnt indiziert. Die Resultate der penetrierenden Keratoplastik (PK) sind exzellent, aber nach 2-14 Jahren kann es im transplantierten Gewebe zu Amyloidablagerungen kommen.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form von Hornhautdystrophie ist nicht bekannt. In westlichen L\u00e4ndern ist sie eine der h\u00e4ufigeren Formen, wurde aber weltweit dokumentiert."}, {"name": "BICD2-assoziierte autosomal dominante spinale Muskelatrophie mit vorwiegender Beinbeteiligung Typ 2", "sub_name": "BICD2-assoziierte proximale spinale Muskelatrophie mit Beginn im Kindesalter, autosomal-dominant", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "BICD2-assoziierte autosomal dominante spinale Muskelatrophie mit vorwiegender Beinbeteiligung Typ 2, SMALED2, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Vorgeburtlich, Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G12.1", "OMIM": "615290", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Proximale spinale Muskelatrophie mit Beginn im Kindesalter, autosomal-dominant"}, {"name": "BICD2-assoziierte proximale spinale Muskelatrophie mit Beginn im Kindesalter, autosomal-dominant", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "BICD2-assoziierte autosomal dominante spinale Muskelatrophie mit vorwiegender Beinbeteiligung Typ 2, SMALED2, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Vorgeburtlich, Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G12.1", "OMIM": "615290", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Proximale spinale Muskelatrophie mit Beginn im Kindesalter, autosomal-dominant"}, {"name": "Bickel-Fanconi Glykogenose", "sub_name": "Fanconi-Bickel-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Fanconi-Bickel-Glykogenose (FBG) ist eine seltene Glykogenspeicherkrankheit und gekennzeichnet durch Glykogenspeicherung in Leber und Niere, schwere renale Tubulopathie und gest\u00f6rten Glukose- und Galaktosestoffwechsel. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, bisher wurden weniger als 200 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Die Krankheit wird schon in den allerersten Lebensmonaten manifest, mit Gedeihst\u00f6rung, Polyurie und Rachitis, die im Zusammenhang mit Verlusten im proximalen Tubulus steht. In der fr\u00fchen Kindheit fallen verz\u00f6gertes Wachstum und Hepatosplenomegalie mit Vorw\u00f6lbung des Abdomens auf. Die Pubert\u00e4t tritt versp\u00e4tet ein. Ein weiteres Symptom ist Osteopenie, mit Frakturneigung schon im Kindesalter und ausgepr\u00e4gter Osteoporose im sp\u00e4teren Leben. Einige Patienten zeigen eine abnorme Fettverteilung. Das FBG wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache sind homozygote oder compound-heterozygote Mutationen im Glukosetransporter-2 (GLUT2)-Gen (SLC2A2; 3q26.1-q26.3). Die Diagnose ergibt sich aus den klinischen Symptomen, den r\u00f6ntgenologischen Zeichen einer Rachitis und den charakteristischen Laborbefunden einer renalen proximalen Tubulopathie (massive Glukosurie, Proteinurie, Phosphaturie, Hypophosphat\u00e4mie, Aminoazidurie und Hyperurik\u00e4mie). Mehrere F\u00e4lle von FBG wurden mit erh\u00f6hten Galaktosespiegeln im Neugeborenen-Screening f\u00fcr Galaktos\u00e4mie entdeckt. Weitere Laborbefunde sind Hypoglyk\u00e4mie, Ketonurie und Hypercholesterin\u00e4mie. Als diagnostischer Marker f\u00fcr die FBG und andere Glykogenosen wurde k\u00fcrzlich der Befund einer erh\u00f6hten Serum-Biotinidase-Aktivit\u00e4t vorgeschlagen. Histopathologische Biopsiebefunde sind Lebersteatose und Glykogenspeicherung in Hepatozyten und renalen proximalen Tubuluszellen. Die Diagnose kann durch den Nachweis von Mutationen im SLC2A2-Gen best\u00e4tigt werden. Die wichtigste Differentialdiagnose ist die Glykogenspeicherkrankheit Typ I A (van Gierke) mit Glukose-6-Phosphatase-Mangel (s. diesen Terminus). In Familien mit bekannten SLC2A2-Mutationenist eine vorgeburtliche Diagnose m\u00f6glich. Die Behandlung der FBG ist symptomatisch und zielt auf eine Korrektur der renalen Symptomatik durch Substitution von Wasser und Elektrolyten. Zur Vermeidung der hypophosphat\u00e4mischen Rachitis ist die Supplementierung mit Vitamin D und Phosphat unerl\u00e4sslich. Die Patienten sollen galaktosearm ern\u00e4hrt werden, mit Fruktose als haupts\u00e4chlicher Kohlenhydratquelle. Die Langzeitprognose ist nicht bekannt. Die renale Tubulopathie besteht bis in das Erwachsenenalter fort, scheint aber in den meisten F\u00e4llen nicht zur Niereninsuffizienz zu f\u00fchren. Di\u00e4t und Supplementierung k\u00f6nnen einige Symptome der FBG lindern aber nicht das Wachstum verbessern. Die erwachsenen Patienten sind daher kleinw\u00fcchsig.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare glycogen storage disease due to a deficiency in solute carrier family 2, facilitated glucose transporter member 2 and characterized by hepatorenal glycogen accumulation leading to severe renal tubular dysfunction and impaired glucose and galactose metabolism.", "synonyms": "GSD due to GLUT2 deficiency, Glycogen storage disease due to GLUT2 deficiency, Glycogenosis due to GLUT2 deficiency, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "E74.0", "omim": "227810", "umls": "C3495427", "gard": "2268", "epidemiology": "The prevalence is unknown but less than 200 cases have been described in the literature to date.", "clinical_description": "Onset occurs during the first few months of life with failure to thrive, polyuria, normo/hypokalemic metabolic acidosis, fasting hypoglycemia and post-feeding hyperglycemia. Metabolic acidosis, hypokalemia, hypophosphatemia and rickets are the consequence of severe proximal tubule dysfunction. Growth retardation and hepatosplenomegaly resulting in a protruding abdomen are evident by early childhood. Puberty can be delayed. Generalized osteoporosis can lead to fractures already during childhood. Some patients also display an abnormal fat distribution.", "etiology": "The disease is due to homozygous or compound heterozygous mutations in the SLC2A2 gene (3q26.2-q27), encoding the protein, solute carrier family 2, facilitated glucose transporter member 2.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis may be suspected on the basis of the clinical manifestations, radiological findings revealing rickets, and from characteristic results from laboratory investigations showing proximal renal tubular dysfunction (massive glucosuria, proteinuria, phosphaturia, hypophosphatemia, aminoaciduria and hypouricemia). However, several cases have been detected through neonatal screening of galactose levels. Additional laboratory findings include fasting hypoglycemia, ketonuria and hypercholesterolemia. Elevated serum biotinidase activity is also found in patients and has recently been proposed as a diagnostic marker for this syndrome and other glycogen storage diseases. Analysis of biopsy samples reveals liver steatosis, and glycogen accumulation in the hepatocytes and proximal renal tubular cells. The diagnosis can be confirmed by identification of a mutation in the SLC2A2 gene.", "differential_diagnosis": "The principle differential diagnosis is type I glycogen storage disease, which is caused by glucose-6-phosphatase deficiency. The renal phenotype must be differentiated from other forms of genetically determined Fanconi Syndrome.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible for families in which the SLC2A2 mutation has already been identified.", "genetic_counseling": "The pattern of inheritance is autosomal recessive and genetic counseling is recommended for affected families. The risk of offspring inheriting the disease is 25% where both parents are unaffected carriers.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no causal treatment. Therapy consists of replacing water and electrolytes lost through urine excretion as a result of the proximal tubule dysfunction. In addition, Vitamin D replacement is also fundamental for preventing hypophosphatemic rickets. Patients should follow a galactose-restricted diabetic diet with fructose as the main source of carbohydrate. During infancy, night feeding can be necessary in order to avoid hypoglycemia.", "prognosis": "The long-term prognosis is unknown. However, the description of the first identified patients reveals that renal function is preserved in adulthood despite renal tubular dysfunction and liver involvement also persisting."}, {"name": "Bickers-Adams-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Hydrozephalus mit Stenose des Aquaeductus Sylvii", "german_description": "Der Hydrozephalus durch Stenose der Sylvius-Leitung (des Aquaeductus cerebri, HSAS) ist ein historischer Begriff zur Beschreibung eines Ph\u00e4notyps, der heute zur Gruppe der X-chromosomal-rezessiv vererbten L1CAM-Spektrum-Erkrankungen geh\u00f6rt (L1-Syndrom, siehe dort). HSAS ist gekennzeichnet durch die Assoziation von Hydrozephalus, schwerer geistiger Behinderung, spastischer Parese, Pyramidenzeichen und adduzierten Daumen. Der HSAS stellt das schwere Ende des Spektrums dar und ist mit einer schlechten Prognose verbunden. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A congenital, X-linked, clinical subtype of L1 syndrome characterized by severe hydrocephalus often of prenatal onset, adducted thumbs, spasticity (mostly evidenced by brisk tendon reflexes and extensor plantar responses) and moderate to severe intellectual disability. This subtype represents the severe end of the L1 syndrome spectrum and is associated with poor prognosis.", "synonyms": "Bickers-Adams syndrome, HSAS, X-linked HSAS, X-linked acqueductal stenosis, X-linked hydrocephalus, X-linked hydrocephalus with stenosis of aqueduct of Sylvius, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q03.0", "omim": "307000", "umls": "C0265216", "gard": "434"}, {"name": "Bickerstaff-Enzephalitis", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Hirnstamm-Enzephalitis Bickerstaff (BBE) ist eine seltene postinfekti\u00f6se neurologische Erkrankung und charakterisiert durch die Assoziation einer externen Ophthalmoplegie, Ataxie und Bewusstseinsst\u00f6rung (Schl\u00e4frigkeit, Stupor oder Koma) oder Hyperreflexie.", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "G61.0", "UMLS": "C1960543", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt.", "clinical_description": "Die Patienten fallen in der Regel durch den Beginn einer Diplopie und Gangst\u00f6rung nach Infektionen der oberen Atemwege oder des Magen-Darm-Traktes auf. Die externe Ophthalmoplegie ist progredient (innerhalb von vier Wochen nach Beginn) und relativ symmetrisch. Bei mehr als der H\u00e4lfte der Patienten besteht eine schlaffe symmetrische Tetraparese zusammen mit tiefen oder oberfl\u00e4chlichen sensorischen St\u00f6rungen, Schw\u00e4che der Gesichtsmuskulatur, Bulb\u00e4rparalyse, interner Ophthalmoplegie, Blepharoptose und Nystagmus In der akuten Phase kann die BBE besonders schwer verlaufen mit vollst\u00e4ndiger Ophthalmoplegie, fazialer Diplegie und vollst\u00e4ndiger Paralyse der Arme und Beine, \u00e4hnlich einem \"Hirntod\". Die BBE tritt nach vorliegenden Berichten nach Infektionen mit verschiedenen Erregern auf, darunter das Zytomegalievirus, Campylobacter jejuni und Mycoplasma pneumoniae.", "etiology": "Die genaue Pathogenese ist im Einzelnen noch nicht bekannt. Bei der BBE ist jedoch ein Antigangliosid-Antik\u00f6rper, anti-GQ1b, nachweisbar.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf den klinischen Befunden der Vorgeschichte der Patienten, den Ergebnissen der Untersuchung der Zerebrospinalfl\u00fcssigkeit (CSF) mit dem Nachweis erh\u00f6hter Proteinspiegel, sowie dem Nachweis von Anti-GQ1b-IgG-Antik\u00f6rpern (nicht bei allen Patienten vorhanden). Weitere diagnostische Befunde werden bei Magnetresonanzbildgebung erhalten (abnorm erh\u00f6hte Intensit\u00e4t in der hinteren Fossa, in der wei\u00dfen Substanz oder im Thalamus) und bei neurophysiologischen Untersuchungen (Elektroenzephalogramm und Elektromyographie mit Hinweis auf Beteiligung des zentralen Nervensystems und vor allem der Axone). Bei Patienten mit Schw\u00e4che der Gliedma\u00dfen zeigt die BBE eine klinische \u00dcberlappung mit dem Miller-Fisher-Syndrom (MFS; s. dort), einer Hirnnerven-Variante des Guillain-Barr\u00e9-Syndroms (GBS; s. dort) und auch mit den axonalen Formen des GBS (akute motorisch-axonale Neuropathie und akute motorisch-sensorische axonale Neuropathie; s. diese Termini). Dies hat mehreren Autoren Anlass zu der Vermutung gegeben, dass BBE, MFS und GBS unterschiedliche Manifestationen des gleichen klinischen Spektrums darstellen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnostisch muss bei Patienten mit BBE auch an die akute disseminierte Encephalomyelitis (ADEM; s. dort) und an seltene postinfekti\u00f6se neurologische Erkrankungen gedacht werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Betreuung der Patienten beinhaltet eine Immuntherapie mit intraven\u00f6sem Immunglobulin (IVIg) oder Plasmaaustausch.", "prognosis": "Zwar ist das klinische Bild schwer, aber die Krankheit verl\u00e4uft bei mehr als der H\u00e4lfte der Patienten monophasisch mit vollst\u00e4ndiger Remission der Symptome innerhalb von sechs Monaten. Andere Patienten k\u00f6nnen leichte bis schwere Restsymptome aufweisen.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt."}, {"name": "Bidirektionale katecholaminerge Tachykardie", "sub_name": "Tachykardie, katecholaminerge polymorphe ventrikul\u00e4re", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz der CPVT betr\u00e4gt in Europa 1:10.000. Das typische Erkrankungsalter liegt bei beiden Geschlechtern zwischen 7 und 9 Jahren.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, severe genetic arrhythmogenic disorder of the structurally normal heart characterized by catecholamine-induced ventricular tachycardia (VT) manifesting as syncope and sudden death in young individuals.", "synonyms": "Bidirectional ventricular tachycardia induced by catecholamine, CPVT, Malignant paroxysmal ventricular tachycardia, Polymorphic ventricular tachycardia induced by catecholamines, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Childhood, Adolescent", "icd_10": "I47.2", "omim": "604772\u00a0 611938\u00a0 614021\u00a0 614916\u00a0 615441", "umls": "C1631597", "gard": "4421", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of catecholaminergic polymorphic ventricular tachycardia (CPVT) is estimated to be 1/10,000. Both sexes are equally affected.", "clinical_description": "Typical age of onset of CPVT is between 7 and 15 years of age. Exercise- or emotion-induced syncopal spells are frequently the first symptom. In a subset of patients (10-20%), the disease is clinically silent, presenting only in the event of sudden death. Up to one third of CPVT patients experience life-threatening arrhythmic events prior to starting treatment. The typical arrhythmias of CPVT are bidirectional VT, and, less frequently, supraventricular tachycardias.", "etiology": "The disorder is genetically heterogeneous; in 70% of cases, the cardiac ryanodine receptor (RYR2, 1q43) gene is implicated with autosomal dominant inheritance. Mutations in the cardiac calsequestrin gene (CASQ2, 1p13.1) cause an autosomal recessive form of CPVT in 2% to 5% of patients, and in rare instances may cause autosomal dominant CPVT. Other, rarer genes causing CPVT include Trans-2,3-enoyl-CoA reductase-like (TECRL, 4q13.1), calmodulin-1 (CALM1, 14q32.11), and cardiac triadin (TRDN, 6q22.31).", "diagnostic_methods": "Subjects with a family history of CPVT, or emotion- or exercise-induced sudden death or syncope should undergo exercise stress test and Holter monitoring. Given the reproducibility of arrhythmias, graded exercise stress test is of utmost diagnostic importance. Holter monitoring is also indicated for the rarer cases where acute emotion represents a more powerful trigger. Resting electrocardiogram is usually unremarkable. Cardiac imaging (echocardiogram and MRI) is unremarkable.", "differential_diagnosis": "The principal differential diagnoses are long QT syndrome (LQTS), arrhythmogenic right ventricular cardiomyopathy (ARVC), and Andersen-Tawil syndrome.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis can be performed in families with high penetrance and a highly lethal mutation.", "genetic_counseling": "Screening for the RYR2 mutation and CASQ2 mutation is indicated in all patients with confirmed or suspected CPVT. Screening forTECRL, CALM1, and TRDN mutations may be considered as a second-line analysis. According to the mutation identified, the appropriate genetic counseling should be offered to affected families.", "management_and_treatment": "Lifestyle changes such as limitation of physical activity, avoidance of strong emotion and stressful environments should be recommended to all CPVT patients. Beta blockers (BB; particularly nadolol) are the first treatment option for patients with CPVT and the maximum tolerated dose should be administered to control arrhythmias. Flecainide, a sodium channel blocker, can be considered in patients with BB-resistant arrhythmias. Implantable cardioverter defibrillator (ICD) is recommended in CPVT patients who survived a cardiac arrest, and in those experiencing recurrent syncope or breakthrough arrhythmias despite compliance to an optimal medical treatment.", "prognosis": "Although CPVT is a severe disease with high mortality if untreated, early diagnosis and adequate treatment can greatly increase life expectancy. Lifestyle modifications along with optimal medical therapy and ICD implantation in patients with recurrent symptoms portends a favorable prognosis."}, {"name": "Biemond-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Brachydaktylie - Nystagmus - zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch Brachydaktylie, Nystagmus und zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie. Es wurde in 1 Familie bei Angeh\u00f6rigen aus 4 Generationen beschrieben. Einige Patienten waren geistig behindert und hatten einen Strabismus. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare multiple congenital anomalies/dysmorphic syndrome characterized by brachydactyly, nystagmus, and cerebellar ataxia. Intellectual deficit and strabismus have also been reported. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1934.", "synonyms": "Biemond syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "113400", "umls": "C1862099", "gard": "971"}, {"name": "Biemond-Syndrom Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Biemond-Syndrom Typ 2 (BS2) ist eine seltene, genetisch bedingte, neurologische Erkrankung mit Entwicklungsst\u00f6rung. Sie wurde bisher bei einer sehr kleinen Anzahl von Patienten mit einem d\u00fcrftig definierten Ph\u00e4notyp beschrieben. Zu diesem Ph\u00e4notyp geh\u00f6ren Iriskolobome, Kleinwuchs, Adipositas, Hypogonadismus, postaxiale Polydaktylie und Intelligenzminderung. Zus\u00e4tzlich wurden ein Hydrozephalus und faziale Dysostose berichtet. Das BS2 zeigt \u00c4hnlichkeiten mit dem Bardet-Biedl-Syndrom. Seit 1997 wurde das Syndrom nicht n\u00e4her definiert.", "synonyms": "Hypogonadismus-Kleinwuchs-Kolobom-pr\u00e4axiale Polydaktylie-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unbekannt\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich, Neugeborenenzeit", "OMIM": "210350", "UMLS": "C1859487\u00a0 C2930903", "GARD": "882"}, {"name": "Bietti-Kristalldystrophie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Bietti-Kristall Dystrophie (BCD) ist eine seltene progrediente, autosomal-rezessiv vererbte tapetoretinale Degeneration, die im 3. Lebensjahrzehnt auftritt. Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch kleine gl\u00e4nzende kristalline Ablagerungen in der hinteren Retina und im Kornea-Limbus, und durch Sklerose der Choroidea-Gef\u00e4\u00dfe. Die Folge sind Nachtblindheit, verminderte Sehkraft, parazentrales Skotom und, im Endstadium, legale Blindheit.", "synonyms": "BCD, Bietti`s kristalline Retinopathie, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "ICD-10": "H15.5", "OMIM": "210370", "UMLS": "C1859486", "MeSH": "C535440", "GARD": "10050"}, {"name": "Bietti`s kristalline Retinopathie", "sub_name": "Bietti-Kristalldystrophie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Bietti-Kristall Dystrophie (BCD) ist eine seltene progrediente, autosomal-rezessiv vererbte tapetoretinale Degeneration, die im 3. Lebensjahrzehnt auftritt. Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch kleine gl\u00e4nzende kristalline Ablagerungen in der hinteren Retina und im Kornea-Limbus, und durch Sklerose der Choroidea-Gef\u00e4\u00dfe. Die Folge sind Nachtblindheit, verminderte Sehkraft, parazentrales Skotom und, im Endstadium, legale Blindheit.", "synonyms": "BCD, Bietti`s kristalline Retinopathie, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "ICD-10": "H15.5", "OMIM": "210370", "UMLS": "C1859486", "MeSH": "C535440", "GARD": "10050"}, {"name": "Bifide Nase mit/ohne anorektale und renale Anomalien", "sub_name": "BNAR-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "BNAR syndrome is a very rare multiple congenital anomaly syndrome characterized by a bifid nose (see this term) (with bulbous nasal tip but not associated with hypertelorism) with or without the presence of anal defects (i.e. anteriorly placed anus, rectal stenosis or atresia) and renal dysplasia (unilateral or bilateral renal agenesis, see these terms) and without intellectual disability. BNAR syndrome is phenotypically related to Fraser syndrome and oculotrichoanal syndrome (see these terms).", "synonyms": "Bifid nose with or without anorectal and renal anomalies, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "608980", "umls": "C2750433", "gard": "10595"}, {"name": "Bikuspide Aortenklappe, famili\u00e4re Form", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Familial bicuspid aortic valve is a rare, genetic, aortic malformation defined as a presence of abnormal two-leaflet aortic valve in at least 2 first-degree relatives. It is frequently asymptomatic or may be associated with progressive aortic valve disease (aortic regurgitation and/or aortic stenosis, typically due to valve calcification) and a concomitant aortopathy (i.e. aortic dilation, aortic aneurysm and/or dissection).", "synonyms": "Familial BAV, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "icd_10": "Q23.1", "omim": "109730\u00a0 614823"}, {"name": "Bilaterale band-\u00e4hnliche Kalzifizierung mit Polymikrogyrie", "sub_name": "Intrauterines infektions\u00e4hnliches Syndrom, kongenitales", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "BLC-PMG, Baraitser-Brett-Piesowicz-Syndrom, Baraitser-Reardon-Syndrom, Bilaterale band-\u00e4hnliche Kalzifizierung mit Polymikrogyrie, Mikrozephalie - intrakraniale Verkalkungen - Intelligenzminderung, Pseudo-TORCH-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "251290", "UMLS": "C2931662\u00a0 C3489725", "GARD": "12426\u00a0 815", "summary": "Das Kongenitale Intrauterine Infektions\u00e4hnliche Syndrom (KIIS) ist bei Geburt gekennzeichnet durch Mikrozephalie, intrakraniale Verkalkungen, neurologische Unreife, Krampfanf\u00e4lle und einen weiteren klinischen Verlauf, wie er bei Patienten nach intrauteriner Infektion mit Toxoplasma gondii gesehen wird. Trotz wiederholter Tests werden auch andere bekannte infekt\u00f6se Ursachen, R\u00f6teln, Zytomegalievirus oder Herpes simplex (sog. TORCH-Syndrom) immer wieder ausgeschlossen. Bisher wurden mehr als 30 F\u00e4lle publiziert. Die beschriebenen F\u00e4lle sind klinisch sehr heterogen. Zu den unterschiedlich ausgepr\u00e4gten Symptomen z\u00e4hlen intrauterine Wachstumsverz\u00f6gerung, Hepatosplenomegalie, Hyperbilirubin\u00e4mie, Kleinhirn-Hypoplasie oder -Atrophie und kongenitale Katarakt. Patienten mit gleichzeitig bestehender Thrombozytopenie werden als distinkter Untertyp angesehen. Mehrere famili\u00e4re F\u00e4lle sind mit autosomal-rezessiver Vererbung vereinbar. Die Ursache ist weiterhin unklar. Die Diagnose basiert auf dem klinischen Bild und erfordert den Ausschluss intrauteriner Infektionen. Das KIIS zeigt eine erhebliche klinische \u00dcberschneidung mit dem Aicardi-Goutieres-Syndrome (AGS, s. dort). Nach Ansicht einiger Autoren sprechen Ver\u00e4nderungen der Zerebrospinalfl\u00fcssigkeit (Leukozytose, erh\u00f6hte IFN-Alpha-Spiegel) f\u00fcr AGS und gest\u00f6rte Leberfunktion, angeborene Mikrozephalie und Thromozytopenie f\u00fcr KIIS. Da aber beide Syndrome klinisch au\u00dferordentlich variabel sind, wurde auch vermutet, dass AGS und KIIS unterschiedliche Auspr\u00e4gungen der gleichen Krankheit sind. Weitere Differentialdiagnosen sind andere Syndrome mit Mikrozephalie und intrakranialen Verkalkungen: Cockayne-Syndrom, COFS-Syndrom (das in der Regel als neonatale Form des Cockayne-Syndroms angesehen wird), das Hoyeraal-Hreidarsson-Syndrom (die neonatale Auspr\u00e4gung des Dyskeratosis congenita-Syndroms; s. diese Termini), einige F\u00e4lle von mitochondrialer Enzephalomyelopathie und Pseudohypoparathyreoidismus. Fr\u00fchere F\u00e4lle wurden evtl. als 'Fahr-Krankheit` beschrieben, eine \u00fcberholte Bezeichnung f\u00fcr urs\u00e4chlich heterogene Krankheitsbilder mit intrakranialen Verkalkungen. Die Behandlung ist ausschlie\u00dflich symptomatisch. Die Prognose ist unterschiedlich, in ung\u00fcnstigen F\u00e4llen starben mehrere der Patienten im ersten Lebensjahr."}, {"name": "Bilaterale heredit\u00e4re mikro-epiphys\u00e4re Dysplasie", "sub_name": "Dysplasie, epiphys\u00e4re multiple, Typ 5", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Multiple epiphyseal dysplasia type 5 is a multiple epiphyseal dysplasia characterized by an early-onset of pain and stiffness (involving knee and hip), progressive deformity of the extremities and precocious osteoarthritis associated with delayed and irregular ossification of epiphyses. Features specific to multiple epiphyseal dysplasia, type 5 include normal stature and lesser incidence of gait abnormalities. Radiographs reveal epiphyseal and metaphyseal irregularities. Multiple epiphyseal dysplasia type 5 follows an autosomal dominant mode of transmission.", "synonyms": "BHMED, Bilateral hereditary micro-epiphyseal dysplasia, EDM5, MED5, Polyepiphyseal dysplasia type 5, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q77.3", "omim": "607078", "umls": "C1846843", "mesh": "C535505", "gard": "9794"}, {"name": "Bilaterale Lambdoid- und Sagittalsynostose", "sub_name": "Dyssynostose, kraniofaziale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die kraniofaziale Dyssynostose (CFD) ist ein seltenes kraniales Malformationssyndrom, welches durch den vorzeitigen Verschluss beider Lambdan\u00e4hte und der posterioren Sagittalnaht charakterisiert ist. Dies f\u00fchrt zu einer abnormen Sch\u00e4delform (frontale Vorw\u00f6lbung, anteriore Turrizephalie mit leichter Brachyzephalie, biparietaler Verschm\u00e4lerung, okzipitaler Konkavit\u00e4t) und fazialen Dysmorphien (tief sitzende Ohren, Mittelgesichtshypoplasie). Weiterhin wurde von Kleinw\u00fcchsigkeit, Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung, Epilepsie und okulomotorischer Dyspraxie berichtet. Assoziierte Auff\u00e4lligkeiten beinhalten eine Vergr\u00f6\u00dferung der zerebralen Ventrikel, eine Corpus Callosum-Agenesie, die sogenannte Arnold-Chiari Malformation Typ 1 (siehe dort), ven\u00f6se Anomalien des Sch\u00e4dels, sowie Hydrozephalus.", "synonyms": "BLSS, Bilaterale Lambdoid- und Sagittalsynostose, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.0", "OMIM": "218350", "UMLS": "C1857511", "MeSH": "C536455", "GARD": "1575"}, {"name": "Bilaterale Mikrotie-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Gaumenspalte-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch eine Assoziation von beidseitiger Mikrotie, starker bis hochgradiger Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit und Gaumenspalte. Es wurde in 1 konsanguinen iranischen Familie bei 4 Angeh\u00f6rigen beschrieben. Als Ursache des Syndroms wurden Mutationen im HOXA2-Gen (7p15-p14) gefunden, als bereits bekannt war, dass das orthologe Gen der Maus an der Entwicklung des H\u00f6rsystems beteiligt ist. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic, orofacial clefting syndrome characterized by the association of bilateral microtia with severe to profound hearing impairment, and cleft palate.", "synonyms": "Bilateral microtia-hearing loss-cleft palate syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.0", "omim": "612290", "umls": "C2676772"}, {"name": "Bilaterale multizystische renale Dysplasie", "sub_name": "Nierendysplasie, multizystische, bilaterale Form", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare lethal form of multicystic dysplastic kidney (MCDK), a congenital anomaly of the kidney and urinary tract (CAKUT), in which both kidneys are large, distended by non-communicating multiple cysts and non-functional.", "synonyms": "Bilateral MCDK, Bilateral multicystic renal dysplasia, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q61.4", "umls": "C1567427\u00a0 C1840451", "mesh": "C537373\u00a0 D021782", "gard": "9517", "epidemiology": "The prevalence and incidence of bilateral MCDK are unknown.", "clinical_description": "Bilateral MCDK may be suspected antenatally at routine ultrasound scans, with the majority detected around the 20th week of gestation. It is considered a lethal entity, and most pregnancies are terminated. When born, such infants present with features of the Potter sequence (constellation of signs resulting from prolonged in utero oligohydramnios) including severe pulmonary hypoplasia and severe renal failure, limb anomalies and facial dysmorphic features, and generally die shortly after birth.", "etiology": "MCDK results from disrupted nephrogenesis but the exact pathogenic mechanism is still unknown. Disturbed formation of nephrons could result from impaired fetal urine flow early in development. Mutations in the HNF1B gene (17q12), coding for hepatocyte nuclear transcription factor 1beta, are known to cause unilateral MCDK and have only rarely been reported for bilateral cases. MCDK is also linked to gestational diabetes and to the use of some medications during pregnancy, such as anti-epileptic drugs.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is mainly based on prenatal ultrasound showing large hypoechogenic, non-communicating cysts within an irregularly outlined kidney with no visible renal pelvis. A tiny remnant kidney can be observed if the cysts have involuted. In addition, oligo/anhydramnios is present as a sign of poor functional renal development.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include bilateral pelviureteric junction obstruction, in which the largely dilated calices may appear to be cysts. Posterior urethral valves may result in oligo/anhydramnios, and the megaureter may be mistaken for renal cysts.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Ultrasonographic screening can detect MCDKs from midway through gestation.", "genetic_counseling": "Both sporadic and familial cases have been observed. In familial cases, transmission is autosomal dominant with a recurrence risk of 50%.", "management_and_treatment": "As the absence of functional renal tissue results in anhydramnios with pulmonary hypoplasia (Potter sequence), which is generally lethal shortly after birth, most pregnancies with bilateral MCDK will be terminated. When children with bilateral MCDK survive the early postnatal period, renal replacement therapy will be needed.", "prognosis": "Bilateral MCDK is considered a lethal entity."}, {"name": "Bilaterale renale Dysplasie", "sub_name": "Nierendysplasie, bilaterale", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of renal dysplasia (RD), a renal tract malformation, characterized by abnormal or incomplete development of both kidneys. Bilateral RD can be segmental, and of variable severity, with renal aplasia corresponding to extreme RD. Patients may be asymptomatic if the residual kidney function is sufficient. In cases of severe bilateral RD, the risk of renal failure in childhood is high.", "synonyms": "Kidney dysplasia, bilateral, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "Q61.4", "umls": "C0431698"}, {"name": "Bilaterale symmetrische Gliose des Thalamus", "sub_name": "Thalamus-Kalzifikationen, symmetrische", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Bilaterale symmetrische Gliose des Thalamus, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G93.8", "GARD": "5070", "summary": "Die Symmetrischen Thalamus-Kalzifikationen zeichnen sich klinisch durch einen niedrigen Apgar-Score, spastische Parese oder ausgepr\u00e4gte Muskelhypotonie, schwaches oder fehlendes Schreien, schlechte Nahrungsaufnahme und beidseitige L\u00e4hmung oder Schw\u00e4che der Gesichtsmuskeln aus. Es handelt sich um ein extrem seltenes Krankheitsbild, nur etwa 30 F\u00e4lle wurden bisher beschrieben. Die Kalzifikationen werden durch Computertomographie nachgewiesen. Die Prognose ist sehr schlecht. "}, {"name": "Bilaterale und symmetrische oto-mandibul\u00e4re Dysplasie mit Alopezie", "sub_name": "Mandibulofaziale Dysostose mit Alopezie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare mandibulofacial dysostosis characterized by the association with scalp alopecia and sparse eyebrows and eyelashes. Craniofacial dysmorphic features include zygomatic and mandibular dysplasia or hypoplasia, cleft palate, micrognathia, dental anomalies, auricular dysmorphism, and eyelid anomalies, among others. Patients may experience limited jaw mobility, glossoptosis, upper airway obstruction, and conductive hearing loss.", "synonyms": "MFDA, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "Q75.4", "omim": "616367"}, {"name": "Bilginturan-Brachydaktylie", "sub_name": "Brachydaktylie-arterielle Hypertension-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Kombination von Brachydaktylie und Bluthochdruck ist selten. Sie ist in weniger als 10 Familien mit weniger als 100 Patienten beschrieben worden. Die meisten Patienten sind T\u00fcrken aus einer kleinen Region an der nord\u00f6stlichen Schwarzmeer-K\u00fcste. Das Syndrom wurde auch bei japanischen, US-amerikanischen und kanadischen Familien beschrieben. Ein umfangreicher, gut dokumentierter Stammbaum aus der T\u00fcrkei erm\u00f6glichte eine Kopplungsanalyse mit Kartierung des dominant-erblichen Gens zwischen die DNA-Marker D12S364 und D12S87 in der Region 12p12.2-p11.2. Die Aktivit\u00e4t des Renin-Angiotensin-Systems und das Sympathische Nervensystem sind bei den Patienten normal, und der Hochdruck ist nicht salz-sensitiv, eine Konstellation \u00e4hnlich einer Essentiellen Hypertonie. Die Betroffenen haben einen schweren Hypertonus, der auf antihypertensive Therapie anspricht. Unbehandelt sterben sie etwa mit 50 Jahren am Schlaganfall. Eine Retinopathia hypertonica ist selten. Magnetresonanz-Bildgebung (MRI) zeigte bei allen 15 untersuchten Patienten, aber nicht bei den gesunden Angeh\u00f6rigen, Schleifen in den hinteren und unteren Kleinhirnarterien, die \u00fcber eine neurovaskul\u00e4re Kompression evtl. die Hypertonie ausl\u00f6sen. Die Brachydaktylie ist vom Typ E und betrifft haupts\u00e4chlich die Metacarpalia. Die Phalangen sind normal oder verk\u00fcrzt. Die Patienten haben meist einen proportionierten Minderwuchs. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Brachydactyly - arterial hypertension is a rare genetic brachydactyly syndrome characterized by the association of brachydactyly type E (see this term) with hypertension (due to vascular or neurovascular anomalies) as well as the additional features of short stature and low birth weight (compared to non-affected family members), stocky build and a round face. The onset of hypertension is often in childhood and, if untreated, most patients will have had a stroke by the age of 50.", "synonyms": "Bilginturan brachydactyly, Bilginturan syndrome, Brachydactyly type E, with short stature and hypertension, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q73.8", "omim": "112410", "umls": "C1862170", "gard": "967"}, {"name": "Bilginturan-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Brachydaktylie-arterielle Hypertension-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Kombination von Brachydaktylie und Bluthochdruck ist selten. Sie ist in weniger als 10 Familien mit weniger als 100 Patienten beschrieben worden. Die meisten Patienten sind T\u00fcrken aus einer kleinen Region an der nord\u00f6stlichen Schwarzmeer-K\u00fcste. Das Syndrom wurde auch bei japanischen, US-amerikanischen und kanadischen Familien beschrieben. Ein umfangreicher, gut dokumentierter Stammbaum aus der T\u00fcrkei erm\u00f6glichte eine Kopplungsanalyse mit Kartierung des dominant-erblichen Gens zwischen die DNA-Marker D12S364 und D12S87 in der Region 12p12.2-p11.2. Die Aktivit\u00e4t des Renin-Angiotensin-Systems und das Sympathische Nervensystem sind bei den Patienten normal, und der Hochdruck ist nicht salz-sensitiv, eine Konstellation \u00e4hnlich einer Essentiellen Hypertonie. Die Betroffenen haben einen schweren Hypertonus, der auf antihypertensive Therapie anspricht. Unbehandelt sterben sie etwa mit 50 Jahren am Schlaganfall. Eine Retinopathia hypertonica ist selten. Magnetresonanz-Bildgebung (MRI) zeigte bei allen 15 untersuchten Patienten, aber nicht bei den gesunden Angeh\u00f6rigen, Schleifen in den hinteren und unteren Kleinhirnarterien, die \u00fcber eine neurovaskul\u00e4re Kompression evtl. die Hypertonie ausl\u00f6sen. Die Brachydaktylie ist vom Typ E und betrifft haupts\u00e4chlich die Metacarpalia. Die Phalangen sind normal oder verk\u00fcrzt. Die Patienten haben meist einen proportionierten Minderwuchs. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Brachydactyly - arterial hypertension is a rare genetic brachydactyly syndrome characterized by the association of brachydactyly type E (see this term) with hypertension (due to vascular or neurovascular anomalies) as well as the additional features of short stature and low birth weight (compared to non-affected family members), stocky build and a round face. The onset of hypertension is often in childhood and, if untreated, most patients will have had a stroke by the age of 50.", "synonyms": "Bilginturan brachydactyly, Bilginturan syndrome, Brachydactyly type E, with short stature and hypertension, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q73.8", "omim": "112410", "umls": "C1862170", "gard": "967"}, {"name": "Bilharziose", "sub_name": "Schistosomiasis", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Schistosomiasis is an infectious disease caused by parasitic trematodes of the genus Schistosoma that colonize human blood vessels and release eggs that can cause granulomatous reactions leading to acute (swimmer's itch or acute schistosomiasis syndrome) or chronic disease. Depending on where the eggs lodge, manifestations of chronic schistosomiasis can include diarrhea, abdominal pain, loss of appetite, anemia (intestines), hepatosplenism, periportal fibrosis with portal hypertension (liver), urogenital inflammation and scarring, hematuria and dysuria (genitourinary system). Other patients may be asymptomatic.", "synonyms": "Bilharziasis, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "B65.0\u00a0 B65.1\u00a0 B65.2\u00a0 B65.3\u00a0 B65.8\u00a0 B65.9", "omim": "181460", "umls": "C0036323", "mesh": "D012552", "gard": "9687", "meddra": "10039603"}, {"name": "Bili\u00e4re Atresie-Milzfehlbildung-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Syndrom mit bili\u00e4rer Atresie und Milz-Fehlbildung (BASM) bezeichnet die Assoziation von Gallengangs-Atresie (s. dort) und Anomalien der Milz (vor allem Polysplenie und seltener Asplenie und gedoppelte Milz). Weitere m\u00f6gliche Symptome sind Herzfehler, Situs inversus und pr\u00e4-duodenale Pfortader. Das Syndrom repr\u00e4sentiert die embryonale oder syndromale Form der Gallengangs-Atresie. Neugeborene oder S\u00e4uglinge erkranken mit Ikterus, hellen St\u00fchlen, dunklem Urin, Gedeihst\u00f6rung, Hepatomegalie, Gerinnungsst\u00f6rung, An\u00e4mie und oft tastbarer Milz.", "synonyms": "BASM-Syndrom, Gallengangatresie - Milzfehlbildung, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q44.2"}, {"name": "Bili\u00e4re Hamartome", "sub_name": "Zystisches Leberhamartom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das zystische Leberhamartom, auch mesenchymales Leberhamartom genannt, ist ein seltener gutartiger Lebertumor des Kindesalters. In der Regel tritt er vor dem Alter von zwei Jahren auf, ist mesenchymalen Ursprungs und hat unterschiedliche klinische Symptome (aufgetriebenes Abdomen, abdomineller Tumor, Schmerzen, Erbrechen und Zeichen einer Kompression der Vena cava inferior).", "synonyms": "Bili\u00e4re Hamartome, Leberhamartom, mesenchymales, MHL, VMC, Von-Meyenburg-Komplex, ", "ICD-10": "D13.4", "UMLS": "C0334091", "GARD": "2651"}, {"name": "Bili\u00e4res Zystadenokarzinom der Leber", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Zystadenokarzinom des intrahepatischen Galleng\u00e4nge, ", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C22.1", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Bilirubin-Enzephalopathie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Kernikterus, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "P57.9", "UMLS": "C0022610", "GARD": "6830", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Bilirubin-Enzephalopathie, akute", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare neurologic disease characterized by lethargy, hypotonia, poor feeding, opisthotonus, and a typical high-pitched cry due to bilirubin accumulation in the globus pallidus, sub-thalamic nuclei, and other brain regions, resulting from severe neonatal unconjugated hyperbilirubinemia. Onset of symptoms is typically within the first three to five days of life. Additional features include fever, apnea, seizures, and coma. Especially respiratory failure or refractory seizures may lead to a fatal outcome.", "synonyms": "ABE, Acute kernicterus, ", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "P57.8"}, {"name": "Bilirubin-Enzephalopathie, chronische", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare neurologic disease characterized by the chronic consequences of bilirubin toxicity in the globus pallidus, sub-thalamic nuclei, and other brain regions, after exposure to high levels of unconjugated bilirubin in the neonatal period. Symptoms begin after the acute phase of bilirubin encephalopathy in the first year of life, evolve slowly over several years, and include mild to severe extrapyramidal disturbances (especially dystonia and athetosis), auditory neuropathy spectrum disorder, and oculomotor and dental abnormalities.", "synonyms": "BIND, Bilirubin-induced neurological dysfunction, CBE, KSD, Kernicterus spectrum disorder, ", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "P57.8"}, {"name": "Bilirubin-induzierte neurologische Dysfunktion", "sub_name": "Bilirubin-Enzephalopathie, chronische", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare neurologic disease characterized by the chronic consequences of bilirubin toxicity in the globus pallidus, sub-thalamic nuclei, and other brain regions, after exposure to high levels of unconjugated bilirubin in the neonatal period. Symptoms begin after the acute phase of bilirubin encephalopathy in the first year of life, evolve slowly over several years, and include mild to severe extrapyramidal disturbances (especially dystonia and athetosis), auditory neuropathy spectrum disorder, and oculomotor and dental abnormalities.", "synonyms": "BIND, Bilirubin-induced neurological dysfunction, CBE, KSD, Kernicterus spectrum disorder, ", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "P57.8"}, {"name": "Bilirubin-Stoffwechselst\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Bilirubin UDP-Glucuronosyltransferase-Mangel Typ 1", "sub_name": "Crigler-Najjar-Syndrom Typ 1", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of Crigler Najjar syndrome (CNS), a hereditary disorder of hepatic bilirubin conjugation, characterized by severe neonatal unconjugated hyperbilirubinemia due to a complete absence of hepatic UDP-glucuronosyltransferase 1A1. The disorder clinically manifests with neonatal, isolated, severe and permanent jaundice with a permanent risk of bilirubin encephalopathy.", "synonyms": "Bilirubin uridinediphosphate glucuronosyltransferase deficiency type 1, Bilirubin-UGT deficiency type 1, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "E80.5", "omim": "218800", "umls": "C0010324\u00a0 C2931131", "mesh": "C536212", "gard": "47", "meddra": "10057034", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of Crigler-Najjar syndrome type 1 (CNS1) is unknown.", "clinical_description": "Infants present with persistent jaundice at or soon after birth. Bilirubin encephalopathy (kernicterus manifesting as hypertonia, deafness, oculomotor palsy and lethargy) due to hyperbilirubinemia is a permanent risk. Neurologic defects (injury to basal ganglia, cerebellar and likely hippocampal structures) can occur, generally associated with intellectual and motor impairment.", "etiology": "Numerous variants in the gene UGT1A1 gene (2q37), encoding the enzyme UDP-glucuronosyltransferase 1A1 (UGT1A1), have been linked to CNS1. In the liver, UGT1A1 conjugates bilirubin with glucuronic acid, thereby increasing bilirubin water solubility and thus facilitating its excretion. The UGT1A1 variants result in absent UGT1A1 activity with marked impairment of bilirubin conjugation.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on findings of total serum bilirubin between 20 and 45 mg/dL and presence of traces of bilirubin glucuronides in bile. Diagnosis is confirmed by genomic DNA analysis (ruling out the need for liver biopsy). When liver biopsy was performed, it showed a total deficiency of hepatic UGT1A1 activity.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes disorders of excessive bilirubin production (hemolysis, infections). CNS type 2 (CNS2) can be excluded by the lack of response to phenobarbital treatment and by DNA analysis.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible provided both disease-causing mutations have been identified in the proband.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment relies on phototherapy for 10-12 hours a day (to maintain levels of unconjugated hyperbilirubinemia below the neurotoxic threshold and the bilirubin/albumin molar ratio <0.7). Orthotopic liver transplantation may be considered and is more effective when performed before onset of neurologic damage. Bilirubin chelators (calcium salts, cholestyramine) may be used. Treatment with heme oxygenase inhibitors (tin-mesoporphyrin) can decrease plasma bilirubin concentrations but are not advised in the long term, because of their side effects (photosensitization). They may be useful for treating acute and severe hyperbilirubinemia but are not available for daily clinical practice. Gene therapy trials are ongoing. Prompt treatment of neurologic manifestations is required to avoid potentially devastating neurologic sequelae (intensive phototherapy, albumin infusions, and plasma exchanges). Unlike CNS2, patients with CNS1 do not respond to phenobarbital.", "prognosis": "Without treatment, CNS1 is lethal as a result of kernicterus. With treatment and management children have a good prognosis and may follow normal schooling, even though the treatment is very restrictive. Adult patients who have not undergone liver transplantation still require phototherapy but may have ''near normal'' social and familial lives. A few adult women have given birth to normal children, provided their pregnancies have been carefully followed up."}, {"name": "Bilirubin UDP-Glucuronosyltransferase-Mangel Typ 2", "sub_name": "Crigler-Najjar-Syndrom Typ 2", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des CNS 2 ist nicht bekannt. CNS hat eine gesch\u00e4tzte Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt von 1:1.000.000.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of Crigler Najjar syndrome (CNS), a rare hereditary disorder of bilirubin metabolism, characterized by unconjugated hyperbilirubinemia due to reduced and inducible activity of hepatic UDP-glucuronosyltransferase 1A1. The disorder clinically manifests with neonatal, isolated jaundice with a risk of developing bilirubin encephalopathy later in life due to triggers such as stress or infection.", "synonyms": "Bilirubin uridinediphosphate glucuronosyltransferase deficiency type 2, Bilirubin-UGT deficiency type 2, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "E80.5", "omim": "606785", "umls": "C0268311\u00a0 C2931132", "mesh": "C536213", "gard": "8683", "meddra": "10011387", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of Crigler Najjar syndrome type 2 (CNS2) is unknown.", "clinical_description": "First clinical manifestations usually appear soon after birth. CNS2 patients are less severely jaundiced than CNS type 1 (CNS1) patients, have pigmented bile that contains bilirubin glucuronides, and generally do not present neurologic or intellectual impairment. Bilirubin encephalopathy may develop in later life when patients experience a superimposed infection or stress.", "etiology": "Numerous variants in the UGT1A1 gene (2q37), encoding the enzyme UDP-glucuronosyltransferase 1A1 (UGT1A1), have been linked to CNS2. In the liver, UGT1A1 conjugates bilirubin with glucuronic acid, thereby increasing bilirubin water solubility and thus facilitating its excretion. The UGT1A1 variants result in reduced, but inducible bilirubin UGT1A1 activity, with marked impairment of bilirubin conjugation.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on biochemical findings with total serum bilirubin ranging from 6 to 20 mg/dL and presence of bilirubin glucuronides in bile. Diagnosis is confirmed by genomic DNA analysis (ruling out the need for liver biopsy). It may also help in differentiating between the two types of CNS. Liver biopsy, when it was performed, revealed residual enzymatic activity.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes disorders of excessive bilirubin production (hemolysis). CNS2 can be differentiated from CNS1 by the response to phenobarbital treatment and from mild hepatic deficiency of UGT1A1 (Gilbert syndrome).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible provided both disease-causing mutations have been identified in the proband.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment relies on daily phenobarbital administration that can induce the expression of UGT1A1 resulting in a decrease in the serum bilirubin level by approximately 60-70%. Patients and their families must be educated to be very careful during infectious episodes and/or fasting periods that are likely to increase bilirubin production and thus increase hyperbilirubinemia. Should this occur, patients must be examined by their physician and serum bilirubin concentration must be measured.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is good: this form does not cause cognitive or motor impairment during childhood. Adult patients remain jaundiced and must continue phenobarbital treatment throughout their life. However, all patients have to be educated and informed regarding at-risk-for-increase of bilirubin production (infection, stress and prolonged fasting)."}, {"name": "Bilirubin-UGT-Defizienz", "sub_name": "Crigler-Najjar-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Krankheit ist extrem selten und hat eine Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt von etwa 1:1.000.000. Bisher wurden nur wenige hundert F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Beide Geschlechter sind gleich betroffen. Das CNS 1 wird bereits in den ersten Lebenstagen auff\u00e4llig und besteht danach unver\u00e4ndert fort; auch CNS 2 beginnt fr\u00fch.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare hereditary disorder of bilirubin metabolism characterized by unconjugated hyperbilirubinemia due to a either a complete (type 1) or partial and inducible (type 2) hepatic deficit of UDP-glucuronosyltransferase 1A1 activity. The disorder manifests with neonatal jaundice with a risk of developing bilirubin encephalopathy.", "synonyms": "Bilirubin uridinediphosphate glucuronosyltransferase deficiency, Bilirubin-UGT deficiency, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "E80.5", "omim": "218800\u00a0 606785", "umls": "C0010324", "mesh": "D003414", "meddra": "10011386", "epidemiology": "Whilst data on prevalence is very limited, Crigler Najjar syndrome (CNS) is estimated to affect less than 1/100,000 people in Europe. Both sexes are equally affected.", "clinical_description": "First clinical manifestations usually appear soon after birth, presenting with isolated jaundice that is more severe in CNS type 1 (CNS1) than in CNS type 2 (CNS2). In CNS1, it may evolve to bilirubin encephalopathy (kernicterus) with hypertonia, deafness, oculomotor palsy and lethargy when the treatment is delayed or inadequate. In CNS2, the risk of kernicterus is much lower but does exist.", "etiology": "Numerous variants in the gene UGT1A1 (2q37), encoding the enzyme UDP-glucuronosyltransferase 1A1 (UGT1A1), have been linked to CNS. In the liver, UGT1A1 conjugates bilirubin with glucuronic acid, thereby increasing bilirubin water solubility and thus facilitating its excretion. The UGT1A1 variants result in absent (CNS1) or reduced (CNS2) UGT1A1 activity, with marked impairment of bilirubin conjugation.", "diagnostic_methods": "The physical examination shows isolated jaundice and biological analyses detect only severe unconjugated hyperbilirubinemia with normal liver function tests. Abdominal imaging studies (CT scans or ultrasonograms) are normal. Currently, definitive diagnosis relies on genomic DNA analysis (ruling out the need for liver biopsy). In the past, definitive diagnosis was based on demonstration of the enzymatic deficiency in the liver (hepatic biopsy performed after three months of age); however, liver biopsy is no longer performed.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis varies depending of the type of CNS and includes disorders of excessive bilirubin production (hemolysis) and mild hepatic deficiency of hepatic UGT1A1 (Gilbert syndrome).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible provided both disease-causing mutations have been identified in the proband.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment of CNS1 relies on phototherapy (initially at hospital and then at home) for 10-12 hours per day. Bilirubin chelators and ursodeoxycholic acid may also be prescribed in these patients. To date, the only effective treatment for CNS1 is liver transplantation. Treatment of CNS2 consists of daily phenobarbital.", "prognosis": "Children with CNS1 may develop neurological complications as a consequence of the neurotoxicity of unconjugated bilirubin whereas prognosis is generally good for patients with CNS2."}, {"name": "Bilirubin-UGT-Defizienz Typ 1", "sub_name": "Crigler-Najjar-Syndrom Typ 1", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of Crigler Najjar syndrome (CNS), a hereditary disorder of hepatic bilirubin conjugation, characterized by severe neonatal unconjugated hyperbilirubinemia due to a complete absence of hepatic UDP-glucuronosyltransferase 1A1. The disorder clinically manifests with neonatal, isolated, severe and permanent jaundice with a permanent risk of bilirubin encephalopathy.", "synonyms": "Bilirubin uridinediphosphate glucuronosyltransferase deficiency type 1, Bilirubin-UGT deficiency type 1, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "E80.5", "omim": "218800", "umls": "C0010324\u00a0 C2931131", "mesh": "C536212", "gard": "47", "meddra": "10057034", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of Crigler-Najjar syndrome type 1 (CNS1) is unknown.", "clinical_description": "Infants present with persistent jaundice at or soon after birth. Bilirubin encephalopathy (kernicterus manifesting as hypertonia, deafness, oculomotor palsy and lethargy) due to hyperbilirubinemia is a permanent risk. Neurologic defects (injury to basal ganglia, cerebellar and likely hippocampal structures) can occur, generally associated with intellectual and motor impairment.", "etiology": "Numerous variants in the gene UGT1A1 gene (2q37), encoding the enzyme UDP-glucuronosyltransferase 1A1 (UGT1A1), have been linked to CNS1. In the liver, UGT1A1 conjugates bilirubin with glucuronic acid, thereby increasing bilirubin water solubility and thus facilitating its excretion. The UGT1A1 variants result in absent UGT1A1 activity with marked impairment of bilirubin conjugation.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on findings of total serum bilirubin between 20 and 45 mg/dL and presence of traces of bilirubin glucuronides in bile. Diagnosis is confirmed by genomic DNA analysis (ruling out the need for liver biopsy). When liver biopsy was performed, it showed a total deficiency of hepatic UGT1A1 activity.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes disorders of excessive bilirubin production (hemolysis, infections). CNS type 2 (CNS2) can be excluded by the lack of response to phenobarbital treatment and by DNA analysis.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible provided both disease-causing mutations have been identified in the proband.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment relies on phototherapy for 10-12 hours a day (to maintain levels of unconjugated hyperbilirubinemia below the neurotoxic threshold and the bilirubin/albumin molar ratio <0.7). Orthotopic liver transplantation may be considered and is more effective when performed before onset of neurologic damage. Bilirubin chelators (calcium salts, cholestyramine) may be used. Treatment with heme oxygenase inhibitors (tin-mesoporphyrin) can decrease plasma bilirubin concentrations but are not advised in the long term, because of their side effects (photosensitization). They may be useful for treating acute and severe hyperbilirubinemia but are not available for daily clinical practice. Gene therapy trials are ongoing. Prompt treatment of neurologic manifestations is required to avoid potentially devastating neurologic sequelae (intensive phototherapy, albumin infusions, and plasma exchanges). Unlike CNS2, patients with CNS1 do not respond to phenobarbital.", "prognosis": "Without treatment, CNS1 is lethal as a result of kernicterus. With treatment and management children have a good prognosis and may follow normal schooling, even though the treatment is very restrictive. Adult patients who have not undergone liver transplantation still require phototherapy but may have ''near normal'' social and familial lives. A few adult women have given birth to normal children, provided their pregnancies have been carefully followed up."}, {"name": "Bilirubin-UGT-Defizienz Typ 2", "sub_name": "Crigler-Najjar-Syndrom Typ 2", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des CNS 2 ist nicht bekannt. CNS hat eine gesch\u00e4tzte Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt von 1:1.000.000.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of Crigler Najjar syndrome (CNS), a rare hereditary disorder of bilirubin metabolism, characterized by unconjugated hyperbilirubinemia due to reduced and inducible activity of hepatic UDP-glucuronosyltransferase 1A1. The disorder clinically manifests with neonatal, isolated jaundice with a risk of developing bilirubin encephalopathy later in life due to triggers such as stress or infection.", "synonyms": "Bilirubin uridinediphosphate glucuronosyltransferase deficiency type 2, Bilirubin-UGT deficiency type 2, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "E80.5", "omim": "606785", "umls": "C0268311\u00a0 C2931132", "mesh": "C536213", "gard": "8683", "meddra": "10011387", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of Crigler Najjar syndrome type 2 (CNS2) is unknown.", "clinical_description": "First clinical manifestations usually appear soon after birth. CNS2 patients are less severely jaundiced than CNS type 1 (CNS1) patients, have pigmented bile that contains bilirubin glucuronides, and generally do not present neurologic or intellectual impairment. Bilirubin encephalopathy may develop in later life when patients experience a superimposed infection or stress.", "etiology": "Numerous variants in the UGT1A1 gene (2q37), encoding the enzyme UDP-glucuronosyltransferase 1A1 (UGT1A1), have been linked to CNS2. In the liver, UGT1A1 conjugates bilirubin with glucuronic acid, thereby increasing bilirubin water solubility and thus facilitating its excretion. The UGT1A1 variants result in reduced, but inducible bilirubin UGT1A1 activity, with marked impairment of bilirubin conjugation.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on biochemical findings with total serum bilirubin ranging from 6 to 20 mg/dL and presence of bilirubin glucuronides in bile. Diagnosis is confirmed by genomic DNA analysis (ruling out the need for liver biopsy). It may also help in differentiating between the two types of CNS. Liver biopsy, when it was performed, revealed residual enzymatic activity.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes disorders of excessive bilirubin production (hemolysis). CNS2 can be differentiated from CNS1 by the response to phenobarbital treatment and from mild hepatic deficiency of UGT1A1 (Gilbert syndrome).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible provided both disease-causing mutations have been identified in the proband.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment relies on daily phenobarbital administration that can induce the expression of UGT1A1 resulting in a decrease in the serum bilirubin level by approximately 60-70%. Patients and their families must be educated to be very careful during infectious episodes and/or fasting periods that are likely to increase bilirubin production and thus increase hyperbilirubinemia. Should this occur, patients must be examined by their physician and serum bilirubin concentration must be measured.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is good: this form does not cause cognitive or motor impairment during childhood. Adult patients remain jaundiced and must continue phenobarbital treatment throughout their life. However, all patients have to be educated and informed regarding at-risk-for-increase of bilirubin production (infection, stress and prolonged fasting)."}, {"name": "Bilirubin-UGT-Mangel", "sub_name": "Crigler-Najjar-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Krankheit ist extrem selten und hat eine Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt von etwa 1:1.000.000. Bisher wurden nur wenige hundert F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Beide Geschlechter sind gleich betroffen. Das CNS 1 wird bereits in den ersten Lebenstagen auff\u00e4llig und besteht danach unver\u00e4ndert fort; auch CNS 2 beginnt fr\u00fch.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare hereditary disorder of bilirubin metabolism characterized by unconjugated hyperbilirubinemia due to a either a complete (type 1) or partial and inducible (type 2) hepatic deficit of UDP-glucuronosyltransferase 1A1 activity. The disorder manifests with neonatal jaundice with a risk of developing bilirubin encephalopathy.", "synonyms": "Bilirubin uridinediphosphate glucuronosyltransferase deficiency, Bilirubin-UGT deficiency, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "E80.5", "omim": "218800\u00a0 606785", "umls": "C0010324", "mesh": "D003414", "meddra": "10011386", "epidemiology": "Whilst data on prevalence is very limited, Crigler Najjar syndrome (CNS) is estimated to affect less than 1/100,000 people in Europe. Both sexes are equally affected.", "clinical_description": "First clinical manifestations usually appear soon after birth, presenting with isolated jaundice that is more severe in CNS type 1 (CNS1) than in CNS type 2 (CNS2). In CNS1, it may evolve to bilirubin encephalopathy (kernicterus) with hypertonia, deafness, oculomotor palsy and lethargy when the treatment is delayed or inadequate. In CNS2, the risk of kernicterus is much lower but does exist.", "etiology": "Numerous variants in the gene UGT1A1 (2q37), encoding the enzyme UDP-glucuronosyltransferase 1A1 (UGT1A1), have been linked to CNS. In the liver, UGT1A1 conjugates bilirubin with glucuronic acid, thereby increasing bilirubin water solubility and thus facilitating its excretion. The UGT1A1 variants result in absent (CNS1) or reduced (CNS2) UGT1A1 activity, with marked impairment of bilirubin conjugation.", "diagnostic_methods": "The physical examination shows isolated jaundice and biological analyses detect only severe unconjugated hyperbilirubinemia with normal liver function tests. Abdominal imaging studies (CT scans or ultrasonograms) are normal. Currently, definitive diagnosis relies on genomic DNA analysis (ruling out the need for liver biopsy). In the past, definitive diagnosis was based on demonstration of the enzymatic deficiency in the liver (hepatic biopsy performed after three months of age); however, liver biopsy is no longer performed.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis varies depending of the type of CNS and includes disorders of excessive bilirubin production (hemolysis) and mild hepatic deficiency of hepatic UGT1A1 (Gilbert syndrome).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible provided both disease-causing mutations have been identified in the proband.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment of CNS1 relies on phototherapy (initially at hospital and then at home) for 10-12 hours per day. Bilirubin chelators and ursodeoxycholic acid may also be prescribed in these patients. To date, the only effective treatment for CNS1 is liver transplantation. Treatment of CNS2 consists of daily phenobarbital.", "prognosis": "Children with CNS1 may develop neurological complications as a consequence of the neurotoxicity of unconjugated bilirubin whereas prognosis is generally good for patients with CNS2."}, {"name": "Bilirubin-UGT-Mangel Typ 1", "sub_name": "Crigler-Najjar-Syndrom Typ 1", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of Crigler Najjar syndrome (CNS), a hereditary disorder of hepatic bilirubin conjugation, characterized by severe neonatal unconjugated hyperbilirubinemia due to a complete absence of hepatic UDP-glucuronosyltransferase 1A1. The disorder clinically manifests with neonatal, isolated, severe and permanent jaundice with a permanent risk of bilirubin encephalopathy.", "synonyms": "Bilirubin uridinediphosphate glucuronosyltransferase deficiency type 1, Bilirubin-UGT deficiency type 1, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "E80.5", "omim": "218800", "umls": "C0010324\u00a0 C2931131", "mesh": "C536212", "gard": "47", "meddra": "10057034", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of Crigler-Najjar syndrome type 1 (CNS1) is unknown.", "clinical_description": "Infants present with persistent jaundice at or soon after birth. Bilirubin encephalopathy (kernicterus manifesting as hypertonia, deafness, oculomotor palsy and lethargy) due to hyperbilirubinemia is a permanent risk. Neurologic defects (injury to basal ganglia, cerebellar and likely hippocampal structures) can occur, generally associated with intellectual and motor impairment.", "etiology": "Numerous variants in the gene UGT1A1 gene (2q37), encoding the enzyme UDP-glucuronosyltransferase 1A1 (UGT1A1), have been linked to CNS1. In the liver, UGT1A1 conjugates bilirubin with glucuronic acid, thereby increasing bilirubin water solubility and thus facilitating its excretion. The UGT1A1 variants result in absent UGT1A1 activity with marked impairment of bilirubin conjugation.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on findings of total serum bilirubin between 20 and 45 mg/dL and presence of traces of bilirubin glucuronides in bile. Diagnosis is confirmed by genomic DNA analysis (ruling out the need for liver biopsy). When liver biopsy was performed, it showed a total deficiency of hepatic UGT1A1 activity.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes disorders of excessive bilirubin production (hemolysis, infections). CNS type 2 (CNS2) can be excluded by the lack of response to phenobarbital treatment and by DNA analysis.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible provided both disease-causing mutations have been identified in the proband.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment relies on phototherapy for 10-12 hours a day (to maintain levels of unconjugated hyperbilirubinemia below the neurotoxic threshold and the bilirubin/albumin molar ratio <0.7). Orthotopic liver transplantation may be considered and is more effective when performed before onset of neurologic damage. Bilirubin chelators (calcium salts, cholestyramine) may be used. Treatment with heme oxygenase inhibitors (tin-mesoporphyrin) can decrease plasma bilirubin concentrations but are not advised in the long term, because of their side effects (photosensitization). They may be useful for treating acute and severe hyperbilirubinemia but are not available for daily clinical practice. Gene therapy trials are ongoing. Prompt treatment of neurologic manifestations is required to avoid potentially devastating neurologic sequelae (intensive phototherapy, albumin infusions, and plasma exchanges). Unlike CNS2, patients with CNS1 do not respond to phenobarbital.", "prognosis": "Without treatment, CNS1 is lethal as a result of kernicterus. With treatment and management children have a good prognosis and may follow normal schooling, even though the treatment is very restrictive. Adult patients who have not undergone liver transplantation still require phototherapy but may have ''near normal'' social and familial lives. A few adult women have given birth to normal children, provided their pregnancies have been carefully followed up."}, {"name": "Bilirubin-UGT-Mangel Typ 2", "sub_name": "Crigler-Najjar-Syndrom Typ 2", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des CNS 2 ist nicht bekannt. CNS hat eine gesch\u00e4tzte Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt von 1:1.000.000.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of Crigler Najjar syndrome (CNS), a rare hereditary disorder of bilirubin metabolism, characterized by unconjugated hyperbilirubinemia due to reduced and inducible activity of hepatic UDP-glucuronosyltransferase 1A1. The disorder clinically manifests with neonatal, isolated jaundice with a risk of developing bilirubin encephalopathy later in life due to triggers such as stress or infection.", "synonyms": "Bilirubin uridinediphosphate glucuronosyltransferase deficiency type 2, Bilirubin-UGT deficiency type 2, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "E80.5", "omim": "606785", "umls": "C0268311\u00a0 C2931132", "mesh": "C536213", "gard": "8683", "meddra": "10011387", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of Crigler Najjar syndrome type 2 (CNS2) is unknown.", "clinical_description": "First clinical manifestations usually appear soon after birth. CNS2 patients are less severely jaundiced than CNS type 1 (CNS1) patients, have pigmented bile that contains bilirubin glucuronides, and generally do not present neurologic or intellectual impairment. Bilirubin encephalopathy may develop in later life when patients experience a superimposed infection or stress.", "etiology": "Numerous variants in the UGT1A1 gene (2q37), encoding the enzyme UDP-glucuronosyltransferase 1A1 (UGT1A1), have been linked to CNS2. In the liver, UGT1A1 conjugates bilirubin with glucuronic acid, thereby increasing bilirubin water solubility and thus facilitating its excretion. The UGT1A1 variants result in reduced, but inducible bilirubin UGT1A1 activity, with marked impairment of bilirubin conjugation.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on biochemical findings with total serum bilirubin ranging from 6 to 20 mg/dL and presence of bilirubin glucuronides in bile. Diagnosis is confirmed by genomic DNA analysis (ruling out the need for liver biopsy). It may also help in differentiating between the two types of CNS. Liver biopsy, when it was performed, revealed residual enzymatic activity.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes disorders of excessive bilirubin production (hemolysis). CNS2 can be differentiated from CNS1 by the response to phenobarbital treatment and from mild hepatic deficiency of UGT1A1 (Gilbert syndrome).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible provided both disease-causing mutations have been identified in the proband.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment relies on daily phenobarbital administration that can induce the expression of UGT1A1 resulting in a decrease in the serum bilirubin level by approximately 60-70%. Patients and their families must be educated to be very careful during infectious episodes and/or fasting periods that are likely to increase bilirubin production and thus increase hyperbilirubinemia. Should this occur, patients must be examined by their physician and serum bilirubin concentration must be measured.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is good: this form does not cause cognitive or motor impairment during childhood. Adult patients remain jaundiced and must continue phenobarbital treatment throughout their life. However, all patients have to be educated and informed regarding at-risk-for-increase of bilirubin production (infection, stress and prolonged fasting)."}, {"name": "Bilirubin-Uridindiphosphat-Glucuronosyltransferase-Mangel", "sub_name": "Crigler-Najjar-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Krankheit ist extrem selten und hat eine Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt von etwa 1:1.000.000. Bisher wurden nur wenige hundert F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Beide Geschlechter sind gleich betroffen. Das CNS 1 wird bereits in den ersten Lebenstagen auff\u00e4llig und besteht danach unver\u00e4ndert fort; auch CNS 2 beginnt fr\u00fch.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare hereditary disorder of bilirubin metabolism characterized by unconjugated hyperbilirubinemia due to a either a complete (type 1) or partial and inducible (type 2) hepatic deficit of UDP-glucuronosyltransferase 1A1 activity. The disorder manifests with neonatal jaundice with a risk of developing bilirubin encephalopathy.", "synonyms": "Bilirubin uridinediphosphate glucuronosyltransferase deficiency, Bilirubin-UGT deficiency, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "E80.5", "omim": "218800\u00a0 606785", "umls": "C0010324", "mesh": "D003414", "meddra": "10011386", "epidemiology": "Whilst data on prevalence is very limited, Crigler Najjar syndrome (CNS) is estimated to affect less than 1/100,000 people in Europe. Both sexes are equally affected.", "clinical_description": "First clinical manifestations usually appear soon after birth, presenting with isolated jaundice that is more severe in CNS type 1 (CNS1) than in CNS type 2 (CNS2). In CNS1, it may evolve to bilirubin encephalopathy (kernicterus) with hypertonia, deafness, oculomotor palsy and lethargy when the treatment is delayed or inadequate. In CNS2, the risk of kernicterus is much lower but does exist.", "etiology": "Numerous variants in the gene UGT1A1 (2q37), encoding the enzyme UDP-glucuronosyltransferase 1A1 (UGT1A1), have been linked to CNS. In the liver, UGT1A1 conjugates bilirubin with glucuronic acid, thereby increasing bilirubin water solubility and thus facilitating its excretion. The UGT1A1 variants result in absent (CNS1) or reduced (CNS2) UGT1A1 activity, with marked impairment of bilirubin conjugation.", "diagnostic_methods": "The physical examination shows isolated jaundice and biological analyses detect only severe unconjugated hyperbilirubinemia with normal liver function tests. Abdominal imaging studies (CT scans or ultrasonograms) are normal. Currently, definitive diagnosis relies on genomic DNA analysis (ruling out the need for liver biopsy). In the past, definitive diagnosis was based on demonstration of the enzymatic deficiency in the liver (hepatic biopsy performed after three months of age); however, liver biopsy is no longer performed.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis varies depending of the type of CNS and includes disorders of excessive bilirubin production (hemolysis) and mild hepatic deficiency of hepatic UGT1A1 (Gilbert syndrome).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible provided both disease-causing mutations have been identified in the proband.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment of CNS1 relies on phototherapy (initially at hospital and then at home) for 10-12 hours per day. Bilirubin chelators and ursodeoxycholic acid may also be prescribed in these patients. To date, the only effective treatment for CNS1 is liver transplantation. Treatment of CNS2 consists of daily phenobarbital.", "prognosis": "Children with CNS1 may develop neurological complications as a consequence of the neurotoxicity of unconjugated bilirubin whereas prognosis is generally good for patients with CNS2."}, {"name": "Billard-Toutain-Maheut-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Dysphasie, famili\u00e4re kongenitale", "german_description": "Die entwicklungsbedingte Dysphasie ist gepr\u00e4gt durch signifikante Probleme beim Erwerb der gesprochenen Sprache. Die Kinder sind normal intelligent und haben keine anderen Anomalien (intellektuelle Defizite, Kommunikations-St\u00f6rungen, Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, nachweisbare Hirnl\u00e4sionen). Betroffen sind 2-5% sonst ungesch\u00e4digter Kinder. Seltener sind schwere Formen, die auch noch im Erwachsenenalter weiterbestehen. Diese Patienten haben mit 6 Jahren eine Sprachst\u00f6rung mit mangelhafter Wortbildung und Syntax. Mit drei Jahren sprechen sie noch gar nicht. Familien, in denen solche St\u00f6rungen erblich sind und in denen h\u00e4ufiger M\u00e4nner als Frauen betroffen sind, wurden mehrfach beschrieben. Die Analyse dieser Familien und auch Zwillingsstudien belegen die wichtige Rolle genetischer Faktoren bei der Manifestation entwicklungsbedingter St\u00f6rungen der gesprochenen Sprache. Sie lassen auch an monogene, wahrscheinlich autosomal-dominante Vererbung denken. In einer au\u00dfergew\u00f6hnlichen Familie war \u00fcber drei Generationen fast die H\u00e4lfte der Mitglieder mit einer schweren Sprech- und Sprachst\u00f6rung betroffen. Praktisch alle Bereiche der Grammatik und der Sprache waren gest\u00f6rt. Zus\u00e4tzlich hatten die betroffenen Familienmitglieder eine schwere oro-faziale Dyspraxie, und f\u00fcr Au\u00dfenstehende waren ihre sprachlichen \u00c4u\u00dferungen weitgehend unverst\u00e4ndlich. Das wiederholte Auftreten der Krankheit war mit monogener, autosomal-dominanter Vererbung vereinbar. Durch genomweite Kopplungsanalyse wurde eine Region auf Chromosom 7 gefunden, die gemeinsam mit der Sprech- und Sprachst\u00f6rung vererbt wird. Mit dieser Untersuchung wurde best\u00e4tigt, da\u00df die Krankheit autosomal-dominant mit vollst\u00e4ndiger Penetranz vererbt wird. In weiteren Analysen wurde der verantwortliche SPCH1-Locus in ein 5,6 cM-Intervall der Chromosomenregion 7q31 kartiert. Ursache der Krankheit sind Mutationen im FOXP2-Gen, das in dieser Region liegt. Dies ist der erste Hinweis auf die molekulargenetischen Grundlagen eines Entwicklungsprozesses, der in Sprechen und Sprache gipfelt. Sicher ist dies nicht das einzige f\u00fcr Sprache verantwortliche Gen, und auch epigenetische Faktoren spielen wahrscheinlich eine Rolle. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Familial developmental dysphasia is a severe form of developmental verbal apraxia characterized by a deficit in spontaneous speech, writing, grammatical judgment and repetition, defective articulation, moderate to severe degree of dyspraxia, a reduced use of consonant clusters, and comprehension delay. Hearing and intelligence are normal.", "synonyms": "Billard-Toutain-Maheut syndrome, FOXP2-associated dysphasia, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "F80.1", "omim": "600117", "umls": "C1838630", "gard": "1823"}, {"name": "BILU-Syndrom", "sub_name": "B-Zell-Immundefekt-Extremit\u00e4tenanomalien-urogenitale Fehlbildungen-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "BILU-Syndrom, Hoffman-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "BIMSE", "sub_name": "Fokalepilepsie, benigne infantile, mit Midline-Spikes und Waves im Schlaf", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Benign infantile focal epilepsy with midline spikes and waves during sleep is a rare infantile epilepsy syndrome characterized by age of onset between 4 and 30 months, partial sporadic seizures presenting with motion arrest, staring, cyanosis and, less common, automatisms and lateralizing signs, and characteristic interictal sleep EEG changes consisting of a spike followed by a bell-shaped slow wave in the midline region.", "synonyms": "BIMSE, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G40.0"}, {"name": "BIND", "sub_name": "Bilirubin-Enzephalopathie, chronische", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare neurologic disease characterized by the chronic consequences of bilirubin toxicity in the globus pallidus, sub-thalamic nuclei, and other brain regions, after exposure to high levels of unconjugated bilirubin in the neonatal period. Symptoms begin after the acute phase of bilirubin encephalopathy in the first year of life, evolve slowly over several years, and include mild to severe extrapyramidal disturbances (especially dystonia and athetosis), auditory neuropathy spectrum disorder, and oculomotor and dental abnormalities.", "synonyms": "BIND, Bilirubin-induced neurological dysfunction, CBE, KSD, Kernicterus spectrum disorder, ", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "P57.8"}, {"name": "Bindegewebskrankheit durch LH3-Mangel", "sub_name": "Bindegewebskrankheit durch Lysyl-Hydroxylase 3-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene, genetisch bedingte Erkrankung, die durch einen Mangel an Lysyl-Hydroxylase 3 (LH3)-Aktivit\u00e4t verursacht wird und durch eine Vielzahl von Gewebe- und Organbeteiligungen gekennzeichnet ist. Zu den Kennzeichen der Krankheit z\u00e4hlen Skelettanomalien (Klumpfu\u00df, progressive Skoliose, Osteopenie, pathologische Frakturen), Augenbeteiligung (flache Netzh\u00e4ute, Myopie, Katarakte) sowie Haar-, Nagel- und Hautanomalien (grobes, abnormal verteiltes Haar, Hautblasenbildung, reduzierte Palmarfalten, hypoplastische N\u00e4gel). Die Patienten zeigen au\u00dferdem eine intrauterine Wachstumsretardierung, Gesichtsdysmorphien (flaches Gesichtsprofil, tief angesetzte Ohren, flache Augenh\u00f6hlen, kurze und nach oben gerichtete Nase, nach unten gerichtete Mundwinkel) und Gelenkbeugekontrakturen. Wachstums- und Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung, beidseitige sensorineurale Taubheit, br\u00fcchiges Zwerchfell und sp\u00e4ter auftretende spontane Gef\u00e4\u00dfrupturen sind weitere assoziierte Merkmale.", "synonyms": "Bindegewebskrankheit durch LH3-Mangel, Knochenfragilit\u00e4t-Kontrakturen-Arterienruptur-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "M35.8", "OMIM": "612394", "UMLS": "C2676285"}, {"name": "Bindegewebskrankheit durch Lysyl-Hydroxylase 3-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene, genetisch bedingte Erkrankung, die durch einen Mangel an Lysyl-Hydroxylase 3 (LH3)-Aktivit\u00e4t verursacht wird und durch eine Vielzahl von Gewebe- und Organbeteiligungen gekennzeichnet ist. Zu den Kennzeichen der Krankheit z\u00e4hlen Skelettanomalien (Klumpfu\u00df, progressive Skoliose, Osteopenie, pathologische Frakturen), Augenbeteiligung (flache Netzh\u00e4ute, Myopie, Katarakte) sowie Haar-, Nagel- und Hautanomalien (grobes, abnormal verteiltes Haar, Hautblasenbildung, reduzierte Palmarfalten, hypoplastische N\u00e4gel). Die Patienten zeigen au\u00dferdem eine intrauterine Wachstumsretardierung, Gesichtsdysmorphien (flaches Gesichtsprofil, tief angesetzte Ohren, flache Augenh\u00f6hlen, kurze und nach oben gerichtete Nase, nach unten gerichtete Mundwinkel) und Gelenkbeugekontrakturen. Wachstums- und Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung, beidseitige sensorineurale Taubheit, br\u00fcchiges Zwerchfell und sp\u00e4ter auftretende spontane Gef\u00e4\u00dfrupturen sind weitere assoziierte Merkmale.", "synonyms": "Bindegewebskrankheit durch LH3-Mangel, Knochenfragilit\u00e4t-Kontrakturen-Arterienruptur-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "M35.8", "OMIM": "612394", "UMLS": "C2676285"}, {"name": "Bindehautkrankheit, seltene", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C0009759", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Bindehaut-Lymphom, prim\u00e4res", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das prim\u00e4re Lymphom der Bindehaut ist eine extrem seltene klonale lymphoide Proliferation der Augenoberfl\u00e4che mit einem indolenten Verlauf. Klinisch pr\u00e4sentiert es sich mit behandlungsresistenter Bindehautentz\u00fcndung, Ptosis, \u00fcberm\u00e4\u00dfiger Tr\u00e4nenproduktion oder als schmerzloser, lachsfarbener, ''fleischiger'' Fleck mit glatter oder multinodul\u00e4rer Oberfl\u00e4che auf der bulb\u00e4ren Bindehaut. Histologisch handelt es sich in der Regel um ein B-Zell-Non-Hodgkin-Lymphom (am h\u00e4ufigsten ein extranodales Marginalzonen-B-Zell-Lymphom, gefolgt von einem follikul\u00e4ren und diffusen gro\u00dfzelligen B-Zell-Lymphom), wobei ein konjunktivales T-Zell-Non-Hodgkin-Lymphom sehr selten ist.", "synonyms": "Prim\u00e4rer lymphoider Tumor der Bindehaut, ", "ICD-10": "C85.7"}, {"name": "Binder-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Dysplasie, maxillonasale, Typ Binder, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0oder\u00a0Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q75.8", "OMIM": "155050", "UMLS": "C0220692\u00a0 C3888567", "GARD": "6992", "summary": "Das Binder-Syndrom ist eine Entwicklungsst\u00f6rung haupts\u00e4chlich des vorderen Maxilla-Anteils und der Nasenregion. Typisch ist das ungew\u00f6hnlich flache, wenig entwickelte Mittelgesicht (Mittelgesichtshypoplasie) der Patienten, ihre abnorm kurze Nase mit flacher Nasenwurzel, der unterentwickelte Oberkiefer und der relativ vorstehende Unterkiefer und/oder ein 'umgekehrter \u00dcberbiss' (Klasse III-Malokklusion). Bei einigen Patienten wurde eine Hypoplasie der Finger-Endphalangen beschrieben. \u00c4tiologie und Pathogenese des Binder-Syndroms sind noch unklar. Die H\u00e4ufigkeit bei der Geburt liegt unter 1/10.000, das Syndrom wird aber wahrscheinlich zu selten diagnostiziert. Die meisten F\u00e4lle der Literatur waren sporadisch, aber einige wenige Male wurde auch \u00fcber wiederholtes Auftreten in Familien berichtet. Diese F\u00e4lle k\u00f6nnten durch rezessive Vererbung, durch dominante Vererbung mit reduzierter Penetranz oder durch multifaktorielle Vererbung erkl\u00e4rt werden. Ph\u00e4nokopien des Binder-Syndroms wurden bei Kindern beschrieben, die in utero der Einwirkung von Phenytoin oder einem Vitamin K-Mangel (verursacht durch m\u00fctterliche Einnahme von Antikoagulantien oder durch Gallensteine) ausgesetzt waren. Einige Autoren halten das Binder-Syndrom und die Chondrodysplasia punctata f\u00fcr allelische Erkrankungen. Andere Autoren meinen, da\u00df die maxillo-nasale Dysplasie vom Typ Binder keine eigenst\u00e4ndige Krankheit (Entit\u00e4t) und kein Syndrom ist, sondern dass es sich um eine unspezifische Anomalie der naso-maxill\u00e4ren Region handelt. Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik ist durch 2- oder 3-dimensionale Sonographie (Nachweis des flachen Gesichtsprofils und einer Knochenhypoplasie) ab der 20. Schwangerschaftswoche m\u00f6glich. Das Ausma\u00df der Fehlbildungen variiert beim Binder-Syndrom erheblich, so dass chirurgische Korrekturen (orthodontisch, plastisch-chirurgisch) individuell geplant werden m\u00fcssen. "}, {"name": "Bindewald-Ulmer-M\u00fcller-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Fallot-Tetralogie mit Intelligenzminderung und Wachstumsverz\u00f6gerungen", "english": 0, "defenition": "Fallot-Komplex - intellektuelles Defizit - verz\u00f6gertes Wachstum ist eine seltene Erkrankung mit Fallot'scher Tetralogie, kleinen Gesichtsanomalien und, in schwerer Auspr\u00e4gung, mit intellektuellem Defizit und Wachstumsretardierung.", "synonyms": "Bindewald-Ulmer-M\u00fcller-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "601127", "UMLS": "C1832735", "GARD": "893", "epidemiology": "Bisher wurden f\u00fcnf Patienten aus zwei Familien beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Dysmorphe Merkmale sind gro\u00dfe, abstehende, abnorm modellierte Ohren und eine breite Nasenwurzel. Beschrieben wurden auch Mikrozephalie und Syndaktylie der zweiten und dritten Zehen. Alle f\u00fcnf Patienten sind intellektuell schwer eingeschr\u00e4nkt.", "etiology": "Die Krankheit ist wahrscheinlich erblich, autosomal rezessive Vererbung wird angenommen.", "summary": "Bisher wurden f\u00fcnf Patienten aus zwei Familien beschrieben."}, {"name": "BINS", "sub_name": "Neugeborenenkr\u00e4mpfe, benigne idiopathische", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare neonatal epilepsy syndrome characterized by seizures without specific underlying etiology, occurring during the first days of life in infants with an otherwise normal neurological state and no family history of neonatal convulsions. The most commonly partial and clonic seizures usually last for one to three minutes. Repeated seizures may lead to status epilepticus lasting up to 20 hours. Overall, remission rates are high and neurological outcome is favorable.", "synonyms": "BINS, Benign nonfamilial neonatal seizures, ", "icd_10": "G40.3"}, {"name": "Bioelektrischer Status epilepticus im Schlaf", "sub_name": "Epilepsie mit kontinuierlichen Spike-Wave-Entladungen im Schlaf", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Epilepsie mit kontinuierlichen Spike-Wave-Entladungen im Schlaf (continuous spike-wave during sleep, CSWS) ist eine seltene epileptische Enzephalopathie bei Kindern. Charakteristisch sind Krampfanf\u00e4lle, elektroenzephalographische Muster eines Status epilepticus im Schlaf (ESES) und eine kognitive Entwicklungsregression in mindestens zwei der Entwicklungsdom\u00e4nen.", "synonyms": "Bioelektrischer Status epilepticus im Schlaf, CSWS, CSWS-Syndrom, ESES-Syndrom, Epileptische Enzephalopathie mit kontinuierlichen Spike-Wave-Entladungen im Slow-Wave-Schlaf, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G40.4", "OMIM": "245570", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist unbekannt. Das CSWS ist ein seltenes Syndrom, welches (in einigen Studien) 0,5-1,5% der Kinder mit Epilepsie betrifft. Jungen sind dabei h\u00e4ufiger betroffen als M\u00e4dchen mit einem Verh\u00e4ltnis von 3:2.", "clinical_description": "CSWS ist eine altersabh\u00e4ngige epileptische Enzephalopathie, bei der sich das klinische Bild \u00fcber die Zeit entwickelt. Nach einer normalen oder nur moderat abweichenden Entwicklung beginnen die Krampfanf\u00e4lle meist im Alter von 2-4 Jahren. Sie sind h\u00e4ufig unilateral, tonisch-klonisch oder klonisch und sind typischerweise schlafgebunden. Die Anf\u00e4lle werden etwa in einem Alter von 5-6 Jahren h\u00e4ufiger, schwerer und behandlungsresistenter mit einer deutlichen Verschlechterung der Anf\u00e4lle, EEG und Entwicklungsaspekte (z.B. Sprache, soziale Interaktion, Globalintelligenz, motorische F\u00e4higkeiten und Verhalten). Innerhalb dieses akuten Stadiums sind die Anf\u00e4lle (z.B. Absencen sowie klonische, tonisch-klonische und andere Typen) schwierig zu kontrollieren. Eine spontane Besserung der Anf\u00e4lle und der Auff\u00e4lligkeiten im EEG tritt vor der Pubert\u00e4t auf. Die meisten Patienten bleiben allerdings schwer entwicklungsverz\u00f6gert.", "etiology": "Fr\u00fche Entwicklungsst\u00f6rungen, wie besonders den Thalamus betreffende vaskul\u00e4re Insulte oder Malformationen der kortikalen Entwicklung, wurden in etwa der H\u00e4lfte der F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Genetische Faktoren, besonders Mutation im GRIN2A Gen (16p13.2), sind k\u00fcrzlich mit dem CSWS in Zusammenhang gebracht worden.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf der charakteristischen klinischen Entwicklung (Anf\u00e4lle und neurokognitive Verschlechterung in mindestens zwei Dom\u00e4nen) und den Zeichen im EEG. Das Hauptzeichen im EEG bei CSWS ist ESES. Charakteristisch hierbei ist eine deutliche Potenzierung von epileptiformen Entladungen w\u00e4hrend der Transition von Wachheit zum Schlaf, die zu (fast) kontinuierlichen bilateralen oder gelegentlich lateralisierten langsamen Spike-Waves f\u00fchren. Die Spike-Waves treten in einem signifikanten Teil des Non-REM-Schlafes auf. Zur Diagnostik von Gehirnl\u00e4sionen wird ein MRT durchgef\u00fchrt. Zurzeit ist eine genetische Testung auf das GRIN2A Gen keine Routine, in spezialisierten Zentren ist diese aber m\u00f6glich.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Differentialdiagnose beinhaltet alle epileptischen Syndrome mit der Potenzierung von epileptiformer Aktivit\u00e4t im Schlaf, wie das Landau-Kleffner-Syndrom, die benigne okzipitale Epilepsie des Kindesalters vom Typ Panayiotopoulos und Gastaut, sowie die Rolando-Epilepsie (siehe dort).", "genetic_counseling": "In Familien mit einer GRIN2A Mutation wurde ein autosomal-dominanter Erbgang vermutet.", "management_and_treatment": "Das Hauptziel der Behandlung ist die Anfallskontrolle. Es ist unklar ob eine Verbesserung der EEG-Auff\u00e4lligkeiten die Langzeitergebnisse der Entwicklung verbessern. Hohe Dosen an n\u00e4chtlichen Benzodiazepinen, wie Diazepam oder Clobazam, reduzieren akut und subakut die epiletiforme Aktivit\u00e4t. Die am h\u00e4ufigsten eingesetzten Antiepileptika sind Valproat, Levetiracetam, Lamotrigin und Ethosuximid. Kortikosteroide sind n\u00fctzlich, aber mit Langzeitnebenwirkungen assoziiert. In ausgew\u00e4hlten F\u00e4llen ist die Epilepsiechirurgie eine wirksame Therapie, auch in F\u00e4llen, bei denen die epiletiformen Entladungen beidseits auftreten.", "prognosis": "Auch wenn die Anf\u00e4lle und die EEG-Auff\u00e4lligkeiten dazu neigen, sich mit der Adoleszenz zu normalisieren, ist die Prognose der Entwicklung schlecht, da die neurokognitive Verschlechterung in den meisten F\u00e4llen bestehen bleibt.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist unbekannt. Das CSWS ist ein seltenes Syndrom, welches (in einigen Studien) 0,5-1,5% der Kinder mit Epilepsie betrifft. Jungen sind dabei h\u00e4ufiger betroffen als M\u00e4dchen mit einem Verh\u00e4ltnis von 3:2."}, {"name": "Biologische Anomalie ohne ph\u00e4notypische Charakterisierung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Biotinidase-Mangel", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des klinischen Biotinidase (BTD)-Mangels wird auf 1:61.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Heterozygotenfrequenz in der Normalbev\u00f6lkerung betr\u00e4gt etwa 1:120.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A late-onset form of multiple carboxylase deficiency, an inborn error of biotin metabolism that, if untreated, is characterized by seizures, breathing difficulties, hypotonia, skin rash, alopecia, hearing loss and delayed development.", "synonyms": "Juvenile-onset multiple carboxylase deficiency, Late-onset multiple carboxylase deficiency, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal, Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "E53.8", "omim": "253260", "umls": "C0220754\u00a0 C1854698", "mesh": "D028921", "gard": "894", "meddra": "10071434", "epidemiology": "Prevalence of clinical biotinidase deficiency (BD) is estimated to be 1/61,000. Carrier frequency in the general population is approximately 1/120.", "clinical_description": "Symptoms of BD deficiency typically appear within the first few months of life, but later onset has also been reported. Individuals with untreated profound deficiency (less than 10 % of mean normal serum biotinidase activity) have variable clinical findings including seizures, hypotonia, eczematoid rash, alopecia, ataxia, hearing loss, fungal infections, and developmental delay. Metabolically, untreated children can exhibit ketolactic acidosis, organic acidemia (-uria) and mild hyperammonemia. Individuals with untreated partial BD (10% to 30% of mean normal biotinidase activity) may be asymptomatic, but during periods of stress, such as illness, fever or fasting, may develop symptoms similar to those of individuals with profound BD. Multiple adults with optic neuropathy and/or peripheral neuropathy, that is often mistakenly diagnosed as multiple sclerosis, have been shown to have profound biotinidase deficiency.", "etiology": "BD deficiency is caused by mutations in the BTD gene (3p25) resulting in reduced or absent biotinidase activity. This enzyme recycles free, non-protein bound, biotin which is required for multiple biotin-dependent metabolic processes. There are more than 150 known mutations of the BTD gene that cause BD.", "diagnostic_methods": "The disorder is detected through newborn screening when available. Other cases are diagnosed by clinical signs and symptoms and confirmed by demonstration of deficient serum biotinidase activity. Molecular mutation analysis of the BTD gene is also possible.", "differential_diagnosis": "The symptoms of BD overlap with those of other metabolic diseases, including holocarboxylase synthetase deficiency, isolated carboxylase deficiency, nutritional biotin deficiency, zinc deficiency and essential fatty acid deficiency. Testing for biotinidase deficiency should be considered in all individuals thought to have multiple sclerosis.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis for at-risk pregnancies is possible and can be performed by enzymatic analysis or by mutation analysis when the mutation is known. However, because of the treatability of the disorder, prenatal testing is not considered by most families.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them of the 25% risk of having an affected child for each pregnancy. Siblings of patients with BD should be tested for the deficiency even if they do not exhibit symptoms.", "management_and_treatment": "Supplementation with oral biotin in the free, non-protein bound, form is the primary treatment and improves symptoms in symptomatic patients, and prevents symptoms in those identified by newborn screening or before symptoms have developed. Once some features, such as optic atrophy, hearing loss, or developmental delay develop, they may not be reversible with biotin treatment. Treatment with biotin should be maintained lifelong. There are no known, serious adverse effects of biotin therapy. Patients and their families should be warned about the importance of treatment compliance. Periodic ophthalmological, neurological and metabolic evaluations are recommended. Raw eggs should be avoided because of their avidin content (biotin-binding substance), but cooking inactivates the binding effect of avidin.", "prognosis": "The prognosis for individuals diagnosed with BD is very good, provided they are treated before symptoms occur and are compliant with biotin therapy. In adult patients presenting with optic neuropathy and/or peripheral neuropathy, improvement in symptoms is likely with early intervention. However, if such individuals remain symptomatic for too long a period, their symptoms may be irreversible."}, {"name": "Biotin-responsive St\u00f6rung der Basalganglien", "sub_name": "Biotin-Thiamin-responsive St\u00f6rung der Basalganglien", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic neurological disorder characterized by subacute encephalopathy with confusion, seizures, and movement disorder, often following a history of febrile illness. Imaging may reveal bilateral lesions in the basal ganglia. The disease usually becomes symptomatic in childhood and is life-threatening if left untreated, but symptoms can be reversed and progression prevented by treatment with high doses of biotin and thiamine.", "synonyms": "BBGD, BTBGD, Biotin-responsive basal ganglia disease, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "icd_10": "G93.8", "omim": "607483", "umls": "C1843807", "mesh": "C537658", "gard": "10237"}, {"name": "Biotin-Thiamin-responsive St\u00f6rung der Basalganglien", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic neurological disorder characterized by subacute encephalopathy with confusion, seizures, and movement disorder, often following a history of febrile illness. Imaging may reveal bilateral lesions in the basal ganglia. The disease usually becomes symptomatic in childhood and is life-threatening if left untreated, but symptoms can be reversed and progression prevented by treatment with high doses of biotin and thiamine.", "synonyms": "BBGD, BTBGD, Biotin-responsive basal ganglia disease, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "icd_10": "G93.8", "omim": "607483", "umls": "C1843807", "mesh": "C537658", "gard": "10237"}, {"name": "Bipartite Talus", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der bipartite Talus ist eine seltene, genetisch bedingte Knochenerkrankung, die durch das Vorhandensein von zwei nicht verschmolzenen Talarfragmenten gekennzeichnet ist, wobei das hintere Fragment auf H\u00f6he des hinteren Talarfortsatzes liegt. Die Patienten k\u00f6nnen sich mit Fu\u00df- und/oder Kn\u00f6chelschmerzen (belastungsinduziert oder nicht), wiederholten Kn\u00f6chelverstauchungen, chronischer Bandlaxit\u00e4t des Kn\u00f6chels, eingeschr\u00e4nkter Kn\u00f6chelbewegung (d. h. Plantarflexion, Eversion und Inversion) und leichten Schwellungen vorstellen.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "Q66.8"}, {"name": "Birdshot-Chorioretinopathie", "sub_name": "Chorioretinopathie Typ Birdshot", "german_description": "Die Birdshot (Schrotschu\u00df)-Chorioretinopathie ist eine entz\u00fcndliche Erkrankung der Ader- und Netzhaut des Auges. Auff\u00e4lligstes Symptom sind creme-farbene Flecken, die um die Papille herum in einem relativ regelm\u00e4\u00dfigen Muster angeordnet sind und in die Peripherie ausstrahlen. Beide Augen sind \u00e4hnlich betroffen. Oft ist dieser Befund von einer Entz\u00fcndung des Glask\u00f6rpers, einer Gef\u00e4\u00dfst\u00f6rung der Retina und einem zystischen Makula-\u00d6dem begleitet. Ein weiteres wesentliches Merkmal ist die Assoziation mit dem Antigen HLA-A29, das 95,9% der Patienten tragen. Betroffen sind Menschen im mittleren Lebensalter, ohne Bevorzugung eines Geschlechts. Die meisten Patienten sind europ\u00e4ischer Herkunft. Einige japanische Patienten wurden beschrieben und waren HLA-A29-negativ. Die \u00c4tiologie ist noch unbekannt, aber die starke Assoziation mit HLA-A29 l\u00e4\u00dft an eine Autoimmunerkrankung denken. Die Behandlung erfolgt mit entz\u00fcndungshemmenden Medikamenten, wenn Vitritis und Makula-\u00d6dem vorhanden sind. Eine sekund\u00e4re Gef\u00e4\u00dfneubildung in der Aderhaut wird mit Laser-Photokoagulation oder mit photodynamischer Therapie behandelt. Gef\u00e4\u00dfneubildung in der Netzhaut oder vor der Papille und Glask\u00f6rper-Blutungen erfordern eine Laser-Behandlung oder Entfernung des Glask\u00f6rpers. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Birdshot chorioretinopathy is a posterior uveitis characterized by multiple cream-colored, hypopigmented choroidal lesions in the fundus and a strong association with HLA-A29 and clinically presenting with blurred vision, floaters, photopsia, scotoma and nyctalopia.", "synonyms": "Birdshot chorioretinitis, Birdshot retinochoroiditis, Birdshot retinochoroidopathy, Vitiliginous choroiditis, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "H30.1", "omim": "605808", "umls": "C1853959", "mesh": "C537630", "gard": "5926", "epidemiology": "The disease is more common in North European descents with a female preponderance. It accounts for 6%-8% of cases of posterior uveitis. Prevalence in North Carolina is estimated to be 1/700,000.", "clinical_description": "The age of onset is usually the fifth or sixth decade of life. Patients often present with gradual deterioration of vision, floaters, photopsia, scotoma, nyctalopia, metamorphopsia and poor color and contrast sensitivity. Decreased visual acuity in early disease is attributed to macular edema. Persistent inflammation and optic disc edema can lead to optic atrophy and subsequent permanent visual loss. In majority of the patients, the disease is chronic and progressive while 20% of patients develop a limited disease with spontaneous remission. A systemic involvement including essential hypertension, cerebrovascular accidents, hearing loss, vitiligo (see this term) and psoriasis is rarely observed.", "etiology": "Etiology is unknown but an organ -specific T-cell - driven autoimmune process is implicated, with both choroid and retina being independent targets and sites of inflammation. The Th17 system has also been implicated but this remains unconfirmed. A strong association with HLA-A29 is noted.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis is based on clinical findings, supportive flourescein angiography and HLA testing (<50% positive predictive value, as 8% of general population are HLA-A29+), The visual fields may show blind spot enlargement, central/ paracentral scotomas or constriction of the peripheral vision. Fundoscopy reveals characteristic multifocal, hypopigmented, ovoid, cream-colored lesions (50-1500 \u00b5m) at the level of the choroid and retinal pigment epithelium in the postequatorial fundus displaying a nasal and radial distribution. Angiography (Indocyanine green (ICG), flourescin) reveals multiple hypofluorescent spots (birdshot lesions), vascular leakage, macular edema, disc edema, optic atrophy and neovascularization (in later stages).", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnoses are those diseases that produce white dots in choroid and retina; they include white dot syndromes, vogt-Koyanagi-Harada disease, infectious etiologies (Lyme disease, tuberculosis, toxoplasmosis) and primary intraocular lymphoma (masquerade syndromes) (see these terms).", "genetic_counseling": "More than 95 percent of patients with birdshot chorioretinopathy are HLA-A29 positive. However, the disease is not considered heritable.", "management_and_treatment": "Electroretinography, flourescin angiography and perimetry are important in the follow-up of patients with Birdshot retinopathy. While periocular, ocular, intravitreal and systemic corticosteroids may be effective in the short-term management of vitritis and macular edema, they are of inconsistent efficacy in the long run. Early introduction of corticosteroid-sparing immune modulatory treatment (cyclosporine, methotrexate, mycophenolate mofetil, azathioprine, tacrolimus, human immunoglobulin G) is advocated, as extended treatment is anticipated in most patients. For refractory cases, daclizumab and infliximab has been helpful.", "prognosis": "Preservation of central vision until late in the disease and induction of long-term remission are possible with treatment, however the long-term visual prognosis of this disorder remains guarded."}, {"name": "Birdshot-Retinochoroidopathie", "sub_name": "Chorioretinopathie Typ Birdshot", "german_description": "Die Birdshot (Schrotschu\u00df)-Chorioretinopathie ist eine entz\u00fcndliche Erkrankung der Ader- und Netzhaut des Auges. Auff\u00e4lligstes Symptom sind creme-farbene Flecken, die um die Papille herum in einem relativ regelm\u00e4\u00dfigen Muster angeordnet sind und in die Peripherie ausstrahlen. Beide Augen sind \u00e4hnlich betroffen. Oft ist dieser Befund von einer Entz\u00fcndung des Glask\u00f6rpers, einer Gef\u00e4\u00dfst\u00f6rung der Retina und einem zystischen Makula-\u00d6dem begleitet. Ein weiteres wesentliches Merkmal ist die Assoziation mit dem Antigen HLA-A29, das 95,9% der Patienten tragen. Betroffen sind Menschen im mittleren Lebensalter, ohne Bevorzugung eines Geschlechts. Die meisten Patienten sind europ\u00e4ischer Herkunft. Einige japanische Patienten wurden beschrieben und waren HLA-A29-negativ. Die \u00c4tiologie ist noch unbekannt, aber die starke Assoziation mit HLA-A29 l\u00e4\u00dft an eine Autoimmunerkrankung denken. Die Behandlung erfolgt mit entz\u00fcndungshemmenden Medikamenten, wenn Vitritis und Makula-\u00d6dem vorhanden sind. Eine sekund\u00e4re Gef\u00e4\u00dfneubildung in der Aderhaut wird mit Laser-Photokoagulation oder mit photodynamischer Therapie behandelt. Gef\u00e4\u00dfneubildung in der Netzhaut oder vor der Papille und Glask\u00f6rper-Blutungen erfordern eine Laser-Behandlung oder Entfernung des Glask\u00f6rpers. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Birdshot chorioretinopathy is a posterior uveitis characterized by multiple cream-colored, hypopigmented choroidal lesions in the fundus and a strong association with HLA-A29 and clinically presenting with blurred vision, floaters, photopsia, scotoma and nyctalopia.", "synonyms": "Birdshot chorioretinitis, Birdshot retinochoroiditis, Birdshot retinochoroidopathy, Vitiliginous choroiditis, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "H30.1", "omim": "605808", "umls": "C1853959", "mesh": "C537630", "gard": "5926", "epidemiology": "The disease is more common in North European descents with a female preponderance. It accounts for 6%-8% of cases of posterior uveitis. Prevalence in North Carolina is estimated to be 1/700,000.", "clinical_description": "The age of onset is usually the fifth or sixth decade of life. Patients often present with gradual deterioration of vision, floaters, photopsia, scotoma, nyctalopia, metamorphopsia and poor color and contrast sensitivity. Decreased visual acuity in early disease is attributed to macular edema. Persistent inflammation and optic disc edema can lead to optic atrophy and subsequent permanent visual loss. In majority of the patients, the disease is chronic and progressive while 20% of patients develop a limited disease with spontaneous remission. A systemic involvement including essential hypertension, cerebrovascular accidents, hearing loss, vitiligo (see this term) and psoriasis is rarely observed.", "etiology": "Etiology is unknown but an organ -specific T-cell - driven autoimmune process is implicated, with both choroid and retina being independent targets and sites of inflammation. The Th17 system has also been implicated but this remains unconfirmed. A strong association with HLA-A29 is noted.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis is based on clinical findings, supportive flourescein angiography and HLA testing (<50% positive predictive value, as 8% of general population are HLA-A29+), The visual fields may show blind spot enlargement, central/ paracentral scotomas or constriction of the peripheral vision. Fundoscopy reveals characteristic multifocal, hypopigmented, ovoid, cream-colored lesions (50-1500 \u00b5m) at the level of the choroid and retinal pigment epithelium in the postequatorial fundus displaying a nasal and radial distribution. Angiography (Indocyanine green (ICG), flourescin) reveals multiple hypofluorescent spots (birdshot lesions), vascular leakage, macular edema, disc edema, optic atrophy and neovascularization (in later stages).", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnoses are those diseases that produce white dots in choroid and retina; they include white dot syndromes, vogt-Koyanagi-Harada disease, infectious etiologies (Lyme disease, tuberculosis, toxoplasmosis) and primary intraocular lymphoma (masquerade syndromes) (see these terms).", "genetic_counseling": "More than 95 percent of patients with birdshot chorioretinopathy are HLA-A29 positive. However, the disease is not considered heritable.", "management_and_treatment": "Electroretinography, flourescin angiography and perimetry are important in the follow-up of patients with Birdshot retinopathy. While periocular, ocular, intravitreal and systemic corticosteroids may be effective in the short-term management of vitritis and macular edema, they are of inconsistent efficacy in the long run. Early introduction of corticosteroid-sparing immune modulatory treatment (cyclosporine, methotrexate, mycophenolate mofetil, azathioprine, tacrolimus, human immunoglobulin G) is advocated, as extended treatment is anticipated in most patients. For refractory cases, daclizumab and infliximab has been helpful.", "prognosis": "Preservation of central vision until late in the disease and induction of long-term remission are possible with treatment, however the long-term visual prognosis of this disorder remains guarded."}, {"name": "Birk-Barel-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Intellectual disability, Birk-Barel type is a rare, genetic, syndromic intellectual disability characterized by congenital central hypotonia, developmental delay, moderate to severe intellectual disability and subtle dysmorphic features which evolve over time (dolichocephaly, myopathic facies, ptosis, short and broad philtrum, tented upper lip vermillion, palatal anomalies, mild micro- and/or retrognathia). Patients present reduced facial movements, lethargy, weak cry, transient neonatal hypoglycemia, severe feeding difficulties and failure to thrive. Dysphagia, particularly of solid food, asthenic body build, joint contractures and scoliosis are additional features.", "synonyms": "Intellectual disability-hypotonia-facial dysmorphism syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "612292", "gard": "10358"}, {"name": "Birt-Hogg-Dub\u00e9-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Fibrofollikulome mit Trichodiskome und Akrochordone, Hornstein-Knickenberg-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter, \u00c4ltere Erwachsene", "ICD-10": "D23.9", "OMIM": "135150", "UMLS": "C0346010", "MeSH": "D058249", "GARD": "2322", "MedDRA": "10067736", "summary": "Das Birt-Hogg-Dube (BHD)-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch Hautl\u00e4sionen, Nierentumoren und Lungenzysten, evtl. in Verbindung mit einem Pneumothorax. Das Syndrom ist nach drei kanadischen \u00c4rzten benannt, die es 1977 beschrieben. Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1:200.000 gesch\u00e4tzt, die Inzidenz ist nicht genau bekannt. Bisher wurden mehr als 100 Familien mit BHD beschrieben. Die Nierentumoren der Patienten reichen von benignen Onkozytomen bis zu malignen chromophoben, klarzelligen oder papill\u00e4ren Nierenzell-Karzinomen. Manchmal werden auch gemischte Nierentumoren gesehen. Fibrofollikulome sind die typische Hautl\u00e4sion. Sie sind gekennzeichnet durch umschriebene Proliferation von Fibroblasten mit Ansammlung von Kollagen um verformte Haarfollikel herum, aus denen basaloide Zellen in das umgebende fibromuzin\u00f6se Stroma reichen. Andere charakteristische Hautl\u00e4sionen sind Trichdiscome und Akrochordone. Die dermatologischen Symptome des BHD treten meist im dritten oder vierten Lebensjahrzehnt auf und persistieren danach. Die Nierentumoren entstehen in der Regel erst nach dem Auftreten der Hautl\u00e4sionen. Die Lungenzysten sind gekennzeichnet durch zystische Erweiterung der Alveolarr\u00e4ume, ihre Gr\u00f6\u00dfe reicht von mikroskopischen Herden bis zu einem Durchmesser von einigen Millimetern. Die d\u00fcnnwandigen Zysten sind mit kuboidem Epithel ausgekleidet. Die Zysten rei\u00dfen unter dem Druck der Inhalation, was zum Pneumothorax f\u00fchrt. Das BHD wird autosomal-dominant vererbt. Eine m\u00f6gliche Ursache des BHD sind Mutationen im FLCN-Gen (17p11.2), das f\u00fcr Folliculin kodiert, dessen Funktion noch nicht bekannt ist. Es wird vermutet, dass Folliculin eine Komponente der mTOR (mammalian Target Of Rapamycin)-Signalkette ist, wie noch andere Proteine mit Beziehung zu Hamartom-Syndromen und dass es eine Rolle bei der Entwicklung von Nierentumoren und evtl. anderen assoziierten Ver\u00e4nderungen spielt. Die Diagnose basiert auf der Erkennung der klinischen Manifestationen und den histologischen Befunden der mit BHD assoziierten Trichodiscome, perifollikul\u00e4ren Fibrome und Fibrofollikulome. Sie kann durch Mutationsnachweis im FLCN-Gen best\u00e4tigt werden. Die Differentialdiagnose der multiplen festen Papeln beim BHD h\u00e4ngt davon ob, die L\u00e4sionen epithelialer, mesodermaler oder gemischter Herkunft sind. Den betroffenen Patienten soll eine genetische Beratung und, wenn m\u00f6glich, auch eine molekulare Analyse angeboten werden. F\u00fcr die dermatologischen Manifestationen des BHD gibt es keine spezifische Therapie. Solit\u00e4re perifollikul\u00e4re Fibrome werden chirurgisch entfernt. Als Therapie wurden auch Dermabrasion und Elektro-Desikkation vorgeschlagen. Danach k\u00f6nnen die L\u00e4sionen aber wieder auftreten. Patienten mit BHD sollen in Hinblick auf m\u00f6gliche Ver\u00e4nderungen von Lungen, Nieren und Gastrointestinaltrakt \u00fcberwacht werden. Die Prognose des BHD h\u00e4ngt von der Beteiligung der inneren Organe und von der Art eines Nierentumors ab."}, {"name": "Bixler-Christian-Gorlin-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Hypertelorismus - Mikrotie - Gesichtsspalten", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Hypertelorismus-Mikrotie-Gesichtsspalten-Syndrom oder HMC-Syndrom ist sehr selten und gekennzeichnet durch die Kombination von Hypertelorismus, Lippen-Kiefer-Gaumenspalte und Mikrotie.", "synonyms": "Bixler-Christian-Gorlin-Syndrom, HMC-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q87.0", "OMIM": "239800", "UMLS": "C0220742", "GARD": "897", "epidemiology": "In der Literatur wurden bisher aus sieben Familien insgesamt neun Patienten beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Einige Patienten haben Herz- oder Nierenfehlbildungen. H\u00e4ufige Symptome sind Kleinwuchs und intellektuelles Defizit.", "etiology": "Autosomal rezessive Vererbung wird angenommen.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Vorgeburtliche Diagnose durch Ultraschall ist m\u00f6glich.", "summary": "In der Literatur wurden bisher aus sieben Familien insgesamt neun Patienten beschrieben."}, {"name": "Bizervikaler Uterus bicornis mit offenem Zervix und Vagina", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "Q51.1", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Bizervikaler Uterus bicornis und blind endende Hemivagina", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "Q51.1", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Bj\u00f6rnstad-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "E88.8", "OMIM": "262000", "UMLS": "C0266006", "MeSH": "C537633", "GARD": "22", "summary": "Das Bj\u00f6rnstad-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch kongenitalen sensorisch-neuralen H\u00f6rverlust und Pili torti des Kopfhaars, der Lider und Augenbrauen. Weniger als 50 F\u00e4lle wurden bisher beschrieben. Der H\u00f6rverlust wird meist sehr fr\u00fch im Leben manifest, oft schon im ersten Lebensjahr. Bei den Pili torti ist der Haarschaft abgeflacht und verdreht. Das Haar wird dadurch sehr br\u00fcchig, und in den ersten beiden Lebensjahren kommt es zum Verlust der Haare. Das Bj\u00f6rnstad-Syndrom wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache sind Mutationen im BCS1L-Gen (Chromosomen-region 2q33). Mutationen in diesem Gen sind auch Ursache des GRACILE-Syndroms (s. dort) und des mitochondrialen Komplex-III-Mangels. "}, {"name": "B-K Muttermal-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Famili\u00e4res atpisches multiples Muttermal- und Melanomsyndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Familial atypical multiple mole melanoma (FAMMM) syndrome is an inherited genodermatosis characterized by the presence of multiple melanocytic nevi (often >50) and a family history of melanoma as well as, in a subset of patients, an increased risk of developing pancreatic cancer (see this term) and other malignancies.", "synonyms": "B-K mole syndrome, FAMM-PC syndrome, FAMMM syndrome, Familial atypical mole syndrome, Familial atypical multiple mole melanoma-pancreatic carcinoma syndrome, Familial dysplastic nevus syndrome, Melanoma-pancreatic cancer syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "C43.9", "omim": "155600\u00a0 606719", "umls": "C0013403\u00a0 C0205747\u00a0 C1838547\u00a0 C2314896", "epidemiology": "The prevalence is unknown. An accurate estimate of the prevalence of FAMMM syndrome is difficult to make given the highly variable phenotype displayed both between and within FAMMM syndrome kindreds and the limited data available.", "clinical_description": "The clinical phenotype of FAMMM syndrome shows wide heterogeneity in regards to the presence of nevi and familial predisposition to melanoma and pancreatic cancer (mainly adenocarcinoma). The disease most often presents in children and teenagers but can occur at any age. The presenting feature is usually a high total body nevi count (usually more than 50). The majority will be clinically typical but some may have an atypical appearance (asymmetrical, raised, and/or different shades of tan, brown, black, or red and often of different sizes) resembling early melanoma and most frequently occur on the back, chest, buttocks, breasts, and scalp. Melanomas can arise from atypical moles or de novo and have been reported in some FAMMM syndrome patients as early as the second to third decade of life. Those with CDNK2A mutations have a 90% risk of developing melanoma by the age of 80 and a 20% increased risk of developing pancreatic cancer by the age of 75. These mutations are also associated with a younger age of onset. Other cancers that can be rarely associated with FAMMM syndrome include breast cancer, esophageal cancer and sarcoma.", "etiology": "FAMMM syndrome has been associated with mutations in the 16p locus of CDKN2A  (9p21), a tumor suppressor gene involved in cell cycle inhibition. However, approximately 60% of patients with FAMMM syndrome do not have a  CDKN2A  mutation.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnostic criteria for FAMMM syndrome are as follows: high total body nevi count (usually >50), nevi with certain histologies (i.e. lentiginous pattern, nuclear atypia) and melanomas in 1 or more first or second degree relatives. Nevi are evaluated for melanoma based on the ABCDE characteristics (asymmetry, border irregularity, color variation, diameter >6 mm, and evolution or elevation). Dermatoscopy is also a non-invasive method of identifying melanomas. Molecular genetic testing identifying a CDKN2A mutation confirms diagnosis but the absence of a mutation in this gene does not exclude a diagnosis of FAMMM syndrome.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include cutaneous neurofibromas and pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma as well as Neurofibromatosis type 1 (see this term).", "genetic_counseling": "FAMMM syndrome is inherited in an autosomal dominant manner with incomplete penetrance. Genetic counseling should be offered to patients and their families.", "management_and_treatment": "Screening for melanoma in FAMMM syndrome kindreds should begin at age 10 and include a total body skin examination with the use of dermoscopy. Follow-up clinical exams or self-exams should then be performed every 6 months to monitor any changes in nevi. In families with a history of pancreatic cancer or a CDKN2A mutation, screening by computed tomography, magnetic resonance imaging, or endoscopic ultrasound can be offered starting at age 40. Melanoma, pancreatic cancer and other cancers should follow standard treatment guidelines.", "prognosis": "In those with pancreatic cancer, the prognosis is poor. Early diagnosis and treatment of melanoma tends to lead to a better prognosis."}, {"name": "Blake-Pouch-Zyste", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Blake-Pouch-Zyste ist eine nicht-syndromale, in der Regel gutartige, zystische Fehlbildung der hinteren Sch\u00e4delgrube, die durch eine mittige Ausst\u00fclpung des Velum medullare superius in die Cisterna magna gekennzeichnet ist und aus einer fehlenden R\u00fcckbildung der rudiment\u00e4ren Tela chorioidea des vierten Ventrikels w\u00e4hrend der Embryogenese resultiert. Die Patienten k\u00f6nnen asymptomatisch sein oder sich im Kindes- oder Erwachsenenalter mit klinischen Manifestationen eines Hydrozephalus vorstellen, wie Kopfschmerzen, Hypotonie, Schwindel, Synkopen, Erbrechen, verschwommenes oder doppeltes Sehen, Nystagmus, Papillen\u00f6dem und verz\u00f6gerte Gangentwicklung.", "ICD-10": "Q03.1"}, {"name": "Blaschkoider Lichen planus", "sub_name": "Lichen planus linearis", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Lineare Lichen planus (LLP), auch Blaschkoider LP genannt, ist ein seltener Typ des Lichen planus und gekennzeichnet durch lineare Verteilung lichenoider L\u00e4sionen entlang der Blaschko-Linien, die ein Spiegel der embryonalen Entwicklung der Haut sind.", "synonyms": "Blaschkoider Lichen planus, LP, linearer, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "L43.8", "UMLS": "C0023650", "GARD": "11898", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist niccht bekannt. Weniger als 0,5% der Patienten mit LP manifestieren einen Blaschkoiden LP. H\u00e4ufiger wird \u00fcber betroffene Kinder berichtet, der LLP tritt aber auch bei Erwachsenen auf.", "clinical_description": "Die L\u00e4sionen sind juckende, livide, linear angeordnete Papeln, meist an den Gliedma\u00dfen, aber auch an anderen Stellen des K\u00f6rpers. Sie folgen den Blaschko-Linien und nicht den Dermatomen. Der LLP kann eine mehr typische, nicht-segmental und zuf\u00e4llig verteilte L\u00e4sionen eine klassischen LP \u00fcberlagern. Histologisch gleicht der LLP dem papulo-squam\u00f6sen LP. Eine sehr seltene Variante des LLP, die zosteriforme LP, ist gekennzeichnet durch segmentale zosterartige Verteilung der lichenoiden L\u00e4sionen. Der zosteriforme LP kann als K\u00f6bner-Ph\u00e4nomen nach Zoster-Infektion auftreten.", "etiology": "Die \u00c4tiologie des LLP ist nicht bekannt, in Verbindung gebracht wurde er mit metastasierendem Karzinom, HIV- und Hepatitis C-Infektion. Es wird vermutet, dass der LLP aus einem abnormen Keratinozytenklon entsteht, der durch das LP-ausl\u00f6sende Ereignis aktiviert wird.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist niccht bekannt. Weniger als 0,5% der Patienten mit LP manifestieren einen Blaschkoiden LP. H\u00e4ufiger wird \u00fcber betroffene Kinder berichtet, der LLP tritt aber auch bei Erwachsenen auf."}, {"name": "Blasenekstrophie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A congenital genitourinary malformation belonging to the spectrum of the exstrophy-epispadias complex (EEC) and is characterized by an evaginated bladder plate, epispadias and an anterior defect of the pelvis, pelvic floor and abdominal wall.", "synonyms": "Classic exstrophy of the bladder, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Multigenic/multifactorial\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q64.1", "omim": "600057", "umls": "C0005689", "mesh": "D001746", "gard": "6398", "epidemiology": "The prevalence at birth for the EEC is reported at 1/10,000. As epispadias (E), classic bladder exstrophy (CEB) and cloacal exstrophy (EC) are now recognized clinical variants of the same spectrum, accurate epidemiological data on E/EC/CEB are no longer available. However, CEB appears to be more frequent in the white population. Most studies report a male-to-female ratio of around 2.4:1, but ratios as high as 6:1 have also been reported.", "clinical_description": "CEB is evident from birth, with the reddish bladder mucosa being visible in the lower abdomen and mucosal polyps sometimes present on the surface. Urine drips from the ureteric orifices on the bladder surface. Other findings include pubic diastasis of various degrees with divergent rectus muscles and inguinal hernias. In males, the penis is short and broad with dorsal chordee. The urethral plate covers the whole dorsum of the penis from the open bladder to the glandular grove. Both corpora cavernosa are located beneath the urethral plate and the colliculus seminalis and the ductus ejaculatorii are visible as tiny openings in the area where the prostate is presumably dorsally located. Females present with a bifid clitoris next to the open urethral plate. The vaginal opening appears narrow and the perineum is shortened due to the anterior displacement of the vagina and anus. Women with CEB have a predisposition for vaginal or uterine prolapse. Spinal anomalies occur in about 7% of cases but gastrointestinal anomalies are rare in CEB.", "etiology": "CEB results from early abnormal development of the intra-abdominal wall and bladder during rupture of the cloacal membrane. Though the underlying cause remains still unknown, a developmental field defect with both genetic and environmental factors is likely to play a role.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is clinical. However, during follow-up, laboratory and imagining studies (such as ultrasound of the urogenital system, pelvic MRI or X-ray, voiding cystography and urodynamics) are useful to determine renal function and assess bladder capacity and detrusor function.", "management_and_treatment": "Management is primarily surgical, with the main aims of obtaining secure abdominal wall closure, achieving urinary continence with preservation of renal function, and, finally, adequate cosmetic and functional genital reconstruction. Currently, several methods for bladder reconstruction with creation of an outlet resistance and epispadias repair (either as a staged or a one-stage approach) during the newborn period are favored worldwide. Removal of the bladder template with complete urinary diversion to a rectal reservoir can be an alternative.", "prognosis": "After reconstructive surgery of the bladder, continence rates of about 80% are expected during childhood. Though spontaneous voiding is the main issue, additional surgery might be needed to optimize bladder storage and emptying function. In cases of definite reconstruction failure, urinary diversion should be undertaken. In puberty, genital and reproductive function constitute increasingly important issues for both sexes. Psychosocial and psychosexual outcome reflect the importance of long-term care (from birth into adulthood) from a multidisciplinary team of experts for parents and children with EEC to facilitate an adequate quality of life."}, {"name": "Blasenekstrophie-Epispadie-Kloakenekstrophie-Komplex", "sub_name": "Ekstrophie-Epispadie-Komplex", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "BEEC, Blasenekstrophie-Epispadie-Kloakenekstrophie-Komplex, EEC, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q64.1", "OMIM": "258040\u00a0 600057", "UMLS": "C1838703", "GARD": "2207", "summary": "Der Ekstrophie-Epispadie-Komplex (EEC) repr\u00e4sentiert ein Spektrum von Urogenital-Fehlbildungen deren Schweregrad von Epispadie (E) und klassischer Blasenekstrophie (CEB) bis zur Kloaken-Ekstrophie (EC) als schwerster Manifestation reicht. Abh\u00e4ngig vom Schweregrad sind beim EEC die Harnwege, das Muskel- und Skelettsystem, das Becken, der Beckenboden, die Bauchwand und manchmal die Wirbels\u00e4ule und der Anus betroffen. Die Pr\u00e4valenz f\u00fcr das ganze Spektrum bei Geburt wurde als 1:10.000 bestimmt , mit 1:30.000 f\u00fcr CEB und 1:200.000 f\u00fcr EC. Insgesamt sind Knaben h\u00e4ufiger als M\u00e4dchen betroffen. Der EEC ist gekennzeichnet durch sichtbare Defekte der unteren Bauchwand, entweder mit evaginierter Blasenplatte (CEB) oder mit einer offenen Urethraplatte bei Knaben und einer Spalte bei M\u00e4dchen (E). Der Urin tropft sichtbar auf der Oberfl\u00e4che der Blase aus den Ureter\u00f6ffnungen oder durch die Urethra. In den seltenen F\u00e4llen von CE sind nach der Geburt zwei ekstrophierte Blasenh\u00e4lften sichtbar, sowie Omphalozele, Anus imperforatus und Wirbels\u00e4ulendefekte. Auch atypische Formen des EEC (duplizierte Ekstrophie, bedeckte Ekstrophie und Pseudo-Ekstrophie) wurden beschrieben. Der EEC resultiert aus einer mechanischen Ruptur oder einer Vergr\u00f6\u00dferung der Kloakenmembran, wodurch, mit der Folge der Ekstrophie, das Einwachsen mesodermaler Zellen entlang der subumbilikalen Mittellinie verhindert wird. Der Schweregrad der Fehlbildung wird durch den Zeitpunkt der Ruptur bestimmt. Die zugrundeliegende Ursache ist nicht bekannt. Famili\u00e4re F\u00e4lle sind selten. Wahrscheinlich sind Erb- als auch Umweltfaktoren an der Genese des EEC beteiligt. Die Diagnose wird bei Geburt klinisch gestellt. Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnose ist durch sorgf\u00e4ltigen Fehlbildungs-Ultraschall mit dem Befund m\u00f6glich, dass mehrfach eine normal gef\u00fcllte fetale Blase fehlt. Die Eltern m\u00fcssen sorgf\u00e4ltig beraten werden, wegen der guten Ergebnisse bei angemessener chirurgischer Behandlung soll ein Abbruch der Schwangerschaft nicht mehr grunds\u00e4tzlich angeboten werden. Die Behandlung ist prim\u00e4r chirurgisch. Die Ziele sind ein sicherer Verschluss der Bauchwand, Harnkontinenz und Erhalt der Nierenfunktion und schlie\u00dflich eine kosmetisch und funktionell ad\u00e4quate Rekonstruktion des Genitales. Gegenw\u00e4rtig werden weltweit mehrere Methoden der Blasenrekonstruktion in der Neugeborenenzeit mit Formung eines Auslasswiderstandes (in einem oder mehreren Schritten) erfolgreich angewendet. Eine Alternative ist die Entfernung der Blasenanlage mit vollst\u00e4ndiger Umleitung des Urins in ein rektales Reservoir. Nach Rekonstruktion der Blase sind im Kindesalter Kontinenzraten von etwa 80% zu erwarten. Das spontane Wasserlassen ist das Hauptproblem, und zus\u00e4tzliche chirurgische Eingriffe sind evtl. erforderlich, um die Speicher- und Entleerungsfunktion zu optimieren. In F\u00e4llen von definitivem Versagen der Rekonstruktion soll eine Umleitung des Urins erfolgen. In der Pubert\u00e4t sind f\u00fcr beide Geschlechter die Geschlechts- und Fortpflanzungsfunktion ein zunehmend wichtiges Thema. F\u00fcr die psychosoziale und psychosexuelle Anpassung und eine angemessene Lebensqualit\u00e4t ist die Langzeitbetreuung der Eltern und Kinder mit EEC von der Geburt bis zum Erwachsenenalter durch ein multidisziplin\u00e4res Expertenteam entscheidend wichtig."}, {"name": "Blasenekstrophie, klassische", "sub_name": "Blasenekstrophie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A congenital genitourinary malformation belonging to the spectrum of the exstrophy-epispadias complex (EEC) and is characterized by an evaginated bladder plate, epispadias and an anterior defect of the pelvis, pelvic floor and abdominal wall.", "synonyms": "Classic exstrophy of the bladder, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Multigenic/multifactorial\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q64.1", "omim": "600057", "umls": "C0005689", "mesh": "D001746", "gard": "6398", "epidemiology": "The prevalence at birth for the EEC is reported at 1/10,000. As epispadias (E), classic bladder exstrophy (CEB) and cloacal exstrophy (EC) are now recognized clinical variants of the same spectrum, accurate epidemiological data on E/EC/CEB are no longer available. However, CEB appears to be more frequent in the white population. Most studies report a male-to-female ratio of around 2.4:1, but ratios as high as 6:1 have also been reported.", "clinical_description": "CEB is evident from birth, with the reddish bladder mucosa being visible in the lower abdomen and mucosal polyps sometimes present on the surface. Urine drips from the ureteric orifices on the bladder surface. Other findings include pubic diastasis of various degrees with divergent rectus muscles and inguinal hernias. In males, the penis is short and broad with dorsal chordee. The urethral plate covers the whole dorsum of the penis from the open bladder to the glandular grove. Both corpora cavernosa are located beneath the urethral plate and the colliculus seminalis and the ductus ejaculatorii are visible as tiny openings in the area where the prostate is presumably dorsally located. Females present with a bifid clitoris next to the open urethral plate. The vaginal opening appears narrow and the perineum is shortened due to the anterior displacement of the vagina and anus. Women with CEB have a predisposition for vaginal or uterine prolapse. Spinal anomalies occur in about 7% of cases but gastrointestinal anomalies are rare in CEB.", "etiology": "CEB results from early abnormal development of the intra-abdominal wall and bladder during rupture of the cloacal membrane. Though the underlying cause remains still unknown, a developmental field defect with both genetic and environmental factors is likely to play a role.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is clinical. However, during follow-up, laboratory and imagining studies (such as ultrasound of the urogenital system, pelvic MRI or X-ray, voiding cystography and urodynamics) are useful to determine renal function and assess bladder capacity and detrusor function.", "management_and_treatment": "Management is primarily surgical, with the main aims of obtaining secure abdominal wall closure, achieving urinary continence with preservation of renal function, and, finally, adequate cosmetic and functional genital reconstruction. Currently, several methods for bladder reconstruction with creation of an outlet resistance and epispadias repair (either as a staged or a one-stage approach) during the newborn period are favored worldwide. Removal of the bladder template with complete urinary diversion to a rectal reservoir can be an alternative.", "prognosis": "After reconstructive surgery of the bladder, continence rates of about 80% are expected during childhood. Though spontaneous voiding is the main issue, additional surgery might be needed to optimize bladder storage and emptying function. In cases of definite reconstruction failure, urinary diversion should be undertaken. In puberty, genital and reproductive function constitute increasingly important issues for both sexes. Psychosocial and psychosexual outcome reflect the importance of long-term care (from birth into adulthood) from a multidisciplinary team of experts for parents and children with EEC to facilitate an adequate quality of life."}, {"name": "Blasenkarzinom, kleinzelliges", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das kleinzellige Blasenkarzinom (SCCB) ist ein sehr seltener, wenig differenzierter, neuroendokriner epithelialer Blasentumor und klinisch durch H\u00e4maturie und/oder Dysurie und einen hoch-aggressiven Verlauf gekennzeichnet.", "synonyms": "Blasenkrebs, kleinzelliger, SCCB, Undifferenziertes neuroendokrines Blasenkarzinom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C67.0\u00a0 C67.1\u00a0 C67.2\u00a0 C67.3\u00a0 C67.4\u00a0 C67.5\u00a0 C67.6\u00a0 C67.7\u00a0 C67.8\u00a0 C67.9", "GARD": "11923", "epidemiology": "Das SCCB ist mit einer Jahresinzidenz von weniger als 1-9/1.000.000 extrem selten. Seit 1980 wurden weniger als 1.500 F\u00e4lle identifiziert. Das demographische Profil des SCCB \u00e4hnelt dem des \u00dcbergangszell-Karzinoms der Blase (TCC). Die meisten Patienten sind m\u00e4nnlich, das Geschlechtsverh\u00e4ltnis betr\u00e4gt im Mittel 5:1 (Bereich 1:1-16:1). Die publizierten F\u00e4lle kommen \u00fcberwiegend aus Populationen mit europ\u00e4ischem Hintergrund.", "clinical_description": "Die meisten Informationen \u00fcber das SCCB resultieren aus retrospektiven Untersuchungen und einigen wenigen prospektiven Studien. Das mittlere Diagnosealter ist 67 Jahre (Bereich 32-91 Jahre). Die klinischen Merkmale des SCCB \u00e4hneln denen des Blasen-TCC und folgen aus der Anwesenheit einer Tumormasse. Das Hauptsymptom ist eine massive H\u00e4maturie (63-88 % der F\u00e4lle), mit Dysurie als zweith\u00e4ufigstem Symptom. Gelegentliche Symptome sind Obstruktion der Harnwege, Leibschmerzen, Harnwegsinfektionen und Gewichtsverlust. Das SCCB tritt oft zusammen mit anderen Karzinom-Typen auf und ist h\u00e4ufig mit anderen histologischen Formeln von Blasenkrebs kombiniert: TCC, Adenokarzinom und Plattenepithelzell-Karzinom. Allgemein wird angenommen, dass das SCCB ein hohes metastatische Potential hat. Berichtet wurde \u00fcber seltene F\u00e4lle paraneoplastischer Syndrome, z. B. ektope ACTH-Sekretion und Hyperkalz\u00e4mie.", "etiology": "Die \u00c4tiologie der Krankheit ist nicht bekannt, als wahrscheinlicher Mechanismus wird die Anomalie einer multipotenten Stammzelle angenommen. In der Vorgeschichte wird in 65-79 % der F\u00e4lle Rauchen angegeben.", "diagnostic_methods": "Der Tumor ist histologisch und immunhistochemisch nicht vom kleinzelligen Lungenkrebs (SCLC; s. dort) zu unterscheiden. Die Diagnose eines SCCB basiert haupts\u00e4chlich auf den histopathologischen Befunden nach Zystoskopie und transurethraler Resektion des Blasentumors. Hilfreich f\u00fcr die Sicherung der Diagnose sind immunchemische F\u00e4rbungen. Lichtmikroskopisch zeigt der Tumor enggepackte, zytoplasmaarme Zellen mit wenigen Organellen. Der Tumor ist zusammengesetzt aus Nestern runder maligner Zellen mit pyknotischen, runden bis ovalen Kernen und gleichm\u00e4\u00dfig verteiltem ''Pfeffer-und-Salz-Chromatin''. Mehr als 95 % der F\u00e4lle von SCCB werden im Stadium TII mit Invasion des Muskels oder sp\u00e4ter diagnostiziert.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind die direkte Invasion der Blase durch SCC der Prostata, metastatische SCC anderen Ursprungs (in der Regel Lunge) und prim\u00e4re Lymphome der Blase.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Einstufung des Tumors erfolgt mit dem TNM-Staging des \u00dcbergangszell-Karzinoms. Die Art der Behandlung ist von der Behandlung des SCLC \u00fcbernommen. Jedoch werden die Tumoren vieler Patienten mit SCCB radikal resiziert, was beim SCLC selten erfolgt. Patienten mit chirurgisch resizierbarer Erkrankung sollten multimodal chemotherapeutisch, chirurgisch und/oder radiologisch behandelt werden. Die wirksamste Behandlungssequenz ist neo-adjuvante Chemotherapie mit 4 Chemotherapie-Zyklen, gefolgt von radikaler Zystektomie. Patienten mit nicht-resizierbarer Erkrankung sollten, wie bei neuroendokrinen Tumoren, palliativ chemotherapisch mit einem Platin-Medikament (Cisplatin bei kr\u00e4ftigen Patienten) behandelt werden. Bei Blasen-SCC des Stadiums TIII/IV ist eine prophylaktische kraniale Bestrahlung zu erw\u00e4gen.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist ung\u00fcnstig, vor allem im Fall eines rein kleinzelligen Karzinoms.", "summary": "Das SCCB ist mit einer Jahresinzidenz von weniger als 1-9/1.000.000 extrem selten. Seit 1980 wurden weniger als 1.500 F\u00e4lle identifiziert. Das demographische Profil des SCCB \u00e4hnelt dem des \u00dcbergangszell-Karzinoms der Blase (TCC). Die meisten Patienten sind m\u00e4nnlich, das Geschlechtsverh\u00e4ltnis betr\u00e4gt im Mittel 5:1 (Bereich 1:1-16:1). Die publizierten F\u00e4lle kommen \u00fcberwiegend aus Populationen mit europ\u00e4ischem Hintergrund."}, {"name": "Blasenkrebs, kleinzelliger", "sub_name": "Blasenkarzinom, kleinzelliges", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das kleinzellige Blasenkarzinom (SCCB) ist ein sehr seltener, wenig differenzierter, neuroendokriner epithelialer Blasentumor und klinisch durch H\u00e4maturie und/oder Dysurie und einen hoch-aggressiven Verlauf gekennzeichnet.", "synonyms": "Blasenkrebs, kleinzelliger, SCCB, Undifferenziertes neuroendokrines Blasenkarzinom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C67.0\u00a0 C67.1\u00a0 C67.2\u00a0 C67.3\u00a0 C67.4\u00a0 C67.5\u00a0 C67.6\u00a0 C67.7\u00a0 C67.8\u00a0 C67.9", "GARD": "11923", "epidemiology": "Das SCCB ist mit einer Jahresinzidenz von weniger als 1-9/1.000.000 extrem selten. Seit 1980 wurden weniger als 1.500 F\u00e4lle identifiziert. Das demographische Profil des SCCB \u00e4hnelt dem des \u00dcbergangszell-Karzinoms der Blase (TCC). Die meisten Patienten sind m\u00e4nnlich, das Geschlechtsverh\u00e4ltnis betr\u00e4gt im Mittel 5:1 (Bereich 1:1-16:1). Die publizierten F\u00e4lle kommen \u00fcberwiegend aus Populationen mit europ\u00e4ischem Hintergrund.", "clinical_description": "Die meisten Informationen \u00fcber das SCCB resultieren aus retrospektiven Untersuchungen und einigen wenigen prospektiven Studien. Das mittlere Diagnosealter ist 67 Jahre (Bereich 32-91 Jahre). Die klinischen Merkmale des SCCB \u00e4hneln denen des Blasen-TCC und folgen aus der Anwesenheit einer Tumormasse. Das Hauptsymptom ist eine massive H\u00e4maturie (63-88 % der F\u00e4lle), mit Dysurie als zweith\u00e4ufigstem Symptom. Gelegentliche Symptome sind Obstruktion der Harnwege, Leibschmerzen, Harnwegsinfektionen und Gewichtsverlust. Das SCCB tritt oft zusammen mit anderen Karzinom-Typen auf und ist h\u00e4ufig mit anderen histologischen Formeln von Blasenkrebs kombiniert: TCC, Adenokarzinom und Plattenepithelzell-Karzinom. Allgemein wird angenommen, dass das SCCB ein hohes metastatische Potential hat. Berichtet wurde \u00fcber seltene F\u00e4lle paraneoplastischer Syndrome, z. B. ektope ACTH-Sekretion und Hyperkalz\u00e4mie.", "etiology": "Die \u00c4tiologie der Krankheit ist nicht bekannt, als wahrscheinlicher Mechanismus wird die Anomalie einer multipotenten Stammzelle angenommen. In der Vorgeschichte wird in 65-79 % der F\u00e4lle Rauchen angegeben.", "diagnostic_methods": "Der Tumor ist histologisch und immunhistochemisch nicht vom kleinzelligen Lungenkrebs (SCLC; s. dort) zu unterscheiden. Die Diagnose eines SCCB basiert haupts\u00e4chlich auf den histopathologischen Befunden nach Zystoskopie und transurethraler Resektion des Blasentumors. Hilfreich f\u00fcr die Sicherung der Diagnose sind immunchemische F\u00e4rbungen. Lichtmikroskopisch zeigt der Tumor enggepackte, zytoplasmaarme Zellen mit wenigen Organellen. Der Tumor ist zusammengesetzt aus Nestern runder maligner Zellen mit pyknotischen, runden bis ovalen Kernen und gleichm\u00e4\u00dfig verteiltem ''Pfeffer-und-Salz-Chromatin''. Mehr als 95 % der F\u00e4lle von SCCB werden im Stadium TII mit Invasion des Muskels oder sp\u00e4ter diagnostiziert.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind die direkte Invasion der Blase durch SCC der Prostata, metastatische SCC anderen Ursprungs (in der Regel Lunge) und prim\u00e4re Lymphome der Blase.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Einstufung des Tumors erfolgt mit dem TNM-Staging des \u00dcbergangszell-Karzinoms. Die Art der Behandlung ist von der Behandlung des SCLC \u00fcbernommen. Jedoch werden die Tumoren vieler Patienten mit SCCB radikal resiziert, was beim SCLC selten erfolgt. Patienten mit chirurgisch resizierbarer Erkrankung sollten multimodal chemotherapeutisch, chirurgisch und/oder radiologisch behandelt werden. Die wirksamste Behandlungssequenz ist neo-adjuvante Chemotherapie mit 4 Chemotherapie-Zyklen, gefolgt von radikaler Zystektomie. Patienten mit nicht-resizierbarer Erkrankung sollten, wie bei neuroendokrinen Tumoren, palliativ chemotherapisch mit einem Platin-Medikament (Cisplatin bei kr\u00e4ftigen Patienten) behandelt werden. Bei Blasen-SCC des Stadiums TIII/IV ist eine prophylaktische kraniale Bestrahlung zu erw\u00e4gen.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist ung\u00fcnstig, vor allem im Fall eines rein kleinzelligen Karzinoms.", "summary": "Das SCCB ist mit einer Jahresinzidenz von weniger als 1-9/1.000.000 extrem selten. Seit 1980 wurden weniger als 1.500 F\u00e4lle identifiziert. Das demographische Profil des SCCB \u00e4hnelt dem des \u00dcbergangszell-Karzinoms der Blase (TCC). Die meisten Patienten sind m\u00e4nnlich, das Geschlechtsverh\u00e4ltnis betr\u00e4gt im Mittel 5:1 (Bereich 1:1-16:1). Die publizierten F\u00e4lle kommen \u00fcberwiegend aus Populationen mit europ\u00e4ischem Hintergrund."}, {"name": "Blasenmole", "sub_name": "Mola hydatidosa", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Blasenmole ist ein benignes Neoplasma des Trophoblasten, das w\u00e4hrend einer Schwangerschaft durch abnorme Fertilisation entsteht. Wegen der Proliferation des Trophoblasten ist eine normale Entwicklung des Embryos nicht m\u00f6glich. Blasenmolen sind entweder komplett oder partiell.", "synonyms": "Blasenmole, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "O01.0\u00a0 O01.1\u00a0 O01.9", "OMIM": "231090\u00a0 614293", "UMLS": "C0020217", "MeSH": "D006828", "GARD": "10263", "MedDRA": "10020481", "epidemiology": "Eine Blasenmole tritt in Europa in 1 von etwa 1.000 Schwangerschaften auf und wird bei 1 von 41 Fehlgeburten gefunden.", "clinical_description": "Komplette Blasenmolen sind in 40% der F\u00e4lle symptomlos. Am h\u00e4ufigsten wird eine Mole im ersten Trimenon entdeckt, wenn bei Blutungen und Schmerzen im Becken der Verdacht auf eine Fehlgeburt besteht. Klinische Symptome des zweiten Trimenons (Erbrechen, Metrorrhagie, abnorme Gr\u00f6\u00dfenzunahme des Uterus, seltener An\u00e4mie oder Pr\u00e4eklampsie) werden jetzt wegen der Routine-Ultraschallkontrollen nur selten gesehen. Hyperthyreose ist selten. Die klinischen Symptome der partiellen Blasenmole (Metrorrhagie, Erbrechen u.a.) treten selten auf. Eine Blasenmole wird im der Regel histologisch in Aspiraten diagnostiziert, die wegen Verdacht auf Fehlgeburt gewonnen werden.", "etiology": "Ursache der Blasenmole ist eine abnorme Fertilisation mit \u00fcbersch\u00fcssigem v\u00e4terlichen Chromosomenmaterial. Eine komplette Blasenmole entsteht durch Fertilisation einer entkernten Eizelle durch 1 oder 2 haploide Spermien. Der Karyotyp ist 46,XX (75% der F\u00e4lle) oder 46,XY (25%). Die Blasenmole ist gekennzeichnet durch Hyperplasie des Trophoblasten, allgemeine Degeneration der Chorionzotten und das Fehlen einer Amnionh\u00f6hle und embryonalen Gewebes. Eine partielle Blasenmole entsteht durch Fertilisation einer normalen Eizelle durch 2 Spermien oder 1 abnormes Spermium. Kennzeichen sind fokale Hyperplasie des Trophoblasten, lokalisierte Degeneration von Chorionzotten und identifizierbares embryonales Gewebe. In 99% der F\u00e4lle ergibt die Chromosomenanalyse eine Triploidie. Im Ultraschall zeigt die komplette Blasenmole ein klassisches ,,Schneesturm''-Muster (solide, hyperechogene Bereiche unterschiedlicher Form, gemischt mit durchscheinenden Bereichen unterschiedlicher Gr\u00f6\u00dfe), das die gesamte Uterush\u00f6hle ausf\u00fcllt. Fr\u00fcher Ultraschall, vor der 9. bis 10. Woche, zeigt eine Plazenta mit umschriebener blasiger Struktur. Der Ultraschall der partiellen Blasenmole zeigt fokale blasige Ver\u00e4nderungen. Meist sind embryonale Strukturen nachweisbar, und der Uterus ist nicht vergr\u00f6\u00dfert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose wird am Produkt der Fertilisation histologisch gestellt. Hierbei ist oft eine Beurteilung durch zwei Experten sinnvoll. Bei Verdacht auf das Vorliegen einer Blasenmole muss der Gesamtspiegel des Choriongonadotropins (hCG+hCG\u00df) bestimmt werden.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Blasenmolen d\u00fcrfen nicht mit Schwangerschafts-Trophoblastenneoplasmen (s. dort) und mit der verl\u00e4ngerten Retention einer 'klassischen' spontanen Fehlgeburt verwechselt werden. Mit Ausnahme sehr seltener F\u00e4lle wiederholten Auftretens einer Blasenmole bei der gleichen Frau oder in der gleichen Familie (< 1%, wobei gelegentlich eine NLRP7-Mutation gefunden wurde) ist eine eingehende genetische Beratung nicht erforderlich.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung der Blasenmolen erfolgt durch ultraschall-geleitete Saugevakuierung. Diese Ma\u00dfnahme muss schnell erfolgen, da das Risiko f\u00fcr Komplikationen mit fortschreitender Schwangerschaft zunimmt. Nach der Entfernung ist die Prognose exzellent. Das Hauptrisiko ist die Retention wegen unvollst\u00e4ndiger Aspiration (25% der F\u00e4lle). Deshalb ist eine Ultraschallkontrolle innerhalb von 15 Tagen nach Aspiration gerechtfertigt. Bei Retention (Ultraschallbild von > 17 mm in antero-posteriorem Durchmesser) muss die Aspiration wiederholt werden. In etwa 15% der kompletten und 0,5-5% der partiellen Blasenmolen kommt es Wochen bis Monate nach der Molenevakuierung zu Komplikationen durch Schwangerschafts-Trophoblastentumoren (s. dort). Deren Auftreten kann durch Kontrolle des Plasma-hCG-Spiegels erkannt werden. Nach Erfassung des Krankheitsstadiums (staging) erfolgt eine angemessene Chemotherapie.", "summary": "Eine Blasenmole tritt in Europa in 1 von etwa 1.000 Schwangerschaften auf und wird bei 1 von 41 Fehlgeburten gefunden."}, {"name": "Blasenmole, inkomplette", "sub_name": "Mole, hydatiforme partielle", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Partial hydatiform mole is a type of hydatiform mole (see this term) characterized by abnormal hyperplastic trophoblasts and hydropic villi due to fertilization of a normal ovocyte by two spermatozoa or one abnormal spermatozoon (allowing for some fetal development), and that manifests with vaginal bleeding accompanied by nausea and frequent vomiting, hyperemesis gravidarum, hyperthyroidism and risk of spontaneous miscarriage.", "synonyms": "Incomplete hydatidiform mole, Incomplete molar pregnancy, Partial molar pregnancy, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "O01.1", "umls": "C0334529"}, {"name": "Blasenmole, vollst\u00e4ndige", "sub_name": "Mole, hydatiforme komplette", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of hydatiform mole characterized by abnormal hyperplastic trophoblasts and hydropic villi due to fertilization of an enucleated ovocyte by one or two haploid spermatozoa that can manifest with vaginal bleeding accompanied by nausea and frequent vomiting, hyperemesis gravidarum, risk of spontaneous miscarriage, hyperthyroidism, and has the potential of developing into choriocarcinoma.", "synonyms": "Complete molar pregnancy, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "O01.0", "omim": "231090\u00a0 614293\u00a0 618431\u00a0 618432", "umls": "C0678213"}, {"name": "Blasenschmerz-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Interstitielle Cystitis", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des BPS reicht von 10-510:100.000 Einwohner und ist am h\u00f6chsten in den nordischen L\u00e4ndern. Das Geschlechtsverh\u00e4ltnis (m:w) ist 1:9. M\u00f6glich ist eine Assoziation des BPS mit Fibromyalgie.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare non-infectious, chronic and most often progressive disease of the urinary bladder. It is characterized by varying combinations and extent of pain, urinary frequency (pollakisuria), nocturia and urgency. Interstitial cystitis (IC) has a broad intersection with Bladder Pain Syndrome (BPS) and Overactive Bladder (OAB).", "synonyms": "Bladder pain syndrome, IC/BPS, IC/PBS, Interstitial cystitis/bladder pain syndrome, Interstitial cystitis/painful bladder syndrome, Painful bladder syndrome, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "N30.1", "umls": "C0282488\u00a0 C0600040\u00a0 C1720830\u00a0 C3160917", "mesh": "D018856", "meddra": "10011796", "epidemiology": "Prevalence of IC/BPS is approximately 1/200-2,000- for females and 1/2,450-12,500 for males. The prevalence of IC alone is less than 1/2,000. The estimated number of unreported cases might be much higher. Women are more affected than men (ratio 9:1).", "clinical_description": "IC is characterized by a permanent or intermittent unpleasant sensation (pain, pressure, bladder spasms) in the pelvic (or vulvar, suprapubic, pubic, vaginal, perineal, scrotal or urethral) region of more than 6 month duration, often with worsening during bladder filling. Limited bladder capacity is frequent but not a mandatory precondition. Frequency, nocturia and urgency are often associated with IC. Two types of IC can be distinguished: Hunner-Type and Non-Hunner-Type IC.", "etiology": "The exact etiology of the disorder is unknown and might be multifactorial. Possible factors are urothelial alterations with an increased permeability of urine components, preceding infections (including history of bacterial cystitis), hormonal, vascular or neurological abnormalities, trauma, inflammation or autoimmune diseases. Other risk factors may include pelvic surgery, changes in microbiome, reduced microcirculation, histamine intolerance, dysfunction of the pelvic floor, endometriosis, genetic factors and psychological factors.", "diagnostic_methods": "IC is a diagnosis of exclusion. Diagnosis is based on the patient's history, questionnaires, pain protocol, bladder diary and physical examination including a pain mapping and urinalysis. Additional examinations include ultrasound, uroflowmetry, urethrocystoscopy, flow-electromyography and urodynamics, provocation tests (e.g. KCl test), hydrodistension of the bladder and bladder biopsy under anesthesia combined with a standardized counting for mast cells. A stool test may also helpful.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include a long list of diseases of the musculoskeletal system and connective tissue, gastrointestinal diseases, gynecological diseases, neurological disorders, psychological disorders and urological diseases.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment is most often symptomatic, and ranges from non-invasive behavioral treatment to oral medication, complementary medicine, intravesical therapy (instillation), transurethral procedures, invasive / surgical interventions and rehabilitation measures. A phased approach is recommended and the therapy should be individualized. Cystectomy and urinary diversion is an ultima ratio, although with excellent results in pain control in patients with IC.", "prognosis": "IC is a debilitating disease and extremely affects the quality of life including physical, psychological, domestic, social, sexual and occupational aspects. IC is a chronically-recurring or chronically-progressive disease. Most often IC results in a bladder with very low capacity, high frequency and intolerable pain."}, {"name": "Blastische plasmazytoide dendritische Zell-Neoplasie", "sub_name": "CD4+/CD56+ h\u00e4matoderme Neoplasie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare hematologic neoplasm characterized by origin from precursors of plasmacytoid dendritic cells, with frequent cutaneous, bone marrow, and lymph node involvement, as well as leukemic dissemination. Most common clinical presentation is with asymptomatic solitary or multiple skin lesions (either isolated purplish nodules, isolated bruise-like papules, or disseminated purplish nodules/macules/papules), although some patients may present with leukemia. Skin biopsy shows a diffuse, monomorphous infiltrate of medium-sized blast cells resembling either lymphoblasts or myeloblasts, with massive involvement of the dermis. The clinical course is aggressive, and age has an adverse impact on prognosis.", "synonyms": "BPDCN, Blastic NK-cell lymphoma, Blastic plasmacytoid dendritic cell neoplasm, Lymphoblastoid variant of NK-cell lymphoma, Monomorphic NK-cell lymphoma, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Elderly", "icd_10": "C86.4", "gard": "10556"}, {"name": "Blastisches NK-Zell-Lymphom", "sub_name": "CD4+/CD56+ h\u00e4matoderme Neoplasie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare hematologic neoplasm characterized by origin from precursors of plasmacytoid dendritic cells, with frequent cutaneous, bone marrow, and lymph node involvement, as well as leukemic dissemination. Most common clinical presentation is with asymptomatic solitary or multiple skin lesions (either isolated purplish nodules, isolated bruise-like papules, or disseminated purplish nodules/macules/papules), although some patients may present with leukemia. Skin biopsy shows a diffuse, monomorphous infiltrate of medium-sized blast cells resembling either lymphoblasts or myeloblasts, with massive involvement of the dermis. The clinical course is aggressive, and age has an adverse impact on prognosis.", "synonyms": "BPDCN, Blastic NK-cell lymphoma, Blastic plasmacytoid dendritic cell neoplasm, Lymphoblastoid variant of NK-cell lymphoma, Monomorphic NK-cell lymphoma, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Elderly", "icd_10": "C86.4", "gard": "10556"}, {"name": "Blastogeneseanomalien", "sub_name": "Dysplasie, axiale mesodermale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltener Entwicklungsdefekt w\u00e4hrend der Embryogenese, der durch kongenitale Manifestationen sowohl des okulo-aurikulo-vertebralen Spektrums als auch der kaudalen Regressionssequenz gekennzeichnet ist. Der Ph\u00e4notyp ist sehr variabel, aber die Patienten pr\u00e4sentieren sich typischerweise mit Gesichtsdysmorphien (inkl. Asymmetrie, Hypertelorismus), Ohrmuschelanomalien (z.B.. pr\u00e4aurikul\u00e4re Tags, Mikrotie, Fehlen der Mittelohrkn\u00f6chelchen), Skelettfehlbildungen (Halbwirbel, H\u00fcftluxation, Sakralagenesie/-dysplasie, Klumpf\u00fc\u00dfe, Flexionsdeformit\u00e4t der unteren Extremit\u00e4ten), Herzfehler (Dextrokardie, Septumdefekte), Nieren- und Urogenitalanomalien (z. B. Nierenagenesie/Dysplasie, abnorme \u00e4u\u00dfere Genitalien, Kryptorchismus) sowie Analanomalien wie Analatresie und Rektovesikusfistel.", "synonyms": "Blastogeneseanomalien, Russell-Weaver-Bull-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "UMLS": "C2931613", "MeSH": "C537790", "GARD": "213"}, {"name": "Blastom, pleuro-pulmonales, Typ I", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "C34.1\u00a0 C34.2\u00a0 C34.3\u00a0 C34.8\u00a0 C34.9", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Blastom, pleuro-pulmonales, Typ II", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "C34.1\u00a0 C34.2\u00a0 C34.3\u00a0 C34.8\u00a0 C34.9", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Blastom, pleuro-pulmonales, Typ III", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "C34.1\u00a0 C34.2\u00a0 C34.3\u00a0 C34.8\u00a0 C34.9", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Blaublindheit", "sub_name": "Tritanopie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Blaublindheit, Farbenblindheit, Tritan-Typ, Tritanopie, kongenitale, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "H53.5", "OMIM": "190900", "UMLS": "C0155017", "summary": "Die Tritanopie ist eine extrem seltene Form der Farbenblindheit mit selektiv verminderter oder fehlender Wahrnehmung von Blau. Eines von 13-15.000 Neugeborenen ist betroffen. Die Tritanopie wird autosomal-dominant vererbt. Ursache sind Mutationen im BCP-Gen (blue cone pigment, 7q31.33-q32), das f\u00fcr das blau-empfindliche Photopigment kodiert. Die Wahrnehmung von Rot und Gr\u00fcn ist nicht eingeschr\u00e4nkt. "}, {"name": "Blaues Gummibl\u00e4schen-Naevus-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Blue rubber bleb-Naevus", "german_description": "Der Blue rubber bleb-Naevus (BRBNS) ist eine seltene vaskul\u00e4re Fehlbildung mit vor allem kutanen und viszeralen L\u00e4sionen, die h\u00e4ufig zu schweren und potentiell t\u00f6dlichen Blutungen und An\u00e4mie f\u00fchren. Bisher wurden mehr als 200 F\u00e4lle beschrieben, aber die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Multifokale ven\u00f6se Fehlbildungen bestehen am h\u00e4ufigsten in der Haut und im Gastrointestinaltrakt (GIT), aber auch im Gehirn, in den Nieren, Lungen, Augen, Knochen uns anderen Organen. Beschrieben wurden auch Gerinnungsst\u00f6rungen (Verbrauchskoagulopathie, Thrombozytopenie). Die L\u00e4sionen sind in der Regel schon im Kindesalter ausgepr\u00e4gt, k\u00f6nnen sich aber auch erst im sp\u00e4teren Leben entwickeln. Sie pulsieren leicht, sind blau gef\u00e4rbt und komprimierbar. Wichtigste klinische Manifestation sind akute oder chronische Blutungen aus multiplen vaskul\u00e4ren Fehlbildungen im GIT, in der Regel im D\u00fcnndarm. Akute Blutungen werden manifest mit Bluterbrechen, Mel\u00e4na (Blutstuhl) oder rektale Blutungen. Ohne radikale Behandlung werden die Patienten mit BRBNS durch chronische Magendarmblutungen an\u00e4misch und m\u00fcssen ihr ganzes Leben mit Eisen und Bluttransfusionen behandelt werden. Eine maligne Umwandlung der L\u00e4sionen wurde bisher nicht beschrieben. Seltene Komplikationen der gastrointestinalen Malformationen sind Volvulus, Intussuszeption und Darminfarkt. Die Ursache des Syndroms ist nicht bekannt. Die meisten F\u00e4lle erscheinen isoliert, aber mehrere Familien mit autosomal-dominanter Vererbung wurden beschrieben. Mutationen im TEK/TIE2-Gen (9p21), das f\u00fcr eine endotheliale Rezeptor-Tyrosinkinase kodiert, sind wahrscheinlich f\u00fcr die famili\u00e4ren F\u00e4lle verantwortlich. Methoden zur Diagnose des BRBNS sind H\u00e4matologie, Endoskkopie, Ultraschall, CT, MRI und Histopathologie. Differentialdiagnosen sind: Gef\u00e4\u00dftumoren, entweder benigne (H\u00e4mangiome) oder maligne (Kaposi-Sarkom, Angiosarkom); Gef\u00e4\u00dfanomalien bei angeborenen oder systemischen Erkrankungen (Klippel-Trenaunay-Weber, Ehlers-Danlos, die CREST-Variante der Sklerodermie, Osler-Weber-Rendu-Syndrom) und erworbene oder sporadische L\u00e4sionen (Angiodysplasien, vaskul\u00e4re Ektasie des Antrum pyloricum, strahleninduzierte vaskul\u00e4re Ektasie und Dieulafoy-L\u00e4sionen (sh. diese Termini). Naevi der Haut bluten in der Regel nicht: Chirurgische Resektion, Sklerotherapie oder Embolisation ergeben gute kosmetische Resultate. Wenn keine massiven gastrointestinalen Blutungen auftreten, ist eine konservative Behandlung mit Eisengaben und/oder Bluttransfusionen ausreichend. Wenig wirksam sind Kortikosteroide, anti-fibrinolytische Agentien, hochdosierte intraven\u00f6se Gaben von Gammaglobulin und Interferon-alpha. Langzeitbehandlung mit dem Somatostatin-Analogon Octreotid reduziert den Blutverlust aus den Naevi und anderen vaskul\u00e4ren L\u00e4sionen des Magendarmtraktes. Intraoperative Enteroskopie ist die sicherste diagnostische und/oder therapeutische Methode mit endoskopischer Koagulation oder vollst\u00e4ndiger chirurgischer Keilekzision. Es wird empfohlen, die Indikation f\u00fcr einen operativen Eingriff mit drahtloser Kapsel-Endoskopie abzukl\u00e4ren. Diese Methode kann auch f\u00fcr die Kontrolle des Therapieeffektes n\u00fctzlich sein.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare vascular malformation disorder with cutaneous and visceral lesions frequently associated with serious, potentially fatal bleeding and anemia.", "synonyms": "BRBN, Bean syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q27.8", "omim": "112200", "umls": "C0346072", "mesh": "C536240", "gard": "5940", "epidemiology": "More than 200 cases have been published so far, but prevalence is unknown.", "clinical_description": "Multifocal venous malformations most commonly involve the skin and gastrointestinal tract (GIT), but can also affect the brain, kidneys, lungs, eyes, bones and other organs. Hemostatic abnormalities due to consumption coagulopathy and thrombocythemia have also been described. The lesions are generally present in childhood but can develop later in life. They are usually blue colored and easily compressible with light palpation. The main clinical manifestation is acute or chronic bleeding from the multiple GIT vascular malformations, with the small intestine usually being involved. The acute bleeding presents as hematemesis, melena, or rectal bleeding. Unless treated radically, patients with BRBN develop anemia from chronic gastrointestinal bleeding and require lifelong treatment with iron and blood transfusions. Malignant transformation of the lesions has not been reported so far. Infrequent complications of the gastrointestinal malformations are volvulus, intussusception and intestinal infarction.", "etiology": "The cause of the syndrome is still unknown. Although most cases show no apparent hereditary pattern, autosomal dominant expression has been reported in several families. A gene mutation has been mapped to the short arm of chromosome 9 and might be involved in these familial cases.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnostic methods include: blood counts, endoscopy, ultrasound, CT, MRI, and histopathology.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include vascular tumors, either benign (hemangiomas) or malignant (Kaposi's sarcoma, angiosarcoma); vascular anomalies associated with congenital or systemic diseases (Klippel-Trenaunay-Weber, Ehlers-Danlos, the CREST variant of scleroderma, and Osler-Weber-Rendu syndrome) and acquired and sporadic lesions (angiodysplasias, gastric antral vascular ectasia, radiation-induced vascular ectasias, and Dieulafoy's lesions) (see these terms).", "management_and_treatment": "Cutaneous lesions do not usually bleed: surgery, sclerotherapy or embolization provide a good cosmetic result. In the absence of massive GIT bleeding, a conservative treatment is sufficient (iron supplementation and/or blood transfusions). Corticosteroids, antifibrinolytic agents, high-dose intravenous gamma globulin and interferon alpha are of poor effect. Long-term use of octreotide has been found to reduce blood loss from BRBN and other vascular gastrointestinal lesions. Intra-operative enteroscopy is the accepted ultimate diagnostic and/or therapeutic procedure, allowing immediate resolution of pathological findings by endoscopic coagulation or surgical full-thickness wedge excision. It is recommended to start with capsule wireless endoscopy to specify the indication for the procedure. Capsule endoscopy may also be a useful tool for monitoring the effects of therapy."}, {"name": "Blaus\u00e4urevergiftung", "sub_name": "Zyanid-Vergiftung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Blaus\u00e4urevergiftung, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "T65.0", "summary": "Es handelt sich bei diesem Eintrag um eine seltene Kondition, f\u00fcr dessen Behandlung ein Medikament mit europ\u00e4ischer und/oder amerikanischer Orphan-Drug-Designation existiert."}, {"name": "Blau-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Blau-Syndrom (BS) ist eine seltene, systemische entz\u00fcndliche Erkrankung mit fr\u00fchbeginnender granulomat\u00f6ser Arthritis, Uveitis und Exanthem. Der Terminus BS bezeichnet jetzt eine einheitliche Erkrankung mit sowohl famili\u00e4rem als auch sporadischem Auftreten. (Letztere Form wurde bisher als Sarkoidose mit fr\u00fchem Beginn bezeichnet.) Die vorgeschlagene Bezeichnung P\u00e4diatrische granulomat\u00f6se Arthritis wird aktuell in Frage gestellt, da sie nicht den systemischen Charakter der Erkrankung anspricht.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "D89.8", "OMIM": "186580", "UMLS": "C1861303", "GARD": "304", "MedDRA": "10071755", "epidemiology": "Die genaue Pr\u00e4valenz ist unbekannt. In einem d\u00e4nischen Register wurde die j\u00e4hrliche Inzidenz auf 1/1.670.000/Jahr f\u00fcr Kinder unter 5 Jahren gesch\u00e4tzt.", "clinical_description": "Ein Hautausschlag (mit kleinen roten/braunen Punkten) ist in der Regel das erste Symptom und erscheint bereits im Alter von 1 Monat im Gesicht und breitet sich danach auf den Rumpf aus. Das Exanthem kann rezidivieren und sich jeweils ohne Behandlung zur\u00fcckbilden. Gelenksymptome beginnen in der Regel vor dem Alter von 10 Jahren mit schmerzlosen zystenartigen Schwellungen auf dem Fu\u00dfr\u00fccken und an den Handgelenken. In der Folge wird eine symmetrische Arthritis (mit ser\u00f6ser Synovitis und Tendosynovitis) an Handgelenken, Sprunggelenken, Knien und manchmal an den Ellenbogen manifest. Kamptodaktylie aufgrund einer hypertrophischen Tendosynovitis wird bei fortgeschrittener Erkrankung oft beschrieben. Eine schwere Behinderung tritt in der Regel nicht vor dem Alter von 40-50 Jahren ein. Eine schleichende granulomat\u00f6se Iridozyklitis und eine posteriore Uveitis (siehe dort) k\u00f6nnen in eine schwere destruktive Panuveitis \u00fcbergehen. Im weiteren Verlauf treten charakteristische Iriskn\u00f6tchen, fokale Synechien, Katarakte, erh\u00f6hter Augeninnendruck und charakteristische klumpige, die Cornea umrandende Ablagerungen auf. Zur posterioren Beteiligung z\u00e4hlen eine Vitritis, eine multifokale Choroiditis, Ver\u00e4nderungen der Netzhautgef\u00e4\u00dfe und Sehnerv-\u00d6deme. Ein signifikanter Verlust der Sehf\u00e4higkeit besteht bei 20-30% der Betroffenen. Zum Spektrum der klinischen Symptome geh\u00f6ren Fieber, maligne systemische und pulmonale Hypertension, granulomat\u00f6se Vaskulitis der gro\u00dfen Gef\u00e4\u00dfe und granulomat\u00f6se Entz\u00fcndung der Leber, Nieren und Lunge.", "etiology": "Ursache des BS sind vererbte oder neu aufgetretene Mutationen im NOD2-Gen (16q12), das f\u00fcr Ver\u00e4nderungen in der angeborenen Immunantwort, Entz\u00fcndungen und Zelltod verantwortlich ist. Transfektions-Untersuchungen ergaben, dass NOD2-Mutationen den Kernfaktor NF\u0138B aktivieren, der wiederum die Transkription pro-inflammatorischer Zytokine hochreguliert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert weitgehend auf dem Nachweis der nicht-verk\u00e4senden granulomat\u00f6sen Entz\u00fcndung mit epithelioiden Zellen und mehrkernigen Riesenzellen in Haut-, Synovia- oder Konjunktiva-Biopsien und auf dem Mutationsnachweis im NOD2-Gen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind: Polyarthritis, Systemische juvenile idiopathische Arthritis (JIA; siehe dort), granulomat\u00f6se Entz\u00fcndung bei prim\u00e4rer Immunschw\u00e4che und die Systemische granulomat\u00f6se Vaskulitis. Bei Patienten mit granulomat\u00f6ser Entz\u00fcndung m\u00fcssen chronische Infektionen, insbesondere mit Mykobakterien und Pilzen ausgeschlossen werden.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine pr\u00e4natale Diagnose und pr\u00e4natale Gentests werden selten durchgef\u00fchrt.", "genetic_counseling": "Das BS wird autosomal-dominant vererbt. Auch f\u00fcr Nachkommen sporadischer F\u00e4lle ist das Risiko erh\u00f6ht. Eine genetische Beratung wird angeraten.", "management_and_treatment": "Es gibt keine evidenzbasierten Daten zur optimalen Behandlung des BS. Eine Kortikosteroid-Therapie mit m\u00e4\u00dfiger bis niedriger Dosierung ist wirksam bei der Behandlung einer Uveitis und Gelenkerkrankung, jedoch k\u00f6nnen die Nebenwirkungen bei l\u00e4ngerer Anwendung unakzeptabel hoch werden. Methotrexat mit einer Dosierung von 10-15 mg/m2 einmal w\u00f6chentlich vermindert die Krankheitsaktivit\u00e4t und erm\u00f6glicht eine Reduktion der Kortikosteroid-Dosis. Die Einf\u00fchrung von monoklonalen Anti-TNF-Antik\u00f6rper-Wirkstoffen (Infliximab und Adalimumab) stellt m\u00f6glicherweise einen gr\u00f6\u00dferen therapeutischen Fortschritt bei der Behandlung des BS dar, jedoch erscheint die Wirkung auf die Uveitis-Aktivit\u00e4t weniger \u00fcberzeugend.", "prognosis": "Die BS ist eine chronische und progrediente Erkrankung mit einem variablen und oft unvorhersehbaren Spektrum von Schweregraden. In F\u00e4llen mit gr\u00f6\u00dferer Zahl von Symptomen kann die Lebenserwartung verringert sein. Die Prognose der Uveitis ist ung\u00fcnstig.", "summary": "Die genaue Pr\u00e4valenz ist unbekannt. In einem d\u00e4nischen Register wurde die j\u00e4hrliche Inzidenz auf 1/1.670.000/Jahr f\u00fcr Kinder unter 5 Jahren gesch\u00e4tzt."}, {"name": "Blauzapfenmonochromasie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Blauzapfen-Monochromasie (BCM) ist eine X-chromosomal-rezessiv vererbte Krankheit mit schwer gest\u00f6rtem Farbsehen, geringer Sehsch\u00e4rfe, Nystagmus und Photophobie als Folge einer Funktionsst\u00f6rung der Rot (L)- und Gr\u00fcn (M)- Zapfen. BCM ist eine unvollst\u00e4ndige Form der Achromatopsie (siehe dort).", "synonyms": "Achromatopsie, atypische X-chromosomale, Achromatopsie, inkomplette X-chromosomale, Farbenblindheit, blauer einzapfiger monochromatischer Typ, S-Zapfen-Monochromasie, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "H53.5", "OMIM": "303700", "UMLS": "C0339537\u00a0 C2931753", "MeSH": "C536238\u00a0 C538165", "GARD": "917", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird weltweit auf 1/100.000 gesch\u00e4tzt.", "clinical_description": "Die BCM manifestiert sich im fr\u00fchen S\u00e4uglingsalter, bevorzugt bei Knaben. Das Farbsehen ist schwer gest\u00f6rt und die Sehsch\u00e4rfe vermindert (erhalten ist nur die Funktion der St\u00e4bchen und der Blauzapfen). Weitere h\u00e4ufige Symptome sind Photophobie, Myopie und Pendelnystagmus (der im Verlauf nachl\u00e4sst).", "etiology": "Ursache der Erkrankung sind Mutationen im Rot- und Gr\u00fcn-Opsin-Gencluster OPN1LW und OPN1MW (Xq28), wodurch die Funktion der entsprechenden Zapfen gest\u00f6rt ist. Zu diesen Mutationen geh\u00f6ren Deletionen der f\u00fcr die Expression beider Gene kritischen Locus-Kontrollregion. Diese Deletionen k\u00f6nnen aber auch den Opsin-Gencluster teilweise oder vollst\u00e4ndig einschlie\u00dfen. Genomische Rearrangements (ungleiches Crossing-over) k\u00f6nnen zu einem singul\u00e4ren Rot-Gen und/oder zu Rot-Gr\u00fcn-Hybridgenen mit den inaktivierenden Mutationen f\u00fchren. H\u00e4ufig wird die c.607T>C p.C203R Missense-Mutation gefunden, aber auch andere Missense-und Nonsens-Mutationen wurden beschrieben.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die BCM wird diagnostiziert durch klinisch-ophthalmologische Untersuchung, elektrophysiologische (Elektroretinoraphie; ERG) und psychophysische (Farbsehen, Dunkelanpassung) Testung, wobei BCM-Patienten keine Antwort auf rotes und gr\u00fcnes Licht aber eine normale Antwort auf blaues Licht zeigen. Mutations-Screening kann die Diagnose best\u00e4tigen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind Achromatopsie, kongenitale Amaurose Leber, verschiedene Arten von Zapfendystrophien (siehe diese Termini) und zerebrale Achromatopsie.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Die BCM wird X-chromosomal vererbt. Eine genetische Beratung ist unerl\u00e4sslich. Konduktorinnen vererben das mutierte Allel mit 50% Wahrscheinlichkeit an ihre Kinder. Die Penetranz ist vollst\u00e4ndig, die Expressivit\u00e4t nur wenig variabel.", "genetic_counseling": "Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik wird Paaren mit Wiederholungsrisiko abh\u00e4ngig von nationalen Vorgehensweisen und ethischen Einstellungen durch Speziallabors angeboten.", "management_and_treatment": "Eine spezifische Therapie gibt es nicht. Die Patienten werden symptomatisch behandelt und im Verlauf regelm\u00e4\u00dfig ophthalmologisch kontrolliert. Die Patienten werden \u00fcber die Anwendung von Filtergl\u00e4sern und Kontaktlinsen (rot- oder braunget\u00f6nt) informiert mit dem Ziel verminderter Photophobie und verbesserter Wahrnehmung von Kontrasten. Stark vergr\u00f6\u00dfernde Sehhilfen unterst\u00fctzen das Lesen.", "prognosis": "Die BCM bleibt im Verlauf in der Regel station\u00e4r, jedoch kann selten bei \u00e4lteren Patienten eine Makuladegeneration auftreten.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird weltweit auf 1/100.000 gesch\u00e4tzt."}, {"name": "BLC", "sub_name": "Chondrodysplasie Typ Blomstrand", "german_description": "Die letale Chondrodysplasie Typ Blomstrand (BLC) ist eine autosomal-rezessiv vererbte Krankheit mit fr\u00fcher Letalit\u00e4t und akzelerierter Knochenreifung und Knorpeldifferenzierung. Kinder mit BLC werden im typischen Fall pr\u00e4matur geboren und sterben kurz nach der Geburt. Sie manifestieren ein schweres Fehlbildungssyndrom mit extrem verk\u00fcrzten Gliedma\u00dfen. Die BLC wird rezessiv vererbt und ist assoziiert mit inaktivierenden Mutationen im PTHR1-Gen, das f\u00fcr den PTH/PTHrP-Rezeptor kodiert. R\u00f6ntgenologisch zeigt das gesamte Skelett eine erh\u00f6hte Knochendichte und eine stark vorangeschrittene Ossifikation. Die Diagnose kann mit transvaginalem Ultraschall schon in der 12.-13. Schwangerschaftswoche gestellt werden. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Blomstrand lethal chondrodysplasia (BLC) is a neonatal osteosclerotic dysplasia (see this term) characterized by advanced endochondral bone maturation, very short limbs, dwarfism and prenatal lethality.", "synonyms": "BLC, BOCD, Blomstrand chondrodysplasia, Blomstrand osteochondrodysplasia, Chondrodysplasia, Blomstrand type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q78.8", "omim": "215045", "umls": "C1859148", "mesh": "C537914", "gard": "914", "epidemiology": "To date, less than 10 cases have been described in the literature.", "clinical_description": "BLC is a congenital disorder characterized by a low birth weight, facial dysmorphism (widely spaced and protruding eyes (which typically show cataract), depressed nasal bridge, short columella, long philtrum, macroglossia, protruding tongue, severe micrognathia), short trunk, narrow thorax and severe rhizo-meso-acromelic shortness of the limbs. Other anomalies also observed include tooth and mammary gland development defects, hypoplastic lungs, aorta coarctation (see this term), and bowel malrotation. Two forms of BCL, have been described: type I which is the severe, classical form and type II which has less severe features (such as absence of short trunk or, severely shortened arms but moderately shortened legs).", "etiology": "BLC is caused by inactivating homozygous or compound heterozygous mutations in PTH1R (3p22-p21.1) which encodes the parathyroid hormone (PTH)/parathyroid-hormone-related peptide (PTHrP) receptor (PTH1R). These mutations result in the decrease in binding or response to PTH and PTHrP.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on the clinical and radiological characteristics which show generalized increase in bone density with advanced ossification, severe shortness of the long bones with wide metaphyses and club-shaped distal ends, long narrow thorax, calcified hyoid bone and laryngeal cartilage and underdeveloped viscerocranium. Histopathological examination shows an important acceleration of the endochondral ossification in tubular bones, narrow cartilages of the epiphyses and large epiphyseal ossification centers. Diagnosis is confirmed by the genetic screening of PTH1R.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes primary failure of tooth eruption (see this term) and other lethal short limbed dwarfisms.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is achieved by sonographic examination showing polyhydramnios, hydrops fetalis (see this term) and a fetus with very short limbs, nuchale dema, macroglossia, a protuberant abdomen, internal anomalies and markedly advanced endochondral bone formation.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them of the 25% risk of having an affected child.", "prognosis": "Both forms of BLC are lethal either prenatally or shortly after birth."}, {"name": "BLC-PMG", "sub_name": "Intrauterines infektions\u00e4hnliches Syndrom, kongenitales", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "BLC-PMG, Baraitser-Brett-Piesowicz-Syndrom, Baraitser-Reardon-Syndrom, Bilaterale band-\u00e4hnliche Kalzifizierung mit Polymikrogyrie, Mikrozephalie - intrakraniale Verkalkungen - Intelligenzminderung, Pseudo-TORCH-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "251290", "UMLS": "C2931662\u00a0 C3489725", "GARD": "12426\u00a0 815", "summary": "Das Kongenitale Intrauterine Infektions\u00e4hnliche Syndrom (KIIS) ist bei Geburt gekennzeichnet durch Mikrozephalie, intrakraniale Verkalkungen, neurologische Unreife, Krampfanf\u00e4lle und einen weiteren klinischen Verlauf, wie er bei Patienten nach intrauteriner Infektion mit Toxoplasma gondii gesehen wird. Trotz wiederholter Tests werden auch andere bekannte infekt\u00f6se Ursachen, R\u00f6teln, Zytomegalievirus oder Herpes simplex (sog. TORCH-Syndrom) immer wieder ausgeschlossen. Bisher wurden mehr als 30 F\u00e4lle publiziert. Die beschriebenen F\u00e4lle sind klinisch sehr heterogen. Zu den unterschiedlich ausgepr\u00e4gten Symptomen z\u00e4hlen intrauterine Wachstumsverz\u00f6gerung, Hepatosplenomegalie, Hyperbilirubin\u00e4mie, Kleinhirn-Hypoplasie oder -Atrophie und kongenitale Katarakt. Patienten mit gleichzeitig bestehender Thrombozytopenie werden als distinkter Untertyp angesehen. Mehrere famili\u00e4re F\u00e4lle sind mit autosomal-rezessiver Vererbung vereinbar. Die Ursache ist weiterhin unklar. Die Diagnose basiert auf dem klinischen Bild und erfordert den Ausschluss intrauteriner Infektionen. Das KIIS zeigt eine erhebliche klinische \u00dcberschneidung mit dem Aicardi-Goutieres-Syndrome (AGS, s. dort). Nach Ansicht einiger Autoren sprechen Ver\u00e4nderungen der Zerebrospinalfl\u00fcssigkeit (Leukozytose, erh\u00f6hte IFN-Alpha-Spiegel) f\u00fcr AGS und gest\u00f6rte Leberfunktion, angeborene Mikrozephalie und Thromozytopenie f\u00fcr KIIS. Da aber beide Syndrome klinisch au\u00dferordentlich variabel sind, wurde auch vermutet, dass AGS und KIIS unterschiedliche Auspr\u00e4gungen der gleichen Krankheit sind. Weitere Differentialdiagnosen sind andere Syndrome mit Mikrozephalie und intrakranialen Verkalkungen: Cockayne-Syndrom, COFS-Syndrom (das in der Regel als neonatale Form des Cockayne-Syndroms angesehen wird), das Hoyeraal-Hreidarsson-Syndrom (die neonatale Auspr\u00e4gung des Dyskeratosis congenita-Syndroms; s. diese Termini), einige F\u00e4lle von mitochondrialer Enzephalomyelopathie und Pseudohypoparathyreoidismus. Fr\u00fchere F\u00e4lle wurden evtl. als 'Fahr-Krankheit` beschrieben, eine \u00fcberholte Bezeichnung f\u00fcr urs\u00e4chlich heterogene Krankheitsbilder mit intrakranialen Verkalkungen. Die Behandlung ist ausschlie\u00dflich symptomatisch. Die Prognose ist unterschiedlich, in ung\u00fcnstigen F\u00e4llen starben mehrere der Patienten im ersten Lebensjahr."}, {"name": "Blei-Intoxikation", "sub_name": "Bleivergiftung", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Lead poisoning is defined as acute or chronic exposure to lead resulting in lead accumulation (blood lead concentration (BLC) >5 ug/dL) that can affect every organ system in the body and to which children are more susceptible. Clinical manifestations depend on the amount and duration of exposure and include abdominal pain, colic, constipation, lead line on gingival tissue, arthralgia, myalgia, peripheral neuropathy, fatigue, irritability, anemia, chronic nephropathy and hypertension. In children, even low levels of exposure (BLC <5 ug/dL) is reported to lead to irreversible effects such as loss of cognition, shortening of attention span, alteration of behavior, dyslexia, attention deficit disorder, hypertension, renal impairment, immunotoxicity and toxicity to the reproductive organs.", "synonyms": "Lead intoxication, Plumbism, Saturnism, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "T56.0", "umls": "C0023176"}, {"name": "Bleivergiftung", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Lead poisoning is defined as acute or chronic exposure to lead resulting in lead accumulation (blood lead concentration (BLC) >5 ug/dL) that can affect every organ system in the body and to which children are more susceptible. Clinical manifestations depend on the amount and duration of exposure and include abdominal pain, colic, constipation, lead line on gingival tissue, arthralgia, myalgia, peripheral neuropathy, fatigue, irritability, anemia, chronic nephropathy and hypertension. In children, even low levels of exposure (BLC <5 ug/dL) is reported to lead to irreversible effects such as loss of cognition, shortening of attention span, alteration of behavior, dyslexia, attention deficit disorder, hypertension, renal impairment, immunotoxicity and toxicity to the reproductive organs.", "synonyms": "Lead intoxication, Plumbism, Saturnism, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "T56.0", "umls": "C0023176"}, {"name": "Blepharochalasie-Doppelte Lippe-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Ascher-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Ascher-Syndrom ist definiert als das Zusammentreffen von Blepharochalasis und gedoppelter Lippe. Das Syndrom ist sehr selten und wurde bisher bei weniger als 15 Patienten beschrieben. Bei der Blepharochalasis handelt es sich um eine zunehmende Erschlaffung der Lidhaut mit \u00f6demat\u00f6sen Schwellungen, Hautatrophie, Verengung der Lidspalte und der Bildung eines Pseudo-Epikanthus. Eine besondere Falte der Mundschleimhaut wird als doppelte Lippe bezeichnet. Meist ist die Oberlippe betroffen, aber auch eine Doppelung der Unterlippe ist m\u00f6glich. Weitere, fakultative Symptome sind euthyreote Struma, Hypertelorismus, Ptose, verbreiterte Nase mit breiter Spitze, hoher Gaumen, beidseitige Klinodaktylie des Mittelfingers und, im sp\u00e4teren Verlauf, Fetthernien der Orbita und Prolaps der Tr\u00e4nendr\u00fcse. Wahrscheinlich handelt es sich bei allen mitgeteilten F\u00e4llen um dominante Neumutationen. Ein Gen konnte bisher nicht lokalisiert werden. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A very rare syndrome characterized by a combination of blepharochalasis, double lip, and non-toxic thyroid enlargement (seen in 10-50% of cases), although the occurrence of all three signs at presentation is uncommon. Hypertrophy of the mucosal zone of the lip with persistence of the horizontal sulcus between cutaneous and mucosal zones gives an appearance of double lip, with the upper lip being frequently involved. Blepharochalasis, or episodic edema of eyelid, appears around puberty, is present in 80% of cases, is usually bilateral, and can rarely lead to vision impairment and other ocular complications. Most cases are sporadic, but familial cases (with a possible autosomal dominant inheritance) have also been reported.", "synonyms": "Blepharochalasis-double lip syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.0", "omim": "109900", "umls": "C0339085", "gard": "201"}, {"name": "Blepharochalasis, isolierte", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare palpebral disorder characterized by recurrent episodes of painless eyelid edema. It usually occurs bilaterally, typically affects the upper eyelids, and may manifest as a hypertrophic form resulting in orbital fat herniation through a weakened orbital septum, or an atrophic form with atrophy of redundant eyelid skin and superior nasal fat pads. Additional findings are formation of pseudoepicanthal folds, lacrimal gland prolapse, or ptosis.", "icd_10": "H02.3"}, {"name": "Blepharo-cheilo-dentales Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden mehr als 50 F\u00e4lle in der Literatur beschrieben.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare ectodermal dysplasia syndrome characterized by the association of lower eyelid ectropion, upper eyelid distichiasis, euryblepharon, bilateral cleft lip and palate, and conical teeth.", "synonyms": "BCD syndrome, Blepharocheilodontic syndrome, Clefting-ectropion-conical teeth syndrome, Ectropion inferior-cleft lip and/or palate syndrome, Elschnig syndrome, Lagophthalmia-cleft lip and palate syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "119580\u00a0 617681", "umls": "C1861536", "gard": "2071\u00a0 3167", "epidemiology": "Over 50 cases have been described in literature to date.", "clinical_description": "Blepharocheilodontic syndrome (BCD) syndrome is characterized by eyelid malformations, cleft lip with or without cleft palate (CLP), and dental anomalies. CLP is usually bilateral and eyelid malformations are typical (ectropion of the lower eyelids, euryblepharon, and lagophthalmia). Patients harbor variable expression of ectodermal dysplasia, with constant dental anomalies corresponding to conical teeth and tooth agenesis. Additional variable features have been reported, including congenital hypothyroidism due to thyroid gland hypoplasia or aplasia, imperforate anus, neural tube defect, and syndactyly. Patients have normal intellectual development. Significant interindividual and intrafamilial variability have been reported, as well as incomplete penetrance. Diffuse gastric cancer and lobular breast cancer have been reported in two families so far. To date, the risk of cancer in BCD syndrome is not precisely known, since cancers were not reported in the other reported families.", "etiology": "BCD syndrome is due to either heterozygous CDH1 or CTNND1 variants. CDH1 encodes the E-cadherin, a transmembrane glycoprotein. CTNND1 encodes the Delta-Catenin, a protein linked to the cytoplasmic domain of E-cadherin. Both proteins are involved in a cell-cell adhesion complex, critical for establishing and maintaining polarized and differentiated epithelia during development. Recurrent missense CDH1 variants have been identified in BCD syndrome, probably impairing ion calcium binding. Variations in CTNND1 correspond predominantly to truncating variants, but missense variants have also been reported. BCD-related to CDH1 and CTNND1 variants are clinically indistinguishable, although the latter usually shows a milder phenotype. CDH1 variants also cause hereditary diffuse gastric cancer (HDGC), and diffuse gastric cancer and lobular breast cancer have been reported in two BCD families with CDH1 variants. Since cancers have not been reported in other reported families to date, the risk of cancer development is not precisely known. No HDGC-related cancer has been reported in patients with CTNND1 variants.", "diagnostic_methods": "The syndrome is suspected on the association of CLP, typical eyelid malformations and ectodermal dysplasia features. Molecular genetic testing approaches include targeted sequencing of the entire CDH1 and CTNND1 coding regions.", "differential_diagnosis": "BSD presents with a unique constellation of features and there are no relevant differential diagnoses.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal testing is possible if the pathogenic variant has been identified in an affected family member. However if the pathogenic variant is identified in the fetus, the severity of the condition is not predictable.", "genetic_counseling": "BCD syndrome is usually sporadic, but large families have been described. The disorder is autosomal dominant and patients harboring BCD syndrome features and carrying a CDH1 variant or a CTNND1 variant have 50% risk to transmit the pathogenic variant to their offspring. Due to intrafamilial variability and incomplete penetrance, prediction of the severity is difficult.", "management_and_treatment": "Management of BCD syndrome is supportive and symptomatic. CLP management is surgical, dental, and orthodontic. Early orthodontic follow-up should be proposed. Blepharoplasty is required for ankyloblepharon and for severe eyelid anomalies. Lagophthalmos can lead to corneal abrasion. Ophthalmologic evaluation is recommended to assess eye movement and possible tearing reduction. Congenital hypothyroidism is usually diagnosed through neonatal screening and treated with thyroid replacement therapy. Assessment of risk of cancer is challenging. Currently, there are no clear guidelines for surveillance or prophylactic total gastrectomy.", "prognosis": "The prognosis and functional consequences are variable and dependent on the associated anomalies. In families carrying a CDH1 variant and with a positive familial history of CDH1-related cancers, or fitting criteria for hereditary diffuse gastric cancer (HDGC), prognosis can be worsened by the occurrence of cancer."}, {"name": "Blepharo-naso-faziales Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Blepharo-naso-faziale Syndrom ist ein seltenes oto-rhino-laryngologisches Fehlbildungs-Syndrom und gekennzeichnet durch maskenartiges Gesicht, Obstruktion der Tr\u00e4neng\u00e4nge, extrapyramidale Zeichen, Fingerfehlbildungen und Intelligenzminderung.", "synonyms": "Pashayan-Prozansky-Syndrom, Pashayan-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0X-chromosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "Q87.0", "OMIM": "110050", "UMLS": "C0796197", "GARD": "4238", "epidemiology": "Das Blepharo-naso-faziale Syndrom wurde bisher in 3 Familien beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Das Gesicht erscheint durch die Schw\u00e4che der Gesichtsmuskeln maskenartig. Charakteristisch ist die Obstruktion der Tr\u00e4neng\u00e4nge. Weitere klinische Merkmale sind: Telekanthus (mit Verlagerung des Tr\u00e4nenpunktes nach temporal), dicke Nase, breiter Nasenr\u00fccken, manchmal Mittelgesichtshypoplasie, longitudinale Wangenfurchen, trapezoide Oberlippe und malformierte Ohren. Beschrieben wurden auch intellektuelle Behinderung, kutane Syndaktylie, Torsionsdystonie, verst\u00e4rkte tiefe Sehnenreflexe, Babinski-Zeichen, schlechte Koordination und lockere Gelenke.", "etiology": "Das Syndrom wird entweder autosomal oder X-chromosomal dominant vererbt.", "summary": "Das Blepharo-naso-faziale Syndrom wurde bisher in 3 Familien beschrieben."}, {"name": "Blepharophimose-Epicanthus inversus-Ptosis-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Blepharophimose-Epikanthus inversus-Ptose-Syndrom (BPES) ist ein erbliches Syndrom, mit dem sich etwa 100 Publikationen befassen. Manche Arbeiten beschreiben Stammb\u00e4ume mit vielen Betroffenen, andere nur Einzelf\u00e4lle. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist wahrscheinlich weniger als 1/5.000. BPES-Patienten haben eine Blepharophimose (verengte Lidspalten), Ptose, Telekanthus (vergr\u00f6\u00dferter Abstand der inneren Augenwinkel) und Epicanthus inversus (Hautfalte, die vom Unterlid nach innen oben zieht und teilweise den inneren Augenwinkel bedeckt). Zwei Subtypen des BPES wurden voneinander abgegrenzt. Beim Typ 1 sind die Lidanomalien mit Ovarialinsuffizienz und vorzeitiger Menopause und daraus resultierender Infertilit\u00e4t assoziiert. Beim Typ 2 sind nur die Lidanomalien vorhanden. Die Vererbung ist in beiden F\u00e4llen autosomal-dominant. Ursache beider Typen sind Mutationen im FOXL2-Gen in der Region 3q23. Etwa die H\u00e4lfte der F\u00e4lle sind Neumutationen. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare ophthalmic disorder characterized by blepharophimosis, ptosis, epicanthus inversus, and telecanthus, that can appear associated with (type 1) or without primary ovarian insufficiency (POI; type 2).", "synonyms": "BPES, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q10.3", "omim": "110100", "umls": "C0220663", "epidemiology": "The worldwide prevalence is unknown.", "clinical_description": "A congenital disorder characterized by a complex bilateral eyelid malformation including blepharophimosis, ptosis, epicanthus inversus and telecanthus. Other ophthalmic manifestations that are usually associated include lacrimal duct anomalies, amblyopia, strabismus, refractive errors and a lateral displacement of the inferior lacrimal puncta. Additional features include a broad nasal bridge, low-set ears, and a short philtrum. Affected females may develop POI, and are thus considered to have BPES type 1. Females without POI are classed as BPES type 2.", "etiology": "The disorder is caused by an intragenic mutation (80%), gene deletion (10-12%), deletions of regulatory elements outside of the FOXL2 gene (3q23)(<5%), and translocations involving the FOXL2 region. FOXL2 encodes a forkhead transcription factor that contains a typical DNA-binding forkhead domain and a polyalanine tract of 14 residues strictly conserved in mammals. FOXL2 is expressed in peri-ocular tissues as well as in the fetal and adult ovaries.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on presence at birth of the 4 major eyelids features with or without POI (amenorrhea for greater than 6 months, less than age 40 years and follicle stimulating hormone concentration greater than 40 IU/L). The clinical diagnosis is confirmed by the identification of a genetic defect in the FOXL2 gene or its regulatory region.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnoses includes those conditions in which ptosis or blepharophimosis are major features. However, this disorder can be relatively easily distinguished from most of these conditions as its facial appearance is very typical.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Genetic prenatal testing may be possible where the pathogenic variant has been previously identified in an affected family member.", "genetic_counseling": "Whilst the disorder can occur sporadically (de novo), the pattern of inheritance is typically autosomal dominant and genetic counseling for affected families should be offered. Penetrance for the eyelid phenotype is complete and presence of POI varies between families. Germline mosaicism has been described as well as a recessive mutation (one family) involving a polyalanine expansion of intermediate length.", "management_and_treatment": "The surgical management is traditionally performed in two stages and involves a medial canthoplasty for correction of the blepharophimosis, epicanthus inversus, and telecanthus at ages 3 to 5 years, followed about a year later by ptosis correction. However, when ptosis is severe, surgical repair is recommended before age 3 years. Ophthalmologic follow-up is important for management of the oculoplastic surgery. All female patients should be assessed and followed up for POI. Management of POI is multidisciplinary ( requiring a geneticist, endocrinologist, gynaecologist) should include counseling of the patient and relatives. Egg donation may be considered as a reproductive option. In the case of a detectable ovarian reserve, therapeutic counseling can lead to fertility preservation.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is good and patients have a normal lifespan."}, {"name": "Blepharophimose-Epicanthus inversus-Ptosis-Syndrom plus", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "BPES plus, Mikrodeletionssyndrom 3q23, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Blepharophimose-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "BMRS, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0oder\u00a0X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0oder\u00a0Mitochondriale Vererbung\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "GARD": "10892", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Blepharophimose-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom, Typ Maat-Kievit-Brunner", "sub_name": "Blepharophimose-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom Typ MKB", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene, X-chromosomale syndromale St\u00f6rung der intellektuellen Entwicklung, die nur Jungen betrifft und durch eine globale Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung mit wenig oder fehlender Sprache, urogenitale Anomalien (inkl. Skrotalhypoplasie, Mikropenis und Kryptorchismus), autistisches Verhalten und Gesichtsdysmorphie gekennzeichnet ist. Charakteristische Gesichtsmerkmale sind Ptosis, Blepharophimose, eine knollige Nasenspitze, ein langes Philtrum und eine Maxillarhypoplasie mit vollen Wangen. Weitere variable Merkmale sind Mikrozephalie, Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, Zahnanomalien und hyperextensible Gelenke.", "synonyms": "BMRS vom Typ Maat-Kievit-Brunner, BMRS, MKB-Typ, Blepharophimose-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom, Typ Maat-Kievit-Brunner, Ohdo-Syndrom, X-chromosomales, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "300895"}, {"name": "Blepharophimose-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom Typ MKB", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene, X-chromosomale syndromale St\u00f6rung der intellektuellen Entwicklung, die nur Jungen betrifft und durch eine globale Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung mit wenig oder fehlender Sprache, urogenitale Anomalien (inkl. Skrotalhypoplasie, Mikropenis und Kryptorchismus), autistisches Verhalten und Gesichtsdysmorphie gekennzeichnet ist. Charakteristische Gesichtsmerkmale sind Ptosis, Blepharophimose, eine knollige Nasenspitze, ein langes Philtrum und eine Maxillarhypoplasie mit vollen Wangen. Weitere variable Merkmale sind Mikrozephalie, Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, Zahnanomalien und hyperextensible Gelenke.", "synonyms": "BMRS vom Typ Maat-Kievit-Brunner, BMRS, MKB-Typ, Blepharophimose-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom, Typ Maat-Kievit-Brunner, Ohdo-Syndrom, X-chromosomales, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "300895"}, {"name": "Blepharophimose-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom Typ Ohdo", "sub_name": "Ohdo-Blepharophimose-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "BMRS Typ Ohdo, Blepharophimose-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom Typ Ohdo, Blepharophimose-Syndrom Ohdo-Typ, Ohdo-Madokoro-Sonoda-Syndrom, Ohdo-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "249620", "UMLS": "C0796094\u00a0 C2931643", "GARD": "3348", "summary": "Das Ohdo-Blepharophimose-Syndrom (OBS) ist ein Syndrom mit multiplen kongenitalen Anomalien und gekennzeichnet durch Blepharophimose, Ptose, hypoplastische Z\u00e4hne, H\u00f6rst\u00f6rungen und geistige Behinderung. Bisher wurden weltweit weniger als 30 Patienten beschrieben. Bei einigen Patienten wurden abnorme Ohren, Mikrozephalie und retardiertes Wachstum beschrieben. Bei m\u00e4nnlichen Patienten sind Kryptorchismus und hypoplastisches Skrotum m\u00f6gliche Symptome. Die meisten F\u00e4lle sind sporadisch, lediglich die Originalf\u00e4lle von Ohdo waren zwei betroffene Schwestern mit einem Kusin ersten Grades, was mit autosomal-rezessiver Vererbung vereinbar ist. Vermutet wurden auch autosomal- dominante, X-chromosomale und mitochondriale Vererbung. "}, {"name": "Blepharophimose-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom Typ SBBYS", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch kongenitale Hypothyreose, faziale Dysmorphien (Mikrozephalie, Blepharophimose, kolbige Nase, d\u00fcnne Lippen, tiefsitzende Ohren, Mikrogenie), postaxiale Polydaktylie und schwere geistige Behinderung. Weniger als 20 F\u00e4lle wurden bisher beschrieben. M\u00e4nnliche Patienten haben einen Kryptorchismus. Einige Patienten haben Herzfehler (Ventrikelseptumdefekt), Hypotonie und Wachstumsverz\u00f6gerung. Vermutet wurde autosomal-rezessive Vererbung. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, multiple congenital anomalies syndrome characterized by the association of a typical facial phenotype with microcephaly associated with congenital hypothyroidism, skeletal involvement (polydactyly, long thumb(s) and long first toe(s), and patellar hypoplasia/agenesis), and some degree of global developmental delay, hypotonia and intellectual disability. Facial features include an immobile mask-like face, severe blepharophimosis and ptosis, tear duct abnormalities, a broad nasal bridge, bulbous nasal tip, small mouth, thin upper lip, hypoplastic teeth and small, low set ears. Renal and genital anomalies, usually cryptorchidism, are often present in affected males. Congenital heart defects and growth delay are variably present.", "synonyms": "Hypothyroidism-dysmorphism-postaxial polydactyly-intellectual disability syndrome, SBBYS variant of Ohdo syndrome, SBBYSS, Say-Barber-Biesecker-Young-Simpson syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "603736", "umls": "C1863557", "epidemiology": "Although the prevalence of the disorder is unknown, it is thought to be less than 1/1,000,000. To date, 122 individuals with molecularly diagnosed blepharophimosis-intellectual disability syndrome, SBBYS type (SBBYS), have been reported.", "clinical_description": "Clinical diagnosis is typically based on the striking facial gestalt associated with microcephaly. Skeletal anomalies include long thumbs and great toes, patellar hypoplasia/agenesis, polydactyly (both pre and postaxial), camptodactyly, clinodactyly, brachydactyly, syndactyly, club feet , flexion contractures of the knees and/or hips, and anomalies of the spine, and/or ribs. Individuals generally have developmental delay/intellectual disability, which can be mild. Language disorder, autism spectrum features, anxiety, aggressiveness, attention problems, agenesis or hypoplasia of the corpus callosum, optic nerve hypoplasia and other brain abnormalities have also been reported. Congenital heart malformations (50% of cases), ocular anomalies and bilateral mixed hearing loss are also often present. Renal anomalies (e.g. hydronephrosis or multiple renal cysts), anal and genital anomalies including cryptorchidism, hypospadias, clitoromegaly and/or hypoplasia of the labia minora or majora, are reported in more than 40% of cases. In a minority of cases, thyroid agenesis/hypoplasia, hypothyroidism, intestinal malrotation, dental anomalies, feeding and respiratory difficulties, gastroesophageal reflux, poor growth, short stature, cleft palate, and Pierre Robin sequence are observed. SBBYS is allelic with genitopatellar syndrome and an intermediate phenotype has been described; thus, the disorder may present as part of a spectrum.", "etiology": "The syndrome is caused by heterozygous variants in KAT6B (10q22) encoding a highly conserved acetyltransferase that is part of the MYST family, and regulates the expression of multiple genes.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical examination, brain imaging and molecular studies (specific gene testing if the specific clinical suspicion has been raised, otherwise broader genomic tests).", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis include other genetic syndromes that associates intellectual disability with one or more of the key features of this disorder.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Polyhydramnios, increased nuchal translucency and/or cystic hygroma, renal anomalies can be observed during pregnancy but are non-specific. Genetic diagnosis can be proposed to families in which the pathogenic variant has already been identified in an affected relative.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal dominant. Most of the cases described are de novo, so the empirical risk of recurrence is low, 1-2%. Three families have been described in which the pathogenic variant has been inherited from a parent with a mild phenotype. The recurrence risk in these cases is 50%. To date, no cases of germinal mosaicism have been reported but this cannot be excluded.", "management_and_treatment": "Management requires a lifelong multidisciplinary approach with specific regular follow-up based on the patient's clinical manifestations (pediatric, neuropsychiatric, cardiological, ophthalmological, audiometric, orpthopedic, and genetic examinations). Occupational, physical, speech (in particular non-verbal methods of communication), feeding and educational therapies must be tailored to the patient's needs. Bowel malrotation is a potentially dangerous medical complication. Particular attention should be paid to monitoring feeding and growth, as feeding problems tend to occur early.", "prognosis": "Whilst there is limited data regarding life expectancy, adult patients are reported and there are no known reasons to suspect reduced life expectancy. Autonomy depends on the degree of involvement and the severity of the psychomotor developmental delay."}, {"name": "Blepharophimose-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom, Typ SBBYS/genitopatellares \u00dcberlappungs-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Blepharophimose- Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom Typ V", "sub_name": "Blepharophimose- Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom, Typ Verloes", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Blepharophimosis-intellectual disability syndrome, Verloes type is a rare, genetic multiple congenital anomalies/dysmorphic syndrome characterized by congenital microcephaly, severe epilepsy with hypsarrhythmia, adducted thumbs, abnormal genitalia, and normal thyroid function. Hypotonia, moderate to severe psychomotor delay, and characteristic facial dysmorphism (including round face with prominent cheeks, blepharophimosis, large, bulbous nose with wide alae nasi, posteriorly rotated ears with dysplastic conchae, narrow mouth, cleft palate, and mild micrognathia) are additional characteristic features.", "synonyms": "BMRS type V, BMRS, Verloes type, Blepharophimosis-intellectual disability syndrome type V, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "604314", "umls": "C1858538"}, {"name": "Blepharophimose- Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom, Typ Verloes", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Blepharophimosis-intellectual disability syndrome, Verloes type is a rare, genetic multiple congenital anomalies/dysmorphic syndrome characterized by congenital microcephaly, severe epilepsy with hypsarrhythmia, adducted thumbs, abnormal genitalia, and normal thyroid function. Hypotonia, moderate to severe psychomotor delay, and characteristic facial dysmorphism (including round face with prominent cheeks, blepharophimosis, large, bulbous nose with wide alae nasi, posteriorly rotated ears with dysplastic conchae, narrow mouth, cleft palate, and mild micrognathia) are additional characteristic features.", "synonyms": "BMRS type V, BMRS, Verloes type, Blepharophimosis-intellectual disability syndrome type V, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "604314", "umls": "C1858538"}, {"name": "Blepharophimose-Ptosis-Epicanthus inversus-Syndrom mit vorzeitiger Ovarialinsuffizienz", "sub_name": "Blepharophimose-Ptosis-Epicanthus inversus-Syndrom Typ 1", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "BPES Typ 1, Blepharophimose-Ptosis-Epicanthus inversus-Syndrom mit vorzeitiger Ovarialinsuffizienz, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich", "OMIM": "110100", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Blepharophimose-Epicanthus inversus-Ptosis-Syndrom"}, {"name": "Blepharophimose-Ptosis-Epicanthus inversus-Syndrom ohne vorzeitige Ovarialinsuffizienz", "sub_name": "Blepharophimose-Ptosis-Epicanthus inversus-Syndrom Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "BPES Typ 2, Blepharophimose-Ptosis-Epicanthus inversus-Syndrom ohne vorzeitige Ovarialinsuffizienz, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich", "OMIM": "110100", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Blepharophimose-Epicanthus inversus-Ptosis-Syndrom"}, {"name": "Blepharophimose-Ptosis-Epicanthus inversus-Syndrom Typ 1", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "BPES Typ 1, Blepharophimose-Ptosis-Epicanthus inversus-Syndrom mit vorzeitiger Ovarialinsuffizienz, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich", "OMIM": "110100", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Blepharophimose-Epicanthus inversus-Ptosis-Syndrom"}, {"name": "Blepharophimose-Ptosis-Epicanthus inversus-Syndrom Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "BPES Typ 2, Blepharophimose-Ptosis-Epicanthus inversus-Syndrom ohne vorzeitige Ovarialinsuffizienz, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich", "OMIM": "110100", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Blepharophimose-Epicanthus inversus-Ptosis-Syndrom"}, {"name": "Blepharophimose-Ptosis-Esotropie-Syndaktylie-Kleinwuchs-Syndrom", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch gemeinsames Auftreten von Blepharophimose, Ptose, V-Esotropie, Schw\u00e4che der Augen- und Stirnmuskeln, Syndaktylie der Zehen, Kleinwuchs, Progenie, Hypertrophie der Augenbrauen und Synophris. Es wurde bei 6 Personen aus 3 verwandten miteinander verwandten Familien beschrieben. Das Syndrom wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare syndrome characterised by the association of blepharophimosis and ptosis, V-esotropia, and weakness of extraocular and frontal muscles with syndactyly of the toes, short stature, prognathism, and hypertrophy and fusion of the eyebrows.", "synonyms": "Frydman-Cohen-Karmon syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "210745", "umls": "C1859432", "gard": "905"}, {"name": "Blepharophimose-Syndrom Ohdo-Typ", "sub_name": "Ohdo-Blepharophimose-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "BMRS Typ Ohdo, Blepharophimose-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom Typ Ohdo, Blepharophimose-Syndrom Ohdo-Typ, Ohdo-Madokoro-Sonoda-Syndrom, Ohdo-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "249620", "UMLS": "C0796094\u00a0 C2931643", "GARD": "3348", "summary": "Das Ohdo-Blepharophimose-Syndrom (OBS) ist ein Syndrom mit multiplen kongenitalen Anomalien und gekennzeichnet durch Blepharophimose, Ptose, hypoplastische Z\u00e4hne, H\u00f6rst\u00f6rungen und geistige Behinderung. Bisher wurden weltweit weniger als 30 Patienten beschrieben. Bei einigen Patienten wurden abnorme Ohren, Mikrozephalie und retardiertes Wachstum beschrieben. Bei m\u00e4nnlichen Patienten sind Kryptorchismus und hypoplastisches Skrotum m\u00f6gliche Symptome. Die meisten F\u00e4lle sind sporadisch, lediglich die Originalf\u00e4lle von Ohdo waren zwei betroffene Schwestern mit einem Kusin ersten Grades, was mit autosomal-rezessiver Vererbung vereinbar ist. Vermutet wurden auch autosomal- dominante, X-chromosomale und mitochondriale Vererbung. "}, {"name": "Blepharophimose-Telekanthus-Mikrostomie-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Flaches Gesicht-Mikrostomie-Ohranomalie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Flat face-microstomia-ear anomaly syndrome is a rare, genetic, multiple congenital anomalies/dysmorphic syndrome characterized by dysmorphic facial features, including high forehead, elongated and flattened midface, arched and sparse eyebrows, short palpebral fissures, telecanthus, long nose with hypoplastic nostrils, long philtrum, high and narrow palate and microstomia with downturned corners. Ears are characteristically malformed, large, low-set and posteriorly rotated and nasal speech is associated. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1994.", "synonyms": "Blepharophimosis-telecanthus-microstomia syndrome, Simosa craniofacial syndrome, Simosa-Penchaszadeh-Bustos syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.0", "omim": "182150", "umls": "C1866962", "gard": "4873"}, {"name": "Blepharoptose - Myopie - Linsenektopie", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch beidseitige angeborene Blepharoptose, Linsenluxation und hochgradige Myopie. Es wurde in 1 Familie bei einer Mutter und ihren beiden T\u00f6chtern beschrieben. Wahrscheinlich wird das Syndrom autosomal-dominant vererbt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, lens position anomaly disease characterized by bilateral congenital blepharoptosis, ectopia lentis and high grade myopia. Additional reported manifestations include abnormally long eye globes and signs of levator aponeurosis disinsertion. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1982.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q15.8", "omim": "110150", "umls": "C1862259", "mesh": "C536236", "gard": "912"}, {"name": "Blepharospasmus-oromandibul\u00e4re Dystonie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A focal dystonia involving symmetrical benign essential blepharospasm (BEB) and oromandibular dystonia.", "synonyms": "Meige dystonia, Meige syndrome, ", "age_of_onset": "Elderly, Adult", "icd_10": "G24.8", "umls": "C0025183", "gard": "7008"}, {"name": "Blighia sapida (Akeepflaume), akute Vergiftung", "sub_name": "Akee-Frucht-Vergiftung, akute", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Akute Vergiftung durch Blighia sapida, Blighia sapida (Akeepflaume), akute Vergiftung, Jamaika-Brechkrankheit, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "T62.2", "UMLS": "C0274888", "GARD": "9299", "summary": "Die akute Vergiftung mit der Akee-Frucht (auch Jamaica-vomiting-Syndrom oder -Krankheit genannt) ist verursacht durch den Verzehr unreifer Fr\u00fcchte der 'Akipflaume' Blighia sapida, einer Verwandten der Litschi. Es ist eine schwerwiegende Vergiftung und kommt in einigen L\u00e4ndern der Karibik und West-Afrikas h\u00e4ufig vor. In Frankreich und anderen L\u00e4ndern Westeuropas ist diese Vergiftung dagegen selten. Durch die Vergiftung kommt es zu einer Hypoglyk\u00e4mie und zu einer Hemmung der Glukoneogenese. Verursacher der Hypoglyk\u00e4mie ist Hypoglycin A, das im Arillus (e\u00dfbare Fruchth\u00fclle) gefunden wird. Die klinischen Symptome sind schwer (Koma, Konvulsionen, Delir, toxische Hepatitis, akute Dehydratation, Schock) und k\u00f6nnen zum Tod f\u00fchren. Die Behandlung ist symptomatisch (intraven\u00f6se oder orale Gabe von Glukose). Obwohl die Vergiftung im allgemeinen gutartig ist oder einen g\u00fcnstigen Verlauf nimmt, sind durch Aufnahme gro\u00dfer Mengen der unreifen Frucht doch auch t\u00f6dliche Verl\u00e4ufe m\u00f6glich. Im Jahr 1998 wurden 29 Todesf\u00e4lle registriert, 2001 mehr als 50. "}, {"name": "Blindheit, episkopische", "sub_name": "Norrie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des ND bei Geburt ist nicht bekannt, beschrieben wurden weltweit bisher mehr als 400 Patienten. Ethnische Unterschiede wurden nicht gefunden. Die Patienten sind nahezu immer m\u00e4nnlich.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare developmental defect during embryogenesis characterized by abnormal retinal development with congenital blindness. Common associated manifestations include sensorineural hearing loss and developmental delay, intellectual disability and/or behavioral disorders.", "synonyms": "Atrophia bulborum hereditaria, Episkopi blindness, Norrie-Warburg disease, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "H35.5", "omim": "310600", "umls": "C0266526", "mesh": "C537849", "gard": "7224", "meddra": "10069760", "epidemiology": "To date, more than 400 cases have been described. Affected patients are almost always male.", "clinical_description": "The ocular findings in affected males are usually bilateral and symmetrical. The iris, anterior chamber and cornea may be normal at birth but greyish-yellow elevated masses (pseudogliomas) are often observed behind the lens along with retinal vascular dysgenesis and leukocoria. Partial or complete retinal detachment develops within the first few weeks or months of life. In infancy and childhood, patients may develop cataracts, nystagmus, anterior/posterior synechiae, band keratopathy and a shallow anterior chamber with increased intraocular pressure. Phthisis bulbi is found later on, along with opacified corneas and sunken orbits. Vision varies from light perception to congenital complete blindness. Most affected males develop progressive asymmetrical sensorineural hearing loss starting in childhood (median age of onset is 12 years). Hearing loss may be severe and bilateral by mid-adulthood. Developmental delay and intellectual disability are found in about 20-30% of patients. Some have cognitive and psychosocial behavioral disorders, including psychosis. Other associated manifestations are highly variable and may include growth failure, microphthalmia, varied chronic seizure disorders, peripheral vascular disease (peripheral ulcers) and erectile dysfunction. Very rare cases of carrier females with retinal findings, such as retinal detachment, abnormal retinal vasculature with associated vision loss or mild sensorineural hearing loss, have been reported.", "etiology": "Norrie disease is caused by mutations in the NDP gene (Xp11.4-p11.3), encoding the norrin cystine knot growth factor NDP which is involved in the vascular development of the eye and ear. A large number of disease-causing mutations have been identified.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on the characteristic clinical ocular findings and can be confirmed by molecular genetic testing of NDP. No biochemical or functional assays are available. A causative mutation in the NDP gene is recovered in around 85% of male probands. If negative, search for a rearrangement should be conducted.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes retinoblastoma in cases with unilateral pseudoglioma, and other disorders related to NDP mutations such as retinopathy of prematurity, persistent hyperplastic primary vitreous, and familial exudative vitreoretinopathy.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal testing for at-risk pregnancies is possible if the disease-causing mutation has been identified in the family. In rare cases, particularly where there is a family history, ocular abnormalities have been detected on ultrasonography in the third trimester.", "genetic_counseling": "Norrie disease is inherited in an X-linked manner. Rare de novo mutations have been reported. Genetic counseling should be offered to affected families. Where a female carries the mutation, there will be a 50% risk that male offspring will inherit the disease, and a 50% risk that female offspring will be carriers. Where a male is affected, male offspring are unaffected whereas female offspring are obligate carriers", "management_and_treatment": "Many patients have complete retinal detachment at birth making treatment for preservation of sight difficult. Those that do not have complete retinal detachment may benefit from surgery or laser therapy. Enucleation of the eye may be required in rare cases. Hearing aids should be provided to correct hearing loss and cochlear implantation can be considered. Supportive therapy should be provided for behavioral disorders.", "prognosis": "Overall health is generally good in patients with ND. Life expectancy may however be reduced due to general risks associated with the disabling manifestations of the disease."}, {"name": "Blindheit-Skoliose-Arachnodaktylie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "This syndrome associates progressive visual loss with scoliosis or kyphoscoliosis and arachnodactyly of the fingers and toes.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent", "omim": "612445", "umls": "C2676234", "epidemiology": "The syndrome has been described in four patients (three males and one female) from the same family.", "clinical_description": "The male patients presented with the complete phenotype while the female patient suffered only from blindness.", "etiology": "No mutations were found in the FBN1, TGFBR1 and TGFBR2 genes which are associated with other syndromes presenting similar clinical findings (i.e. Marfan syndrome; see this term).", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission seems autosomal dominant."}, {"name": "Bloch-Siemens-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Incontinentia pigmenti", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei der Geburt betr\u00e4gt etwa 1/ 143.000. Das Geschlechtsverh\u00e4ltnis w:m betr\u00e4gt 20:1.", "english": 1, "defenition": "An X-linked syndromic muti-systemic ectodermal dysplasia presenting neonatally in females with a bullous rash along Blaschko's lines (BL) followed by verrucous plaques and hyperpigmented swirling patterns. It is further characterized by teeth abnormalities, alopecia, nail dystrophy and can affect the retinal and the central nervous system (CNS) microvasculature. It may have other aspects of ectodermal dysplasia such as sweat gland abnormalities. Germline pathogenic variants in males result in embryonic lethality.", "synonyms": "Bloch-Siemens syndrome, Bloch-Sulzberger syndrome, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-linked dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q82.3", "omim": "308300", "umls": "C0021171\u00a0 C0022283\u00a0 C2930820", "mesh": "D007184", "gard": "6778", "epidemiology": "The birth prevalence is approximately 1/ 143,000. The female to male ratio is 20:1.", "clinical_description": "The disorder cutaneous findings typically present perinatally with an erythematous vesicular rash (bullous stage I) following BL: linear on extremities, swirled on trunk and head. Classically, Stage I evolves to a verrucous stage II characterized by wart-like plaques then to Stage III hyperpigmentation along BL that can persist to adulthood. This evolution varies and some adults report persistence of Stages I and II, usually with febrile illness, well into adulthood. These three stages are not sequential, as stage I rash can recur during febrile illness. The so-called Stage IV findings have hypopigmented, hairless regions following BL mostly evident on the lower extremities; however, it is possible that these areas of skin dysplasia may be present from an earlier age, but not visible until the growth of adult body hair. About 50% of IP symptoms are extracutaneous. Delayed dentition, missing, and/or malformed cone shaped teeth occur in most cases. Other manifestations include onycodystrophy, alopecia and a wide range of ophthalmologic abnormalities from primary microphthalmia, to reactive retinal neovascularization (RNV) conferring risk of retinal detachment. CNS abnormalities may comprise microcephaly and neonatal stroke that can result in seizures, neurocognitive and motor impairments. The majority (>60%) of patients are neurologically normal.", "etiology": "IP is caused by familial (10-25%) or sporadic de novo (>50%) mutations of the NF-kappaB essential modulator gene IKBKG (formerly NEMO). In females, a common exon 4-10 deletion underlies 65% of cases, 8.6% have a sequence variant, and about 4% have a gene deletion.", "diagnostic_methods": "Typical skin lesions and genetic testing are sufficient for diagnosis. Leukocytosis and eosinophilia may be noted. Skin histology shows eosinophilic spongisostic bulles (stage I); hyperkeratotic and acanthotic epidermis with dyskeratotic keratinocytes (stage II) and loose dermal melanine deposits (stage III).", "differential_diagnosis": "Stage I may be misdiagnosed as bullous impetigo, inherited epidermolysis bullosa, herpes, or varicella. Differential diagnosis of stage II includes warts, molluscum contagiosum, and epidermal nevus syndrome. Any condition with 'linear and swirled' pigmentation overlaps with stage III. Stage IV resembles scarring, vitiligo, or other hypopigmentations with localized alopecia. Note that chromosomal mosaicism can manifest swirled and linear pigmentation abnormalities in both males and females. Additional reported differential diagnoses are Naegeli-Franceschetti-Jadassohn syndrome and Norrie's disease.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Fertility is normal except for the miscarriage of affected males. Genetic prenatal diagnosis is available.", "genetic_counseling": "IP is inherited X-linked dominantly. An affected woman has a 50% risk of having affected children. Live-born affected males should be checked for a 47,XXY karyotype.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment is symptomatic, including standard management of blisters (not opening them and avoidance of trauma), topical treatment (medication, oatmeal baths) and addressing infections (as in cellulitis). Dental abnormalities should be managed by a pedodontist in combination with speech therapy and a pediatric nutritional program as needed. Appropriate specialists are required for RNV monitoring and treatment (cryotherapy and laser photocoagulation) and regular procedures should be followed if retinal detachment occurs. Early retinal angiograms may be indicated. Neurological involvement necessitates a pediatric neurologist, whereas developmental screening and additional complementary therapy may be recommended in cases with developmental delay.", "prognosis": "Life expectancy is normal. Those without neonatal CNS abnormalities typically have normal physical and cognitive development."}, {"name": "Bloch-Sulzberger-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Incontinentia pigmenti", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei der Geburt betr\u00e4gt etwa 1/ 143.000. Das Geschlechtsverh\u00e4ltnis w:m betr\u00e4gt 20:1.", "english": 1, "defenition": "An X-linked syndromic muti-systemic ectodermal dysplasia presenting neonatally in females with a bullous rash along Blaschko's lines (BL) followed by verrucous plaques and hyperpigmented swirling patterns. It is further characterized by teeth abnormalities, alopecia, nail dystrophy and can affect the retinal and the central nervous system (CNS) microvasculature. It may have other aspects of ectodermal dysplasia such as sweat gland abnormalities. Germline pathogenic variants in males result in embryonic lethality.", "synonyms": "Bloch-Siemens syndrome, Bloch-Sulzberger syndrome, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-linked dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q82.3", "omim": "308300", "umls": "C0021171\u00a0 C0022283\u00a0 C2930820", "mesh": "D007184", "gard": "6778", "epidemiology": "The birth prevalence is approximately 1/ 143,000. The female to male ratio is 20:1.", "clinical_description": "The disorder cutaneous findings typically present perinatally with an erythematous vesicular rash (bullous stage I) following BL: linear on extremities, swirled on trunk and head. Classically, Stage I evolves to a verrucous stage II characterized by wart-like plaques then to Stage III hyperpigmentation along BL that can persist to adulthood. This evolution varies and some adults report persistence of Stages I and II, usually with febrile illness, well into adulthood. These three stages are not sequential, as stage I rash can recur during febrile illness. The so-called Stage IV findings have hypopigmented, hairless regions following BL mostly evident on the lower extremities; however, it is possible that these areas of skin dysplasia may be present from an earlier age, but not visible until the growth of adult body hair. About 50% of IP symptoms are extracutaneous. Delayed dentition, missing, and/or malformed cone shaped teeth occur in most cases. Other manifestations include onycodystrophy, alopecia and a wide range of ophthalmologic abnormalities from primary microphthalmia, to reactive retinal neovascularization (RNV) conferring risk of retinal detachment. CNS abnormalities may comprise microcephaly and neonatal stroke that can result in seizures, neurocognitive and motor impairments. The majority (>60%) of patients are neurologically normal.", "etiology": "IP is caused by familial (10-25%) or sporadic de novo (>50%) mutations of the NF-kappaB essential modulator gene IKBKG (formerly NEMO). In females, a common exon 4-10 deletion underlies 65% of cases, 8.6% have a sequence variant, and about 4% have a gene deletion.", "diagnostic_methods": "Typical skin lesions and genetic testing are sufficient for diagnosis. Leukocytosis and eosinophilia may be noted. Skin histology shows eosinophilic spongisostic bulles (stage I); hyperkeratotic and acanthotic epidermis with dyskeratotic keratinocytes (stage II) and loose dermal melanine deposits (stage III).", "differential_diagnosis": "Stage I may be misdiagnosed as bullous impetigo, inherited epidermolysis bullosa, herpes, or varicella. Differential diagnosis of stage II includes warts, molluscum contagiosum, and epidermal nevus syndrome. Any condition with 'linear and swirled' pigmentation overlaps with stage III. Stage IV resembles scarring, vitiligo, or other hypopigmentations with localized alopecia. Note that chromosomal mosaicism can manifest swirled and linear pigmentation abnormalities in both males and females. Additional reported differential diagnoses are Naegeli-Franceschetti-Jadassohn syndrome and Norrie's disease.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Fertility is normal except for the miscarriage of affected males. Genetic prenatal diagnosis is available.", "genetic_counseling": "IP is inherited X-linked dominantly. An affected woman has a 50% risk of having affected children. Live-born affected males should be checked for a 47,XXY karyotype.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment is symptomatic, including standard management of blisters (not opening them and avoidance of trauma), topical treatment (medication, oatmeal baths) and addressing infections (as in cellulitis). Dental abnormalities should be managed by a pedodontist in combination with speech therapy and a pediatric nutritional program as needed. Appropriate specialists are required for RNV monitoring and treatment (cryotherapy and laser photocoagulation) and regular procedures should be followed if retinal detachment occurs. Early retinal angiograms may be indicated. Neurological involvement necessitates a pediatric neurologist, whereas developmental screening and additional complementary therapy may be recommended in cases with developmental delay.", "prognosis": "Life expectancy is normal. Those without neonatal CNS abnormalities typically have normal physical and cognitive development."}, {"name": "Blomstrand letale Chondrodysplasie", "sub_name": "Chondrodysplasie Typ Blomstrand", "german_description": "Die letale Chondrodysplasie Typ Blomstrand (BLC) ist eine autosomal-rezessiv vererbte Krankheit mit fr\u00fcher Letalit\u00e4t und akzelerierter Knochenreifung und Knorpeldifferenzierung. Kinder mit BLC werden im typischen Fall pr\u00e4matur geboren und sterben kurz nach der Geburt. Sie manifestieren ein schweres Fehlbildungssyndrom mit extrem verk\u00fcrzten Gliedma\u00dfen. Die BLC wird rezessiv vererbt und ist assoziiert mit inaktivierenden Mutationen im PTHR1-Gen, das f\u00fcr den PTH/PTHrP-Rezeptor kodiert. R\u00f6ntgenologisch zeigt das gesamte Skelett eine erh\u00f6hte Knochendichte und eine stark vorangeschrittene Ossifikation. Die Diagnose kann mit transvaginalem Ultraschall schon in der 12.-13. Schwangerschaftswoche gestellt werden. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Blomstrand lethal chondrodysplasia (BLC) is a neonatal osteosclerotic dysplasia (see this term) characterized by advanced endochondral bone maturation, very short limbs, dwarfism and prenatal lethality.", "synonyms": "BLC, BOCD, Blomstrand chondrodysplasia, Blomstrand osteochondrodysplasia, Chondrodysplasia, Blomstrand type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q78.8", "omim": "215045", "umls": "C1859148", "mesh": "C537914", "gard": "914", "epidemiology": "To date, less than 10 cases have been described in the literature.", "clinical_description": "BLC is a congenital disorder characterized by a low birth weight, facial dysmorphism (widely spaced and protruding eyes (which typically show cataract), depressed nasal bridge, short columella, long philtrum, macroglossia, protruding tongue, severe micrognathia), short trunk, narrow thorax and severe rhizo-meso-acromelic shortness of the limbs. Other anomalies also observed include tooth and mammary gland development defects, hypoplastic lungs, aorta coarctation (see this term), and bowel malrotation. Two forms of BCL, have been described: type I which is the severe, classical form and type II which has less severe features (such as absence of short trunk or, severely shortened arms but moderately shortened legs).", "etiology": "BLC is caused by inactivating homozygous or compound heterozygous mutations in PTH1R (3p22-p21.1) which encodes the parathyroid hormone (PTH)/parathyroid-hormone-related peptide (PTHrP) receptor (PTH1R). These mutations result in the decrease in binding or response to PTH and PTHrP.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on the clinical and radiological characteristics which show generalized increase in bone density with advanced ossification, severe shortness of the long bones with wide metaphyses and club-shaped distal ends, long narrow thorax, calcified hyoid bone and laryngeal cartilage and underdeveloped viscerocranium. Histopathological examination shows an important acceleration of the endochondral ossification in tubular bones, narrow cartilages of the epiphyses and large epiphyseal ossification centers. Diagnosis is confirmed by the genetic screening of PTH1R.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes primary failure of tooth eruption (see this term) and other lethal short limbed dwarfisms.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is achieved by sonographic examination showing polyhydramnios, hydrops fetalis (see this term) and a fetus with very short limbs, nuchale dema, macroglossia, a protuberant abdomen, internal anomalies and markedly advanced endochondral bone formation.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them of the 25% risk of having an affected child.", "prognosis": "Both forms of BLC are lethal either prenatally or shortly after birth."}, {"name": "Bloom-Syndrom", "german_description": "Weil die Erkrankung sehr selten ist, kann die H\u00e4ufigkeit nicht genau angegeben werden. Bei den Ashkenazi-Juden ist die H\u00e4ufigkeit als Folge eines Gr\u00fcndereffektes auf 1/48.000 erh\u00f6ht.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Bloom syndrome is a rare disorder associated with pre- and postnatal growth deficiency, a telangiectatic erythematous rash of the face and other sun-exposed areas, insulin resistance and predisposition to early onset and recurrent cancer of multiple organ systems.", "synonyms": "BSyn, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q82.2", "omim": "210900", "umls": "C0005859", "mesh": "D001816", "gard": "915", "epidemiology": "Bloom syndrome (BSyn) overall prevalence is unknown, but in the Ashkenazi Jewish population it is estimated at approximately 1/ 48,000 births. A founder mutation, known as BLMash is present in approximately 1 in 100 persons of Ashkenazi Jewish background. There are also founder mutations in the Slavic and Hispanic populations.", "clinical_description": "Individuals with BSyn show proportionate growth deficiency of prenatal onset (average birth weight 1757 g) and continuing throughout life (average adult height of 149 cm for men and 138 cm for women). Dolichocephaly, narrow face, prominent nose and ears, and malar and mandibular hypoplasia can be observed. Subcutaneous adipose tissue is sparse. Telangiectatic erythema appears during the first 1-2 years of life on the face (in particular the cheek), dorsum of the hands and other sun-exposed areas. Caf\u00e9-au-lait macules and hypopigmented skin lesions are common. Children with BSyn characteristically feed slowly, have a decreased appetite and eat a limited variety of foods. Despite nutritional interventions, weight gain is modest and children are rarely in the normal range for growth. One major feature of Bsyn is a greatly increased predisposition to cancers in a distribution corresponding to the general population but occurring at a much younger age. Survivors of a first cancer may have multiple cancers in their lifetime. Most men with BSyn have azoospermia or severe oligospermia, while women are often fertile but may begin menopause prematurely.", "etiology": "Bloom syndrome is inherited as an autosomal recessive trait. The BLM gene codes for a RecQ helicase that forms a complex with two other proteins, DNA topoisomerase III\u03b1 and RMI.BLM heterozygotes are healthy and without any clinical features of the disorder.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis of BSyn is suspected clinically by identification of characteristic features and is confirmed by identification of biallelic pathogenic variants of the BLM gene on molecular genetic testing.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnosis of Bloom syndrome includes Fanconi anemia, Silver-Russell syndrome, Rothmund-Thomson syndrome, ataxia-telangiectasia, and Nijmegen breakage syndrome. Three other disorders also may be of interest in a differential diagnosis. RECQ-mediated genome instability 1, RECQ-mediated genome instability 2, Microcephaly, growth restriction, & increased sister-chromatid exchange 2.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis of at-risk pregnancies is possible by cytogenetic (SCE) or molecular genetic testing (BLM sequencing and deletion/duplication) of fetal cells obtained by amniocentesis or chorionic villus sampling. Molecular genetic testing is preferred.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Management is symptomatic. Increased calorie density formulas and foods may promote weight gain and increased growth. Although growth hormone treatment may improve linear growth, many clinicians caution against its use because of reports of early onset of cancer in some treated children. Standard antibiotic regimens are used to treat infections. If the serum levels of immunoglobulins are low and the patient is experiencing repeated infections, some have been treated with intravenous or subcutaneous immunoglobulins. Skin protection, including covering exposed skin and use of a broad-spectrum sunscreen with at least 30 SPF is crucial to reduce the sun-sensitive skin rash. Health supervision recommendations for persons with Bloom syndrome have been published, including recommendations for cancer surveillance. Due to hypersensitivity of patients to chemotherapy, reduced dosage and/or duration of therapy is recommended, usually beginning with 50% of the weight-based dosage. Caution should be exercised with use of ionizing radiation or alkylating agents, particularly busulfan, cyclophosphamide or melphalan.", "prognosis": "The high occurrence of cancer reduces life expectancy. The median overall life expectancy is approximately 30 years, with cancer and related complications as the leading cause of death."}, {"name": "Blount-Barber-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Blount-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Blount-Barber-Syndrom, Blount-Krankheit, Osteochondrosis deformans tibiae, ", "prevalence": "Noch nicht beschrieben", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "M92.5", "OMIM": "188700\u00a0 259200", "UMLS": "C0175756", "MeSH": "C536237", "GARD": "916", "MedDRA": "10072255", "summary": "Die Blount-Krankheit ist charakterisiert durch gest\u00f6rtes Wachstum des inneren oberen Anteils der Tibia, wodurch es zunehmend zu einer bogenf\u00f6rmigen Deformierung mit einem Knick direkt unterhalb des Knies kommt (Tibia vara). In 60% der F\u00e4lle sind beide Beine betroffen. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Klinisch fallen Patienten mit Blount-Krankheit durch Verbiegung und unterschiedliche L\u00e4nge der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen und durch eine mediale Prominenz der proximalen Tibia auf. Adipositas und fr\u00fches Laufen pr\u00e4disponieren zur Erkrankung. M\u00f6gliche Ursachen werden noch kontrovers diskutiert. Es scheint sich um eine multifaktorielle Erkrankung zu handeln, deren genetischer Anteil aber unbekannt ist. Die Blount-Krankheit kann nur bei mehr als 2 Jahre alten Kindern diagnostiziert werden, da eine Tibia vara auch physiologisch vorkommt. Ohne Behandlung kann die Deformit\u00e4t schwere Ausma\u00dfe annehmen und fr\u00fch zu einer degenerativen Arthritis der Kniegelenke f\u00fchren. Die kinderorthop\u00e4dische Betreuung mu\u00df jedem Kind spezifisch angepa\u00dft sein. Sie kann mit orthop\u00e4dischen Ma\u00dfnahmen beginnen, aber in schwereren, mit Schmerzen verbundenen F\u00e4llen ist evtl. eine chirurgische Korrektur der Deformit\u00e4t indiziert. "}, {"name": "Blount-Krankheit", "sub_name": "Blount-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Blount-Barber-Syndrom, Blount-Krankheit, Osteochondrosis deformans tibiae, ", "prevalence": "Noch nicht beschrieben", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "M92.5", "OMIM": "188700\u00a0 259200", "UMLS": "C0175756", "MeSH": "C536237", "GARD": "916", "MedDRA": "10072255", "summary": "Die Blount-Krankheit ist charakterisiert durch gest\u00f6rtes Wachstum des inneren oberen Anteils der Tibia, wodurch es zunehmend zu einer bogenf\u00f6rmigen Deformierung mit einem Knick direkt unterhalb des Knies kommt (Tibia vara). In 60% der F\u00e4lle sind beide Beine betroffen. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Klinisch fallen Patienten mit Blount-Krankheit durch Verbiegung und unterschiedliche L\u00e4nge der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen und durch eine mediale Prominenz der proximalen Tibia auf. Adipositas und fr\u00fches Laufen pr\u00e4disponieren zur Erkrankung. M\u00f6gliche Ursachen werden noch kontrovers diskutiert. Es scheint sich um eine multifaktorielle Erkrankung zu handeln, deren genetischer Anteil aber unbekannt ist. Die Blount-Krankheit kann nur bei mehr als 2 Jahre alten Kindern diagnostiziert werden, da eine Tibia vara auch physiologisch vorkommt. Ohne Behandlung kann die Deformit\u00e4t schwere Ausma\u00dfe annehmen und fr\u00fch zu einer degenerativen Arthritis der Kniegelenke f\u00fchren. Die kinderorthop\u00e4dische Betreuung mu\u00df jedem Kind spezifisch angepa\u00dft sein. Sie kann mit orthop\u00e4dischen Ma\u00dfnahmen beginnen, aber in schwereren, mit Schmerzen verbundenen F\u00e4llen ist evtl. eine chirurgische Korrektur der Deformit\u00e4t indiziert. "}, {"name": "Blount-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Blount-Barber-Syndrom, Blount-Krankheit, Osteochondrosis deformans tibiae, ", "prevalence": "Noch nicht beschrieben", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "M92.5", "OMIM": "188700\u00a0 259200", "UMLS": "C0175756", "MeSH": "C536237", "GARD": "916", "MedDRA": "10072255", "summary": "Die Blount-Krankheit ist charakterisiert durch gest\u00f6rtes Wachstum des inneren oberen Anteils der Tibia, wodurch es zunehmend zu einer bogenf\u00f6rmigen Deformierung mit einem Knick direkt unterhalb des Knies kommt (Tibia vara). In 60% der F\u00e4lle sind beide Beine betroffen. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Klinisch fallen Patienten mit Blount-Krankheit durch Verbiegung und unterschiedliche L\u00e4nge der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen und durch eine mediale Prominenz der proximalen Tibia auf. Adipositas und fr\u00fches Laufen pr\u00e4disponieren zur Erkrankung. M\u00f6gliche Ursachen werden noch kontrovers diskutiert. Es scheint sich um eine multifaktorielle Erkrankung zu handeln, deren genetischer Anteil aber unbekannt ist. Die Blount-Krankheit kann nur bei mehr als 2 Jahre alten Kindern diagnostiziert werden, da eine Tibia vara auch physiologisch vorkommt. Ohne Behandlung kann die Deformit\u00e4t schwere Ausma\u00dfe annehmen und fr\u00fch zu einer degenerativen Arthritis der Kniegelenke f\u00fchren. Die kinderorthop\u00e4dische Betreuung mu\u00df jedem Kind spezifisch angepa\u00dft sein. Sie kann mit orthop\u00e4dischen Ma\u00dfnahmen beginnen, aber in schwereren, mit Schmerzen verbundenen F\u00e4llen ist evtl. eine chirurgische Korrektur der Deformit\u00e4t indiziert. "}, {"name": "BLSS", "sub_name": "Dyssynostose, kraniofaziale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die kraniofaziale Dyssynostose (CFD) ist ein seltenes kraniales Malformationssyndrom, welches durch den vorzeitigen Verschluss beider Lambdan\u00e4hte und der posterioren Sagittalnaht charakterisiert ist. Dies f\u00fchrt zu einer abnormen Sch\u00e4delform (frontale Vorw\u00f6lbung, anteriore Turrizephalie mit leichter Brachyzephalie, biparietaler Verschm\u00e4lerung, okzipitaler Konkavit\u00e4t) und fazialen Dysmorphien (tief sitzende Ohren, Mittelgesichtshypoplasie). Weiterhin wurde von Kleinw\u00fcchsigkeit, Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung, Epilepsie und okulomotorischer Dyspraxie berichtet. Assoziierte Auff\u00e4lligkeiten beinhalten eine Vergr\u00f6\u00dferung der zerebralen Ventrikel, eine Corpus Callosum-Agenesie, die sogenannte Arnold-Chiari Malformation Typ 1 (siehe dort), ven\u00f6se Anomalien des Sch\u00e4dels, sowie Hydrozephalus.", "synonyms": "BLSS, Bilaterale Lambdoid- und Sagittalsynostose, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.0", "OMIM": "218350", "UMLS": "C1857511", "MeSH": "C536455", "GARD": "1575"}, {"name": "BLS Typ 1", "sub_name": "Immundefekt durch MHC Klasse I-Expressionsdefekt", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autosomal recessive primary immunodeficiency characterized by severe reduction in the cell surface expression of HLA class I molecules, typically resulting in childhood-onset of chronic bacterial infections of the respiratory tract evolving to widespread bronchiectasis and respiratory insufficiency. Sterile necrotizing granulomatous skin lesions mainly involving the extremities and the mid-face may be observed in some patients. Severe viral infections do not occur as part of the condition. Atypical variants without respiratory or cutaneous manifestations, as well as asymptomatic individuals have been reported.", "synonyms": "Bare lymphocyte syndrome type 1, MHC class I deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "D81.6", "omim": "241600\u00a0 604571", "umls": "C1858266", "gard": "8427"}, {"name": "Blue-Diaper-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Drummond-Syndrom, Hyperkalz\u00e4mie, famili\u00e4re - Nephrokalzinose - Indikanurie, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "ICD-10": "E70.8", "OMIM": "211000", "UMLS": "C0268478", "MeSH": "C536239", "GARD": "5939", "summary": "Das Blue Diaper-Syndrom ist eine extrem seltene erbliche Stoffwechselkrankheit mit Hyperkalz\u00e4mie, Nephrokalzinose und Indikanurie. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Die betroffenen Kinder fallen durch Verdauungsst\u00f6rungen, Fieber und periodische Schreckhaftigkeit auf. Auch \u00fcber Sehst\u00f6rungen wurde berichtet. Tryptophan wird im Darm nicht resorbiert und von Darmbakterien zu Indikan verstoffwechselt. Das Indikan wird im Urin ausgeschieden und f\u00fchrt bei Kontakt mit der Luft zu dessen Blauf\u00e4rbung (Indigo). Es ist noch nicht klar, ob das Syndrom autosomal- oder X-chromosomal-rezessiv vererbt wird. Auch die molekulare Ursache des Syndroms ist unbekannt. M\u00f6gliche Ursachen k\u00f6nnten Mutationen in den Genen f\u00fcr den L-Typ-Aminos\u00e4ure-Transporter 2 (SLC7A8/LAT2, 14q11.2) oder den T-Typ-Aminos\u00e4ure-Transporter 1 (SLC16A10/TAT1, 6q21-q22) sein. "}, {"name": "Blue rubber bleb-Naevus", "german_description": "Der Blue rubber bleb-Naevus (BRBNS) ist eine seltene vaskul\u00e4re Fehlbildung mit vor allem kutanen und viszeralen L\u00e4sionen, die h\u00e4ufig zu schweren und potentiell t\u00f6dlichen Blutungen und An\u00e4mie f\u00fchren. Bisher wurden mehr als 200 F\u00e4lle beschrieben, aber die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Multifokale ven\u00f6se Fehlbildungen bestehen am h\u00e4ufigsten in der Haut und im Gastrointestinaltrakt (GIT), aber auch im Gehirn, in den Nieren, Lungen, Augen, Knochen uns anderen Organen. Beschrieben wurden auch Gerinnungsst\u00f6rungen (Verbrauchskoagulopathie, Thrombozytopenie). Die L\u00e4sionen sind in der Regel schon im Kindesalter ausgepr\u00e4gt, k\u00f6nnen sich aber auch erst im sp\u00e4teren Leben entwickeln. Sie pulsieren leicht, sind blau gef\u00e4rbt und komprimierbar. Wichtigste klinische Manifestation sind akute oder chronische Blutungen aus multiplen vaskul\u00e4ren Fehlbildungen im GIT, in der Regel im D\u00fcnndarm. Akute Blutungen werden manifest mit Bluterbrechen, Mel\u00e4na (Blutstuhl) oder rektale Blutungen. Ohne radikale Behandlung werden die Patienten mit BRBNS durch chronische Magendarmblutungen an\u00e4misch und m\u00fcssen ihr ganzes Leben mit Eisen und Bluttransfusionen behandelt werden. Eine maligne Umwandlung der L\u00e4sionen wurde bisher nicht beschrieben. Seltene Komplikationen der gastrointestinalen Malformationen sind Volvulus, Intussuszeption und Darminfarkt. Die Ursache des Syndroms ist nicht bekannt. Die meisten F\u00e4lle erscheinen isoliert, aber mehrere Familien mit autosomal-dominanter Vererbung wurden beschrieben. Mutationen im TEK/TIE2-Gen (9p21), das f\u00fcr eine endotheliale Rezeptor-Tyrosinkinase kodiert, sind wahrscheinlich f\u00fcr die famili\u00e4ren F\u00e4lle verantwortlich. Methoden zur Diagnose des BRBNS sind H\u00e4matologie, Endoskkopie, Ultraschall, CT, MRI und Histopathologie. Differentialdiagnosen sind: Gef\u00e4\u00dftumoren, entweder benigne (H\u00e4mangiome) oder maligne (Kaposi-Sarkom, Angiosarkom); Gef\u00e4\u00dfanomalien bei angeborenen oder systemischen Erkrankungen (Klippel-Trenaunay-Weber, Ehlers-Danlos, die CREST-Variante der Sklerodermie, Osler-Weber-Rendu-Syndrom) und erworbene oder sporadische L\u00e4sionen (Angiodysplasien, vaskul\u00e4re Ektasie des Antrum pyloricum, strahleninduzierte vaskul\u00e4re Ektasie und Dieulafoy-L\u00e4sionen (sh. diese Termini). Naevi der Haut bluten in der Regel nicht: Chirurgische Resektion, Sklerotherapie oder Embolisation ergeben gute kosmetische Resultate. Wenn keine massiven gastrointestinalen Blutungen auftreten, ist eine konservative Behandlung mit Eisengaben und/oder Bluttransfusionen ausreichend. Wenig wirksam sind Kortikosteroide, anti-fibrinolytische Agentien, hochdosierte intraven\u00f6se Gaben von Gammaglobulin und Interferon-alpha. Langzeitbehandlung mit dem Somatostatin-Analogon Octreotid reduziert den Blutverlust aus den Naevi und anderen vaskul\u00e4ren L\u00e4sionen des Magendarmtraktes. Intraoperative Enteroskopie ist die sicherste diagnostische und/oder therapeutische Methode mit endoskopischer Koagulation oder vollst\u00e4ndiger chirurgischer Keilekzision. Es wird empfohlen, die Indikation f\u00fcr einen operativen Eingriff mit drahtloser Kapsel-Endoskopie abzukl\u00e4ren. Diese Methode kann auch f\u00fcr die Kontrolle des Therapieeffektes n\u00fctzlich sein.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare vascular malformation disorder with cutaneous and visceral lesions frequently associated with serious, potentially fatal bleeding and anemia.", "synonyms": "BRBN, Bean syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q27.8", "omim": "112200", "umls": "C0346072", "mesh": "C536240", "gard": "5940", "epidemiology": "More than 200 cases have been published so far, but prevalence is unknown.", "clinical_description": "Multifocal venous malformations most commonly involve the skin and gastrointestinal tract (GIT), but can also affect the brain, kidneys, lungs, eyes, bones and other organs. Hemostatic abnormalities due to consumption coagulopathy and thrombocythemia have also been described. The lesions are generally present in childhood but can develop later in life. They are usually blue colored and easily compressible with light palpation. The main clinical manifestation is acute or chronic bleeding from the multiple GIT vascular malformations, with the small intestine usually being involved. The acute bleeding presents as hematemesis, melena, or rectal bleeding. Unless treated radically, patients with BRBN develop anemia from chronic gastrointestinal bleeding and require lifelong treatment with iron and blood transfusions. Malignant transformation of the lesions has not been reported so far. Infrequent complications of the gastrointestinal malformations are volvulus, intussusception and intestinal infarction.", "etiology": "The cause of the syndrome is still unknown. Although most cases show no apparent hereditary pattern, autosomal dominant expression has been reported in several families. A gene mutation has been mapped to the short arm of chromosome 9 and might be involved in these familial cases.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnostic methods include: blood counts, endoscopy, ultrasound, CT, MRI, and histopathology.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include vascular tumors, either benign (hemangiomas) or malignant (Kaposi's sarcoma, angiosarcoma); vascular anomalies associated with congenital or systemic diseases (Klippel-Trenaunay-Weber, Ehlers-Danlos, the CREST variant of scleroderma, and Osler-Weber-Rendu syndrome) and acquired and sporadic lesions (angiodysplasias, gastric antral vascular ectasia, radiation-induced vascular ectasias, and Dieulafoy's lesions) (see these terms).", "management_and_treatment": "Cutaneous lesions do not usually bleed: surgery, sclerotherapy or embolization provide a good cosmetic result. In the absence of massive GIT bleeding, a conservative treatment is sufficient (iron supplementation and/or blood transfusions). Corticosteroids, antifibrinolytic agents, high-dose intravenous gamma globulin and interferon alpha are of poor effect. Long-term use of octreotide has been found to reduce blood loss from BRBN and other vascular gastrointestinal lesions. Intra-operative enteroscopy is the accepted ultimate diagnostic and/or therapeutic procedure, allowing immediate resolution of pathological findings by endoscopic coagulation or surgical full-thickness wedge excision. It is recommended to start with capsule wireless endoscopy to specify the indication for the procedure. Capsule endoscopy may also be a useful tool for monitoring the effects of therapy."}, {"name": "Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch P2Y12-ADP-Rezeptor-Defekt", "sub_name": "Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch P2Y12-Defekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der P2Y12-Defekt ist eine seltene Gerinnungsst\u00f6rung. Symptome der leichten bis mittelschweren Blutungsneigung sind leicht auftretende Hauteinblutungen ('blaue Flecken'), Schleimhautblutungen und schwere postoperative Blutungen. Der urs\u00e4chliche Defekt des Thrombozyten-Rezeptors P2Y12 st\u00f6rt selektiv die Reaktion der Thrombozyten auf Adenosin-Diphosphat (ADP).", "synonyms": "Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch P2Y12-ADP-Rezeptor-Defekt, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "D69.8", "OMIM": "609821", "UMLS": "C1853278", "GARD": "12478", "epidemiology": "Bisher wurden in der Literatur 14 Patienten beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Der P2Y12-Defekt ist eine angeborene St\u00f6rung mit leicht bis stark verl\u00e4ngerter Blutungszeit, leicht auftretenden Hauteinblutungen, Schleimhautblutungen (Nasenbluten, Magen- und Zahnfleischbluten u.a.), H\u00e4morrhagien und blutungsbedingten Komplikationen nach Trauma und leichten oder schweren operativen Eingriffen.", "etiology": "Ursache des P2Y12-Defektes sind Mutationen im P2RY12-Gen (3q24-q25) mit vorzeitigem Kettenabbruch oder Funktionsverlust des P2Y12-Rezeptors. ADP aktiviert die Pl\u00e4ttchen durch Interaktion mit den beiden G-Protein-gekoppelten Rezeptoren P2Y1 und P2Y12. Der P2Y1-Rezeptor vermittelt die Mobilisierung des ionisierten Kalziums und ist verantwortlich f\u00fcr die durch ADP ausgel\u00f6ste Formver\u00e4nderung und leichte passagere Aggregatiion der Pl\u00e4ttchen. Der P2Y12-Rezeptor steuert den Abschluss und die Verst\u00e4rkung der Antwort auf ADP und der anderen Thrombozyten-Agonisten (u.a. Thromboxane A2, Thrombin und Kollagen). Der P2Y12-Rezeptor hat deshalb eine entscheidende Rolle bei Bildung und Stabilisierung des Thrombus.", "genetic_counseling": "Der P2Y12-Mangel wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Beide Eltern der Patienten sind heterozygote Tr\u00e4ger der Anlage. Das Wiederholungsrisiko f\u00fcr weitere betroffene Kinder betr\u00e4gt 25%.", "summary": "Bisher wurden in der Literatur 14 Patienten beschrieben."}, {"name": "Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch P2Y12-Defekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der P2Y12-Defekt ist eine seltene Gerinnungsst\u00f6rung. Symptome der leichten bis mittelschweren Blutungsneigung sind leicht auftretende Hauteinblutungen ('blaue Flecken'), Schleimhautblutungen und schwere postoperative Blutungen. Der urs\u00e4chliche Defekt des Thrombozyten-Rezeptors P2Y12 st\u00f6rt selektiv die Reaktion der Thrombozyten auf Adenosin-Diphosphat (ADP).", "synonyms": "Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch P2Y12-ADP-Rezeptor-Defekt, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "D69.8", "OMIM": "609821", "UMLS": "C1853278", "GARD": "12478", "epidemiology": "Bisher wurden in der Literatur 14 Patienten beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Der P2Y12-Defekt ist eine angeborene St\u00f6rung mit leicht bis stark verl\u00e4ngerter Blutungszeit, leicht auftretenden Hauteinblutungen, Schleimhautblutungen (Nasenbluten, Magen- und Zahnfleischbluten u.a.), H\u00e4morrhagien und blutungsbedingten Komplikationen nach Trauma und leichten oder schweren operativen Eingriffen.", "etiology": "Ursache des P2Y12-Defektes sind Mutationen im P2RY12-Gen (3q24-q25) mit vorzeitigem Kettenabbruch oder Funktionsverlust des P2Y12-Rezeptors. ADP aktiviert die Pl\u00e4ttchen durch Interaktion mit den beiden G-Protein-gekoppelten Rezeptoren P2Y1 und P2Y12. Der P2Y1-Rezeptor vermittelt die Mobilisierung des ionisierten Kalziums und ist verantwortlich f\u00fcr die durch ADP ausgel\u00f6ste Formver\u00e4nderung und leichte passagere Aggregatiion der Pl\u00e4ttchen. Der P2Y12-Rezeptor steuert den Abschluss und die Verst\u00e4rkung der Antwort auf ADP und der anderen Thrombozyten-Agonisten (u.a. Thromboxane A2, Thrombin und Kollagen). Der P2Y12-Rezeptor hat deshalb eine entscheidende Rolle bei Bildung und Stabilisierung des Thrombus.", "genetic_counseling": "Der P2Y12-Mangel wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Beide Eltern der Patienten sind heterozygote Tr\u00e4ger der Anlage. Das Wiederholungsrisiko f\u00fcr weitere betroffene Kinder betr\u00e4gt 25%.", "summary": "Bisher wurden in der Literatur 14 Patienten beschrieben."}, {"name": "Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung, erworbene", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung, genetisch bedingte, seltene", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Blutungskrankheit durch CalDAG-GEFI-Mangel", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Bleeding disorder due to CalDAG-GEFI deficiency is a rare hematologic disease due to defective platelet function and characterized by mucocutaneous bleeding starting in infancy (around 18 months of age), presenting with prolonged and severe epistaxis, hematomas and bleeding after tooth extraction. Massive menorrhagia and chronic anemia have also been reported.", "synonyms": "Bleeding disorder due to calcium- and DAG-regulated guanine exchange factor-1 deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "D69.1", "omim": "615888"}, {"name": "Blutungskrankheit durch Kalzium- und DAG-regulierten Guanin-Nukleotid-Austausch-Faktor 1- Mangel", "sub_name": "Blutungskrankheit durch CalDAG-GEFI-Mangel", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Bleeding disorder due to CalDAG-GEFI deficiency is a rare hematologic disease due to defective platelet function and characterized by mucocutaneous bleeding starting in infancy (around 18 months of age), presenting with prolonged and severe epistaxis, hematomas and bleeding after tooth extraction. Massive menorrhagia and chronic anemia have also been reported.", "synonyms": "Bleeding disorder due to calcium- and DAG-regulated guanine exchange factor-1 deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "D69.1", "omim": "615888"}, {"name": "Blutungskrankheit mit assoziiertem Mangel der zytosolischen Phospholipase-A2 alpha", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic hematologic and intestinal disease characterized by childhood onset of bleeding tendency with epistaxis, gum bleeding, gastrointestinal bleeding, hematuria, and menorrhagia due to impaired platelet aggregation and secretion, as well as recurrent gastrointestinal ulcera. Mildly reduced levels of coagulation factor XI have been reported in addition.", "synonyms": "PLA2G4A-related platelet dysfunction, Platelet dysfunction due to cytosolic phospholipase-A2 alpha deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "D69.1", "omim": "618372"}, {"name": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit Hyperdiploidie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C91.0", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit Hypodiploidie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Hypodiploide ALL, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C91.0", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit rekurrenter genetischer Anomalie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter, \u00c4ltere Erwachsene", "ICD-10": "C91.0", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(1;19)(q23;p13.3)", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(1;19)(q23;p13.3); TCF3-PBX1, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C91.0", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(1;19)(q23;p13.3); TCF3-PBX1", "sub_name": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(1;19)(q23;p13.3)", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(1;19)(q23;p13.3); TCF3-PBX1, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C91.0", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(12;21)(p13.2;q22.1)", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(12;21)(p13.2;q22.1); ETV6-RUNX1, B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(12;21)(p13;q22); TEL-AML1, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C91.0", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(12;21)(p13.2;q22.1); ETV6-RUNX1", "sub_name": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(12;21)(p13.2;q22.1)", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(12;21)(p13.2;q22.1); ETV6-RUNX1, B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(12;21)(p13;q22); TEL-AML1, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C91.0", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(12;21)(p13;q22); TEL-AML1", "sub_name": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(12;21)(p13.2;q22.1)", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(12;21)(p13.2;q22.1); ETV6-RUNX1, B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(12;21)(p13;q22); TEL-AML1, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C91.0", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(5;14)(q31.1;q32.3)", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(5;14)(q31;q32); IL3-IGH, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C91.0", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(5;14)(q31;q32); IL3-IGH", "sub_name": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(5;14)(q31.1;q32.3)", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(5;14)(q31;q32); IL3-IGH, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C91.0", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(9;22)(q34.1;q11.2)", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "B-ALL mit t(9;22)(q34.1;q11.2), BCR-ABL1-\u00e4hnliche B-ALL, Philadelphia-Chromosom-\u00e4hnliche B-ALL, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter, \u00c4ltere Erwachsene", "ICD-10": "C91.0", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(v;11q23.3)", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(v;11q23); MLL-Rearrangement, B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(v;11q23.3); KMT2A-Rearrangement, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C91.0", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(v;11q23.3); KMT2A-Rearrangement", "sub_name": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(v;11q23.3)", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(v;11q23); MLL-Rearrangement, B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(v;11q23.3); KMT2A-Rearrangement, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C91.0", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(v;11q23); MLL-Rearrangement", "sub_name": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(v;11q23.3)", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(v;11q23); MLL-Rearrangement, B-lymphoblastische Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom mit t(v;11q23.3); KMT2A-Rearrangement, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C91.0", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "BMAH", "sub_name": "Nebennierenblutung, bilaterale massive", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "BMAH, ", "ICD-10": "E27.4", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Nebenniereninsuffizienz, akute"}, {"name": "BMD", "sub_name": "Best vitelliforme Makuladegeneration", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Best Vitelliforme Makuladegeneration (BVMD) ist eine genetisch bedingte Makuladegeneration mit Verlust der zentralen Sehkraft, Metamorphopsie (ver\u00e4nderte Wahrnehmung von Gegenst\u00e4nden) und vermindertem Arden-Verh\u00e4ltnis im Elektrookulogramm. Ursache ist eine eigelb-\u00e4hnliche L\u00e4sion der Fovea und ihrer Umgebung.", "synonyms": "BMD, BVMD, Best Makuladegeneration, Best-Krankheit, Dystrophia vitelliformis, Fr\u00fch beginnende vitelliforme Makuladystrophie, Juvenile vitelliforme Makuladystrophie, Makuladegeneration, vitelliforme, Typ 2, Polymorpe vitelline Makuladegeneration, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "H35.5", "OMIM": "153700", "UMLS": "C0339510\u00a0 C2745945", "GARD": "182", "epidemiology": "Sch\u00e4tzungen der Pr\u00e4valenz liegen zwischen 1:5.000 in Nordschweden und 1:67.000 in D\u00e4nemark. Das m\u00e4nnliche Geschlecht ist h\u00e4ufiger betroffen (m:w = 3:1).", "clinical_description": "Die BVMD beginnt im Kindesalter, manchmal auch erst sp\u00e4ter (5-13 Jahre). Bei Geburt ist der Visus noch normal. Die BVMD schreitet in mehreren Stadien fort: Stadium 1:Asymptomatische pr\u00e4vitelliforme Phase; Stadium 2: Bildung einer dotter-gelben (vitelliformen) L\u00e4sion in der Makula; Stadium 2a: Der Inhalt der Fovea wird weniger homogen ('R\u00fchrei-artig'); Stadium 3 (Pseudo-Hypopyon): Die vitelliforme Substanz in der L\u00e4sion wird fl\u00fcssig. Schlie\u00dflich l\u00f6st sich die L\u00e4sion auf und hinterl\u00e4sst eine Narbe, wodurch der zentrale Visus verloren geht (20/200). Weiter kompliziert wird dieser Verlauf durch eine subfoveale choroidale neovaskul\u00e4re (CNV) Membran (bei Kindern selten). M\u00f6gliche Symptome sind gest\u00f6rte Unterscheidung von Farben (vor allem der Protanachse) und Metamorphopsie. Der periphere Visus und die Dunkeladaptation bleiben erhalten. Einige Mutationstr\u00e4ger bleiben symptomfrei.", "etiology": "Die BVMD ist gekennzeichnet durch Atrophie des Pigmentepithels der Netzhaut (RPE) mit gest\u00f6rtem zentralen Visus. In den meisten F\u00e4llen ist die BVMD verursacht dirch Mutationen im BEST1-Gen (11q12). Es kodiert f\u00fcr Bestrophin-1, einen im RPE exprimierten Chlorid-Kanal. Der Defekt dieses Proteins f\u00fchrt im Gefolge des gest\u00f6rten Ionenaustausches zur Ablagerung von Lipofuszin.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren Familienanamnese, Testung der Sehsch\u00e4rfe und Inspektion des Augenhintergrundes (mit Nachweis gelber, runder Ablagerungen von Lipofuszin im Zentrum der Makula). Das Vollfeld-Elektroretinogramm (ERG) ist normal. Im Elektrookulogramm (EOG) wird das Ruhepotential des Auges durch Bestimmung des Arden-Quotienten (AR: Verh\u00e4ltnis Lichtpeak/Dunkelminimum; normal \u22651.8) gekennzeichnet. Bei BVMD ist der AR in der Regel vermindert (1.0-1.3). Durch hochaufl\u00f6sende optische Koh\u00e4renztomographie kann die abnorme Ablagerung von Lipofuszin zwischen den Photorezeptoren und dem RPE nachgewiesen werden. Durch Mutationsanalyse im BEST1-Gen wird die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen der BVMD sind die Foveo-makul\u00e4re vitelliforme Dystrophie mit Beginn im Erwachsenenalter, die Altersabh\u00e4ngige Makuladegeneration, die autosomal-rezessive Bestrophinopathie, die autosomal-dominante Vitreo-retino-choroidopathie, Retinitis pigmentosa (s. diese Termini) und die Ochsenaugen-Makulopathie.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Pr\u00e4nataldiagnose und Pr\u00e4implantationsdiagnostik sind m\u00f6glich, wenn in der Familie die urs\u00e4chliche Mutation bekannt ist.", "genetic_counseling": "Die BVMD wird autosomal-dominant mit vollst\u00e4ndiger Penetranz vererbt. Erkrankungsalter und Ausma\u00df des Visusverlustes variieren innerhalb und zwischen den Familien.", "management_and_treatment": "Teil der symptomatischen Behandlung sind Sehhilfen bei signifikant eingeschr\u00e4nktem Visus. F\u00fcr Patienten aller Altersstufen werden j\u00e4hrliche ophthalmologische Kontrollen empfohlen. Tabakkonsum soll vermieden werden, da er das Risiko f\u00fcr neovaskul\u00e4re Makuladegeneration erh\u00f6ht. Optionen f\u00fcr die Behandlung einer CNV sind: Photodynamische Therapie mit Verteporfin, direkte Laser-Photokoagulation oder Anti-VEGF-Agentien (Bevacizumab). Eine Behandlungsart der BVMD ist die trans-korneale elekrische Retina-Stimulation.", "prognosis": "Die BVMD kann bis zu geographischer Atrophie fortschreiten und ist in einigen F\u00e4llen durch die Entwicklung einer CNV kompliziert. 7-9% der Patienten erfahren keinen Visusverlust aber haben bei normalem ERG ein ver\u00e4ndertes EOG.", "summary": "Sch\u00e4tzungen der Pr\u00e4valenz liegen zwischen 1:5.000 in Nordschweden und 1:67.000 in D\u00e4nemark. Das m\u00e4nnliche Geschlecht ist h\u00e4ufiger betroffen (m:w = 3:1)."}, {"name": "BMRS", "sub_name": "Blepharophimose-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "BMRS, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0oder\u00a0X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0oder\u00a0Mitochondriale Vererbung\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "GARD": "10892", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "BMRS, MKB-Typ", "sub_name": "Blepharophimose-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom Typ MKB", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene, X-chromosomale syndromale St\u00f6rung der intellektuellen Entwicklung, die nur Jungen betrifft und durch eine globale Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung mit wenig oder fehlender Sprache, urogenitale Anomalien (inkl. Skrotalhypoplasie, Mikropenis und Kryptorchismus), autistisches Verhalten und Gesichtsdysmorphie gekennzeichnet ist. Charakteristische Gesichtsmerkmale sind Ptosis, Blepharophimose, eine knollige Nasenspitze, ein langes Philtrum und eine Maxillarhypoplasie mit vollen Wangen. Weitere variable Merkmale sind Mikrozephalie, Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, Zahnanomalien und hyperextensible Gelenke.", "synonyms": "BMRS vom Typ Maat-Kievit-Brunner, BMRS, MKB-Typ, Blepharophimose-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom, Typ Maat-Kievit-Brunner, Ohdo-Syndrom, X-chromosomales, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "300895"}, {"name": "BMRS Typ Ohdo", "sub_name": "Ohdo-Blepharophimose-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "BMRS Typ Ohdo, Blepharophimose-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom Typ Ohdo, Blepharophimose-Syndrom Ohdo-Typ, Ohdo-Madokoro-Sonoda-Syndrom, Ohdo-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "249620", "UMLS": "C0796094\u00a0 C2931643", "GARD": "3348", "summary": "Das Ohdo-Blepharophimose-Syndrom (OBS) ist ein Syndrom mit multiplen kongenitalen Anomalien und gekennzeichnet durch Blepharophimose, Ptose, hypoplastische Z\u00e4hne, H\u00f6rst\u00f6rungen und geistige Behinderung. Bisher wurden weltweit weniger als 30 Patienten beschrieben. Bei einigen Patienten wurden abnorme Ohren, Mikrozephalie und retardiertes Wachstum beschrieben. Bei m\u00e4nnlichen Patienten sind Kryptorchismus und hypoplastisches Skrotum m\u00f6gliche Symptome. Die meisten F\u00e4lle sind sporadisch, lediglich die Originalf\u00e4lle von Ohdo waren zwei betroffene Schwestern mit einem Kusin ersten Grades, was mit autosomal-rezessiver Vererbung vereinbar ist. Vermutet wurden auch autosomal- dominante, X-chromosomale und mitochondriale Vererbung. "}, {"name": "BMRS Typ V", "sub_name": "Blepharophimose- Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom, Typ Verloes", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Blepharophimosis-intellectual disability syndrome, Verloes type is a rare, genetic multiple congenital anomalies/dysmorphic syndrome characterized by congenital microcephaly, severe epilepsy with hypsarrhythmia, adducted thumbs, abnormal genitalia, and normal thyroid function. Hypotonia, moderate to severe psychomotor delay, and characteristic facial dysmorphism (including round face with prominent cheeks, blepharophimosis, large, bulbous nose with wide alae nasi, posteriorly rotated ears with dysplastic conchae, narrow mouth, cleft palate, and mild micrognathia) are additional characteristic features.", "synonyms": "BMRS type V, BMRS, Verloes type, Blepharophimosis-intellectual disability syndrome type V, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "604314", "umls": "C1858538"}, {"name": "BMRS Typ Verloes", "sub_name": "Blepharophimose- Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom, Typ Verloes", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Blepharophimosis-intellectual disability syndrome, Verloes type is a rare, genetic multiple congenital anomalies/dysmorphic syndrome characterized by congenital microcephaly, severe epilepsy with hypsarrhythmia, adducted thumbs, abnormal genitalia, and normal thyroid function. Hypotonia, moderate to severe psychomotor delay, and characteristic facial dysmorphism (including round face with prominent cheeks, blepharophimosis, large, bulbous nose with wide alae nasi, posteriorly rotated ears with dysplastic conchae, narrow mouth, cleft palate, and mild micrognathia) are additional characteristic features.", "synonyms": "BMRS type V, BMRS, Verloes type, Blepharophimosis-intellectual disability syndrome type V, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "604314", "umls": "C1858538"}, {"name": "BMRS vom Typ Maat-Kievit-Brunner", "sub_name": "Blepharophimose-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom Typ MKB", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene, X-chromosomale syndromale St\u00f6rung der intellektuellen Entwicklung, die nur Jungen betrifft und durch eine globale Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung mit wenig oder fehlender Sprache, urogenitale Anomalien (inkl. Skrotalhypoplasie, Mikropenis und Kryptorchismus), autistisches Verhalten und Gesichtsdysmorphie gekennzeichnet ist. Charakteristische Gesichtsmerkmale sind Ptosis, Blepharophimose, eine knollige Nasenspitze, ein langes Philtrum und eine Maxillarhypoplasie mit vollen Wangen. Weitere variable Merkmale sind Mikrozephalie, Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, Zahnanomalien und hyperextensible Gelenke.", "synonyms": "BMRS vom Typ Maat-Kievit-Brunner, BMRS, MKB-Typ, Blepharophimose-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom, Typ Maat-Kievit-Brunner, Ohdo-Syndrom, X-chromosomales, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "300895"}, {"name": "BMS", "sub_name": "Zungen- und Schleimhautbrennen", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare neurologic disease characterized by an unremitting bilateral symmetrical burning sensation of the oral mucosa without clinical evidence of causative lesions. It most frequently occurs in postmenopausal women and typically affects the tongue, less often the palate, lips, or buccal mucosa. It is often associated with dysgeusia and xerostomia.", "synonyms": "BMS, Oral dysesthesia, Orodynia, Stomatodynia, Stomatopyrosis, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "K14.6", "umls": "C0006430\u00a0 C2930806", "gard": "5974"}, {"name": "BNAHC", "sub_name": "Benigne n\u00e4chtliche alternierende Hemiplegie im Kindesalter", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die beninge n\u00e4chtliche alternierende Hemiplegie im Kindesalter ist eine seltene neurologische Erkrankung, die durch wiederholte Anf\u00e4lle von n\u00e4chtlichem Schreien oder Weinen gekennzeichnet ist, gefolgt oder begleitet von einseitiger oder manchmal bilateraler Hemiplegie. Die Krankheit ist nicht mit neurologischen oder entwicklungsbedingten Beeintr\u00e4chtigungen verbunden, kann aber mit leichten Verhaltensst\u00f6rungen einhergehen.", "synonyms": "BNAHC, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unbekannt\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "G81.9"}, {"name": "BNAR-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "BNAR syndrome is a very rare multiple congenital anomaly syndrome characterized by a bifid nose (see this term) (with bulbous nasal tip but not associated with hypertelorism) with or without the presence of anal defects (i.e. anteriorly placed anus, rectal stenosis or atresia) and renal dysplasia (unilateral or bilateral renal agenesis, see these terms) and without intellectual disability. BNAR syndrome is phenotypically related to Fraser syndrome and oculotrichoanal syndrome (see these terms).", "synonyms": "Bifid nose with or without anorectal and renal anomalies, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "608980", "umls": "C2750433", "gard": "10595"}, {"name": "Bockenheimer-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare vascular anomaly characterized by congenital, progressive, circumscribed venous malformations (phlebectasias) primarily involving the upper and/or lower extremities, either on one side or bilaterally. The malformed vessels are visible beneath the skin. Veins of all sizes are affected. Pain, swelling, muscle wasting, and ulceration may occur.", "synonyms": "Genuine diffuse phlebectasia, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q27.4"}, {"name": "Boder-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Odontomatose - Aorten- und \u00d6sophagusstenose", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Odontoma-dysphagia syndrome is a malformation syndrome, characterized by odontomas (undifferentiated mass of the esophagus) and severe dysphagia.", "synonyms": "Boder syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "No data available", "omim": "164330", "umls": "C1834013", "gard": "238", "epidemiology": "Less than ten cases have been reported so far.", "clinical_description": "Three of the reported patients manifested multiple odontomas. Occasionally, cardiac (stenosis of the intrathoracic descendent aorta, interstitial myocarditis), renal (pyelonephritis) and hepatic (hepatic sclerosis) involvement has been described.", "etiology": "Hypertrophy and dysmotility of the esophageal smooth muscles is suggested to have causative role for dysphagia.", "genetic_counseling": "In several cases, autosomal dominant inheritance has been suspected. Currently, there are no genes associated with this condition."}, {"name": "BOD-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Brachymorphie-Onychodysplasie-Dysphalangie-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Brachymorphie-Onychodysplasie-Dysphalangie-Syndrom (BOD) ist ein sehr seltenes Fehlbildungs-Syndrom und gekennzeichnet durch Kleinwuchs, hypoplastische Kleinfinger mit kleinen dysplastischen N\u00e4geln, faziale Dysmorphien (grobe Gesichtsz\u00fcge, breiter Mund, breite Nase) und leichte intellektuelle Behinderung. Es wird vermutet, dass das Coffin-Siris-Syndrom (s. dort) und das BOD -Syndrom evtl. allelische Varianten sind.", "synonyms": "BOD-Syndrom, Senior-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.1", "OMIM": "113477", "UMLS": "C1862082", "MeSH": "C536242", "GARD": "918"}, {"name": "Body-Stalk-Anomalie", "sub_name": "Gliedma\u00dfen-K\u00f6rperwand-Defekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Body-Stalk-Anomalie, LBWC-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "GARD": "3251", "summary": "Der Gliedma\u00dfen-K\u00f6rperwand-Komplex (LBWC) ist gekennzeichnet durch multiple schwere Fehlbildungen des Foeten mit Exenzephalie/Enzephalozele, Thorako- und/oder Abdominoschisis (Defekte der vorderen K\u00f6rperwand), Gliedma\u00dfendefekten und, in einigen F\u00e4llen, Gesichtsspalten. Bisher wurden etwa 250 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Das klinische Bild ist von Fall zu Fall sehr unterschiedlich. Weitere Symptome sind: Viszerale Fehlbildungen (in 95%; Darmatresie, ano-rektale Fehlbildungen, Persistenz eines extraembryonalen Zoeloms), Anomalien der Wirbels\u00e4ule (lumbosakrale Meningomyelozele, Kyphoskoliose), fehlendes Diaphragma und urogenitale Fehlbildungen, z.B. Nierenagenesie. \u00c4u\u00dfere Zeichen des LBWC sind kurze Nabelschnur und Anheftung der Plazenta am Abdomen. Eine Reihe von Manifestationen des LBWC (kraniofaziale Defekte, Gesichtsspalten, Amnionb\u00e4nder, Adh\u00e4sionen) sind auch Teil der Amnionb\u00e4nder-Sequenz (s. dort). Bisher ist unklar, ob beide Entit\u00e4ten verschiedene Formen der gleichen Krankheit sind. Die \u00c4tiologie des LBWC ist unbekannt. Die untersuchten Karyotypen waren unauff\u00e4llig, Zusammenh\u00e4nge mit Geschlecht, elterlichem Alter und teratogenen Agentien wurden nicht gefunden. Vermutet werden exogene Ursachen, entweder eine fr\u00fche Amnionruptur oder eine fr\u00fchembryonale vaskul\u00e4re St\u00f6rung. Einige famili\u00e4re F\u00e4lle wurden beschrieben. Die Diagnose folgt direkt aus den klinischen Symptomen. Mittels Ultraschall ist eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik m\u00f6glich. Der LBWC muss von der Gastroschisis (s. dort) differenziert werden, die eine bessere Prognose hat. Im Gegensatz dazu ist der LBWC eine letale St\u00f6rung, der Tod tritt schon vor der Geburt oder in der fr\u00fchen Neugeborenenzeit ein. "}, {"name": "Boeck-Krankheit", "sub_name": "Sarkoidose", "german_description": "Die Sarkoidose ist eine multisystemische Krankheit mit unbekannter Ursache. Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch Bildung von Immun-Granulomen in den betroffenen Organen. Die Sarkoidose ist weltweit verbreitet. Die Inzidenz h\u00e4ngt vom, Alter, Geschlecht, ethnischem Hintergrund und geographischer Herkunft ab und wurde bei M\u00e4nnern zu etwa 1:6.300 und bei Frauen zu 1:5.300 bestimmt. Bevorzugt betroffen sind Lunge und lymphatisches System, aber auch praktisch jedes andere Organ kann in den Krankheitsprozess einbezogen sein. Schwere Verl\u00e4ufe resultieren aus der Beteiligung des Herzens, des Nervensystems, der Augen, der Nieren und des Kehlkopfes. In den meisten F\u00e4llen wird die Sarkoidose durch anhaltenden tockenen Husten, Augen- und Hautsymptome, Schwellung der peripheren Lymphknoten, Mattigkeit, Gewichtsverlust, Fieber oder Nachtschwei\u00df und Erythema nodosum manifest. Ein abnormer Stoffwechsel des Vitamins D3 in den Granulomen und Hyperkalz\u00e4mie sind m\u00f6gliche Befunde. Die R\u00f6ntgen-Thorax-Befunde sind in 90% auff\u00e4llig und definieren mit Lymphadenopathie und/oder Lungeninfiltraten (ohne oder mit Fibrose) die Sarkoidose-Stadien I bis IV. Die \u00c4tiologie ist noch unbekannt. In der am meisten favorisierte Hypothese wird angenommen, dass verschiedene unbekannte und schwer abbaubare Antigene aus Infektionen oder Umwelt bei genetisch pr\u00e4disponierten Personen eine \u00fcberstarke Immunreaktion ausl\u00f6sen. Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren charakteristische klinische und radiologische Befunde, der Nachweis nicht-verk\u00e4sender Granulome (in Biopsaten unter tracheo-bronchialer Endoskopie oder an anderen Stellen) und der Ausschluss aller anderen granulomat\u00f6sen Erkrankungen. Verlauf und Schweregrad der Sarkoidose sind sehr unterschiedlich. In den gutartigsten F\u00e4llen mit spontaner Remission innerhalb von 24-36 Monaten ist eine Behandlung nicht erforderlich, aber bis zur Heilung m\u00fcssen regelm\u00e4\u00dfige Kontrollen stattfinden. In schwereren F\u00e4llen erfolgt eine medikament\u00f6se Behandlung, entweder sofort oder im Verlauf der Kontrolluntersuchungen, wenn die Entwicklung der Krankheit es erfordert. Die Behandlung st\u00fctzt sich auf systemische Anwendung von Kortikosteroiden. Diese Behandlung muss mindestens 12 Monate lang erfolgen. Einige Patienten machen wiederholte Rezidive durch und ben\u00f6tigen \u00fcber lange Zeit (mehrere Jahre) niedrig dosiert Kortikosteroide. Bei mangelhaftem Ansprechen auf Kortikosteroide, bei Unvertr\u00e4glichkeit oder zur Einsparung hoher Steroiddosen, wenn diese \u00fcber lange Zeit erforderlich sind, haben sich Immunsuppressiva und Aminochinoline als n\u00fctzlich erwiesen. In streng ausgew\u00e4hlten F\u00e4llen, die auf Standardtherapie nicht ansprechen, k\u00f6nnen evtl. spezifische Anti-TNF-alpha-Agentien wertvolle Besserung bringen. Einige Patienten profitieren von topischen Kortikosteroiden. Die Mortalit\u00e4t der Sarkoidose wird auf 0,5-5% gesch\u00e4tzt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare multisystemic, autoinflammatory disorder of unknown etiology characterized by the formation of immune, non-caseating granulomas in any organ(s), leading to variable clinical symptoms and severity. Clinical presentation is typically with persistent dry cough, eye or skin manifestations, peripheral lymph nodes, fatigue, weight loss, fever or night sweats, and L\u00f6fgren syndrome.", "synonyms": "Besnier-Boeck-Schaumann disease, Boeck sarcoid, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Multigenic/multifactorial\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent, Elderly, Adult", "icd_10": "D86.0\u00a0 D86.1\u00a0 D86.2\u00a0 D86.3\u00a0 D86.8\u00a0 D86.9", "omim": "181000\u00a0 612387\u00a0 612388", "umls": "C0036202", "mesh": "D012507", "meddra": "10039486", "epidemiology": "Sarcoidosis is a ubiquitous disease with incidence varying according to age, sex, race and geographic origin. The highest rates are reported in Northern Europe and in African-American individuals, the lowest rates in Asia. In Europe, incidence ranges between 1/625 to 500,000 inhabitants. There is a slight predominance in females.", "clinical_description": "Presentation, severity and evolution of sarcoidosis is highly variable. Diagnosis typically occurs in the fourth and fifth decade of life with a second peak of incidence occurring in women older than 50 years of age, but presentation may occur anywhere between childhood and elderly age. The disease is classed as either acute, resolving within 2 years, or chronic, persisting for 3-5 years or longer. The lung and the lymphatic system are predominantly affected, but virtually every organ may be involved. Other severe manifestations result from cardiac, neurological, ocular, kidney or laryngeal localizations. In most cases, sarcoidosis is revealed by persistent dry cough, eye or skin manifestations, peripheral lymph nodes, fatigue, weight loss, fever or night sweats, and L\u00f6fgren syndrome (an acute form characterized by fever, bilateral ankle arthritis and/or erythema nodosum and bilateral hilar lymphadenopathy). Abnormal metabolism of vitamin D3 within granulomatous lesions and hypercalcemia are possible. Chest radiography is abnormal in about 90% of cases and shows lymphadenopathy and/or pulmonary infiltrates (without or with fibrosis), defining sarcoidosis stages from I to IV. African-Americans present a more severe disease, and in Scandinavian countries, about one third of cases have L\u00f6fgren syndrome.", "etiology": "The etiology remains unknown. The prevailing hypothesis is that various, unidentified antigens of either infectious or environmental origin could trigger an exaggerated immune reaction in genetically susceptible hosts.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis relies on compatible clinical and radiographic manifestations, biopsy showing non-caseating granulomas and exclusion of all other causes of granulomatous disease. Some situations do not require biopsy such as Lofgren's syndrome or the presence of typical asymptomatic bilateral mediastino-hilar adenopathies. Biopsies from easily accessible areas (skin, peripheral lymphadenopathies, conjunctival nodules) should be considered. However, bronchoscopy with bronchial and transbronchial biopsies has a good diagnostic performance. Endobronchial ultrasonography-guided transbronchial needle aspiration (EBUS-TBNA) provide a high yield in case of mediastino-hilar lymphadenopathies.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes infections, chronic beryllium disease, common variable immunodeficiency, hypersensitivity pneumonitis, granulomatous polyangiitis, Crohn disease, sarcoid-like reactions (cancer or lymphomas), as well as drug-induced granulomatosis.", "genetic_counseling": "Sarcoidosis results from a complex interaction of multiple genes and thus does not require genetic counseling.", "management_and_treatment": "Depending on the evolution and severity of sarcoidosis, patients may not require systemic therapy. Therapy is considered where there is a possibility of severe complications (i.e. functional organ failure) or to reduce persistent symptoms of discomfort that impact on quality of life. Discomfort may be due to fibrosis, para-sarcoidosis syndrome or comorbidities as well as active disease. Treatment is principally with systemic corticosteroids, and generally maintained for 12 months; however, the duration and minimal efficient dose should be adapted to each patient. Patients with repeated relapses may require long-term, low-dose corticosteroid therapy. Other treatments including immunosuppressive drugs (methotrexate, azathioprine, or leflunomide) and aminoquinolins may be useful in case of unsatisfactory response to corticosteroids, poor tolerance or as sparing agents. In some strictly selected cases refractory to standard therapy, specific anti-TNF-alpha agents (infliximab or adalimumab) may offer improvement. Some patients benefit from topical corticosteroids.", "prognosis": "In at least half of cases, sarcoidosis resolves spontaneously within 2 years. Remission is less likely where diseases persists for five years after presentation. Mortality is estimated at 6-8% and typically due to organ failure (typically respiratory or cardiac). The extent of pulmonary fibrosis and pulmonary hypertension are predictive of mortality."}, {"name": "BOFS", "sub_name": "Branchio-okulo-faziales Syndrom", "german_description": "Weniger als 50 Patienten mit dem Branchio-okulo-fazialem Syndrom (BOFS) sind bisher beschrieben worden. Einige F\u00e4lle sind sporadisch, die meisten kommen aber aus Familien mit mehr als 1 Betroffenen und sind vereinbar mit autosomal-dominanter Vererbung. Symptome sind: niedriges Geburtsgewicht und verz\u00f6gertes Wachstum; bilaterale branchiogene Fisteln, manchmal mit H\u00e4mangiomen oder linearen, verbrennungs-\u00e4hnlichen Hautl\u00e4sionen hinter den Ohren; angeborener Strabismus; verschlossene Tr\u00e4nen-Nasen-G\u00e4nge; Nase mit breiter Basis und flacher Spitze; vorstehende Oberlippe mit breitem Philtrum; 'Karpfenmund'. Weitere Fehlbildungen sind: Pseudo-Spalte der Oberlippe, \u00e4hnlich einer operativ oder spontan verschlossenen Spalte; malformierte Ohren, Schalleitungs-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit; pr\u00e4aurikul\u00e4re Gr\u00fcbchen; Lippengr\u00fcbchen; hoher Gaumenbogen; Zahnanomalien; Augenfehlbildungen (Kolobome, Mikrophthalmie); subkutane Zysten unter der Kopfhaut; Nierenanomalien (Agenesie, Zysten, Hydronephrose). Erwachsene Patienten ergrauen vorzeitig. Ein Patient hatte neben den typischen Symptomen eines BOFS eine partielle Agenesie des Kleinhirnwurms. Zwei Geschwister mit diesem Syndrom hatten h\u00e4mangiomat\u00f6se Orbita-Zysten. Bei 2 F\u00e4llen von BOFS wurden pr\u00e4axiale Polydaktylie und wei\u00dfe Stirnlocke beschrieben. Die Intelligenz ist normal, die Sprache n\u00e4selnd. Das postnatale Wachstum verl\u00e4uft zwischen der 3. und 5. Perzentile. Die retroaurikul\u00e4ren branchiogenen Halsdefekte geh\u00f6ren zu den am h\u00e4ufigsten gesehenen Symptomen. Histologisch k\u00f6nnen in den L\u00e4sionen Thymusanteile nachweisbar sein. Das BOF-Syndrom und das Branchio-oto-renale (BOR)-Syndrom haben als gemeinsame Symptome Stenosen des Tr\u00e4nen-Nasen-Ganges, Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, pr\u00e4aurikul\u00e4re Gr\u00fcbchen, malformierte Ohrmuscheln und Nierenanomalien. Das BOF-Syndrom ist aber nicht mit dem BOR-Syndrom allelisch. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, dominantly inherited multiple congenital anomalies syndrome characterized by highly variable clinical phenotype involving the three main affected systems: branchial (cutaneous) defects, ophthalmic malformations and facial anomalies. Additional features can be present.", "synonyms": "BOFS, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q18.8", "omim": "113620", "umls": "C0376524", "gard": "3212", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of branchio-oculo-facial syndrome (BOFS) is unknown but fewer than 150 individuals with a well-described clinical and/or molecular diagnosis have been reported in the literature so far.", "clinical_description": "The branchial defects include cervical or infra- and/or supra-auricular skin defects that vary in size and shape but are typically characterized as thinned erythematous cutaneous defects. Ocular features are highly variably expressed including microphthalmia, anophthalmia, coloboma, cataract, ptosis, nasolacrimal duct obstruction, strabismus and significant visual impairment. The characteristic craniofacial features include dolichocephaly, hypertelorism, telecanthus, upslanted palpebral fissures, broad nose with full nasal tip, pre-auricular and upper lip pits, external ear anomalies (malformed and prominent pinnae), inner ear and petrous bone anomalies (such as cochlear dysplasia, Mondini dysplasia and enlarged vestibular aqueduct), cleft lip (including lesser forms, such as microform, ''pseudocleft'' or abnormal philtrum) with or without cleft palate, and lower facial nerve and/or muscle hypoplasia (partial 7th cranial nerve weakness). Patients have conductive/sensorineural/mixed hearing loss. Additional findings include ectopic dermal thymus, renal anomalies (dysplastic, multisystem or absent kidneys, vesicoureteral reflux) and ectodermal anomalies (premature hair graying, hypoplastic teeth, dysplastic nails and subcutaneous dermoid-like cysts, often on the scalp). Psychomotor development is typically normal. Autism spectrum disorder, intellectual disability, growth restriction, congenital heart defects and polydactyly are rare.", "etiology": "BOFS is caused by mutations involving the gene TFAP2A (6p24.3) that encodes the transcription factor AP-2 alpha that regulate gene expression during embryogenesis (of the eye, ear, face, body wall, limbs and neural tube).", "diagnostic_methods": "The clinical diagnosis of BOFS is established if all three of the main features (branchial, ocular and craniofacial) are present or if two of the three main features are present in addition to either ectopic thymus or a positive family history in a first-degree relative. Diagnosis may be confirmed with molecular testing.", "differential_diagnosis": "The most important differential diagnosis of BOFS is the branchio-oto-renal syndrome (BOR syndrome).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis and preimplantation genetic testing are possible where the pathogenic variant has previously been identified in a family member.", "genetic_counseling": "BOFS has shown almost complete penetrance and a significant inter- and intrafamilial variability. No clear genotype-phenotype correlation exists. Transmission is autosomal dominant and an affected individual has a 50% chance of having an affected child at each pregnancy. About 50-60% of the diagnosed individuals have a de novo pathogenic variant.", "management_and_treatment": "Multidisciplinary care is required, including craniofacial specialists, plastic surgeons, ophthalmologists, otolaryngologists, dentists and genetic counseling for affected families. Renal and cardiac abnormalities should be excluded and when necessary supportive therapies should be considered.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is generally good but depends on the severity of associated manifestations."}, {"name": "Bogengangsdehiszenz-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Syndrom der Bogengangsdehiszenz (SCD-Syndrom) ist eine seltene otorhinolaryngologische Erkrankung, die gekennzeichnet ist durch eine ein- oder beidseitige Dehiszenz der kn\u00f6chernen Abdeckung des oberen (am h\u00e4ufigsten), lateralen oder hinterer Bogengangs. Die Patienten zeigen audiologische (Autophonie, Ohrdruck, Schallleitungsschwerh\u00f6rigkeit, pulsierender Tinnitus) und/oder vestibul\u00e4re Symptome (schall- oder druckinduzierte Oszillopsie oder Schwindel, charakteristische vertikal-torsionale Augenbewegungen), je nachdem, welcher Bogengang betroffen ist. Das posteriore SCD-Syndrom ist mit einem hochsitzenden Bulbus jugularis und fibr\u00f6ser Dysplasie assoziiert, w\u00e4hrend das laterale SCD-Syndrom mit chronischer Otitis media und Cholesteatom, mit oder ohne audiologische und vestibul\u00e4re Symptome, einhergeht.", "synonyms": "SCD-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "H83.8"}, {"name": "Bohring-Opitz-\u00e4hnliches Syndrom, KLHL7-assoziiertes", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Bohring-Opitz-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das C-\u00e4hnliche Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch intrauterine Wachstumsretardierung (IUGR), Gedeihst\u00f6rung, faziale Dysmorphien (prominente Metopica-Naht, Naevus flammeus an der Stirn, tiefer frontaler und temporaler Haaransatz mit Hirsutismus, Pausbacken, antimongoloider Verlauf der Lidachsen, Exophthalmos, Hypertelorismus, Lippen-Kiefer-Gaumenspalte, Retrogenie, tiefsitzende Ohren), Flexionsdeformit\u00e4ten der Ellenbogen und Handgelenke, Kamptodaktylie, Ulnardeviation der Finger, Fu\u00dffehlbildungen und schwere Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung. Weniger als 20 Patienten wurden bisher beschrieben. Die meisten Patienten waren sporadisch, aber auch autosomal-rezessive Vererbung wurde beschrieben. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare multiple congenital anomalies syndrome characterized by intrauterine growth retardation (IUGR), postnatal failure to thrive, severe feeding difficulties, microcephaly/trigonocephaly, facial dysmorphism, a recognizable upper limb posture and severe developmental delay. The upper limb posture consists of internal rotation of the shoulders, flexion of the elbows, ulnar deviation of wrists and/or metacarpophalangeal joints.", "synonyms": "BOS syndrome, Bohring syndrome, C-like syndrome, Oberklaid-Danks syndrome, Opitz trigonocephaly-like syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "605039", "umls": "C0796232", "gard": "10140", "epidemiology": "To date 46 cases have been described, less than half of which were molecularly confirmed as carrying a heterozygous pathogenic variation in ASXL1.", "clinical_description": "Bohring-Opitz syndrome (BOS) is characterized by IUGR, severe neonatal feeding difficulties, and microcephaly/trigonocephaly, cleft lip/palate and hirsutism. Facial dysmorphism is characterized by glabellar/frontal nevus flammeus, synophrys, proptosis, hypertelorism, depressed wide nasal bridge, anteverted nares, full cheeks, and micrognathia. The posture of upper limbs, common in all patients at birth, is characterized by internal rotation of the shoulders, flexion of the elbows, ulnar deviation of wrists and/or metacarpophalangeal joints. Most patients exhibit truncal hypotonia and hypertonic extremities at birth. Seizures and obstructive sleep apnea/sleep disturbances can occur during infancy. Other abnormalities can involve the following organs: brain (corpus callosum defects), eyes (retinal and optic nerve abnormalities, high myopia), heart (bradycardia, septal defect), gastrointestinal tract (cycling emesis, gastroesophageal reflux disease) as well as the joints (contractures, congenital hip/radial head dislocations).", "etiology": "BOS is due to a heterozygous pathogenic variation in ASXL1 (20q11.21), which acts as a chromatin modulator.", "diagnostic_methods": "Clinical diagnosis can be confirmed by sequencing of ASXL1 or by intellectual disability-related next generation sequencing panel including the gene. If sequencing is negative, multiplex ligation-dependent probe amplification may be used.", "differential_diagnosis": "A BOS-like phenotype related to KLHL7 has been described which has several features in common with BOS (including a similar upper limb posture) but is clinically distinguished by the absence of trigonocephaly, synophrys, high myopia and cycling emesis. Other diseases sharing several features with BOS but lacking the BOS posture include C syndrome, Shashi-Pena syndrome, Bainbridge-Ropers syndrome and Cornelia de Lange syndrome.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible on chorionic villi or amniotic fluid where the pathogenic variant has been previously identified in the family. Prenatal genetic counseling should therefore be offered to parents of patients with ASXL1 variants to discuss the genetic risks and reproductive options.", "genetic_counseling": "The disorder is autosomal dominant; however, most cases are de novo. Genetic counseling should be offered to all at-risk couples since germinal mosaicism may occur.", "management_and_treatment": "Management requires an early multidisciplinary approach. Seizures are drug-responsive. An increased risk of Wilms tumor is reported. An abdominal ultrasound every 3-4 months is suggested in the first 8 years of life.", "prognosis": "The rate of infant mortality is high. In patients who survive infancy, feeding difficulties and recurrent infections become less severe. Older patients may have some purposeful limb movements, however, their resting state returns to BOS posture. Intellectual disability ranges from severe to profound."}, {"name": "Bohring-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Bohring-Opitz-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das C-\u00e4hnliche Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch intrauterine Wachstumsretardierung (IUGR), Gedeihst\u00f6rung, faziale Dysmorphien (prominente Metopica-Naht, Naevus flammeus an der Stirn, tiefer frontaler und temporaler Haaransatz mit Hirsutismus, Pausbacken, antimongoloider Verlauf der Lidachsen, Exophthalmos, Hypertelorismus, Lippen-Kiefer-Gaumenspalte, Retrogenie, tiefsitzende Ohren), Flexionsdeformit\u00e4ten der Ellenbogen und Handgelenke, Kamptodaktylie, Ulnardeviation der Finger, Fu\u00dffehlbildungen und schwere Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung. Weniger als 20 Patienten wurden bisher beschrieben. Die meisten Patienten waren sporadisch, aber auch autosomal-rezessive Vererbung wurde beschrieben. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare multiple congenital anomalies syndrome characterized by intrauterine growth retardation (IUGR), postnatal failure to thrive, severe feeding difficulties, microcephaly/trigonocephaly, facial dysmorphism, a recognizable upper limb posture and severe developmental delay. The upper limb posture consists of internal rotation of the shoulders, flexion of the elbows, ulnar deviation of wrists and/or metacarpophalangeal joints.", "synonyms": "BOS syndrome, Bohring syndrome, C-like syndrome, Oberklaid-Danks syndrome, Opitz trigonocephaly-like syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "605039", "umls": "C0796232", "gard": "10140", "epidemiology": "To date 46 cases have been described, less than half of which were molecularly confirmed as carrying a heterozygous pathogenic variation in ASXL1.", "clinical_description": "Bohring-Opitz syndrome (BOS) is characterized by IUGR, severe neonatal feeding difficulties, and microcephaly/trigonocephaly, cleft lip/palate and hirsutism. Facial dysmorphism is characterized by glabellar/frontal nevus flammeus, synophrys, proptosis, hypertelorism, depressed wide nasal bridge, anteverted nares, full cheeks, and micrognathia. The posture of upper limbs, common in all patients at birth, is characterized by internal rotation of the shoulders, flexion of the elbows, ulnar deviation of wrists and/or metacarpophalangeal joints. Most patients exhibit truncal hypotonia and hypertonic extremities at birth. Seizures and obstructive sleep apnea/sleep disturbances can occur during infancy. Other abnormalities can involve the following organs: brain (corpus callosum defects), eyes (retinal and optic nerve abnormalities, high myopia), heart (bradycardia, septal defect), gastrointestinal tract (cycling emesis, gastroesophageal reflux disease) as well as the joints (contractures, congenital hip/radial head dislocations).", "etiology": "BOS is due to a heterozygous pathogenic variation in ASXL1 (20q11.21), which acts as a chromatin modulator.", "diagnostic_methods": "Clinical diagnosis can be confirmed by sequencing of ASXL1 or by intellectual disability-related next generation sequencing panel including the gene. If sequencing is negative, multiplex ligation-dependent probe amplification may be used.", "differential_diagnosis": "A BOS-like phenotype related to KLHL7 has been described which has several features in common with BOS (including a similar upper limb posture) but is clinically distinguished by the absence of trigonocephaly, synophrys, high myopia and cycling emesis. Other diseases sharing several features with BOS but lacking the BOS posture include C syndrome, Shashi-Pena syndrome, Bainbridge-Ropers syndrome and Cornelia de Lange syndrome.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible on chorionic villi or amniotic fluid where the pathogenic variant has been previously identified in the family. Prenatal genetic counseling should therefore be offered to parents of patients with ASXL1 variants to discuss the genetic risks and reproductive options.", "genetic_counseling": "The disorder is autosomal dominant; however, most cases are de novo. Genetic counseling should be offered to all at-risk couples since germinal mosaicism may occur.", "management_and_treatment": "Management requires an early multidisciplinary approach. Seizures are drug-responsive. An increased risk of Wilms tumor is reported. An abdominal ultrasound every 3-4 months is suggested in the first 8 years of life.", "prognosis": "The rate of infant mortality is high. In patients who survive infancy, feeding difficulties and recurrent infections become less severe. Older patients may have some purposeful limb movements, however, their resting state returns to BOS posture. Intellectual disability ranges from severe to profound."}, {"name": "Boichis-Krankheit", "sub_name": "Senior-Boichis-Syndrom", "german_description": "Als Boichis-Syndrom wird das gemeinsame Auftreten einer zum Nierenversagen f\u00fchrenden kongenitalen Nephronophthise und Leberfibrose bezeichnet. Es wurde in 1 Familie bei 5 Mitgliedern beschrieben, zwei von ihnen starben im Nierenversagen. Bei zus\u00e4tzlicher Manifestation einer tapeto-retinalen Degeneration und geistiger Behinderung spricht man vom sog. Senior-Boichis-Syndrom. Es wurde in 1 Familie und sp\u00e4ter noch bei einem 12 Jahre alten Kind beschrieben. Evtl. handelt es sich bei beiden Syndromen um die gleiche Entit\u00e4t. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare ciliopathy characterized by the association of nephronophthisis and liver fibrosis. Renal manifestations include chronic renal failure, polyuria, polydipsia, anemia, as well as increased echogenicity on renal ultrasound and interstitial fibrosis and tubular dilation on biopsy. Hepatic involvement manifests as hepatosplenomegaly with extensive fibrosis, destruction of the bile ducts, and cholestasis. Mild psychomotor retardation and ocular symptoms, such as strabismus, nystagmus, retinal degeneration, and anisocoria, have been reported in some patients.", "synonyms": "Boichis disease, Nephronophthisis-hepatic fibrosis syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "Q61.8", "omim": "613550\u00a0 616217"}, {"name": "BOLA3-Mangel", "sub_name": "Mitochondriales Dysfunktions-Syndrom, multiples, Typ 2", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare mitochondrial disease characterized by infantile onset of severe regression after a period of normal development, epileptic encephalopathy, hypotonia, movement disorder, cardiomyopathy, hyperglycinemia, and lactic acidosis. Optic atrophy may also be present. Brain imaging findings are highly variable and include white matter abnormalities. The disease is typically fatal in infancy.", "synonyms": "BOLA3 deficiency, MMDS2, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "E88.8", "omim": "614299"}, {"name": "Bolivianisches h\u00e4morrhagisches Fieber", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Bolivian hemorrhagic fever (BHF), caused by the Machupo virus (MACV), is a severe acute viral hemorrhagic fever characterized by fever, myalgia, and arthralgia followed by hemorrhagic and neurological manifestations.", "synonyms": "Machupo hemorrhagic fever, ", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "A96.1", "umls": "C0282192", "meddra": "10005932"}, {"name": "Bonneau-Beaumont-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Heredit\u00e4re Hyperferritin\u00e4mie-Katarakt-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Hereditary hyperferritinemia with congenital cataracts is characterized by the association of early onset (although generally absent at birth) cataract with persistently raised plasma ferritin concentrations in the absence of iron overload.", "synonyms": "Bonneau-Beaumont syndrome, HHCS, Hereditary hyperferritinemia with congenital cataracts, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "H26.0", "omim": "600886", "umls": "C1833213", "mesh": "C538137", "gard": "2806", "epidemiology": "Prevalence still needs to be precisely determined but is estimated to be at least 1 in 200 000.", "etiology": "The syndrome is caused by a mutation in a translational regulatory element of the gene coding for the L-ferritin subunit, located on 19q13.4-qter. Messenger RNAs for ferritin have a stem-loop structure called an 'iron responsive element' (IRE) in their 5' non-coding region. In the absence of iron, a cytoplasmic protein called the 'iron regulatory protein' (IRP) binds to the IRE and represses ferritin synthesis. As a result of the mutation on the IRE, the IRP no longer recognizes the binding site leading to constitutive L-ferritin expression in tissues and an increase in ferritin levels in the plasma, although there is no iron overload. The mutations that have been identified affect bases on the IRE loop or in the bulge in the middle of the IRE stem. Two partial deletions of either half of the IRE have also been reported.", "differential_diagnosis": "In cases for which no IRE mutations have been detected but the hyperferritinemia persists, hemochromatosis type 4 (which may be caused by ferroportin mutations) should be suspected.", "genetic_counseling": "The syndrome is an autosomal dominant inherited disease.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no treatment for cataract-hyperferritinemia syndrome, but venesections should be avoided as they are not well tolerated.", "prognosis": "Besides cataracts, there are no other clinical manifestations associated with this syndrome and the prognosis is good."}, {"name": "Bonneau-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Polysyndaktylie - Herzfehler", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch Polysyndaktylie, pr\u00e4axiale Hexadaktylie (Duplikation der Gro\u00dfzehe) und komplexe Herzfehler (z.B. Vorhof- oder Ventrikelseptumdefekt, Single Ventricle, Dextroposition der Aorta, Erweiterung des rechten Herzens). Es wurde bei 6 Patienten aus 3 nicht miteinander verwandten Familien beschrieben. Einige Patienten hatten weitere Symptome (z.B. faziale Dysmorphien, Leberzysten). ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, life-threatening developmental defect during embryogenesis characterized by polysyndactyly of fingers and toes as well as complex congenital heart defects (e.g. atrioventricular septal defects, aortic dextroposition, single ventricle, hypo- or hypertrophy of one side of the heart). Additional features may include dysmorphic traits (large fontanel, high forehead, ptosis, hypertelorism, epicanthus, low-set malformed ears, prominent root of the nose, bulbous nose, anteverted nares, long and smooth philtrum, thin upper lip, micrognathism, hirsutism, single transverse crease) nail hypoplasia, phalange agenesis/hypoplasia, flexion contractures, polysplenia, multiple hepatic/renal cysts, atrophic biliary vesicle, ductal plate malformation and genital anomalies (e.g. micropenis, undescended testes, hypoplastic scrotum). The syndrome is usually fatal in utero or in infancy, but survival cases have been reported.", "synonyms": "Bonneau syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "263630", "umls": "C1849719", "gard": "4428"}, {"name": "Bonneman-Meinecke-Reich-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Bonnemann-Meineke-Reich-Syndrom ist eine Kombination von multiplen kongenitalen Anomalien. Charakteristisch ist eine Enzephalopathie, die sich vor allem im ersten Lebensjahr in Form einer psychomotorischen Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung zeigt. Weitere Merkmale dieser Erkrankung sind eine moderate Dysmorphie, Kraniosynostosen, Kleinwuchs (durch einen Wachstumshormonmangel), geistige Retardierung sowie Spastik, Ataxie, Netzhautdegeneration, Nebennieren- und Uterushypoplasie. Das Syndrom wurde bisher nur in zwei Familien beschrieben, in denen je zwei Geschwister betroffen waren. Es wird von einer autosomal-rezessiven Vererbung ausgegangen. Seit 1991 gab es keine weiteren Beschreibungen in der Fachliteratur.", "synonyms": "Enzephalopathie mit intrazerebraler Kalzifikation und Retinadegeneration, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q04.8", "OMIM": "225755", "UMLS": "C1856973", "GARD": "2113"}, {"name": "Bonnemann-Meinecke-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Porenzephalie-zerebell\u00e4re Hypoplasie-interne Fehlbildungen-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltenes Fehlbildungssyndrom des Zentralnervensystems, das durch beidseitige Porenzephalie, Fehlen des Septum pellucidum und Kleinhirnhypoplasie mit fehlendem Vermis gekennzeichnet ist. Zus\u00e4tzlich wurden dysmorphe Gesichtsz\u00fcge (Hypertelorismus, Epikanthusfalten, hochgew\u00f6lbter Gaumen, prominente metopische Naht), Makrozephalie, Hornhauttr\u00fcbung, Situs inversus, Fallot-Tetralogie, Vorhofseptumdefekte und/oder Krampfanf\u00e4lle beobachtet.", "synonyms": "Bonnemann-Meinecke-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "601322", "UMLS": "C1832472", "GARD": "4437"}, {"name": "Bonnet-Dechaume-Blanc-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Wyburn-Mason-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Wyborn-Mason-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch arterio-ven\u00f6se Fehlbildungen mit metamerer Topographie im Gesicht, im periorbitalen Bereich oder im Zentralnervensystem. Das Syndrom ist sehr selten, bisher wurden etwa 100 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Die Fehlbildungen erscheinen schon bei Geburt als gutartige, angiom-\u00e4hnliche L\u00e4sionen in einer Gesichtsh\u00e4lfte, im Trigeminusgebiet oder in der Mitte des Gesichtes. In der Kindheit und Adoleszenz oder auch nach Trauma nimmt die Gr\u00f6\u00dfe zu. Das Wyborn-Mason-Syndrom wird auch bei einigen Patienten mit Hemihypertophie des K\u00f6rpers gesehen. Intrakraniale Fehlbildungen sind immer auch schon bei Geburt vorhanden, f\u00fchren aber erst bei Erwachsenen zu unterschiedlichen neurologischen St\u00f6rungen. Oft verursachen sie Kopfschmerzen, fokale neurologische Ausf\u00e4lle und Hirnblutungen. Wenn sich die Fehlbildung \u00fcber die ganze Netzhaut ausbreitet, oder wenn Gef\u00e4\u00dffehlbildungen in der Orbita oder intra-kranial zu einer Optikus-Neuropathie f\u00fchren, erblinden die Patienten. Dem Wyborn-Mason-Syndrom liegt ein Fehler der Organogenese in der Embryonalzeit zugrunde. Ursache und Risikofaktoren sind unbekannt. F\u00fcr die Diagnose ist Magnetresonanz-Bildgebung (MRI) am besten geeignet. Eine detailliertere Analyse ist durch Angiographie m\u00f6glich, mit dem Nachweis, dass die Kapillaren fehlen, die normal Arterien und Venen verbinden. Stille arterielle L\u00e4sionen (Stufe I nach Schobinger) sollten nicht behandelt werden, dagegen k\u00f6nnen intra-kraniale L\u00e4sionen durch Protonenstrahlen oder Embolisation behandelt werden. In anderen Teilen des K\u00f6rpers werden die Fehlbildungen durch Embolisation mit nachfolgender Operation oder nur chirurgisch oder nur mit Embolisation behandelt. Die Embolisation, der Verschluss der zuf\u00fchrenden Gef\u00e4\u00dfe, soll durch einen erfahrenen Radiologen erfolgen. Selten ist eine Therapie bei S\u00e4uglingen und Kindern indiziert. Die Prognose h\u00e4ngt von der Gr\u00f6\u00dfe, dem Ort, dem Wachstum und der Ausdehnung der L\u00e4sion ab. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Wyburn-Mason syndrome or Bonnet-Dechaume-Blanc syndrome is characterized by the association of arteriovenous malformations of the maxilla, retina, optic nerve, thalamus, hypothalamus and cerebral cortex.", "synonyms": "Bonnet-Dechaume-Blanc syndrome, CAMS2, Cerebrofacial arteriovenous metameric syndrome type 2, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "Q28.2", "umls": "C0265321", "mesh": "C536752", "gard": "7900", "meddra": "10048661", "epidemiology": "The prevalence is not known but it is very rare: fewer than 100 cases have been reported in the literature to date. The sex ratio is even.", "clinical_description": "Malformations appear successively, sometimes over several tens of years. Neurological clinical signs include: progressive neurological deficits depending on the location of the malformation, epilepsy or cephalalgia. These symptoms result in venous congestion and hemorrhage. Psychomotor delay in childhood is not common. The associated maxillofacial lesions lead to asymmetries or deformations of the face, impairment of maxillofacial osseous growth and, in intraosseous maxillo-mandibular locations, serious oral hemorrhages. The visual symptoms are caused by arteriovenous malformations of the retina and depend on the size and location of malformations (retina, optical nerve, chiasma). Partial manifestations of the syndrome (incomplete spectrum) are possible.", "etiology": "Wyburn-Mason syndrome is caused by an anomaly in organogenesis, however the etiology and risk factors are unknown. There are no familial forms of the syndrome. The connection between lesions of the same angio-architectural nature, but in different locations, can be explained by the regionalized origin of cells of the vascular walls in the cephalic region, and their migration. The cells of vessels in the facial, orbital, maxillary or mandibular, and encephalic areas come from three large embryonic regions. An embryonic defect in a cellular group before its migration to its final destination may `spread' vascular lesions along the route of migration. This gives rise to cerebrofacial metameric or segmental syndromes (CAMS) called CAMS1, CAMS2 and CAMS3 according to the region from which the cells depart: CAMS1 (corpus callosum, hypothalamus, olfactory tract, forehead, nose), Wyburn-Mason syndrome that has been renamed CAMS2 (cortex and diencephalon, optic chiasma, optic nerve, retina, sphenoid, maxilla, cheek) and CAMS3 (cerebellum, temporal bone, mandible).", "diagnostic_methods": "Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) is the best diagnostic instrument and provides information on the extent of the anomalies. An arteriogram then allows a more detailed analysis of the angio-architecture of the lesions, revealing the absence of capillary vessels that normally connect arteries and veins. It is most often impossible to completely treat cerebral vascular malformations because of the extent and architecture of the lesions.", "management_and_treatment": "Targeted partial treatment through the endovascular route aims to isolate the region at risk of malformation. It can be successful in dentoalveolar and cerebral locations if a particular weakness has been identified using MRI or arteriogram. Combined management with embolization and surgery is most often necessary for maxillofacial malformations.", "prognosis": "The early appearance of neurological problems is an unfavorable factor for long term prognosis."}, {"name": "Book-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Book-Syndrom ist ein seltenes, autosomal-dominant vererbtes Ektodermale-Dysplasie-Syndrom und wurde in einer schwedischen Familie (25 F\u00e4lle aus 4 Generationen) und bei einem isolierten Fall beschrieben. Das Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch Aplasie der Praemolaren, Hyperhidrose und vorzeitiges Ergrauen der Haare. Zus\u00e4tzliche Symptome des isolierten Falles waren schmaler Gaumen, hypoplastische N\u00e4gel, Anomalien der Augenbrauen, einseitige Vierfingerfurche und schwach ausgepr\u00e4gte Dermatoglyphen.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "Q82.4", "OMIM": "112300", "UMLS": "C0457014", "GARD": "932"}, {"name": "Boomerang-Dysplasie", "german_description": "Die Boomerang-Dysplasie ist ein Letal-Syndrom mit schwerwiegender Knochenbeteiligung. Symptome sind Kleinwuchs, sowie kurze, gebogene, steife Gliedma\u00dfen mit Verkn\u00f6cherungsdefekten und fehlenden Knochen (Fibula und Radius) und eine charakteristische Fazies mit breiter Nasenwurzel und Hypoplasie der Nasenfl\u00fcgel und des Nasenseptums. Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik ist mit Fehlbildungs-Ultraschall m\u00f6glich. Das Syndrom ist sehr selten, nur 10 F\u00e4lle wurden bisher beschrieben. Die Ursache ist unbekannt. Einige Patienten hatten zus\u00e4tzlich Symptome einer Atelosteogenesis Typ 1. Es wird deshalb angenommen, dass beide Krankheiten zum gleichen pathologischen Spektrum z\u00e4hlen. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Boomerang dysplasia (BD) is a rare lethal skeletal dysplasia characterized by severe short-limbed dwarfism, dislocated joints, club feet, distinctive facies and diagnostic x-ray findings of underossified and dysplastic long tubular bones, with a boomerang-like bowing.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q87.1", "omim": "112310", "umls": "C0432201", "mesh": "C536573", "gard": "933", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of BD is unknown.", "clinical_description": "Affected neonates are stillborn or die rapidly after birth and present clinically with severe short-limbed dwarfism, dislocated hip, knee and elbow joints, club feet and proviso born alive have severe cardio respiratory failure. Facial dysmorphism includes midface hypoplasia and cleft palate. Boomerang dysplasia clinically differs from AOI and AOIII because of the boomerang shaped bowing of the femur and occasionally observed encephalocele and omphalocele.", "etiology": "BD results from missense mutations or small in-frame deletions in the FLNB gene reported in exons 2-5, normally expected to translate full length but biochemically abnormal filamin B protein.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis can be confirmed from skeletal radiographs, chondro-osseous histopathology and genetic testing. Distinctive radiographic findings are similar to AOI but, BD presents with a more severe deficiency in mineralization, with non-ossification of certain segments of limbs and vertebrates, and a boomerang-like shape of some long tubular bones.", "differential_diagnosis": "Comprises other skeletal dysplasias with severe short-limbed dwarfism such as achondrogenesis, campomelic dysplasia, Ellis-van Creveld syndrome, achondroplasia, metatropic dysplasia, Roberts syndrome, short rib-polydactyly syndrome and thanatophoric dysplasia. Additional differential diagnosis includes diseases associated with impaired ossification such achondrogenesis, hypophosphatasia, and osteogenesis imperfecta (see these terms).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "The prenatal diagnosis of BD is difficult to ascertain by ultrasound. Ultrasound shows thoracic hypoplasia, limb shortening, delayed ossification of spine and appendicular segments and possibly joint dislocations, similar to AOI and AOIII. Boomerang-shape morphology some long tubular bones may be diagnosed prenatally by 3D-CT scan.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is poor, as the condition is lethal in utero."}, {"name": "BOOP", "sub_name": "Pneumonie, kryptogene organisierende", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Kryptogene organisierende Pneumonie (COP) oder Bronchiolitis obliterans mit organisierender Pneumonie (BOOP) ist eine Form der idiopathischen interstitiellen Lungenentz\u00fcndung, die pathologisch durch die organisierende Pneumonie (OP) gekennzeichnet ist, die mit unspezifischen grippe\u00e4hnlichen Symptomen sowie Husten und Atemnot auftritt und bei der keine \u00e4tiologisches Ursache gefunden wird.", "synonyms": "BOOP, Bronchiolitis obliterans mit organisierender Pneumonie, COP, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter, \u00c4ltere Erwachsene", "ICD-10": "J84.1", "UMLS": "C0242770", "MeSH": "D018549", "GARD": "1620", "epidemiology": "COP macht 5-10% der interstitiellen Lungenerkrankungen aus. Die j\u00e4hrliche Inzidenz in Island wurde auf 1/90.900 gesch\u00e4tzt.", "clinical_description": "Das durchschnittliche Alter der Erkrankung ist 50-60 Jahre. Die Patienten zeigen unspezifische Merkmale wie mildes Fieber, unproduktiver Husten, Unwohlsein, Anorexie, Gewichtsverlust und progressiver, aber leichter Dyspnoe. Bei der Auskultation finden sich fokal sp\u00e4rliche Rasselger\u00e4usche \u00fcber den betroffenen Bereichen, die teilweise mit klinischen Konsolidierungsmerkmalen einhergehen. Es gibt keine Anzeichen von Trommelschlegelfingern. Zwischen dem Auftreten der ersten Symptome und der Diagnose k\u00f6nnen 3 oder mehr Monate vergehen. In schnell fortschreitenden F\u00e4llen kann die Dyspnoe schwerwiegend sein. Seltene Erscheinungsformen sind Brustschmerzen, Nachtschwei\u00df und H\u00e4moptyse. Es wurden Pneumothorax und Pneumomediastinum berichtet. COP verschwindet in der Regel mit der Behandlung, aber in bis zur H\u00e4lfte der F\u00e4lle treten R\u00fcckf\u00e4lle auf. Obwohl die meisten diagnostizierten F\u00e4lle inzwischen behandelt werden, wurde auch eine spontane Besserung \u00fcber 3-6 Monate berichtet.", "etiology": "Die \u00c4tiologie ist unbekannt. Die Stadien der COP-Pathogenese umfassen die Verletzungsphase (Permeabilit\u00e4ts\u00f6dem und Fibrinablagerungen als Reaktion auf eine Verletzung der Alveolarzellen), die proliferierende Phase (Bildung von fibroinflammatorischen Knospen), die reife Phase (Vorhandensein von \"reifen\" fibrotischen Knospen im Alveolarraum) und die L\u00f6sungsphase (Reversibilit\u00e4t von L\u00e4sionen).", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf dem klinischen Bild, der Bildgebung, der Histopathologie der Lunge und dem Ausschluss aller Ursachen der sekund\u00e4ren OP. Die hochaufl\u00f6sende Computertomographie zeigt 3 Hauptmuster der Bildgebung: mehrere fleckige alveol\u00e4re Tr\u00fcbungen, die migrieren k\u00f6nnen (in den meisten F\u00e4llen; typische COP), ein einzelner Fokusknoten oder eine einzelne Masse (Fokale COP) oder diffuse infiltrative Tr\u00fcbungen (infiltrative oder progressive fibrotische COP). Die videogest\u00fctzte Thorakoskopie ist die Methode der Wahl bei der Gewinnung von Lungengewebe, aber transbronchiale Biopsien, Kernnadelbiopsien und seit Neuestem transbronchiale Kryobiopsien sind alternative Methoden. Histologische Befunde der OP sind eine l\u00fcckenhafte F\u00fcllung der Lungenalveolen und Atemwegsbronchiolen durch Knospen von Granulationsgewebe aus Fibroblasten und Myofibroblasten (Massonk\u00f6rper). Die faseroptische Bronchoskopie mit bronchoalveol\u00e4rer Lavage zeigt einen deutlichen Anstieg der Lymphozyten und einen leichten Anstieg der Neutrophilen und Eosinophilen. Es werden erh\u00f6hte C-reaktive Proteinserumspiegel und Neutrophilzahlen im peripheren Blut berichtet.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Hauptdifferenzialdiagnose ist die idiopathische chronische eosinophile Pneumonie. Sekund\u00e4re OP m\u00fcssen auch durch die Beseitigung ihrer m\u00f6glichen Ursachen ausgeschlossen werden, einschlie\u00dflich prim\u00e4rer bili\u00e4rer Zirrhose, ulzerativer Kolitis, Morbus Crohn, Sweet-Syndrom, Sarkoidose, Morbus Beh\u00e7et, prim\u00e4rem Lungenlymphom, Medikamenten, Infektionen und allen Bindegewebserkrankungen, insbesondere rheumatoide Arthritis und idiopathisch entz\u00fcndliche Myopathien.", "management_and_treatment": "Standardtherapie f\u00fcr COP sind Kortikosteroide, meist mit Prednison-Dosen von 0,75 mg/kg/Tag f\u00fcr 4 Wochen, die \u00fcber einen Zeitraum von 24 Wochen allm\u00e4hlich abnehmen. Bei Patienten mit schnell fortschreitender COP kann hochdosiertes intraven\u00f6ses Methylprednisolon verabreicht werden. Die fokale COP wird oft durch die Entfernung von L\u00e4sionen diagnostiziert, die zun\u00e4chst als neoplastisch galten, wobei eine weitere Therapie oft nicht erforderlich ist. R\u00fcckf\u00e4lle sollten mit einer Anfangsdosis von 20 mg/Tag Prednison behandelt werden, die sich dann \u00fcber einen Zeitraum von 12 Wochen verj\u00fcngt. Rezidive, die zu oft oder w\u00e4hrend einer Kortikosteroidtherapie auftreten, sollten zu einer Neubewertung der Diagnose f\u00fchren. Die immunsuppressive Therapie kann selten bei schweren infiltrativen Formen der COP eingesetzt werden.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist in der Regel gut, da sich die meisten F\u00e4lle erfolgreich mit einer Kortikosteroidbehandlung behandeln lassen. Rezidive treten jedoch bei 13-58% der Patienten auf und k\u00f6nnen sich bei h\u00e4ufigerem Auftreten auf die Lebensqualit\u00e4t auswirken.", "summary": "COP macht 5-10% der interstitiellen Lungenerkrankungen aus. Die j\u00e4hrliche Inzidenz in Island wurde auf 1/90.900 gesch\u00e4tzt."}, {"name": "Borjeson-Forssman-Lehmann-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das B\u00f6rjeson-Forssman-Lehmann-Syndrom (BFLS) ist ein seltenes, X-chromosomales Adipositas-Syndrom mit geistiger Behinderung, stammbetonter Adipositas, charakteristischen Gesichtsmerkmalen, Hypogonadismus und konischen Fingern und kurzen Zehen.", "synonyms": "BFLS, Intelligenzminderung-Epilepsie-endokrine St\u00f6rung-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "301900", "UMLS": "C0265339", "MeSH": "C536575", "GARD": "936", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist unbekannt. Bisher wurden ca. 50 F\u00e4lle aus 24 Familien sowie sporadische F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Das BFLS tritt vor allem bei Jungen auf, es sind jedoch auch mehrere weibliche Patienten mit milder bis gem\u00e4\u00dfigter Symptomatik in betroffenen Familien und bei isolierten F\u00e4llen dokumentiert. Das klinische Bild ist au\u00dferordentlich unterschiedlich. Bei der Geburt zeigen sich gelegentlich gro\u00dfe Ohren und kleine Genitalien. Der Kopfumfang ist unterschiedlich, alle S\u00e4uglinge sind muskelhypoton und trinkschwach. Eine Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung wird h\u00e4ufig vor Ende des ersten Lebensjahres beobachtet. Im sp\u00e4ten Kindesalter zeigt sich eine auffallende stammbetonte Adipositas. Die Finger sind \u00fcberstreckbar und und konisch geformt, die F\u00fc\u00dfe sind in der Regel breit mit gebeugten, kurzen Zehen. Die meisten Patienten sind von kleiner Statur, jedoch sind einige auch normal gro\u00df. In der Adoleszenz entwickelt sich eine Gyn\u00e4komastie und die Genitalien bleiben meist klein. Au\u00dferdem treten in der Adoleszenz charakteristische grobe Gesichtsz\u00fcge auf, mit tiefliegenden Augen, schmaler Stirn, supraorbitalen W\u00fclsten, Ptose und gro\u00dfen, fleischigen Ohrl\u00e4ppchen. Alle diese Merkmale sind im Erwachsenenalter noch deutlicher ausgepr\u00e4gt. Das Ausma\u00df der geistigen Behinderung reicht von leicht bis schwer und ist nicht progredient. Die Patienten sind in der Regel kontaktfreudig und freundlich, einige zeigen jedoch auch Angstst\u00f6rungen, Depressionen und herausforderndes oder hypersexuelles Verhalten. Seltener beschrieben wurden akute T-Zell-Lymphoblasten-Leuk\u00e4mie, Morbus Perthes (LCPD), Lippen-Kiefer- Gaumenspalten (siehe jeweils dort), Hypopituitarismus, Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, Epilepsie und milde bis generalisierte Polyneuropathie. Weibliche Gentr\u00e4ger sind meist symptomfrei, jedoch kann es bei ihnen in seltenen F\u00e4llen zu Lernst\u00f6rungen sowie einigen der bei m\u00e4nnlichen Patienten beobachteten K\u00f6rpermerkmale kommen.", "etiology": "Ursache des BFLS sind Mutationen im PHF6-Gen (Xq26). Das Genprodukt PHF6 ist am Zellwachstum und an der Zellproliferation beteiligt. Im Allgemeinen f\u00fchren Mutationen, die zu einem Verlust oder einer Verringerung der PHF6-Expression f\u00fchren, zu schwereren klinischen Symptomen. Funktionsverlustmutationen und ungleiche X-Inaktivierung werden zur Erkl\u00e4rung des seltenen Vorkommens symptomatischer weiblicher Patienten herangezogen. Die meisten F\u00e4lle famili\u00e4r, aber auch mehrere isolierte F\u00e4lle mit unbekannter \u00c4tiologie wurden beschrieben.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Verdachtsdiagnose BFLS folgt aus der klinischen Untersuchung mit dem Nachweis der charakteristischen Symptome. Eine Familienanamnese mit Hinweis auf X-chromosomal- rezessive Vererbung und schiefe X-Inaktivierung bei obligaten weiblichen \u00dcbertr\u00e4gern sind weitere diagnostische Indikatoren. Der Nachweis einer PHF6-Mutation kann die Diagnose best\u00e4tigen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind: Coffin-Lowry-, Klinefelter-, Prader-Willi-, Bardet-Biedl- und Wilson-Turner-Syndrom (siehe jeweils dort).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Wenn bei der Mutter oder einem betroffenen Vater eine PHF6-Mutation nachgewiesen wurde, ist eine pr\u00e4natale Diagnose m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Das BFLS wird X-chromosomal vererbt. In der genetischen Beratung wird den Familien die X-chromosomale Vererbung erkl\u00e4rt, um weibliche \u00dcbertr\u00e4ger zu identifizieren. Nur sehr wenige BFLS-Patienten sind fertil, jedoch k\u00f6nnen symptomfreie weibliche \u00dcbertr\u00e4ger die Mutation an ihre Kinder weitergeben.", "management_and_treatment": "F\u00fcr das BFLS gibt es keine kurative Therapie. Das Management und die Behandlung von BFLS erfolgt symptomatisch. Die Heilp\u00e4dagogik beginnt fr\u00fchzeitig und dauert \u00fcber die Adoleszenz bis in das Erwachsenenalter an. Es wird eine gesunde Ern\u00e4hrungsweise empfohlen. Erwachsene ben\u00f6tigen ein unterschiedliches Ma\u00df an Betreuung, die in schweren F\u00e4llen auch die Unterbringung in einer Einrichtung einschlie\u00dfen kann. Zur Behandlung einer Gyn\u00e4komastie ist eine Testosteronersatztherapie und/oder eine bilaterale Mastektomie in Betracht zu ziehen. Wenn es zu Anf\u00e4llen kommt, werden Antiepileptika verschrieben. Es existieren symptomatische Behandlungen bei LCPD und Beeintr\u00e4chtigungen des Geh\u00f6rs. Ein soziales Netz ist wichtig, da BFLS-Patienten aus engen sozialen Beziehungen besonderen Nutzen ziehen.", "prognosis": "Das BFLS ist nicht lebensbedrohlich, aber aufgrund der damit verbundenen geistigen Behinderung ist die Lebensqualit\u00e4t eingeschr\u00e4nkt und eine lebenslange Betreuung oft erforderlich.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist unbekannt. Bisher wurden ca. 50 F\u00e4lle aus 24 Familien sowie sporadische F\u00e4lle beschrieben."}, {"name": "Bork-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Tricho-retino-dento-digitales Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Tricho-retino-dento-digitale-Syndrom ist ein autosomal-dominant vererbtes Ektodermale-Dysplasie-Syndrom und gekennzeichnet durch nicht k\u00e4mmbare Haare (siehe dort), kongenitale Hypotrichose und Zahnanomalien wie Oligodontie (siehe dort) oder Hyperdontie, in Verbindung mit fr\u00fch beginnender Katarakt, Pigmentdystrophie der Netzhaut und Brachydaktylie mit Brachymetakarpie. Auch Hyperaktivit\u00e4t und leichtes intellektuelles Defizit wurde bei den Patienten beschrieben.", "synonyms": "Bork-Syndrom, Unk\u00e4mmbare Haare - retinale Pigmentdystrophie - Zahnanomalien - Brachydaktylie, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q82.4", "OMIM": "191482", "UMLS": "C1860605", "GARD": "5257\u00a0 938"}, {"name": "BOR-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Branchio-oto-renale (BOR)-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch Kiemenbogenanomalien (Branchialspalten, -fisteln und -zysten), H\u00f6rst\u00f6rungen (Fehlbildungen der Ohrmuschel mit pr\u00e4-aurikul\u00e4ren Gr\u00fcbchen, Schallleitungs- und sensorisch-neurale Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit) und Fehlbildungen der Niere (Fehlbildungen der ableitenden Harnwege, Nierenhypoplasie oder -agenesie, Nierendysplasie, Nierenzysten). Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist 1:40.000. Die Nierenbeteiligung kann in chronische Niereninsuffizienz m\u00fcnden. Die Auspr\u00e4gung des BOR-Syndroms ist zwischen den Familien und auch innerhalb einer Familie au\u00dferordentlich unterschiedlich. In einigen Familien fehlen Nieren- und Harnwegsanomalien ganz. Die Vererbung ist autosomal-dominant. Das urs\u00e4chlich beteiligte Gen, EYA1, liegt auf dem langen Arm des Chromosoms 8. Bei etwa 40% der Patienten konnten in diesem Gen Punktmutationen und Deletionen nachgewiesen werden. Urs\u00e4chliche Mutationen wurden auch in den Genen SIX1 und SIX5 identifiziert, deren Produkte mit EYA1 unter Bildung von Transkriptionsfaktor-Komplexen interagieren. Wenn die verursachende Mutation bekannt ist, kann den Familien eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik angeboten werden, wegen der stark variablen Expressivit\u00e4t ist die genetische Beratung aber schwierig. Zur Betreuung der BOR-Patienten geh\u00f6ren: Exzision der Branchialfisteln und -zysten, Anpassung einer geigneten H\u00f6rhilfe, F\u00f6rderprogramme f\u00fcr Schwerh\u00f6rige, regelm\u00e4\u00dfige Untersuchung durch einen Nephrologen. Gelegentlich kann Dialyse oder Nierentransplantation erforderlich werden. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare otomandibular dysplasia syndrome characterized by branchial arch anomalies (branchial clefts, fistulae, cysts), malformations of the ear associated with hearing impairment (malformations of the auricle with pre-auricular pits, conductive or sensorineural hearing impairment), and renal malformations (urinary tree malformation, renal hypoplasia or agenesis, renal dysplasia, renal cysts).", "synonyms": "Branchiootorenal syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "113650\u00a0 610896", "umls": "C0265234", "mesh": "D019280", "gard": "10147", "meddra": "10071135", "epidemiology": "Worldwide, the prevalence of Branchiootorenal (BOR) syndrome in the general population is unknown; however, in the pediatric population it is estimated to be 1/40,000.", "clinical_description": "The expression of the disease varies widely from one family to another and among individuals of the same family. Some individuals do not present with renal abnormalities or a urinary tract malformation.", "etiology": "The causative gene, EYA1, is located on the long arm of chromosome 8. Point mutations and deletions in EYA1 have been identified in approximately 40-75% of affected individuals. In a smaller proportion of patients, mutations in the SIX1 and SIX5 genes have been identified, the products of which interact with EYA1 to form transcription factor complexes.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis of BOR syndrome might be suspected clinically in an individual with second branchial arch anomalies, auricular malformations, preauricular pits or tags, deafness and/or renal anomalies. Especially if there are other affected family members. By genetic testing, the diagnosis can be validated in around half of the patients.", "differential_diagnosis": "The main differential diagnosis is branchio-oculo-facial syndrome (BOFS), caused by TFAP2A variants, which is characterized by branchial defects, highly variable ocular defects and characteristic craniofacial features which can include ear anomalies. Moreover, renal anomalies can occur in patients with BOFS. Other differential diagnosis include hypoparathyroidism-sensorineural deafness-renal disease (HDR) syndrome, due to GATA3 variants, which is distinguished by the presence of hypoparathyroidism in the majority of patients; and otofaciocervical syndrome. Moreover, hearing loss is a common symptom in many genetic disorders.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible if the pathogenic variant has previously been identified in a family member. Although, the variable expressivity of the syndrome makes it impossible to predict the severity of the disease in the fetus.", "genetic_counseling": "The disorder is inherited in an autosomal dominant manner; most patients have an affected parent whilst some cases occur sporadically. Genetic counselling should be offered to affected individuals informing them that there is a 50% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy. The penetrance is thought to be complete while there is a great intrafamilial and interfamilial variability in the presence, severity and type of anomalies.", "management_and_treatment": "Management of affected patients includes excision of branchial fistulae or cysts, hearing aids and education programs appropriate for the hearing impaired, and follow-up by a nephrologist. Dialysis or renal transplantation may be required.", "prognosis": "Most patients with BOR syndrome receiving appropriate treatment are able to lead normal, active lives. The prognosis of BOR syndrome patients primarily depends on the severity of the renal involvement. Pregnancies where the fetus has severe renal impairment can end in a miscarriage. Later in life, the renal disease might progress to end-stage renal disease."}, {"name": "Bosley-Salih-Alorainy-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Bosley-Salih-Alorainy-Syndrom (BSAS) ist gekennzeichnet durch eine variable horizontale Blickfunktionsst\u00f6rung, tiefgreifende und bilaterale sensorineurale Taubheit, die h\u00e4ufig mit einer schweren Innenohrfehlentwicklung verbunden ist, zerebrovaskul\u00e4re Anomalien (die von einer einseitigen Hypoplasie der inneren Halsschlagader bis hin zur bilateralen Agenese reichen), Herzfehlbildung, Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung und gelegentlich Autismus. Das Syndrom wird durch homozygote Mutationen im HOXA1-Gen (7p15.2) verursacht und autosomal-rezessiv \u00fcbertragen. Das Syndrom \u00fcberschneidet sich klinisch und genetisch mit dem Athabasken-Hirnstammdysgenesie-Syndrom (ABDS, s. dort). Im Gegensatz zum ABDS tritt beim BSAS jedoch keine zentrale Atmungsst\u00f6rung auf.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "601536", "UMLS": "C1832216"}, {"name": "Bosma-Henkin-Christiansen-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Hyposmie-nasale und okul\u00e4re Hypoplasie-hypogonadotroper Hypogonadismus-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Arhinie-Mikrophthalmie-Syndrom Bosma, Bosma-Henkin-Christiansen-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unbekannt\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q87.0", "OMIM": "603457", "summary": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch die Assoziation einer schweren Hypoplasie der Nase, Hypoplasie der Augen, Hyposmie, Hypogeusie (herabgesetzte Schmeckempfindung) und hypogonadotropen Hypogonadismus. Es wurde bei 2 m\u00e4nnlichen Patienten beschrieben. Weitere Symptome waren beidseitige Leistenhernien, nicht-deszendierte Hoden und verminderte Sehkraft mit Katarakt und Kolobom. "}, {"name": "BOS-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Bohring-Opitz-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das C-\u00e4hnliche Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch intrauterine Wachstumsretardierung (IUGR), Gedeihst\u00f6rung, faziale Dysmorphien (prominente Metopica-Naht, Naevus flammeus an der Stirn, tiefer frontaler und temporaler Haaransatz mit Hirsutismus, Pausbacken, antimongoloider Verlauf der Lidachsen, Exophthalmos, Hypertelorismus, Lippen-Kiefer-Gaumenspalte, Retrogenie, tiefsitzende Ohren), Flexionsdeformit\u00e4ten der Ellenbogen und Handgelenke, Kamptodaktylie, Ulnardeviation der Finger, Fu\u00dffehlbildungen und schwere Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung. Weniger als 20 Patienten wurden bisher beschrieben. Die meisten Patienten waren sporadisch, aber auch autosomal-rezessive Vererbung wurde beschrieben. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare multiple congenital anomalies syndrome characterized by intrauterine growth retardation (IUGR), postnatal failure to thrive, severe feeding difficulties, microcephaly/trigonocephaly, facial dysmorphism, a recognizable upper limb posture and severe developmental delay. The upper limb posture consists of internal rotation of the shoulders, flexion of the elbows, ulnar deviation of wrists and/or metacarpophalangeal joints.", "synonyms": "BOS syndrome, Bohring syndrome, C-like syndrome, Oberklaid-Danks syndrome, Opitz trigonocephaly-like syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "605039", "umls": "C0796232", "gard": "10140", "epidemiology": "To date 46 cases have been described, less than half of which were molecularly confirmed as carrying a heterozygous pathogenic variation in ASXL1.", "clinical_description": "Bohring-Opitz syndrome (BOS) is characterized by IUGR, severe neonatal feeding difficulties, and microcephaly/trigonocephaly, cleft lip/palate and hirsutism. Facial dysmorphism is characterized by glabellar/frontal nevus flammeus, synophrys, proptosis, hypertelorism, depressed wide nasal bridge, anteverted nares, full cheeks, and micrognathia. The posture of upper limbs, common in all patients at birth, is characterized by internal rotation of the shoulders, flexion of the elbows, ulnar deviation of wrists and/or metacarpophalangeal joints. Most patients exhibit truncal hypotonia and hypertonic extremities at birth. Seizures and obstructive sleep apnea/sleep disturbances can occur during infancy. Other abnormalities can involve the following organs: brain (corpus callosum defects), eyes (retinal and optic nerve abnormalities, high myopia), heart (bradycardia, septal defect), gastrointestinal tract (cycling emesis, gastroesophageal reflux disease) as well as the joints (contractures, congenital hip/radial head dislocations).", "etiology": "BOS is due to a heterozygous pathogenic variation in ASXL1 (20q11.21), which acts as a chromatin modulator.", "diagnostic_methods": "Clinical diagnosis can be confirmed by sequencing of ASXL1 or by intellectual disability-related next generation sequencing panel including the gene. If sequencing is negative, multiplex ligation-dependent probe amplification may be used.", "differential_diagnosis": "A BOS-like phenotype related to KLHL7 has been described which has several features in common with BOS (including a similar upper limb posture) but is clinically distinguished by the absence of trigonocephaly, synophrys, high myopia and cycling emesis. Other diseases sharing several features with BOS but lacking the BOS posture include C syndrome, Shashi-Pena syndrome, Bainbridge-Ropers syndrome and Cornelia de Lange syndrome.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible on chorionic villi or amniotic fluid where the pathogenic variant has been previously identified in the family. Prenatal genetic counseling should therefore be offered to parents of patients with ASXL1 variants to discuss the genetic risks and reproductive options.", "genetic_counseling": "The disorder is autosomal dominant; however, most cases are de novo. Genetic counseling should be offered to all at-risk couples since germinal mosaicism may occur.", "management_and_treatment": "Management requires an early multidisciplinary approach. Seizures are drug-responsive. An increased risk of Wilms tumor is reported. An abdominal ultrasound every 3-4 months is suggested in the first 8 years of life.", "prognosis": "The rate of infant mortality is high. In patients who survive infancy, feeding difficulties and recurrent infections become less severe. Older patients may have some purposeful limb movements, however, their resting state returns to BOS posture. Intellectual disability ranges from severe to profound."}, {"name": "Bothriozephalosis", "sub_name": "Diphyllobothriasis", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Bothriocephalosis is a mammalian cosmopolitan intestinal parasitosis. In addition to non-specific digestive problems (nausea, abdominal pain, lack of appetite), bothriocephalosis provokes an anaemia caused by vitamin B12 deficiency that resembles Biermer anaemia (anaemia characterised by abnormally large red blood cells).", "synonyms": "Bothriocephalosis, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "B70.0", "umls": "C0012561\u00a0 C0277032", "gard": "942", "meddra": "10013029", "epidemiology": "The prevalence is Europe is unknown but more than 10 cases are reported each year, principally from the Italian, Swiss and French Alps.", "etiology": "It is an adult cestodosis caused by the large (more than 10 metres) fish tapeworm Diphyllobothrium latum. The life cycle of the parasite is complex and involves two intermediate hosts: a microscopic crustacean, followed by a freshwater fish. Mammals are contaminated through eating fleshy parts of lightly cooked, smoked or undersalted fish.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is made by examination of the stools.", "management_and_treatment": "Standard tapeworm treatments (niclosamide or praziquantel) are effective at treating this parasitosis."}, {"name": "Botulismus", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Botulismus ist eine seltene erworbene Krankheit der Muskelendplatte und gekennzeichnet durch absteigende schlaffe Parese, verursacht durch Botulinus-Neurotoxine (BoNTs). Vier klinische Formen mit unterschiedlichen Entstehungswegen werden unterschieden.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "A05.1", "UMLS": "C0006057", "MeSH": "D001906", "GARD": "943", "MedDRA": "10006041", "epidemiology": "Global wird eine Pr\u00e4valenz von weniger als 1:1.000.000 angenommen. In den westlichen L\u00e4ndern liegt die Jahres-Inzidenz bei etwa 1:2.000.000.", "clinical_description": "Abh\u00e4ngig von der jeweiligen Form betr\u00e4gt die Inkubationsperiode 12 bis 36 Stunden, u. U. auch bis zu 5-8 Tagen. Zum typischen klinischen Bild geh\u00f6ren symmetrische Paresen der Hirnnerven, gefolgt von symmetrisch absteigender motorischer Parese mit cholinerger Dysautonomie. Erste Symptome sind Visusst\u00f6rungen (Akkomodationsdefekte, Diplopie) mit bilateraler Ptose, dann folgen vegetative Symptome (trockener Mund/Augen, Mydriasis, Dysphagie, Dysarthrie, Harnverhaltung und Obstipation). In schweren F\u00e4llen betrifft die Parese den Hals, Schulter und proximale Muskeln, gefolgt von distalen Muskeln der oberen Extremit\u00e4ten, des Zwerchfells und Atemmuskulatur, evtl. nit eingeschr\u00e4nkter Atmung und Atemstillstand. Sensorik und intellektuelle Funktionen sind unbeeintr\u00e4chtigt. Die klinischen Symptome sind allen Formen gemeinsam. Der ern\u00e4hrungsbedingte Botulismus ist die h\u00e4ufigste Form bei Erwachsenen. Er ist verursacht durch die Aufnahme von Nahrungsmitteln, die mit BoNTs kontaminiert sind. Die Kolonisation des Darmes mit C. C.botulinum und die in situ-Toxin-Produktion wird bei kleinen Kindern beobachtet (S\u00e4uglingsbotulismus) seltener auch bei Erwachsenen (adulter intestinaler Botulismus). Der Inokulations-Botulismus durch Infektion von Wunden ist eine seltene Ursache und tritt v.a. bei Drogenabh\u00e4ngigen durch Injektionen auf. Auch Inhalationsbotulismus und iatrogener Botulismus wurden beschrieben.", "etiology": "Ursache des Botulismus sind BoNTs, die durch C. botulinum und sehr selten durch verwandte Clostridien, z.B. Neurotoxin produzierende St\u00e4mme von C. baratii und C. butyricum, hervorgerufen werden. Clostridien sind st\u00e4bchenf\u00f6rmige anaerobe sporenbildende Bakterien. Es gibt sieben Typen von BoNTs (A-G) mit unterschiedlichen antigenen Eigenschaften. Die Typen A, B, E und selten auch F sind mit menschlichem Botulismus assoziiert. An der Stelle der Absorbtion oder Adsorbtion diffundiert das BoNT \u00fcber das Blut zu den pr\u00e4synaptischen Membranen der cholinergen Skelettnerven und autonomen Nerven. BoNT bindet an die peripheren cholinergen Synapsen und blockiert die Aussch\u00fcttung von Azetylcholin. Hieraus resultiert eine schlaffe Parese.", "diagnostic_methods": "Im ersten Stadium ist die Diagnose rein klinisch. Das EMG ist gekennzeichnet durch kurze, kleine, in hoher Zahl auftretende Potentiale (BSAPs). Durch Nachweis von BoNT im Serum, Stuhl und/oder in Nahrungsproben wird die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt. Auch der Nachweis BoNT-produzierender Clostridien aus Kulturen entsprechender Proben unterst\u00fctzt die Diagnose.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind f\u00fcr die einzelnen Formen verschieden. Abzugrenzen sind Myasthenia gravis, Guillain-Barr\u00e9-Syndrom, Lambert-Eaton-Syndrom, bakterielle und chemische Nahrungsmittelvergiftung oder chemische Intoxikation.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung ist symptomatisch. Die Betreuung zielt auf eine St\u00fctzung der Patienten und assistierte Atmung, ggf. auf der Intensivstation. Die Antitoxin-Therapie ist wirksam, wenn sie schon bei Beginn der Symptome angewendet wird. Das gegenw\u00e4rtig in Europa verf\u00fcgbare Pr\u00e4parat f\u00fcr Erwachsene ist trivalent (Anti-A, B, E). Auch ein heptavalentes Produkt (Anti-A bis G) ist verf\u00fcgbar. In den USA werden bivaltente (Anti-A, B) und monovalente (Anti-E) Antitoxine vertrieben; f\u00fcr S\u00e4uglingsbotulismus ist ein menschliches Botulinum-Immun-Globulin (BIG-IV, Anti-A bis B) verf\u00fcgbar.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose wird durch die jeweilige Form des Botulismus bestimmt, h\u00e4ngt aber im Allgemeinen von der Schnelligkeit der Diagnose und der medizinischen Betreuung ab. Wenn die Patienten angemessen behandelt werden, ist Tod durch Atemversagen ein seltenes Ereignis.", "summary": "Global wird eine Pr\u00e4valenz von weniger als 1:1.000.000 angenommen. In den westlichen L\u00e4ndern liegt die Jahres-Inzidenz bei etwa 1:2.000.000."}, {"name": "Botulismus, ern\u00e4hrungsbedingter", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der ern\u00e4hrungsbedingte Botulismus ist die h\u00e4ufigste Form des Botulismus, einer seltenen erworbenen St\u00f6rung der motorischen Endplatte mit mit absteigender schlaffer Parese durch die Wirkung der Botulinum-Neurotoxine (BoNTs). Ursache ist der Verzehr kontaminierter, BoTSs enthaltender Nahrung.", "synonyms": "Botulismus, Lebensmittelbedingter, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "A05.1", "UMLS": "C1739094", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Die Jahres-Inzidenz in Europa liegt zwischen 1:900.000 und 1:500.000. Weltweit wurden bisher etwa 40.000 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die Symptome beginnen bei Erwachsenen in der Regel innerhalb von 12 bis 36-48 Stunden (Bereich 6 Stunden bis 15 Tage) nach Verzehr der kontaminierten Nahrung. Die Krankheit ist gekennzeichnet durch akute oder subakute, afebrile, symmetrische L\u00e4hmung der Hirnnerven, gefolgt von symmetrischer, absteigender, schlaffer motorischer L\u00e4hmung. Den neurologischen Symptomen k\u00f6nnen \u00dcbelkeit, Leibschmerzen, Erbrechen und Diarrhoe vorangehen. Bei schweren Verl\u00e4ufen sind von der L\u00e4hmung Hals, Schulter und die proximalen Muskeln betroffen, gefolgt von der L\u00e4hmung der distalen Armmuskeln, des Zwerchfells und der Atemmuskeln. Eine m\u00f6gliche Folge sind Atemschw\u00e4che oder Atemstillstand. Das Sensorium und die intellektuellen Funktionen sind nicht beeintr\u00e4chtigt. Die Schnelligkeit des Beginns und die Schwere des Verlaufes werden durch die Menge und den Typ der BoNTs bestimmt.", "etiology": "Die Krankheit wird durch den Verzehr von im Haushalt hergestellten, mit BoNTs-produzierenden Clostridien kontaminierten Konserven (hausgemachte oder traditionell in Dosen abgef\u00fcllte Nahrungsmittel, Schinken, Schweinefleischprodukte, Gem\u00fcse usw.) verursacht. Die Kontamination wird verursacht durch Wachstum und Toxinproduktion in einem anaeroben Medium, bei einem pH \u2265 4,5, bei niedriger Salz- oder Zuckerkonzentration und bei Lagerung bei \u2265 3\u00b0C. Von den 7 BoNT-Typen (A-G) sind die Typen A, B, E und, seltener, F mit nern\u00e4hrungsbedingtem Botulismus assoziiert. Die beteiligten Mikroorganismen sind Clostridium botulinum oder, sehr selten, Neurotoxin produzierende St\u00e4mme von C. butyricum oder C. baratii. Aufgenommene und resorbierte BoNTs diffundierem \u00fcber das Blut- und Lymphsystem zu den Muskelendplatten.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zu Beginn wird die Diagnose rein klinisch gestellt, nach einer den Verdacht weckenden 2-5-t\u00e4gigen Nahrungsanamnese des Patienten. Der Verzehr verd\u00e4chtiger Nahrungsmittel, das Fehlen von Fieber und m\u00f6gliche gastrointestinale Symptome werden f\u00fcr den ern\u00e4hrungsbedingten Botulismus als typisch angesehen. Der Nachweis von BoNT im Serum, im Stuhl, im Erbrochenen, in aspirierten Magensaft oder in verd\u00e4chtigten Nahrungsmitteln best\u00e4tigt die Diagnose. Der Nachweis von BoNT-produzierenden Clostridien in Stuhlkulturen ist als diagnostischer Labortest in der Regel ausreichend.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen des ern\u00e4hrungsbedingten Botulismus sind Myasthenia gravis, die Guillain-Barr\u00e9- und Miller-Fisher-Syndrome, das Lambert-Eaton-Syndrom, sowie der intestinale Botulismus und Wundbotulismus.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Antitoxin-Therapie ist wirksam, wenn Sie schon beim Einsetzen der Symptome begonnen wird. Sie muss von Betreung auf der Intensivstation begleitet sein. In Europa ist z.Zt. nicht nur ein trivalentes (Anti-A,B,E), sondern auch ein heptavalentes (Anti-A bis G) Produkt verf\u00fcgbar. In den USA sind ein bivalentes (Anti-A,B) und ein monovalentes (Anti-E) Antitoxin erh\u00e4ltlich. Die Pr\u00e4vention besteht in Befolgung der Richtlinien f\u00fcr Zubereitung und Lagerung von Nahrungsmitteln, mit dem Ziel, Sporen abzut\u00f6ten und die Keimung von Sporen und/oder die Toxinbildung zu verhindern. Die sofortige Meldung von Verdachtsf\u00e4llen an das Gesundheitsamt kann dem weiteren Verzehr kontaminierter Nahrungsmittel vorbeugen.", "prognosis": "Der ern\u00e4hrungsbedingte Botulismus hat weltweit im Mittel eine Mortalit\u00e4t von 5-10% (USA 3-5%). Die Prognose wird durch die Menge aufgenommenen Toxins und durch die Schnelligkeit der medizinischen Versorgung bestimmt. Bei fr\u00fcher Behandlung ist die Prognose in der Regel gut. M\u00f6gliche Komplikationen w\u00e4hrend des Kliniksaufenthaltes sind Nosokomialinfektionen und Ateminsuffizienz.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Die Jahres-Inzidenz in Europa liegt zwischen 1:900.000 und 1:500.000. Weltweit wurden bisher etwa 40.000 F\u00e4lle beschrieben."}, {"name": "Botulismus, iatrogener", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der iatrogene Botulismus ist in der letzten Zeit die h\u00e4ufigste Art von menschgemachtem Botulismus, einer seltenen erworbenen St\u00f6rung der Muskelendplatte mit durch Botulinum-Neurotoxine (BoNTs) verursachter absteigender schlaffer Parese. Er tritt akzidentell auf oder nach therapeutischer oder kosmetischer Anwendung.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "A05.1", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bis 2008 wurden der FDA 180 zwischen 1997 und 2006 aufgetretene F\u00e4lle gemeldet. Von diesen wurden 87 im Krankenhaus behandelt und 16 Patienten starben.", "clinical_description": "Die klinischen Symptome sind \u00e4hnlich wie bei den anderen Botulismusformen, mit symmetrischen Hirnnervenl\u00e4hmungen, gefolgt von absteigenden, symmetrischen schlaffen L\u00e4hmungen der willk\u00fcrlichen Muskeln, die bis zu Atemversagen und Tod f\u00fchren k\u00f6nnen.", "etiology": "Nach der Injektion wird das Toxin vom Blutstrom aufgenommen und im K\u00f6rper verteilt, wo es die typischen Symptome des Botulismus ausl\u00f6st. Therapeutische BoNT-Injektionen sind Mittel der ersten Wahl bei hemifazialem Spasmus und fokaler Dystonie, wie zervikaler Dystonie und Blepharospasmus. Sie k\u00f6nnen auch zur Behandlung des Strabismus, anderer St\u00f6rungen der Augenmotorik, fokaler Spastik (spastischer Fu\u00df, Spasik der oberen und unteren Gliedma\u00dfen), Reizblase, vegetativen St\u00f6rungen wie Hyperhidrose, Frey-Syndrom und Sialorrhoe erwogen werden. Eine potentielle Wirkung von BoNT-Injektionen ist die Unterdr\u00fcckung von Schmerzen. Die injizierten Toxinmengen, die besonders bei der Behandlung der Spastik der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen relativ hoch sein k\u00f6nnen, hatten Nebenwirkungen zur Folge, die als begrenzte, dem Botulismus verwandte Symptome (Ptose, Diplopie, Dysphagie) und als seltene systemische Ereignisse (grippe\u00e4hnliche Symptome, allgemeine Schw\u00e4che, Dyspnoe) mit gelegentlicher Todesfolge bei Anwendung der BoNT-Typen A und B beschrieben wurden. F\u00fcr kosmetische Behandlungen empfohlene Dosierungen sind zu niedrig um eine systemische St\u00f6rung hervorzurufen, aber die Injektion nicht-lizensierter hochkonzentrierter Pr\u00e4parate von Botulinum-Toxin kann schweren Botulismus verursachen. Alle F\u00e4lle von Botulismus m\u00fcssen gemeldet werden.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bis 2008 wurden der FDA 180 zwischen 1997 und 2006 aufgetretene F\u00e4lle gemeldet. Von diesen wurden 87 im Krankenhaus behandelt und 16 Patienten starben."}, {"name": "Botulismus, infekti\u00f6ser", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der infekti\u00f6se Botulismus ist eine Form des Botulismus, einer seltenen erworbenen St\u00f6rung der Muskelendplatte mit absteigender schlaffer L\u00e4hmung. Ursache sind im Organismus produzierte Botulinum-Neurotoxine (BoNTs) w\u00e4hrend einer toxin-vermittelten Infektion. Formen des infekti\u00f6sen Botulismus sind der Wundbotulismus und der intestinale Botulismus mit Tox\u00e4mie (S\u00e4uglingsbotulismus und adulter intestinaler Botulismus).", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "A05.1", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Weltweit wurden bisher etwa 4.000 F\u00e4lle beschrieben, am bei weitem h\u00e4ufigsten der S\u00e4uglingsbotulismus.", "clinical_description": "Die klinischen Symptome sind \u00e4hnlich wie bei den anderen Formen des Botulismus, besonders dem ern\u00e4hrungsbedingten Botulismus, jedoch fehlen Symptome von seiten des Magen-Darmtraktes (\u00dcbelkeit, Erbrechen). Beim Wundbotulismus ist zus\u00e4tzlich Fieber m\u00f6glich.", "etiology": "Ursache des infekti\u00f6sen Botulismus sind in vivo produzierte BoNTs nach Besiedelung durch C. botulinum und, sehr selten, durch neurotoxinbildende St\u00e4mme von C. baratii und C. butyricum. Der intestinale Botulismus ist bedingt durch Besiedelung des Darms und der Wundbotulismus durch Kontamination von Wunden. Heute sind besonders intraven\u00f6s spritzende Drogenabh\u00e4ngige betroffen. Nach Auskeimung der Sporen und Bildung der Toxine werden diese vom Blutstrom aufgenommen und im K\u00f6rper verteilt, wo sie die typischen Symptome des Botulismus ausl\u00f6sen.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Weltweit wurden bisher etwa 4.000 F\u00e4lle beschrieben, am bei weitem h\u00e4ufigsten der S\u00e4uglingsbotulismus."}, {"name": "Botulismus, infekti\u00f6ser kutaner", "sub_name": "Wundbotulismus", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Wundbotulismus ist eine seltene infekti\u00f6se Form des Botulismus, einer erworbenen St\u00f6rung der Muskelendplatte mit absteigender schlaffer Parese, verursacht durch Botulinum-Neurotoxine (BoNTs) nach Infektion von Wunden mit Clostridium botulinum.", "synonyms": "Botulismus, infekti\u00f6ser kutaner, Impfbotulismus, Kutaner Toxin-vermittelter Botulismus, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "A05.1", "UMLS": "C1306794", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Weltweit wurden bisher etwa 700 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die klinischen Symptome sind \u00e4hnlich wie bei den anderen Formen von Botulismus (symmetrische L\u00e4hmung der Hirnnerven, gefolgt von symmetrischer absteigender schlaffer motorischer L\u00e4hmung). besonders des ern\u00e4hrungsbedingten Botulismus, au\u00dfer dass gastro-intestinale Symptome (\u00dcbelkeit, Erbrechen, Diarrhoe) fehlen und Fieber m\u00f6glich ist. Die Krankheit stand fr\u00fcher mit Verletzungen und selten mit chirurgischen Eingriffen in Verbindung. Heute sind vor allem intraven\u00f6s spritzende Drogenabh\u00e4ngige (IDUs) betroffen, meist Erwachsene im 4. oder 5. Lebensjahrzehnt und langer Vorgeschichte von Abusus mit injizierten ('skin popping') oder inhalierten Drogen (kontaminierte Materialien oder teerschwarzes Heroin). Der Wundbotulismus ist eine infekti\u00f6se, aber nicht \u00fcbertragbare Krankheit. Die Inkubationszeit betr\u00e4gt in F\u00e4llen traumatischer Verletzungen 7 bis 14 Tage, bei IDUs ist sie schwer zu ermitteln, da diese evtl. sogar mehrmals t\u00e4glich Drogen injizieren.", "etiology": "Ursache des Wundbotulismus ist die Kolonisation von Wunden, Furunkeln, Abszessen oder Inokulationsorten durch Sporen von C. botulinum mit nachfolgender Auskeimung und BoNT-Produktion am Ort der Infektion. Das Toxin erreicht die Muskelendplatten \u00fcber das Blut. Die publizierten F\u00e4lle waren verursacht durch die Typen A und B von C. botulinum, lediglich bei 1 Fall wurde C. botulinum Typ E gefunden.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Anfangsdiagnose eines Wundbotulismus beruht auf dem klinischen Verdacht bei Patienten mit k\u00fcrzlich infizierter Wunde oder mit Drogenabusus. Gelegentlich sind Verletzungen nicht erkennbar, sodass an tiefliegende Abszesse oder Sinusitis gedacht werden sollte. Die definitive Diagnose erfordert Laboranalysen zum Nachweis von BoNTs im Serum oder in Wunden. Ein diagnostisch ausreichender Labortest ist in der Regel auch der Nachweis BoNT-produzierender Clostridien in Wundkulturen. Die Analyse von Stuhl und Nahrungsmitteln kann f\u00fcr den Ausschluss anderer Botulismusformen hilfreich sein.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind Myasthenia gravis, Guillain-Barr\u00e9-Syndrom (Miller-Fisher-Syndrom), Lambert-Eaton-Syndrom und ern\u00e4hrungsbedingter und adulter intestinaler Botulismus.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Antitoxin-Therapie ist wirksam, wenn sie schon beim Einsetzen der Symptome begonnen wird. Sie muss von Betreung auf der Intensivstation begleitet sein. In Europa ist z.Zt. nicht nur ein trivalentes (Anti-A,B,E), sondern auch ein heptavalentes (Anti-A bis G) Produkt verf\u00fcgbar. In den USA sind ein bivalentes (Anti-A,B) und ein monovalentes (Anti-E) Antitoxin erh\u00e4ltlich. Zur spezifischen Behandlung des Wundbotulismus geh\u00f6ren die chirurgische Revision der Wunde mit Sp\u00fcung zur Entfernung der Toxinquelle und antibiotische Therapie mit Penicillin und Metronidazol. Vermieden werden sollen Aminoglykoside und Clindamycin, da sie die neuromuskul\u00e4re Blockade verst\u00e4rken k\u00f6nnen.", "prognosis": "Mit angemessener intensivmedizinischer Betreuung ist die Prognose gut. Als Folge von Atemversagen versterben 7% der Patienten. Bei IDUs kann Wundbotulismus mehrfach auftreten.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Weltweit wurden bisher etwa 700 F\u00e4lle beschrieben."}, {"name": "Botulismus, inhalativer", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Inhalationsbotulismus ist eine akzidentell hervorgerufene Form des Botulismus, einer seltenen erworbenen St\u00f6rung der Muskelendplatte mit, durch Botulinum-Neurotoxine (BoNTs) verursachter, absteigender schlaffer Parese.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "A05.1", "UMLS": "C1443900", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Weltweit wurden bisher knapp 10 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die klinischen Symptome \u00e4hneln denen der anderen Formen von Botulismus, mit symetrischen L\u00e4hmungen der Hirnnerven, gefolgt von absteigender, symmetrischer schlaffer Parese der willk\u00fcrlichen Muskulatur bis hin zu Ateminsuffizienz und Tod.", "etiology": "Die Krankheit resultiert aus zuf\u00e4lliger oder gewollter Freisetzung von BoNTs als Aerosol. Nach Inhalation wird das Toxin vom Blutstrom aufgenommen und im K\u00f6rper verteilt, wo es die typischen Symptome des Botulismus ausl\u00f6st. Die Zeit bis zum Einsetzen des Inhalationsbotulismus kann wegen der geringen Fallzahl und m\u00f6glicherweise wiederholter Exposition nicht sicher angegeben werden. Akzidentelle F\u00e4lle wurden zuerst bei 3 Laborarbeitern beschrieben, in neuerer Zeit auch bei Drogenabh\u00e4ngigen mit intranasaler Anwendung von Kokain, entweder bei Sinusitis mit m\u00f6glicher Besiedelung des Sinus und Toxinproduktion oder durch direkte Resorption von fertigem Toxin in kontaminiertem Stra\u00dfenkokain durch die Nasenschleimhaut. Vors\u00e4tzliche Verbreitung von BoNTs durch Aerosol k\u00f6nnte einen Ausbruch von Inhalationsbotulismus bei einer gro\u00dfen Zahl von F\u00e4llen ohne ern\u00e4hrungsbedingte Exposition, aber mit m\u00f6glicherweise ungew\u00f6hnlichen BoNT-Typ (z.B. die Typen C, D, F, G), hervorrufen. Alle F\u00e4lle von Botulismus sind meldepflichtig.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Weltweit wurden bisher knapp 10 F\u00e4lle beschrieben."}, {"name": "Botulismus, intestinaler", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der intestinale Botulismus ist eine seltene Form des Botulismus, einer erworbenen St\u00f6rung der Muskelendplatte mit absteigender schlaffer L\u00e4hmung, verursacht durch Botulinum-Neurotoxine (BoNTs). Ursache ist eine Besiedlung des Darms durch Clostridium botulinum mit Toxinbildung und Tox\u00e4mie. Die Krankheit tritt nahezu immer bei Kindern auf (S\u00e4uglingsbotulismus) und nur sehr selten bei Erwachsenen (Adulter intestinaler Botulismus).", "synonyms": "Botulismus, intestinaler, tox\u00e4mischer, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "A05.1", "UMLS": "C1443901", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des intestinalen Botulismus ist nicht bekannt. Weltweit wurden bisher nahezu 3.400 F\u00e4lle beschrieben, dovon etwa 3.350 bei S\u00e4uglingen und nur 20 F\u00e4lle bei Erwachsenen.", "clinical_description": "Die klinischen Symptome sind \u00e4hnlich wie bei den anderen Botulismusformen, besonders dem ern\u00e4hrungsbedingten Botulismus, jedoch fehlen gastrointestinale Symptome (\u00dcbelkeit, Erbrechen, Diarrhoe).", "etiology": "Ursache der Krankheit sind Botulnum-Neurotoxine, produziert von C. botulinum der Typen A, B, E oder, sehr selten, von neurotoxinbildenden St\u00e4mmen von C. baratii Typ F und C. butyricum Typ E, die tempor\u00e4r den Darm besiedeln k\u00f6nnen. Der Befall des Darms von Erwachsenen ist in der Regel assoziiert mit anatomischen Anomalien des Magendarmtraktes oder mit einer Ver\u00e4nderung der sch\u00fctzenden endogenen Mikroflora durch Breitband-Antibiotika, die wegen entz\u00fcndlicher Darmerkrankung oder nach chirurgischen Eingriffen gegeben wurden. Bei S\u00e4uglingen ist die Darmbesiedlung vermutlich m\u00f6glich, weil eine normale sch\u00fctzende Mikroflora noch nicht vollst\u00e4ndig entwickelt ist. Nach Auskeimung der Sporen werden die Toxine gebildet, in das Blut aufgenommen und im K\u00f6rper verteilt. Danach entwickeln sich die typischen Symptome des Botulismus.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des intestinalen Botulismus ist nicht bekannt. Weltweit wurden bisher nahezu 3.400 F\u00e4lle beschrieben, dovon etwa 3.350 bei S\u00e4uglingen und nur 20 F\u00e4lle bei Erwachsenen."}, {"name": "Botulismus, intestinaler, adulter", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der adulte intestinale Botulismus ist eine sehr seltene Form des Botulismus, einer erworbenen St\u00f6rung der Muskelendplatte mit absteigender schlaffer L\u00e4hmung, verursacht durch Botulinum-Neurotoxine (BoNTs). Ursache ist die Besiedlung des Darms durch das neurotoxinbildende Clostridium botulinum und \u00dcbertritt der BoNTs in das Blut (Tox\u00e4mie).", "synonyms": "Botulismus, intestinaler, des Erwachsenen, Erwachsenenbotulismus, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "A05.1", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, bisher wurden 20 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Die Krankheit tritt bei Erwachsenen und \u00e4lteren Kindern auf.", "clinical_description": "Die Symptome sind \u00e4hnlich wie bei anderen Botulismusformen (schlaffe symmetrische L\u00e4hmung der Hirnnerven, gefolgt von symmetrischer schlaffer absteigender motorischer L\u00e4hmung). Verglichen mit dem ern\u00e4hrungsbedingten Botulismus beginnen die Symptome in der Regel allm\u00e4hlich und weniger dramatisch. Bei einigen F\u00e4llen wurde eine Diarrhoe als Folge einer gleichzeitigen Infektion mit C. difficile beschrieben.", "etiology": "Die Krankheit entwickelt sich als Folge einer l\u00e4ngerzeitigen Resorption kleiner Mengen von BoNTs, in situ produziert von C. botulinum Typ A und B oder selten von C. botulinum Typ C (1 Fall) oder durch neurotoxikogene St\u00e4mme von C. baratii Typ F oder C. butyricum Typ E, die tempor\u00e4r den Darmtrakt besiedeln k\u00f6nnen. Die Besiedelung ist in der Regel mit anatomischen Anomalien des Magen-Darmtraktes oder einer Ver\u00e4nderung der sch\u00fctzenden endogenen Mikroflora durch Breitspektrum-Antibiotika wegen entz\u00fcndlicher Darmerkrankung oder durch chrirurgische Eingriffe verbunden. Bei einigen Patienten, die wegen vermuteter Appendizitis laparatomiert wurden, verschlechterte sich die Parese, wahrscheinlich als Folge der Antibiotikatherapie nach dem chirurgischen Eingriff. Ein Meckelsches Divertikel pr\u00e4disponiert wahrscheinlich zu einer Besiedelung mit C. butyricum.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die klinischen Symptome. Der adulte intestinale Botulismus wird durch den Nachweis von BoNTs in Stuhl und Serum best\u00e4tigt. Im Stuhl k\u00f6nnen auch Suchtests auf BoNT-produzierende Clostridien durchgef\u00fchrt werden. Der Diagnose von Patienten mit sporadischem Botulismus ohne bekannte Kontamination von Nahrung oder Wunden dient der Nachweis einer l\u00e4nger andauernden Ausscheidung von Keimen und Toxin im Stuhl.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind Myasthenia gravis, Guillain-Barr\u00e9-Syndrom (Miller-Fisher-Syndrom), Lambert-Eaton-Syndrom, ern\u00e4hrungabedingter Botulismus und Wundbotulismus (s. diese Termini).", "management_and_treatment": "Die Antitoxintherapie muss unter intensiv-medizinischen Bedingungen durchgef\u00fchrt werden. Das f\u00fcr die Behandlung Erwachsener verwendete Pferde-Antitoxin hat eine Halbwertszeit von 5-8 Tagen. In Europa sind f\u00fcr die Behandlung Erwachsener trivalente (Anti-A, B. E) und heptavalente (Anti-A bis G) Produkte verf\u00fcgbar. In den USA ist ein bivalentes (Ant-A, B) und ein monovalentes (Anti-E) Antitoxin erh\u00e4ltlich. Antibiotika beeinflussen die Wirkung der Toxine nicht und k\u00f6nnen die neuromuskul\u00e4re Blockade sogar verst\u00e4rken, sind aber bei sekund\u00e4ren Infektionen n\u00fctzlich. Bei schweren Verl\u00e4ufen erfordern Ateminsuffizent und Parese evtl. wochenlange Beatmung und intensiv-medizinische Betreuung.", "prognosis": "Bei fr\u00fch beginnender Behandlung und angemessener Intensivpflege ist die Prognose in der Regel gut. Langzeit-Komplikationen wurden nicht gesehen und Tod durch Atemversagen ist extrem selten. Komplikationen w\u00e4hrend des Krankenhausaufenthaltes, auch durch nosokomiale Infektionen, sind m\u00f6glich.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, bisher wurden 20 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Die Krankheit tritt bei Erwachsenen und \u00e4lteren Kindern auf."}, {"name": "Botulismus, intestinaler, des Erwachsenen", "sub_name": "Botulismus, intestinaler, adulter", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der adulte intestinale Botulismus ist eine sehr seltene Form des Botulismus, einer erworbenen St\u00f6rung der Muskelendplatte mit absteigender schlaffer L\u00e4hmung, verursacht durch Botulinum-Neurotoxine (BoNTs). Ursache ist die Besiedlung des Darms durch das neurotoxinbildende Clostridium botulinum und \u00dcbertritt der BoNTs in das Blut (Tox\u00e4mie).", "synonyms": "Botulismus, intestinaler, des Erwachsenen, Erwachsenenbotulismus, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "A05.1", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, bisher wurden 20 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Die Krankheit tritt bei Erwachsenen und \u00e4lteren Kindern auf.", "clinical_description": "Die Symptome sind \u00e4hnlich wie bei anderen Botulismusformen (schlaffe symmetrische L\u00e4hmung der Hirnnerven, gefolgt von symmetrischer schlaffer absteigender motorischer L\u00e4hmung). Verglichen mit dem ern\u00e4hrungsbedingten Botulismus beginnen die Symptome in der Regel allm\u00e4hlich und weniger dramatisch. Bei einigen F\u00e4llen wurde eine Diarrhoe als Folge einer gleichzeitigen Infektion mit C. difficile beschrieben.", "etiology": "Die Krankheit entwickelt sich als Folge einer l\u00e4ngerzeitigen Resorption kleiner Mengen von BoNTs, in situ produziert von C. botulinum Typ A und B oder selten von C. botulinum Typ C (1 Fall) oder durch neurotoxikogene St\u00e4mme von C. baratii Typ F oder C. butyricum Typ E, die tempor\u00e4r den Darmtrakt besiedeln k\u00f6nnen. Die Besiedelung ist in der Regel mit anatomischen Anomalien des Magen-Darmtraktes oder einer Ver\u00e4nderung der sch\u00fctzenden endogenen Mikroflora durch Breitspektrum-Antibiotika wegen entz\u00fcndlicher Darmerkrankung oder durch chrirurgische Eingriffe verbunden. Bei einigen Patienten, die wegen vermuteter Appendizitis laparatomiert wurden, verschlechterte sich die Parese, wahrscheinlich als Folge der Antibiotikatherapie nach dem chirurgischen Eingriff. Ein Meckelsches Divertikel pr\u00e4disponiert wahrscheinlich zu einer Besiedelung mit C. butyricum.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die klinischen Symptome. Der adulte intestinale Botulismus wird durch den Nachweis von BoNTs in Stuhl und Serum best\u00e4tigt. Im Stuhl k\u00f6nnen auch Suchtests auf BoNT-produzierende Clostridien durchgef\u00fchrt werden. Der Diagnose von Patienten mit sporadischem Botulismus ohne bekannte Kontamination von Nahrung oder Wunden dient der Nachweis einer l\u00e4nger andauernden Ausscheidung von Keimen und Toxin im Stuhl.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind Myasthenia gravis, Guillain-Barr\u00e9-Syndrom (Miller-Fisher-Syndrom), Lambert-Eaton-Syndrom, ern\u00e4hrungabedingter Botulismus und Wundbotulismus (s. diese Termini).", "management_and_treatment": "Die Antitoxintherapie muss unter intensiv-medizinischen Bedingungen durchgef\u00fchrt werden. Das f\u00fcr die Behandlung Erwachsener verwendete Pferde-Antitoxin hat eine Halbwertszeit von 5-8 Tagen. In Europa sind f\u00fcr die Behandlung Erwachsener trivalente (Anti-A, B. E) und heptavalente (Anti-A bis G) Produkte verf\u00fcgbar. In den USA ist ein bivalentes (Ant-A, B) und ein monovalentes (Anti-E) Antitoxin erh\u00e4ltlich. Antibiotika beeinflussen die Wirkung der Toxine nicht und k\u00f6nnen die neuromuskul\u00e4re Blockade sogar verst\u00e4rken, sind aber bei sekund\u00e4ren Infektionen n\u00fctzlich. Bei schweren Verl\u00e4ufen erfordern Ateminsuffizent und Parese evtl. wochenlange Beatmung und intensiv-medizinische Betreuung.", "prognosis": "Bei fr\u00fch beginnender Behandlung und angemessener Intensivpflege ist die Prognose in der Regel gut. Langzeit-Komplikationen wurden nicht gesehen und Tod durch Atemversagen ist extrem selten. Komplikationen w\u00e4hrend des Krankenhausaufenthaltes, auch durch nosokomiale Infektionen, sind m\u00f6glich.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, bisher wurden 20 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Die Krankheit tritt bei Erwachsenen und \u00e4lteren Kindern auf."}, {"name": "Botulismus, intestinaler, tox\u00e4mischer", "sub_name": "Botulismus, intestinaler", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der intestinale Botulismus ist eine seltene Form des Botulismus, einer erworbenen St\u00f6rung der Muskelendplatte mit absteigender schlaffer L\u00e4hmung, verursacht durch Botulinum-Neurotoxine (BoNTs). Ursache ist eine Besiedlung des Darms durch Clostridium botulinum mit Toxinbildung und Tox\u00e4mie. Die Krankheit tritt nahezu immer bei Kindern auf (S\u00e4uglingsbotulismus) und nur sehr selten bei Erwachsenen (Adulter intestinaler Botulismus).", "synonyms": "Botulismus, intestinaler, tox\u00e4mischer, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "A05.1", "UMLS": "C1443901", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des intestinalen Botulismus ist nicht bekannt. Weltweit wurden bisher nahezu 3.400 F\u00e4lle beschrieben, dovon etwa 3.350 bei S\u00e4uglingen und nur 20 F\u00e4lle bei Erwachsenen.", "clinical_description": "Die klinischen Symptome sind \u00e4hnlich wie bei den anderen Botulismusformen, besonders dem ern\u00e4hrungsbedingten Botulismus, jedoch fehlen gastrointestinale Symptome (\u00dcbelkeit, Erbrechen, Diarrhoe).", "etiology": "Ursache der Krankheit sind Botulnum-Neurotoxine, produziert von C. botulinum der Typen A, B, E oder, sehr selten, von neurotoxinbildenden St\u00e4mmen von C. baratii Typ F und C. butyricum Typ E, die tempor\u00e4r den Darm besiedeln k\u00f6nnen. Der Befall des Darms von Erwachsenen ist in der Regel assoziiert mit anatomischen Anomalien des Magendarmtraktes oder mit einer Ver\u00e4nderung der sch\u00fctzenden endogenen Mikroflora durch Breitband-Antibiotika, die wegen entz\u00fcndlicher Darmerkrankung oder nach chirurgischen Eingriffen gegeben wurden. Bei S\u00e4uglingen ist die Darmbesiedlung vermutlich m\u00f6glich, weil eine normale sch\u00fctzende Mikroflora noch nicht vollst\u00e4ndig entwickelt ist. Nach Auskeimung der Sporen werden die Toxine gebildet, in das Blut aufgenommen und im K\u00f6rper verteilt. Danach entwickeln sich die typischen Symptome des Botulismus.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des intestinalen Botulismus ist nicht bekannt. Weltweit wurden bisher nahezu 3.400 F\u00e4lle beschrieben, dovon etwa 3.350 bei S\u00e4uglingen und nur 20 F\u00e4lle bei Erwachsenen."}, {"name": "Botulismus, Lebensmittelbedingter", "sub_name": "Botulismus, ern\u00e4hrungsbedingter", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der ern\u00e4hrungsbedingte Botulismus ist die h\u00e4ufigste Form des Botulismus, einer seltenen erworbenen St\u00f6rung der motorischen Endplatte mit mit absteigender schlaffer Parese durch die Wirkung der Botulinum-Neurotoxine (BoNTs). Ursache ist der Verzehr kontaminierter, BoTSs enthaltender Nahrung.", "synonyms": "Botulismus, Lebensmittelbedingter, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "A05.1", "UMLS": "C1739094", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Die Jahres-Inzidenz in Europa liegt zwischen 1:900.000 und 1:500.000. Weltweit wurden bisher etwa 40.000 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die Symptome beginnen bei Erwachsenen in der Regel innerhalb von 12 bis 36-48 Stunden (Bereich 6 Stunden bis 15 Tage) nach Verzehr der kontaminierten Nahrung. Die Krankheit ist gekennzeichnet durch akute oder subakute, afebrile, symmetrische L\u00e4hmung der Hirnnerven, gefolgt von symmetrischer, absteigender, schlaffer motorischer L\u00e4hmung. Den neurologischen Symptomen k\u00f6nnen \u00dcbelkeit, Leibschmerzen, Erbrechen und Diarrhoe vorangehen. Bei schweren Verl\u00e4ufen sind von der L\u00e4hmung Hals, Schulter und die proximalen Muskeln betroffen, gefolgt von der L\u00e4hmung der distalen Armmuskeln, des Zwerchfells und der Atemmuskeln. Eine m\u00f6gliche Folge sind Atemschw\u00e4che oder Atemstillstand. Das Sensorium und die intellektuellen Funktionen sind nicht beeintr\u00e4chtigt. Die Schnelligkeit des Beginns und die Schwere des Verlaufes werden durch die Menge und den Typ der BoNTs bestimmt.", "etiology": "Die Krankheit wird durch den Verzehr von im Haushalt hergestellten, mit BoNTs-produzierenden Clostridien kontaminierten Konserven (hausgemachte oder traditionell in Dosen abgef\u00fcllte Nahrungsmittel, Schinken, Schweinefleischprodukte, Gem\u00fcse usw.) verursacht. Die Kontamination wird verursacht durch Wachstum und Toxinproduktion in einem anaeroben Medium, bei einem pH \u2265 4,5, bei niedriger Salz- oder Zuckerkonzentration und bei Lagerung bei \u2265 3\u00b0C. Von den 7 BoNT-Typen (A-G) sind die Typen A, B, E und, seltener, F mit nern\u00e4hrungsbedingtem Botulismus assoziiert. Die beteiligten Mikroorganismen sind Clostridium botulinum oder, sehr selten, Neurotoxin produzierende St\u00e4mme von C. butyricum oder C. baratii. Aufgenommene und resorbierte BoNTs diffundierem \u00fcber das Blut- und Lymphsystem zu den Muskelendplatten.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zu Beginn wird die Diagnose rein klinisch gestellt, nach einer den Verdacht weckenden 2-5-t\u00e4gigen Nahrungsanamnese des Patienten. Der Verzehr verd\u00e4chtiger Nahrungsmittel, das Fehlen von Fieber und m\u00f6gliche gastrointestinale Symptome werden f\u00fcr den ern\u00e4hrungsbedingten Botulismus als typisch angesehen. Der Nachweis von BoNT im Serum, im Stuhl, im Erbrochenen, in aspirierten Magensaft oder in verd\u00e4chtigten Nahrungsmitteln best\u00e4tigt die Diagnose. Der Nachweis von BoNT-produzierenden Clostridien in Stuhlkulturen ist als diagnostischer Labortest in der Regel ausreichend.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen des ern\u00e4hrungsbedingten Botulismus sind Myasthenia gravis, die Guillain-Barr\u00e9- und Miller-Fisher-Syndrome, das Lambert-Eaton-Syndrom, sowie der intestinale Botulismus und Wundbotulismus.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Antitoxin-Therapie ist wirksam, wenn Sie schon beim Einsetzen der Symptome begonnen wird. Sie muss von Betreung auf der Intensivstation begleitet sein. In Europa ist z.Zt. nicht nur ein trivalentes (Anti-A,B,E), sondern auch ein heptavalentes (Anti-A bis G) Produkt verf\u00fcgbar. In den USA sind ein bivalentes (Anti-A,B) und ein monovalentes (Anti-E) Antitoxin erh\u00e4ltlich. Die Pr\u00e4vention besteht in Befolgung der Richtlinien f\u00fcr Zubereitung und Lagerung von Nahrungsmitteln, mit dem Ziel, Sporen abzut\u00f6ten und die Keimung von Sporen und/oder die Toxinbildung zu verhindern. Die sofortige Meldung von Verdachtsf\u00e4llen an das Gesundheitsamt kann dem weiteren Verzehr kontaminierter Nahrungsmittel vorbeugen.", "prognosis": "Der ern\u00e4hrungsbedingte Botulismus hat weltweit im Mittel eine Mortalit\u00e4t von 5-10% (USA 3-5%). Die Prognose wird durch die Menge aufgenommenen Toxins und durch die Schnelligkeit der medizinischen Versorgung bestimmt. Bei fr\u00fcher Behandlung ist die Prognose in der Regel gut. M\u00f6gliche Komplikationen w\u00e4hrend des Kliniksaufenthaltes sind Nosokomialinfektionen und Ateminsuffizienz.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Die Jahres-Inzidenz in Europa liegt zwischen 1:900.000 und 1:500.000. Weltweit wurden bisher etwa 40.000 F\u00e4lle beschrieben."}, {"name": "Boucher-Neuh\u00e4user-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Ataxie-Hypogonadismus-chorioretinale Dystrophie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Boucher-Neuh\u00e4user-Syndrom ist eine sehr seltene Erkrankung mit der Trias Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie, Chorioretinale Dystrophie und Hypogonadotroper Hypogonadismus. Die Vererbung ist autosomal-rezessiv. Die Ataxie beginnt in der Adoleszenz oder im fr\u00fchen Erwachsenenalter. Die Augensymptome treten erst sp\u00e4ter auf, auch noch im 6. Lebensjahrzehnt. Berichtet wurde \u00fcber verminderte Aussch\u00fcttung von Wachstumshormon nach Stimulation mit Releasing-Faktor, sowie \u00fcber insulin-induzierte Hypoglyk\u00e4mie und \u00fcber Hyperkalz\u00e4mie mit Hyperkalziurie. Ein Patient hatte einen mitochondrialen Atemketten-Defekt im Komplex I mit einer 5,5 kb gro\u00dfen Deletion in der mitochondrialen DNA aus Skelettmuskel. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A very rare autosomal recessive, slowly progressive neurodegenerative disorder characterized by the triad of cerebellar ataxia (that generally manifests at adolescence or early adulthood), chorioretinal dystrophy, which may have a later onset (up to the fifth-sixth decade) leading to variable degrees of visual impairment, and hypogonadotropic hypogonadism (delayed puberty and lack of secondary sex characteristics). Ataxia-hypogonadism-choroidal dystrophy syndrome belongs to a clinical continuum of neurodegenerative disorders along with the clinically overlapping cerebellar ataxia-hypogonadism syndrome (see this term).", "synonyms": "Boucher-Neuh\u00e4user syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.8", "omim": "215470", "umls": "C1859093", "gard": "944"}, {"name": "Bourneville-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Tuber\u00f6se Sklerose Komplex", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird in Europa auf ungef\u00e4hr 1/25.000-1/11.300 gesch\u00e4tzt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare neurocutaneous disorder characterized by multisystem hamartomas, most commonly involving the skin, brain, kidneys, lungs, eye, and heart, and associated with neuropsychiatric disorders.", "synonyms": "Bourneville syndrome, Tuberous sclerosis, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "Q85.1", "omim": "191100\u00a0 613254", "umls": "C0041341", "mesh": "D014402", "gard": "7830\u00a0 946", "meddra": "10045138", "epidemiology": "Whilst prevalence has been historically estimated at 1/10,000, more recent data from the UK and Taiwan estimates prevalence at 1/20-25,000 and 1/100,000, respectively. However, current estimates are likely an underestimate given the variability in phenotypic expression, severity and age of onset.", "clinical_description": "Skin involvement is almost constantly present, beginning as hypomelanotic macules in the first years of life and evolving to facial angiofibromas by 3-4 years, followed by ungual fibromas, cephalic and lumbar (shagreen patch) fibrous plaques, and ''confetti'' skin lesions appearing in childhood to early adolescence. Brain involvement includes cortical dysplasias (tubers), subependymal nodules, and/or subependymal giant cell astrocytoma (SEGA), and is seen in almost all cases. SEGA affects 10 to 20% of tuberous sclerosis complex (TSC) patients, almost exclusively children and young adults. Early-onset epilepsy (focal seizures and/or infantile spasms) is present in 85% of patients. TSC-Associated Neuropsychiatric Disorders (TAND) include intellectual disability, attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder, autism spectrum disorders (ASD), psychiatric disorders, neuropsychological deficits, as well as school and occupational difficulties. Renal angiomyolipomas (AML) develop during childhood with a higher risk of growth during adolescence and adulthood and manifest by pain, hematuria/retroperitoneal hemorrhage, abdominal masses, hypertension and renal failure. Lymphangioleiomyomatosis, multifocal micronodular pneumocyte hyperplasia and pulmonary cysts develop during adulthood and manifest with dyspnea, pneumothorax, or chylothorax. Cardiac rhabdomyomas appear during the fetal period, are rarely symptomatic, and tend to decrease in size in early childhood. Additional features include retinal and liver hamartomas, dental enamel pitting, intraoral fibromas, skeletal dysplasia, and rarely neuroendocrine tumors.", "etiology": "TSC is due to mutations in either TSC1 (9q34) or TSC2 (16p13.3) which encode proteins that indirectly inhibit the mTOR pathway. In excess, mTOR causes increased cell growth and proliferation, as well as disproportionate glutamate activity leading to disrupted synaptic plasticity. Expressivity of TSC is variable due to mosaicism and to genetic-epigenetic modifiers.", "diagnostic_methods": "A definite diagnosis is defined as presence of \u2265 2 major features or 1 major and \u2265 2 minor features. Possible TSC is considered in the presence of 1 major or \u2265 2 minor features. The identification of a pathogenic variant, confirms the diagnosis regardless of the clinical findings.", "differential_diagnosis": "Autosomal dominant polycystic kidney disease type 1 with tuberous sclerosis is seen in up to 5% of patients presenting with TSC and should be excluded. Other differential diagnoses include vitiligo, Ito hypomelanosis, acne, skin rash, cardiac myxoma, isolated brain tumors, pulmonary emphysema, and kidney cysts.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is made in two situations: familial cases with genetic diagnosis (amniocentesis, chorionic villus sampling) or de novo cases with the discovery of cardiac rhabdomyoma or less frequently brain abnormalities on routine pregnancy exams.", "genetic_counseling": "The disorder is autosomal dominant; however, two thirds of cases are the result of a de novo pathogenic variant. In one third of cases, TSC is inherited from one of the parents and, in such cases, genetic counseling is recommended to inform the parents that the risk of having an affected child is 50% for each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Management is multidisciplinary and includes frequent clinical follow-up as well as treatment of epilepsy, tumors, and TAND. Early referral to a specialized pediatric epilepsy center is strongly recommended. Epilepsy treatment includes the use of vigabatrin (GABA transaminase inhibitor) for infantile spasms and early onset focal seizures. For pre-symptomatic infants, video electroencephalogram monitoring is recommended to identify subtle or electrographic seizures. If vigabatrin fails, other antiseizure medicine, ketogenic diet, vagal nerve stimulation, or mTOR pathway inhibitor (everolimus) might be helpful. Early identification of candidates for epilepsy surgery is highly recommended. The developing tumors require frequent follow-up and can be treated with mTOR inhibitors or surgery.", "prognosis": "TSC is a chronic, life-long condition. As patients transition into adulthood, seizures may persist; renal and/or pulmonary issues may become more frequent and clinically significant."}, {"name": "Boutonneuse-Fieber", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare spotted fever rickettsiosis caused by infection with the tick-borne bacterium Rickettsia conorii, characterized by the onset of fever after an incubation period of about a week, followed by a centripetally spreading maculopapular rash, which may evolve into a petechial form. Accompanying symptoms are headaches, myalgia and/or arthralgia, among others. The typical ''tache noire'' may be observed at the site of the tick bite for several days. The disease is endemic in Africa, Southern Europe, and India.", "synonyms": "Mediterranean spotted fever, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "A77.1", "umls": "C0006060", "mesh": "D001907", "meddra": "10006045"}, {"name": "Bowen-Conradi-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter Lebendgeburten wird in der Population der Hutterer auf 1 pro 355 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Hutterer leben in kleinen Farmer-Kolonien in den Prairie-Provinzen und dem Great Plains von Nordamerika. Die Heterozygotenh\u00e4ufigkeit betr\u00e4gt dort bis zu 1/10. Au\u00dferhalb dieser Population gilt das BCS als sehr selten und wurde bislang nur bei 9 Patienten weltweit beschrieben, von denen keiner eine best\u00e4tigte identifizierte Mutation im EMG1-Gen besitzt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare developmental defect during embryogenesis characterized by moderate to severe prenatal and postnatal growth retardation, microcephaly, a distinctive facial appearance, profound psychomotor delay, hip and knee contractures and rockerbottom feet.", "synonyms": "Bowen syndrome, Hutterite type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "211180", "umls": "C1859405", "mesh": "C537081", "gard": "5950", "epidemiology": "Bowen-Conradi syndrome (BCS) birth prevalence is estimated at 1 per 355 within the Hutterite population living in small farming colonies in the Prairie provinces and Great Plains of North America with a carrier frequency as high as 1/10 in the Hutterite population. Outside this population, BCS is considered very rare and has only been reported clinically in 9 patients worldwide to date. To date, there are no non-Hutterite patients reported with biallelic EMG1 pathogenic variants.", "clinical_description": "Prenatally BCS is characterized by intrauterine growth retardation and often a breech presentation. BCS patients fail to thrive, experience severe feeding problems and seldom live past infancy. Distinctive malformations of the head and craniofacial region describe microcephaly at birth, micrognathia and a prominent nose with a noticeable lack of glabellar angle. BCS patients have a severe psychomotor delay, stiff joints, campodactyly or clinodactyly of the little finger and rockerbottom feet. Finger, hip and knee flexion contractures are frequently present. Less common BCS features described include cryptorchidism, seizures, cleft lip with or without cleft palate, congenital heart defect, hypospadias, renal, brain, or other malformations.", "etiology": "In the Hutterite population, BCS is over-represented secondary to a founder effect, and is due to a missense mutation in the EMG1 gene located to 12p13.3, leading to disturbances in ribosomal biosynthesis.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is typically made postnatally based on clinical manifestations and can then be confirmed with molecular testing. The diagnosis can first be identified on antenatal ultrasound; however the findings (particularly in a non-Hutterite infant) are non-specific and would likely not suggest BCS. In a Hutterite fetus, even in the absence of a positive family history, findings such as microcephaly, contractures, and rocker-bottom feet would be strongly suggestive of BCS.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes trisomy 18, COFS syndrome and fetal akinesia deformation sequence. Other conditions with microcephaly and severe growth and developmental delay such as chromosome breakage disorders, DNA damage repair disorders, microcephalic primordial dwarfisms and certain forms of carbohydrate deficient glycoprotein syndromes may also show some overlap.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "In cases with a family history, prenatal diagnosis is available and possible by amniocentesis or chorionic villus sampling and DNA analysis. Targeted mutation analysis of the Hutterite mutation is available prenatally (although rarely pursued) and in some instances carrier testing of both Hutterite parents of a presumed affected pregnancy can strengthen the possibility of diagnosis", "genetic_counseling": "BCS transmission is autosomal recessive. With the discovery of the causative mutation in the Hutterite population, carrier testing is available. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment is merely symptomatic. Feeding is significantly compromised, and most infants require tube feeding. No curative treatment is presently available. The natural history is similar to aneuploidy syndromes such as trisomy 18 and the discussion of palliative care is appropriate.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is extremely poor. Most children die within the first 2 years of life (range 1 day-9 years). Those who survive beyond 1 year of age show extreme growth failure."}, {"name": "Bowen-Syndrom, Hutteriten-Typ", "sub_name": "Bowen-Conradi-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter Lebendgeburten wird in der Population der Hutterer auf 1 pro 355 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Hutterer leben in kleinen Farmer-Kolonien in den Prairie-Provinzen und dem Great Plains von Nordamerika. Die Heterozygotenh\u00e4ufigkeit betr\u00e4gt dort bis zu 1/10. Au\u00dferhalb dieser Population gilt das BCS als sehr selten und wurde bislang nur bei 9 Patienten weltweit beschrieben, von denen keiner eine best\u00e4tigte identifizierte Mutation im EMG1-Gen besitzt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare developmental defect during embryogenesis characterized by moderate to severe prenatal and postnatal growth retardation, microcephaly, a distinctive facial appearance, profound psychomotor delay, hip and knee contractures and rockerbottom feet.", "synonyms": "Bowen syndrome, Hutterite type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "211180", "umls": "C1859405", "mesh": "C537081", "gard": "5950", "epidemiology": "Bowen-Conradi syndrome (BCS) birth prevalence is estimated at 1 per 355 within the Hutterite population living in small farming colonies in the Prairie provinces and Great Plains of North America with a carrier frequency as high as 1/10 in the Hutterite population. Outside this population, BCS is considered very rare and has only been reported clinically in 9 patients worldwide to date. To date, there are no non-Hutterite patients reported with biallelic EMG1 pathogenic variants.", "clinical_description": "Prenatally BCS is characterized by intrauterine growth retardation and often a breech presentation. BCS patients fail to thrive, experience severe feeding problems and seldom live past infancy. Distinctive malformations of the head and craniofacial region describe microcephaly at birth, micrognathia and a prominent nose with a noticeable lack of glabellar angle. BCS patients have a severe psychomotor delay, stiff joints, campodactyly or clinodactyly of the little finger and rockerbottom feet. Finger, hip and knee flexion contractures are frequently present. Less common BCS features described include cryptorchidism, seizures, cleft lip with or without cleft palate, congenital heart defect, hypospadias, renal, brain, or other malformations.", "etiology": "In the Hutterite population, BCS is over-represented secondary to a founder effect, and is due to a missense mutation in the EMG1 gene located to 12p13.3, leading to disturbances in ribosomal biosynthesis.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is typically made postnatally based on clinical manifestations and can then be confirmed with molecular testing. The diagnosis can first be identified on antenatal ultrasound; however the findings (particularly in a non-Hutterite infant) are non-specific and would likely not suggest BCS. In a Hutterite fetus, even in the absence of a positive family history, findings such as microcephaly, contractures, and rocker-bottom feet would be strongly suggestive of BCS.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes trisomy 18, COFS syndrome and fetal akinesia deformation sequence. Other conditions with microcephaly and severe growth and developmental delay such as chromosome breakage disorders, DNA damage repair disorders, microcephalic primordial dwarfisms and certain forms of carbohydrate deficient glycoprotein syndromes may also show some overlap.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "In cases with a family history, prenatal diagnosis is available and possible by amniocentesis or chorionic villus sampling and DNA analysis. Targeted mutation analysis of the Hutterite mutation is available prenatally (although rarely pursued) and in some instances carrier testing of both Hutterite parents of a presumed affected pregnancy can strengthen the possibility of diagnosis", "genetic_counseling": "BCS transmission is autosomal recessive. With the discovery of the causative mutation in the Hutterite population, carrier testing is available. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment is merely symptomatic. Feeding is significantly compromised, and most infants require tube feeding. No curative treatment is presently available. The natural history is similar to aneuploidy syndromes such as trisomy 18 and the discussion of palliative care is appropriate.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is extremely poor. Most children die within the first 2 years of life (range 1 day-9 years). Those who survive beyond 1 year of age show extreme growth failure."}, {"name": "Boxer-Demenz", "sub_name": "Dementia pugilistica", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare neurologic disease characterized by progressive neurodegeneration secondary to repetitive mild traumatic brain injuries. The clinical picture is highly variable and includes behavioral or psychiatric symptoms (such as aggression, depression, delusions, and suicidality), cognitive impairment (including diminished attention, memory deficits, executive functioning deficits, and dementia), and motor deficits (including parkinsonism, ataxia, and dysarthria). Neuropathological hallmark is the accumulation of phosphorylated tau-protein in sulci and perivascular regions.", "synonyms": "Boxer's dementia, Chronic traumatic encephalopathy, Punch-drunk syndrome, ", "icd_10": "F01.8"}, {"name": "Boyadjiev-Jabs-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Dysplasie, kranio-lentikulo-suturale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Boyadjiev-Jabs-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q75.8", "OMIM": "607812", "UMLS": "C1843042", "summary": "Die Kranio-lentikulo-suturale Dysplasie (CLSD), auch als Boyadjiev-Jabs-Syndrom bekannt, ist gekennzeichnet durch die spezifischen Assoziation von gro\u00dfen offenen Fontanellen, die sich erst sp\u00e4t verschlie\u00dfen, Hypertelorismus, fr\u00fch entstehender Katarakt und leichter generalisierter Skelettdysplasie. Das Syndrom wurde zuerst bei 21 Mitgliedern einer saudiarabischen Familie beschrieben. Seither ist eine weitere konsanguine, nicht verwandte Familie mit 6 Betroffenen beschrieben worden. Die Patienten haben abnorme Haare, eine Balkonstirn mit Hyperpigmentierung und kapill\u00e4ren H\u00e4mangiomen, Makrozephalie, signifikanten Hypertelorismus und eine prominente breite Nase. Zus\u00e4tzlich haben die Patienten mit CLSD eine Y-f\u00f6rmige Nahtkatarakt, die im Alter von 1-2 Jahren diagnostiziert wird.Alle Betroffenen sind proportional kleinw\u00fcchsig, aber nicht intellektuell eingeschr\u00e4nkt. Sie haben Plattf\u00fc\u00dfe, \u00fcberstreckbare Gelenke und ein abnormes Gebi\u00df. Skelettver\u00e4nderungen sind Skoliose, hohe und enge Beckenschaufeln und Defekte der Wirbelk\u00f6rper. Die vordere Fontanelle ist auch im Erwachsenenalter noch nicht komplett verschlossen. Das Syndrom scheint autosomal-rezessiv vererbt zu werden, aber andere Erbg\u00e4nge k\u00f6nnen noch nicht ausgeschlossen werden. Ursache der CLSD sind Mutationen im SEC23A-Gen (14q21). An die CLSD soll bei Patienten mit sp\u00e4t schlie\u00dfenden Fontanellen gedacht werden. Die Behandlung ist symptomatisch, diie Prognose ist gut. "}, {"name": "Boylan-Dew-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Hypomyelinisierung-Neuropathie-Arthrogrypose-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltenes, genetisch bedingtes Gliedma\u00dfenfehlbildungssyndrom, das durch multiple angeborene distale Gelenkkontrakturen (inkl. Klumpf\u00fc\u00dfe und proximale und distale Interphalangealgelenkkontrakturen der H\u00e4nde) und sehr schwere motorische L\u00e4hmungen bei der Geburt (d.h. Fehlen von Schlucken, autonomer Atemfunktion und tiefen Sehnenreflexen) gekennzeichnet ist und zum Tod innerhalb der ersten 3 Lebensmonate f\u00fchrt. Fetale Hypo- oder Akinesie, sp\u00e4t einsetzender Polyhydramnion und dramatisch reduzierte oder fehlende motorische Nervenleitgeschwindigkeiten (<10 m/s) sind h\u00e4ufig assoziiert. Die ultrastrukturelle Morphologie der Nerven zeigt schwere Anomalien der Ranvier-Knoten und der myelinisierten Axone.", "synonyms": "Boylan-Dew-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q68.8", "OMIM": "616286\u00a0 616287\u00a0 617468\u00a0 618186"}, {"name": "BPAN", "sub_name": "Beta-propeller-Protein-assoziierte Neurodegeneration", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Beta-propeller protein-associated neurodegeneration (BPAN), also known as static encephalopathy of childhood with neurodegeneration in adulthood, is a rare form of neurodegeneration with brain iron accumulation (NBIA) characterized by early-onset developmental delay and further neurological deterioration in early adulthood.", "synonyms": "BPAN, NBIA5, Neurodegeneration with brain iron accumulation type 5, SENDA, Static encephalopathy of childhood with neurodegeneration in adulthood, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G23.0", "omim": "300894", "gard": "12570"}, {"name": "BPD", "sub_name": "Dysplasie, bronchopulmonale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Bronchopulmonale Dysplasie ist eine chronische Atemwegserkrankung, die entweder bei Fr\u00fchgeborenen als Komplikation (Sch\u00e4digung der Lunge) w\u00e4hrend der Behandlung des Atemnotsyndroms oder bei \u00e4lteren Kindern als Folge einer abnormen Entwicklung der Lunge auftritt. Klinische Zeichen sind Tachypnoe, Tachykardie und Zeichen von Atemnot wie interkostale Einziehungen, expiratorisches St\u00f6hnen und Nasenfl\u00fcgeln.", "synonyms": "BPD, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "P27.1", "UMLS": "C0006287", "MeSH": "D001997", "GARD": "5962", "MedDRA": "10006475"}, {"name": "BPDCN", "sub_name": "CD4+/CD56+ h\u00e4matoderme Neoplasie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare hematologic neoplasm characterized by origin from precursors of plasmacytoid dendritic cells, with frequent cutaneous, bone marrow, and lymph node involvement, as well as leukemic dissemination. Most common clinical presentation is with asymptomatic solitary or multiple skin lesions (either isolated purplish nodules, isolated bruise-like papules, or disseminated purplish nodules/macules/papules), although some patients may present with leukemia. Skin biopsy shows a diffuse, monomorphous infiltrate of medium-sized blast cells resembling either lymphoblasts or myeloblasts, with massive involvement of the dermis. The clinical course is aggressive, and age has an adverse impact on prognosis.", "synonyms": "BPDCN, Blastic NK-cell lymphoma, Blastic plasmacytoid dendritic cell neoplasm, Lymphoblastoid variant of NK-cell lymphoma, Monomorphic NK-cell lymphoma, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Elderly", "icd_10": "C86.4", "gard": "10556"}, {"name": "BPES", "sub_name": "Blepharophimose-Epicanthus inversus-Ptosis-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Blepharophimose-Epikanthus inversus-Ptose-Syndrom (BPES) ist ein erbliches Syndrom, mit dem sich etwa 100 Publikationen befassen. Manche Arbeiten beschreiben Stammb\u00e4ume mit vielen Betroffenen, andere nur Einzelf\u00e4lle. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist wahrscheinlich weniger als 1/5.000. BPES-Patienten haben eine Blepharophimose (verengte Lidspalten), Ptose, Telekanthus (vergr\u00f6\u00dferter Abstand der inneren Augenwinkel) und Epicanthus inversus (Hautfalte, die vom Unterlid nach innen oben zieht und teilweise den inneren Augenwinkel bedeckt). Zwei Subtypen des BPES wurden voneinander abgegrenzt. Beim Typ 1 sind die Lidanomalien mit Ovarialinsuffizienz und vorzeitiger Menopause und daraus resultierender Infertilit\u00e4t assoziiert. Beim Typ 2 sind nur die Lidanomalien vorhanden. Die Vererbung ist in beiden F\u00e4llen autosomal-dominant. Ursache beider Typen sind Mutationen im FOXL2-Gen in der Region 3q23. Etwa die H\u00e4lfte der F\u00e4lle sind Neumutationen. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare ophthalmic disorder characterized by blepharophimosis, ptosis, epicanthus inversus, and telecanthus, that can appear associated with (type 1) or without primary ovarian insufficiency (POI; type 2).", "synonyms": "BPES, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q10.3", "omim": "110100", "umls": "C0220663", "epidemiology": "The worldwide prevalence is unknown.", "clinical_description": "A congenital disorder characterized by a complex bilateral eyelid malformation including blepharophimosis, ptosis, epicanthus inversus and telecanthus. Other ophthalmic manifestations that are usually associated include lacrimal duct anomalies, amblyopia, strabismus, refractive errors and a lateral displacement of the inferior lacrimal puncta. Additional features include a broad nasal bridge, low-set ears, and a short philtrum. Affected females may develop POI, and are thus considered to have BPES type 1. Females without POI are classed as BPES type 2.", "etiology": "The disorder is caused by an intragenic mutation (80%), gene deletion (10-12%), deletions of regulatory elements outside of the FOXL2 gene (3q23)(<5%), and translocations involving the FOXL2 region. FOXL2 encodes a forkhead transcription factor that contains a typical DNA-binding forkhead domain and a polyalanine tract of 14 residues strictly conserved in mammals. FOXL2 is expressed in peri-ocular tissues as well as in the fetal and adult ovaries.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on presence at birth of the 4 major eyelids features with or without POI (amenorrhea for greater than 6 months, less than age 40 years and follicle stimulating hormone concentration greater than 40 IU/L). The clinical diagnosis is confirmed by the identification of a genetic defect in the FOXL2 gene or its regulatory region.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnoses includes those conditions in which ptosis or blepharophimosis are major features. However, this disorder can be relatively easily distinguished from most of these conditions as its facial appearance is very typical.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Genetic prenatal testing may be possible where the pathogenic variant has been previously identified in an affected family member.", "genetic_counseling": "Whilst the disorder can occur sporadically (de novo), the pattern of inheritance is typically autosomal dominant and genetic counseling for affected families should be offered. Penetrance for the eyelid phenotype is complete and presence of POI varies between families. Germline mosaicism has been described as well as a recessive mutation (one family) involving a polyalanine expansion of intermediate length.", "management_and_treatment": "The surgical management is traditionally performed in two stages and involves a medial canthoplasty for correction of the blepharophimosis, epicanthus inversus, and telecanthus at ages 3 to 5 years, followed about a year later by ptosis correction. However, when ptosis is severe, surgical repair is recommended before age 3 years. Ophthalmologic follow-up is important for management of the oculoplastic surgery. All female patients should be assessed and followed up for POI. Management of POI is multidisciplinary ( requiring a geneticist, endocrinologist, gynaecologist) should include counseling of the patient and relatives. Egg donation may be considered as a reproductive option. In the case of a detectable ovarian reserve, therapeutic counseling can lead to fertility preservation.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is good and patients have a normal lifespan."}, {"name": "BPES plus", "sub_name": "Blepharophimose-Epicanthus inversus-Ptosis-Syndrom plus", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "BPES plus, Mikrodeletionssyndrom 3q23, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "BPES Typ 1", "sub_name": "Blepharophimose-Ptosis-Epicanthus inversus-Syndrom Typ 1", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "BPES Typ 1, Blepharophimose-Ptosis-Epicanthus inversus-Syndrom mit vorzeitiger Ovarialinsuffizienz, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich", "OMIM": "110100", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Blepharophimose-Epicanthus inversus-Ptosis-Syndrom"}, {"name": "BPES Typ 2", "sub_name": "Blepharophimose-Ptosis-Epicanthus inversus-Syndrom Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "BPES Typ 2, Blepharophimose-Ptosis-Epicanthus inversus-Syndrom ohne vorzeitige Ovarialinsuffizienz, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich", "OMIM": "110100", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Blepharophimose-Epicanthus inversus-Ptosis-Syndrom"}, {"name": "B-PLL", "sub_name": "B-Zell-Prolymphozytenleuk\u00e4mie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare mature B-cell neoplasm characterized by clonal proliferation of B-cell prolymphocytes, with prolymphocytes constituting more than 55% of lymphoid cells in peripheral blood. IG genes are clonally rearranged. Neoplastic cells are present in the bone marrow, peripheral blood, and spleen. Patients usually present with B symptoms, massive splenomegaly but absent or minimal lymphadenopathy, rapidly increasing lymphocyte count, anemia, and thrombocytopenia. Therapy response is poor.", "synonyms": "B-PLL, ", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "C91.3", "umls": "C0475801", "mesh": "D054403", "gard": "8223"}, {"name": "BPNST", "sub_name": "Nervenscheidentumor, benigner peripherer", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "BPNST, ", "GARD": "7180", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Brachialplexitis, akute", "sub_name": "Neuralgische Amyotrophie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Neuralgische Amyotrophie (NA) ist eine seltene St\u00f6rung des peripheren Nervensystems mit pl\u00f6tzlich einsetzenden extremen Schmerzen in den oberen Extremit\u00e4ten und schnell folgender multifokaler Muskelschw\u00e4che und -atrophie. Danach setzt langsam, \u00fcber mehrere Monate oder Jahre, die Erholung ein. Die NA umfasst eine idiopathische (INA, auch als Parsonage-Turner-Syndrom bezeichnet) und eine erbliche (HNA) Form.", "synonyms": "Armplexusneuritis, Brachial-Plexus-Neuropathie, autoimmune, Brachialplexitis, akute, Neuralgische Schultermyatrophie, Schulterg\u00fcrtel-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G54.5", "OMIM": "162100", "UMLS": "C0221759\u00a0 C1510479", "GARD": "4228", "MedDRA": "10063020", "epidemiology": "Die Inzidenz der NA wird auf 1/50.000-1/30.000 gesch\u00e4tzt, jedoch sind zu geringe Erkennung und anf\u00e4ngliche Fehldiagnosen h\u00e4ufig. Es wird angenommen, dass die INA 10 Mal h\u00e4ufiger ist als die HNA.", "clinical_description": "Die NA kann in jedem Alter auftreten, jedoch wird sie an h\u00e4ufigsten in der dritten bis siebenten Lebensdekade beobachtet. M\u00e4nner sind h\u00e4ufiger betroffen als Frauen. Die Krankheit beginnt bei Patienten mit HNA in der Regel fr\u00fcher als bei Patienten mit INA, aber klinisch sind beide nahezu ununterscheidbar. Das klassische Erscheinungsbild (71% der F\u00e4lle) zeigt sich mit pl\u00f6tzlichem Auftreten von brennenden oder stechenden Schmerzen, meist in den Schultern, im Hals und/oder in den Armen, mit Verbreitung entlang des oberen Plexus brachialis. Diese Schmerzen sind in der Regel unerbittlich, sie verschlimmern sich nachts und dauern etwa 3 Wochen an. Einige Stunden bis Wochen nach dem ersten Einsetzen der Schmerzen folgen Schw\u00e4che in den periskapul\u00e4ren und periglenohumeralen Muskeln. Weitere Symptome k\u00f6nnen aufgrund der Beteiligung von Nerven au\u00dferhalb des Plexus brachialis auftreten, etwa des Plexus lumbosacralis oder der phrenischen Nerven. Patienten mit HNA und SEPT9-R88W-Punktmutation zeigen charakteristische K\u00f6rpermerkmale (z.B. Hypotelorismus, schr\u00e4ge Lidspalten, Epikanthus, ovales Gesicht, Gaumenspalte). Bei einigen Patienten zeigt sich ein rezidivierender/remittierender Verlauf mit symptomfreien Intervallen, w\u00e4hrend bei anderen eine unvollst\u00e4ndige Heilung mit einer bleibenden neurologischen Beeintr\u00e4chtigung eintritt. Rezidive k\u00f6nnen auftreten (75% bei der HNA und 25% bei der INA) und ein persistierender Schmerz im Bewegungsapparat entwickelt sich bei 2/3 der Patienten.", "etiology": "Die \u00c4tiologie ist nicht genau bekannt, aber es wird angenommen, dass genetische, autoimmune und \u00e4u\u00dfere Faktoren beteiligt sind. Der Plexus brachialis ist anf\u00e4llig f\u00fcr eine mechanische Verletzung und f\u00fcr Attacken, die durch eine immunvermittelte Reaktion in diesem Nerv verursacht werden. Eine Virusinfektion oder Immunisierung kann einer NA vorausgehen. Bakterielle und parasitische Infektionen, eine Operation, eine An\u00e4sthesie, eine rheumatische Erkrankung, Trauma, Schwangerschaft und Geburt wurden als m\u00f6gliche mitwirkende Faktoren f\u00fcr NA-Attacken genannt. Die HNA ist in 50% der F\u00e4lle mit einer Punktmutation oder Duplizierung des Suszeptibilit\u00e4tsgens SEPT9 (17q25.3) assoziiert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf den typischen klinischen Merkmalen und dem Ausschluss anderer St\u00f6rungen (z.B. Neuroborreliose, zervikale Radikulopathie oder Pancoast-Syndrom) durch Labortests, Elektromyographie, Aufnahmen der Halswirbels\u00e4ule und Darstellung des Plexus brachialis. Bei Verdacht auf eine HNA kann ein molekulargenetischer Test zum Nachweis einer SEPT9-Mutation eingesetzt werden, da jedoch die HNA genetisch heterogen ist, schlie\u00dft ein negativer Test die Diagnose nicht aus.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine pr\u00e4natale Diagnose wird nicht routinem\u00e4\u00dfig angeboten.", "genetic_counseling": "Gegenstand der genetischen Beratung ist die Analyse des Suszeptibilit\u00e4tsgens f\u00fcr HNA.", "management_and_treatment": "Zur Behandlung in der akuten Phase geh\u00f6rt das Schmerzmanagement, das sich vor allem auf eine Kombination von langwirkenden Opioiden und nicht-steroidalen Antirheumatika st\u00fctzt. Patienten mit chronischen Schmerzen k\u00f6nnen Co-Analgetika gegeben werden. Orales Prednison verringert die Dauer der Schmerzen und beschleunigt die Rekonvaleszenz bei einigen Patienten, wenn es in den ersten Wochen einer Schmerzattacke gegeben wird. Eine t\u00e4gliche Dosis von 1mg/kg \u00fcber 1 Woche, die w\u00e4hrend der zweiten Woche nach und nach verringert wird, wird empfohlen. Eine Nachuntersuchung alle 6 Monate wird empfohlen. Heute gilt eine Rehabilitationstherapie als wichtig und eine \u00fcberm\u00e4\u00dfige Belastung des betroffenen Bereichs sollte vermieden werden.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist unterschiedlich, gilt aber als gut und die Patienten erreichen nach 1-2 Jahren wieder 70-90% ihrer vorherigen Gesundheit. Allerdings bleibt bei vielen eine Intoleranz gegen Sport\u00fcbungen und eine schwache Muskelkoordination in den betroffenen und den kompensierenden Muskeln. Die Lebensqualit\u00e4t kann bei Patienten mit nur unvollst\u00e4ndiger Erholung eingeschr\u00e4nkt sein, jedoch erh\u00f6hen eine fr\u00fche Diagnose und eine geeignete Behandlung die Chancen f\u00fcr eine vollst\u00e4ndige Wiederherstellung der Funktionsf\u00e4higkeit.", "summary": "Die Inzidenz der NA wird auf 1/50.000-1/30.000 gesch\u00e4tzt, jedoch sind zu geringe Erkennung und anf\u00e4ngliche Fehldiagnosen h\u00e4ufig. Es wird angenommen, dass die INA 10 Mal h\u00e4ufiger ist als die HNA."}, {"name": "Brachial-Plexus-Neuropathie, autoimmune", "sub_name": "Neuralgische Amyotrophie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Neuralgische Amyotrophie (NA) ist eine seltene St\u00f6rung des peripheren Nervensystems mit pl\u00f6tzlich einsetzenden extremen Schmerzen in den oberen Extremit\u00e4ten und schnell folgender multifokaler Muskelschw\u00e4che und -atrophie. Danach setzt langsam, \u00fcber mehrere Monate oder Jahre, die Erholung ein. Die NA umfasst eine idiopathische (INA, auch als Parsonage-Turner-Syndrom bezeichnet) und eine erbliche (HNA) Form.", "synonyms": "Armplexusneuritis, Brachial-Plexus-Neuropathie, autoimmune, Brachialplexitis, akute, Neuralgische Schultermyatrophie, Schulterg\u00fcrtel-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G54.5", "OMIM": "162100", "UMLS": "C0221759\u00a0 C1510479", "GARD": "4228", "MedDRA": "10063020", "epidemiology": "Die Inzidenz der NA wird auf 1/50.000-1/30.000 gesch\u00e4tzt, jedoch sind zu geringe Erkennung und anf\u00e4ngliche Fehldiagnosen h\u00e4ufig. Es wird angenommen, dass die INA 10 Mal h\u00e4ufiger ist als die HNA.", "clinical_description": "Die NA kann in jedem Alter auftreten, jedoch wird sie an h\u00e4ufigsten in der dritten bis siebenten Lebensdekade beobachtet. M\u00e4nner sind h\u00e4ufiger betroffen als Frauen. Die Krankheit beginnt bei Patienten mit HNA in der Regel fr\u00fcher als bei Patienten mit INA, aber klinisch sind beide nahezu ununterscheidbar. Das klassische Erscheinungsbild (71% der F\u00e4lle) zeigt sich mit pl\u00f6tzlichem Auftreten von brennenden oder stechenden Schmerzen, meist in den Schultern, im Hals und/oder in den Armen, mit Verbreitung entlang des oberen Plexus brachialis. Diese Schmerzen sind in der Regel unerbittlich, sie verschlimmern sich nachts und dauern etwa 3 Wochen an. Einige Stunden bis Wochen nach dem ersten Einsetzen der Schmerzen folgen Schw\u00e4che in den periskapul\u00e4ren und periglenohumeralen Muskeln. Weitere Symptome k\u00f6nnen aufgrund der Beteiligung von Nerven au\u00dferhalb des Plexus brachialis auftreten, etwa des Plexus lumbosacralis oder der phrenischen Nerven. Patienten mit HNA und SEPT9-R88W-Punktmutation zeigen charakteristische K\u00f6rpermerkmale (z.B. Hypotelorismus, schr\u00e4ge Lidspalten, Epikanthus, ovales Gesicht, Gaumenspalte). Bei einigen Patienten zeigt sich ein rezidivierender/remittierender Verlauf mit symptomfreien Intervallen, w\u00e4hrend bei anderen eine unvollst\u00e4ndige Heilung mit einer bleibenden neurologischen Beeintr\u00e4chtigung eintritt. Rezidive k\u00f6nnen auftreten (75% bei der HNA und 25% bei der INA) und ein persistierender Schmerz im Bewegungsapparat entwickelt sich bei 2/3 der Patienten.", "etiology": "Die \u00c4tiologie ist nicht genau bekannt, aber es wird angenommen, dass genetische, autoimmune und \u00e4u\u00dfere Faktoren beteiligt sind. Der Plexus brachialis ist anf\u00e4llig f\u00fcr eine mechanische Verletzung und f\u00fcr Attacken, die durch eine immunvermittelte Reaktion in diesem Nerv verursacht werden. Eine Virusinfektion oder Immunisierung kann einer NA vorausgehen. Bakterielle und parasitische Infektionen, eine Operation, eine An\u00e4sthesie, eine rheumatische Erkrankung, Trauma, Schwangerschaft und Geburt wurden als m\u00f6gliche mitwirkende Faktoren f\u00fcr NA-Attacken genannt. Die HNA ist in 50% der F\u00e4lle mit einer Punktmutation oder Duplizierung des Suszeptibilit\u00e4tsgens SEPT9 (17q25.3) assoziiert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf den typischen klinischen Merkmalen und dem Ausschluss anderer St\u00f6rungen (z.B. Neuroborreliose, zervikale Radikulopathie oder Pancoast-Syndrom) durch Labortests, Elektromyographie, Aufnahmen der Halswirbels\u00e4ule und Darstellung des Plexus brachialis. Bei Verdacht auf eine HNA kann ein molekulargenetischer Test zum Nachweis einer SEPT9-Mutation eingesetzt werden, da jedoch die HNA genetisch heterogen ist, schlie\u00dft ein negativer Test die Diagnose nicht aus.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine pr\u00e4natale Diagnose wird nicht routinem\u00e4\u00dfig angeboten.", "genetic_counseling": "Gegenstand der genetischen Beratung ist die Analyse des Suszeptibilit\u00e4tsgens f\u00fcr HNA.", "management_and_treatment": "Zur Behandlung in der akuten Phase geh\u00f6rt das Schmerzmanagement, das sich vor allem auf eine Kombination von langwirkenden Opioiden und nicht-steroidalen Antirheumatika st\u00fctzt. Patienten mit chronischen Schmerzen k\u00f6nnen Co-Analgetika gegeben werden. Orales Prednison verringert die Dauer der Schmerzen und beschleunigt die Rekonvaleszenz bei einigen Patienten, wenn es in den ersten Wochen einer Schmerzattacke gegeben wird. Eine t\u00e4gliche Dosis von 1mg/kg \u00fcber 1 Woche, die w\u00e4hrend der zweiten Woche nach und nach verringert wird, wird empfohlen. Eine Nachuntersuchung alle 6 Monate wird empfohlen. Heute gilt eine Rehabilitationstherapie als wichtig und eine \u00fcberm\u00e4\u00dfige Belastung des betroffenen Bereichs sollte vermieden werden.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist unterschiedlich, gilt aber als gut und die Patienten erreichen nach 1-2 Jahren wieder 70-90% ihrer vorherigen Gesundheit. Allerdings bleibt bei vielen eine Intoleranz gegen Sport\u00fcbungen und eine schwache Muskelkoordination in den betroffenen und den kompensierenden Muskeln. Die Lebensqualit\u00e4t kann bei Patienten mit nur unvollst\u00e4ndiger Erholung eingeschr\u00e4nkt sein, jedoch erh\u00f6hen eine fr\u00fche Diagnose und eine geeignete Behandlung die Chancen f\u00fcr eine vollst\u00e4ndige Wiederherstellung der Funktionsf\u00e4higkeit.", "summary": "Die Inzidenz der NA wird auf 1/50.000-1/30.000 gesch\u00e4tzt, jedoch sind zu geringe Erkennung und anf\u00e4ngliche Fehldiagnosen h\u00e4ufig. Es wird angenommen, dass die INA 10 Mal h\u00e4ufiger ist als die HNA."}, {"name": "Brachmann-de Lange-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Cornelia de Lange-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die gesch\u00e4tzte Pr\u00e4valenz in der Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung liegt zwischen 1:62.500 und 1 :45.000.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare multiple congenital anomalies syndrome characterized by facial dysmorphism, hypertrichosis, mild to profound intellectual disability, intrauterine growth restriction (IUGR) and/or postnatal growth restriction, feeding difficulties, abnormalities of the hands and feet (ranging from severe reductional limb abnormalities, oligodactyly, to brachymetacarpia of the first metacarpus). Variable visceral malformations may be present.", "synonyms": "Brachmann-de Lange syndrome, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0X-linked recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q87.1", "omim": "122470\u00a0 300590\u00a0 300882\u00a0 610759\u00a0 614701", "umls": "C0270972", "mesh": "D003635", "gard": "10109", "meddra": "10056354", "epidemiology": "In Europe, the prevalence at birth of Cornelia de Lange syndrome (CdLS) is estimated at 1/80,000.", "clinical_description": "Distinctive facial features include: well-defined arched eyebrows, synophrys, long eyelashes, short nose, concave nasal ridge, anteverted nares, micrognathia, long smooth philtrum, and downturned corners of the mouth with a thin upper lip. Feeding difficulties and failure to thrive are frequently complicated by gastroesophageal reflux. Global developmental delay, in particular speech delay evolves towards intellectual disability ranging from mild to profound. Various behavioral disorders have been reported (anxiety, autistic traits/autism, shyness, compulsive obsessional disorder, self-injurious behavior, psychiatric disorders). Hearing loss is possible as well as various cardiac, renal, skeletal, gastrointestinal, and genital malformations.", "etiology": "Causative pathogenic variants in six genes involved in structural or regulatory components of the cohesin complex have been identified. NIPBL variants (5p13.2) are the most common cause (70% of patients). Less frequently involved genes include: SMC1A (Xp11.22-p11.21) associated with an X-linked form of CdLS, SMC3 (10q25) missense variants associated with a non-classical phenotype, RAD21 (8q24.11) mainly non-classical phenotype, HDAC8 (Xq13.1) implicated in an X-linked CdLS with some distinctive features, and BRD4 (19p13.12) recently associated with non-classical or mild CdLS. Genotype-phenotype correlations can be made to a certain extent, severe forms are more frequently associated with NIPBL.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is often suspected on clinical presentation and a clinical diagnosis can be confirmed for the classical phenotype if full criteria are met. The diagnosis is confirmed by genetic testing for up to 70% of patients presenting a classical phenotype. Gene panels should at least include the causal genes as wells as genes from differential diagnoses (e.g. ANKRD11). Somatic mosaicism occurs quite frequently in CdLS (15%) and saliva or buccal cell swabs should be considered as preferred sample for genetic testing.", "differential_diagnosis": "Hypertrichosis is common in other syndromes that affect chromatin/transcription regulation genes such as Coffin Siris Syndrome, Wiedemann Steiner Syndrome, Rubinstein Taybi syndrome, CHOPS syndrome, etc. Other differential diagnoses include mucopolysaccharidosis, fetal alcohol syndrome, and Smith Lemli Opitz syndrome among others. There are overlapping features between KBG syndrome and mild or atypical CdLS.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal ultrasound examination may show IUGR, organ malformations (diaphragmatic hernia, limb defects), increased nuchal thickness, and abnormal facial profile. Prenatal genetic testing can be proposed when the pathogenic variant has been previously identified in a family member.", "genetic_counseling": "Most cases are sporadic. Occasionally, familial transmission occurs, following an autosomal dominant pattern. Genetic counseling can be difficult in milder forms given some inter-individual variability. Germline mosaicism explains recurrence cases when the pathogenic variant is not detected in parents. X-linked forms (SMC1A, HDAC8) require specific genetic counseling.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no cure for the disorder but psychoeducational care is necessary. Failure to thrive and gastroesophageal reflux require specific care: tube feeding, gastrotomy and Nissen anti-reflux intervention. Screening for multi-visceral or sensorineural complications helps to improve quality of life.", "prognosis": "Life expectancy with appropriate care is typically unaltered but follow-up data is lacking. Life expectancy can be reduced in case of severe or untreated organ malformations. Quality of life is mostly altered by severe limb defects, behavioral disorders and psychiatric disorders. Hearing impairment can be difficult to diagnose and has been reported to improve with time in some adults."}, {"name": "Brachydaktylie A6", "german_description": "Brachymesophalangie, mesomel verk\u00fcrzte Gliedma\u00dfen, Anomalien der Karpal- und Tarsalknochen Die Brachydaktylie A6 ist gekennzeichnet durch gemeinsames Auftreten von Brachydaktylie, mesomel verk\u00fcrzten Gliedma\u00dfen und Anomalien der Karpal- und Tarsalknochen. Im allgemeinen haben die Patienten eine leicht verminderte K\u00f6rpergr\u00f6\u00dfe. Das Syndrom wurde in 1 Verwandtschaft bei 7 betroffenen Angeh\u00f6rigen aus 3 Generationen beschrieben. Die Vererbung scheint autosomal-dominant zu sein. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Brachydactyly A6 (BDA6) is characterized by brachymesophalangy with mesomelic short limbs, and carpal and tarsal bone abnormalities. In general, the affected individuals are of slightly short stature and normal intelligence. The syndrome has been described in a kindred with seven affected members from three generations. Transmission appears to be autosomal dominant.", "synonyms": "Osebold-Remondini syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q73.8", "omim": "112910", "umls": "C1862130", "mesh": "C537092", "gard": "983"}, {"name": "Brachydaktylie-arterielle Hypertension-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Kombination von Brachydaktylie und Bluthochdruck ist selten. Sie ist in weniger als 10 Familien mit weniger als 100 Patienten beschrieben worden. Die meisten Patienten sind T\u00fcrken aus einer kleinen Region an der nord\u00f6stlichen Schwarzmeer-K\u00fcste. Das Syndrom wurde auch bei japanischen, US-amerikanischen und kanadischen Familien beschrieben. Ein umfangreicher, gut dokumentierter Stammbaum aus der T\u00fcrkei erm\u00f6glichte eine Kopplungsanalyse mit Kartierung des dominant-erblichen Gens zwischen die DNA-Marker D12S364 und D12S87 in der Region 12p12.2-p11.2. Die Aktivit\u00e4t des Renin-Angiotensin-Systems und das Sympathische Nervensystem sind bei den Patienten normal, und der Hochdruck ist nicht salz-sensitiv, eine Konstellation \u00e4hnlich einer Essentiellen Hypertonie. Die Betroffenen haben einen schweren Hypertonus, der auf antihypertensive Therapie anspricht. Unbehandelt sterben sie etwa mit 50 Jahren am Schlaganfall. Eine Retinopathia hypertonica ist selten. Magnetresonanz-Bildgebung (MRI) zeigte bei allen 15 untersuchten Patienten, aber nicht bei den gesunden Angeh\u00f6rigen, Schleifen in den hinteren und unteren Kleinhirnarterien, die \u00fcber eine neurovaskul\u00e4re Kompression evtl. die Hypertonie ausl\u00f6sen. Die Brachydaktylie ist vom Typ E und betrifft haupts\u00e4chlich die Metacarpalia. Die Phalangen sind normal oder verk\u00fcrzt. Die Patienten haben meist einen proportionierten Minderwuchs. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Brachydactyly - arterial hypertension is a rare genetic brachydactyly syndrome characterized by the association of brachydactyly type E (see this term) with hypertension (due to vascular or neurovascular anomalies) as well as the additional features of short stature and low birth weight (compared to non-affected family members), stocky build and a round face. The onset of hypertension is often in childhood and, if untreated, most patients will have had a stroke by the age of 50.", "synonyms": "Bilginturan brachydactyly, Bilginturan syndrome, Brachydactyly type E, with short stature and hypertension, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q73.8", "omim": "112410", "umls": "C1862170", "gard": "967"}, {"name": "Brachydaktylie - Ellenbogen-/Handgelenk-Dysplasie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Brachydactyly-elbow wrist dysplasia syndrome is a rare, genetic bone development disorder characterized by dysplasia of all the bony components of the elbow joint, abnormally shaped carpal bones, wrist joint radial deviation and brachydactyly. Patients typically present with slight flexion at the elbow joints (with impossibilty to perform active extension) and usually associate a limited range of motion of the elbow, wrist and finger articulations. Camptodactyly and syndactyly have also been reported.", "synonyms": "Brachydactyly-joint dysplasia syndrome, Liebenberg syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "icd_10": "Q73.8", "omim": "186550", "gard": "966"}, {"name": "Brachydaktylie - Gelenkdysplasie", "sub_name": "Brachydaktylie - Ellenbogen-/Handgelenk-Dysplasie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Brachydactyly-elbow wrist dysplasia syndrome is a rare, genetic bone development disorder characterized by dysplasia of all the bony components of the elbow joint, abnormally shaped carpal bones, wrist joint radial deviation and brachydactyly. Patients typically present with slight flexion at the elbow joints (with impossibilty to perform active extension) and usually associate a limited range of motion of the elbow, wrist and finger articulations. Camptodactyly and syndactyly have also been reported.", "synonyms": "Brachydactyly-joint dysplasia syndrome, Liebenberg syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "icd_10": "Q73.8", "omim": "186550", "gard": "966"}, {"name": "Brachydaktylie-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Mikrodeletionssyndrom 2q37", "german_description": "Charakteristische Symptome des Albright-\u00e4hnlichen Syndroms sind Minderwuchs, \u00dcbergewicht, Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung, Minderbegabung und Brachymetapodie oder Brachydaktylie Typ E (die Verk\u00fcrzung der Finger ist vor allem durch Anomalien der Metacarpalia und Metatarsalia verursacht). Die Krankheit \u00e4hnelt der Heredit\u00e4ren Osteodystrophie Albright und wurde mit unterschiedlich Kombinationen dieser Symptome bisher bei 10 Patienten beschrieben. Im Gegensatz zu den Befunden beim Morbus Albright haben die Patienten keine Weichteil-Verkn\u00f6cherungen und keine St\u00f6rungen des Parathormons und des Kalzium-Stoffwechsels. Auch der Gs-Alpha-Spiegel ist normal. De novo-Deletionen der Chromosomenbande 2q37 sind z.T. schon mikroskopisch erkennbar und werden sonst mit molekular-zytogenetischen Methoden nachgewiesen. Durch Deletionskartierung bei einem Patienten mit einer unbalancierten Translokation wurde die kritische Region auf den Bereich 2q37-qter eingeengt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare chromosomal anomaly involving deletion of chromosome band 2q37 and characterized by a broad spectrum of clinical findings including mild-moderate developmental delay/intellectual disability, brachymetaphalangy of digits 3-5, short stature, obesity, hypotonia, specific facial dysmorphism, abnormal behavior, autism or autism spectrum disorder, joint hypermobility/dislocation, and scoliosis.", "synonyms": "Albright hereditary osteodystrophy type 3, Albright hereditary osteodystrophy-like syndrome, Brachydactyly-intellectual disability syndrome, Del(2)(q37), Deletion 2q37, Monosomy 2q37qter, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q93.5", "omim": "600430", "umls": "C2931817", "mesh": "C538317", "gard": "10202", "epidemiology": "To date, more than 150 individuals have been reported worldwide. Females are more frequently affected (60%).", "clinical_description": "A congenital malformation syndrome with a variable presentation. The phenotype includes mild-to-moderate developmental delay or intellectual deficit, hypotonia (50 to 65% of patients), seizures (20%-35%), brachymetaphalangism (50%), short stature (23%), characteristic facial dysmorphism (sparse scalp hair, round face, prominent forehead, upslanting palpebral fissures, sparse and arched eyebrows, deep-set eyes, midface hypoplasia, a depressed nasal bridge, deficient nasal alae and prominent columella, V-shaped appearance of the nasal tip, thin vermillion border of the lips, and a high-arched palate) and a tendency toward obesity with age. Behavioral disorders are common and may include repetitive behavior, severe communication and social interaction deficits, stereotypic movements, intermittent aggressiveness, hyperactivity, attention deficit disorder, obsessive-compulsive disorder and sleep disturbances. The following clinical features are also frequent: widely set, distally placed or supernumerary nipples, fifth finger clinodactyly, syndactyly, and small hands/feet, syndactyly of the fingers or toes, persistent fetal finger pads and a single palmar crease, and microcephaly or macrocephaly. Eczema is often present. Major malformations occur in 30% of patients with 2q37 deletions and may include congenital heart, gastrointestinal (30% of patients), genitourinary (11% of cases) and central nervous system malformations (6% of patients).", "etiology": "The deletion involves the terminal region of chromosome 2 with breakpoints at or within band 2q37. A few genotype-phenotype correlations have been identified including a critical region for the Albright hereditary osteodystrophy-like phenotype. The genes in 2q37 involved in the clinical signs previously mentioned include CAPN10, PRLH, HDLBP, PER2 for the weight, GBC1, GPR35, STK25, PDCD1, GBX2, TWIST2, FARP2, PER2 for skeletal disorders, GBX2, TWIST2, FARP2, PER2, PRLH, HDLBP, TRPM8, AGAP1, KIF1A, PASK, ATG4B for behavioral disorders, and HDAC4 which is essential for the development of the brain, muscle, and bone. The deletion of Mir-562 is linked to Wilms tumor.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis relies on cytogenetic analysis and molecular characterization. Screening for a translocation should also be conducted as the deletion may be the result of the transmission of a derivative chromosome.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnosis should include other segmental aneusomy syndromes and Prader-Willi syndrome. The group of pseudohypoparathyroidism with Albright hereditary osteodystrophy should also be included in the differential diagnosis but calcium, phosphorus, and parathyroid hormone levels are in the normal range in patients with deletion 2q37.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Genetic antenatal diagnosis is feasible where the deletion or associated rearrangement has previously been identified in a family member. A prenatal diagnosis might be proposed as for any de novo abnormal chromosomal rearrangement because of potential germinal mosaicism.", "genetic_counseling": "Most cases arise de novo; however, familial chromosomal rearrangements have been identified in a small proportion of cases. The subsequent risk to siblings of a proband depends on the specific chromosome rearrangement in the parent. Theoretically, a patient with pure 2q37 deletion will have a 50% risk to transmit the deletion.", "management_and_treatment": "Management should be multidisciplinary and include a comprehensive evaluation of the major clinical criteria. Speech, physical and occupational therapy are required. The patients will need careful medical screening between birth and 5 years, for potential associated malformation, and follow up in referal centers for intellectual disabled patients.", "prognosis": "The prognosis is very different between children some are mildly affected and other have severe intellectual disability. They have often cognitive difficulties and most of them attend special schools. At the age of 20 most of them are not autonomous and some develop psychiatric disorders."}, {"name": "Brachydaktylie-Kleinwuchs-Mikrozephalie-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Feingold-Syndrom Typ 2", "german_description": "Das FS2 ist extrem selten und wurde bislang nur f\u00fcr 3 Patienten beschrieben.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic congenital malformation syndrome characterized by microcephaly, short stature, digital anomalies (brachymesophalangy, fifth finger clinodactyly, syndactyly of toes and hypoplastic thumbs) and mild intellectual disabilities but that lacks the manifestations of gastrointestinal atresia.", "synonyms": "Brachydactyly-short stature-microcephaly syndrome, Brunner-Winter syndrome type 2, FGLDS2, FS2, MMT type 2, Microcephaly-digital anomalies-normal intelligence syndrome type 2, Microcephaly-intellectual disability-tracheoesophageal fistula syndrome type 2, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "614326", "epidemiology": "Feingold syndrome type 2 (FS2) is extremely rare with less than 20 patients described in the literature to date.", "clinical_description": "FS2 patients present with microcephaly, brachydactyly, brachymesophalangy of the second and fifth fingers, hypoplastic thumbs and toe syndactyly as seen in FS1. Mild intellectual disability is also noted. Unlike FS1, patients with FS2 lack any form of gastrointestinal atresia and they do not display short palpebral fissures.", "etiology": "FS2 is thought to be caused by a hemizygous deletion in the MIR17HG gene on chromosome 13q31.3. This is the first example of a syndromic development deficit in humans that is caused by a miRNA gene.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is suspected on clinical presentation and can be confirmed by high-resolution CGH (comparative genomic hybridization) arrays.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis of FS2 includes FS type 1 (FS1), VACTERL association, CHARGE syndrome, brachydactyly type A4 and Fanconi anemia.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal testing is possible in FS2 families with a known MIR17HG mutation or deletion.", "genetic_counseling": "FS2 is inherited in an autosomal dominant manner; however, most cases arise de novo. Genetic counseling is possible.", "management_and_treatment": "Extensive medical examinations are needed to identify possible anomalies of the heart or kidneys. Management of FS2 typically centers for long-term medical sequelae. Occupational therapy / surgical intervention for finger/toe anomalies may be required. Renal and cardiac anomalies should receive the standard treatments and prophylactic antibiotics may be beneficial. Special education is recommended for children and adults with learning deficits. Hearing loss should equally be monitored by an audiologist. Cochlear implants are possible in certain cases.", "prognosis": "Prognosis depends on congenital malformations (especially cardiac and renal anomalies) present. If optimal surgical correction is achievable, the prognosis can be relatively positive, though some patients will continue to be affected by their congenital malformations throughout life."}, {"name": "Brachydaktylie-Kleinwuchs-Retinitis pigmentosa-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Brachydactyly-short stature-retinitis pigmentosa syndrome is a rare, genetic, congenital limb malformation syndrome characterized by mild to severe short stature, brachydactyly, and retinal degeneration (usually retinitis pigmentosa), associated with variable intellectual disability, developmental delays, and craniofacial anomalies.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "250410", "umls": "C1855188"}, {"name": "Brachydaktylie, mesomele, mit mentaler Retardierung und Herzfehlern", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltenes, genetisch bedingtes Dysmorphie-Syndrom mit multiplen kongenitalen Anomalien. Es ist gekennzeichnet durch Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung, Intelligenzminderung, d\u00fcnnen Habitus mit schmalen Schultern, mesomele Verk\u00fcrzung der Arme, kraniofaziale Dysmorphien (z. B. langes Untergesicht, Oberkieferhypoplasie, Schnabelnase, kurze Columella, Prognathie, hochgew\u00f6lbter Gaumen, stumpfer Unterkieferwinkel), Brachydaktylie (meist an den Mittelgliedern) und kardiovaskul\u00e4re Anomalien (z. B. Aortenwurzelerweiterung, Mitralklappenprolaps).", "synonyms": "Stratton-Garcia-Young-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "GARD": "5036"}, {"name": "Brachydaktylie mit langem Daumen", "german_description": "Das Syndrom wurde 1981 in einer Familie bei 4 Mitgliedern aus 3 Generationen beschrieben. Weitere F\u00e4lle sind seitdem nicht bekannt geworden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Brachydactyly - long thumb syndrome is a very rare autosomal dominant heart-hand syndrome (see this term) that is characterized by bisymmetric brachydactyly accompanied by long thumbs, joint anomalies (restriction of motion at the shoulder and metacarpophalangeal joints) and cardiac conduction defects. Additional features include small hands and feet, clinodactyly, narrow shoulders with short clavicles, pectus excavatum and mild shortness of the limbs, cardiomegaly and murmur of pulmonic stenosis.It has been described in four family members from three generations, with no new cases having been reported since 1981.", "synonyms": "Brachydactyly, long thumb type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.2", "omim": "112430", "umls": "C1862169", "gard": "968"}, {"name": "Brachydaktylie - Nystagmus - zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch Brachydaktylie, Nystagmus und zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie. Es wurde in 1 Familie bei Angeh\u00f6rigen aus 4 Generationen beschrieben. Einige Patienten waren geistig behindert und hatten einen Strabismus. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare multiple congenital anomalies/dysmorphic syndrome characterized by brachydactyly, nystagmus, and cerebellar ataxia. Intellectual deficit and strabismus have also been reported. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1934.", "synonyms": "Biemond syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "113400", "umls": "C1862099", "gard": "971"}, {"name": "Brachydaktylie, pr\u00e4axiale - Hallux varus", "german_description": "Das Pr\u00e4axiale-Brachydaktylie-Hallux-varus-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch die Assoziation von Hallux varus und kurzen Daumen und Gro\u00dfzehen (unter Einbeziehung der Metakarpalia, Metatarsalia und Endphalangen, bei normal langen Grundphalangen). Daumen und Gro\u00dfzehen sind im Grundgelenk abduziert. Das Syndrom wurde in 1 Familie bei 8 Betroffenen aus 4 aufeinander folgenden Generationen beschrieben. Alle Betroffenen hatten ein intellektuelles Defizit. Die Vererbung scheint autosomal-dominant zu sein. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare congenital limb malformation characterized the association of hallux varus with short thumbs and first toes (involving the metacarpals, metatarsals, and distal phalanges; the proximal and middle phalanges are of normal length) and abduction of the affected digits. Intellectual deficit was observed in all reported individuals. There have been no further reports since 1994.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q73.8", "omim": "112450", "umls": "C1862162", "gard": "972"}, {"name": "Brachydaktylie - Skoliose - karpale Fusion", "sub_name": "Akrodysplasie - Skoliose", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic dysostosis disorder characterized by brachydactyly and other finger/toe anomalies (short and/or wide metacarpals, abnormal or absent metatarsals, broad halluces), carpal synostosis, fused cervical vertebrae, scoliosis and spina bifida occulta. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1984.", "synonyms": "Brachydactyly-scoliosis-carpal fusion syndrome, Prata-Liberal-Goncalves syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.5", "umls": "C2931761\u00a0 C2931790", "mesh": "C538180\u00a0 C538277", "gard": "491"}, {"name": "Brachydaktylie-Syndaktylie Typ Zhao", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Typ Zhao der Brachydaktylie-Syndaktylie ist ein k\u00fcrzlich beschriebenes Syndrom, das den Typ A4 der Brachydaktylie (kurze Mittelphalangen der zweiten und f\u00fcnften Finger, sowie fehlende Mittelphalangen der zweiten und f\u00fcnften Zehe) mit einer Syndaktylie der zweiten und dritten Zehe verbindet. H\u00e4ufig bestehen gleichzeitig Anomalien der Metacarpalia und Metatarsalia.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q73.8", "OMIM": "610713", "epidemiology": "Dieses Syndrom wurde in zwei Familien beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Ursache sind Mutationen im HOXD13-Gen (2q31-q32). Das Syndrom wird autosomal dominant vererbt.", "summary": "Dieses Syndrom wurde in zwei Familien beschrieben."}, {"name": "Brachydaktylie Typ A1", "german_description": "Die Brachydaktylie Typ A1 (BDA1) ist eine angeborene Fehlbildung mit an allen Fingern verk\u00fcrzten oder fehlenden Mittelphalangen und gelegentlicher Fusion von Mittel- und Endphalangen. Nur wenige Familien wurden bisher beschrieben. Die Grundphalanx der Daumen und Gro\u00dfzehen ist verk\u00fcrzt. Die Betroffenen haben als Erwachsene eine eher geringe K\u00f6rpergr\u00f6\u00dfe. Eine der Ursachen der BDA1 sind Mutationen im 'Indian hedgehog'-Gen (IHH, 2q35-36). Ein weiterer Genort wurde in die Chromosomenregion 5p13.3-p13.2 kartiert. Die BDA1 wird autosomal-dominant vererbt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, congenital limb malformation characterized by shortened or underdeveloped middle phalanges of all digits, that are sometimes fused with the terminal phalanges. The proximal phalanges of the thumbs and big toes are also shortened. Short stature in adulthood has been reported in association.", "synonyms": "Brachydactyly, Farabee type, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q73.8", "omim": "112500\u00a0 607004\u00a0 615072\u00a0 616849", "umls": "C1862151", "mesh": "C537088", "gard": "978"}, {"name": "Brachydaktylie Typ A2", "german_description": "Die Brachydaktylie Typ A2 (BDA2) ist eine angeborene Fehlbildung und gekennzeichnet durch Verk\u00fcrzung, Hypoplasie oder Aplasie der Mittelphalanx des Zeigefingers und manchmal auch des Kleinfingers. Nur wenige F\u00e4lle wurden bisher beschrieben. Charakteristisch ist die dreieckige Form der Mittelphalanx des Zeigefingers. In schweren F\u00e4llen ist der Zeigefinger nach radial verbogen. Mutationen in jeweils einem von zwei Genen f\u00fchren zu BDA2: BMPR1B (4q23-q24) und GDF5 (20q11.2). Andere Mutationen im GDF5-Gen sind Ursache der Brachydaktylie C (s. dort). Angenommen wird autosomal-dominante Vererbung. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, congenital limb malformation characterized by shortening (hypoplasia or aplasia) of the middle phalanges of the index finger and, sometimes, of the fifth finger. On radiographs, the middle phalanx of the index fingers often appear triangular and in severely affected cases, the index finger is curved radially. The lower limb phenotype is generally milder.", "synonyms": "Brachydactyly, Mohr-Wriedt type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q73.8", "omim": "112600", "umls": "C1832702", "mesh": "C537089", "gard": "979"}, {"name": "Brachydaktylie Typ A4", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene angeborene Gliedma\u00dfenfehlbildung, die durch kurze Mittelphalangen des 2. und 5. Fingers und das Fehlen der Mittelphalangen der Zehen 2 bis 5 gekennzeichnet ist. Gelegentlich kann auch der 4. Finger betroffen sein und zeigt sich mit einer abnormal geformten Mittelphalanx, die eine radiale Abweichung der distalen Phalanx verursacht. Andere Hand-/Fu\u00dffehlbildungen, wie Syndaktylie, Polydaktylie, Repositionsdefekte und Symphalangismus, k\u00f6nnen assoziiert sein.", "synonyms": "Brachydaktylie Typ Temtamy, Brachymesophalangie II und V, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q73.8", "OMIM": "112800", "UMLS": "C1862139", "GARD": "990"}, {"name": "Brachydaktylie Typ A7", "german_description": "Die Brachydaktylie A7 (Typ Sm\u00f8rgasbord) ist eine Form von Brachydaktylie mit Merkmalen der Brachydaktylien Typ A2 (verk\u00fcrzte Mittelphalanx des Zeige- und manchmal auch des Kleinfingers) und D (verk\u00fcrzte Daumen-Endphalanx) und verschiedenen weiteren Zeichen. Der Typ A7 wurde in 1 Familie beschrieben. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare dysostosis with brachydactyly characterized by variable combinations of features of brachydactyly types A2 (such as delta-shaped middle phalanx of the second finger or toe) and D (short, broad distal phalanx of the thumb) and other types of brachydactyly (symphalangism), as well as unique features (dislocatable thumbs, lateral deviation of second toes with elevation of first toes). There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1989.", "synonyms": "Brachydactyly, Smorgasbord type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q73.8", "gard": "984"}, {"name": "Brachydaktylie Typ B", "german_description": "Die Brachydaktylie Typ B (BDB) ist eine sehr seltene angeborene Fehlbildung und gekennzeichnet durch Hypoplasie oder Aplasie der der terminalen Anteile der Finger II-V, mit vollst\u00e4ndigem Fehlen der Fingern\u00e4gel. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, nur wenige F\u00e4lle wurden in der Literatur beschrieben. Die Daumen sind immer vollst\u00e4ndig angelegt, deren Endphalangen aber h\u00e4ufig abgeflacht, gespalten oder dupliziert. Auf der radialen Seite der Hand sind die Finger weniger schwer betroffen als auf der ulnaren Seite. Die Zehen sind ebenfalls betroffen, aber weniger schwer als die Finger. H\u00e4utige Syndaktylie, Symphalangie, Karpal- und Tarsalfusionen und Verk\u00fcrzung von Metakarpalia und/oder Metatarsalia sind weitere m\u00f6gliche Symptome. Die BDB wird autosomal-dominant vererbt. Die meisten F\u00e4lle sind durch eine Mutation im ROR2-Gen (9q22) verursacht. Es kodiert f\u00fcr den receptor kinase-like orphan receptor 2. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare congenital limb malformation syndrome characterized by hypoplasia or aplasia of the terminal parts of fingers 2 to 5, with complete absence of the fingernails. The thumbs are always intact but frequently show flattening, splitting or duplication of the distal phalanges. Digits on the radial side of the hand are less severely affected than those on the ulnar side. The feet are similarly affected but less severely. Soft tissue syndactyly, symphalangism, carpal and/or tarsal fusions and shortening of metacarpals and/or metatarsals may be present.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q73.8", "omim": "113000\u00a0 611377", "umls": "C1300267", "gard": "985"}, {"name": "Brachydaktylie Typ B1", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare subtype of brachydactyly type B characterized by hypoplasia or aplasia of the distal phalanges of digits 2-5 with or without nail dysplasia, in association with fusion of the middle and distal phalanges, a broad or bifid thumb, and occasionally distal and proximal symphalangism or syndactyly. The feet are less severely affected than the hands.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal", "omim": "113000"}, {"name": "Brachydaktylie Typ B2", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A clinical subtype of brachydactyly type B characterized by hypoplasia/aplasia of distal and/or middle phalanges in fingers and toes II-V (frequently severe in fingers/toes IV-V, milder in fingers/toes II-III) in association with proximal, and occasionally distal, symphalangism, fusion of carpal/tarsal bones and partial cutaneous syndactyly. Additional reported features include proximal placement of thumbs, sensorineural hearing loss and farsightedness.", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q73.8", "omim": "611377", "umls": "C1969652"}, {"name": "Brachydaktylie Typ C", "german_description": "Die Brachydaktylie Typ C (BDC) ist eine sehr seltene angeborene Fehlbildung und gekennzeichnet durch Brachymesophalangie der Finger II, III und V, Hyperphalangie der Finger II und III und Verk\u00fcrzung des Metacarpale I. Nur wenige Familien mit BDC wurden bisher beschrieben. Der Ringfinger ist meist der l\u00e4ngste Finger. Gelegentlich werden verk\u00fcrzte Metakarpalia und Symphalangien gesehen. Bei Patienten mit BDC wurden heterozygote Mutationen im GDF5-Gen (20q11.2) gefunden. Das Gen kodiert f\u00fcr das cartilage-derived morphogenetic protein 1 (growth / differentiation factor-5). Mehrere Untersuchungen belegen die autosomal-dominante Vererbung der BDC. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare congenital limb malformation characterized by hypoplastic middle phalanges of fingers 2, 3, and 5, with relative sparing of finger 4, as well as hyperphalangy most commonly affecting fingers 2 and 3, shortening of the first metacarpal with short thumb, and ulnar deviation of fingers 2 and 3. The severity of the malformation is highly variable.", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q73.8", "omim": "113100", "umls": "C1300268\u00a0 C1862103", "mesh": "C537093", "gard": "986"}, {"name": "Brachydaktylie Typ E", "german_description": "Die Brachydaktylie E (BDE) ist eine angeborene Fingerfehlbildung mit unterschiedlich starker Verk\u00fcrzung der Metakarpalia, mehr oder weniger normal langen Phalangen, oft aber kurzen Endphalangen. Die BDE ist sehr selten. Manchmal sind auch die Metatarsalia verk\u00fcrzt. Ein eindrucksvolles Symptom ist die \u00dcberstreckbarkeit der Handgelenke. Die K\u00f6rpergr\u00f6\u00dfe der Betroffenen ist m\u00e4\u00dfig verringert. Die BDE wird autosomal-dominant mit variabler Expressivit\u00e4t vererbt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Brachydactyly type E (BDE) is a congenital malformation of the digits characterized by variable shortening of the metacarpals with more or less normal length phalanges, although the terminal phalanges are often short.", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q73.8", "omim": "113300\u00a0 613382", "umls": "C0265312", "gard": "987", "epidemiology": "BDE is very rare.", "clinical_description": "Occasionally, the metatarsals are also short. Hyperextensibility of the hand joints is a striking feature. Axial triradius may occur. Affected individuals may be of moderately short stature.", "etiology": "BDE may be due to mutations in the PTHLH gene (12p12.1-p11.2) or HOXD13 (2q31-q32).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "It is inherited as an autosomal dominant trait with variable expressivity."}, {"name": "Brachydaktylie Typ E mit Kleinwuchs und Bluthochdruck", "sub_name": "Brachydaktylie-arterielle Hypertension-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Kombination von Brachydaktylie und Bluthochdruck ist selten. Sie ist in weniger als 10 Familien mit weniger als 100 Patienten beschrieben worden. Die meisten Patienten sind T\u00fcrken aus einer kleinen Region an der nord\u00f6stlichen Schwarzmeer-K\u00fcste. Das Syndrom wurde auch bei japanischen, US-amerikanischen und kanadischen Familien beschrieben. Ein umfangreicher, gut dokumentierter Stammbaum aus der T\u00fcrkei erm\u00f6glichte eine Kopplungsanalyse mit Kartierung des dominant-erblichen Gens zwischen die DNA-Marker D12S364 und D12S87 in der Region 12p12.2-p11.2. Die Aktivit\u00e4t des Renin-Angiotensin-Systems und das Sympathische Nervensystem sind bei den Patienten normal, und der Hochdruck ist nicht salz-sensitiv, eine Konstellation \u00e4hnlich einer Essentiellen Hypertonie. Die Betroffenen haben einen schweren Hypertonus, der auf antihypertensive Therapie anspricht. Unbehandelt sterben sie etwa mit 50 Jahren am Schlaganfall. Eine Retinopathia hypertonica ist selten. Magnetresonanz-Bildgebung (MRI) zeigte bei allen 15 untersuchten Patienten, aber nicht bei den gesunden Angeh\u00f6rigen, Schleifen in den hinteren und unteren Kleinhirnarterien, die \u00fcber eine neurovaskul\u00e4re Kompression evtl. die Hypertonie ausl\u00f6sen. Die Brachydaktylie ist vom Typ E und betrifft haupts\u00e4chlich die Metacarpalia. Die Phalangen sind normal oder verk\u00fcrzt. Die Patienten haben meist einen proportionierten Minderwuchs. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Brachydactyly - arterial hypertension is a rare genetic brachydactyly syndrome characterized by the association of brachydactyly type E (see this term) with hypertension (due to vascular or neurovascular anomalies) as well as the additional features of short stature and low birth weight (compared to non-affected family members), stocky build and a round face. The onset of hypertension is often in childhood and, if untreated, most patients will have had a stroke by the age of 50.", "synonyms": "Bilginturan brachydactyly, Bilginturan syndrome, Brachydactyly type E, with short stature and hypertension, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q73.8", "omim": "112410", "umls": "C1862170", "gard": "967"}, {"name": "Brachydaktylie Typ Farabee", "sub_name": "Brachydaktylie Typ A1", "german_description": "Die Brachydaktylie Typ A1 (BDA1) ist eine angeborene Fehlbildung mit an allen Fingern verk\u00fcrzten oder fehlenden Mittelphalangen und gelegentlicher Fusion von Mittel- und Endphalangen. Nur wenige Familien wurden bisher beschrieben. Die Grundphalanx der Daumen und Gro\u00dfzehen ist verk\u00fcrzt. Die Betroffenen haben als Erwachsene eine eher geringe K\u00f6rpergr\u00f6\u00dfe. Eine der Ursachen der BDA1 sind Mutationen im 'Indian hedgehog'-Gen (IHH, 2q35-36). Ein weiterer Genort wurde in die Chromosomenregion 5p13.3-p13.2 kartiert. Die BDA1 wird autosomal-dominant vererbt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, congenital limb malformation characterized by shortened or underdeveloped middle phalanges of all digits, that are sometimes fused with the terminal phalanges. The proximal phalanges of the thumbs and big toes are also shortened. Short stature in adulthood has been reported in association.", "synonyms": "Brachydactyly, Farabee type, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q73.8", "omim": "112500\u00a0 607004\u00a0 615072\u00a0 616849", "umls": "C1862151", "mesh": "C537088", "gard": "978"}, {"name": "Brachydaktylie Typ Mohr-Wriedt", "sub_name": "Brachydaktylie Typ A2", "german_description": "Die Brachydaktylie Typ A2 (BDA2) ist eine angeborene Fehlbildung und gekennzeichnet durch Verk\u00fcrzung, Hypoplasie oder Aplasie der Mittelphalanx des Zeigefingers und manchmal auch des Kleinfingers. Nur wenige F\u00e4lle wurden bisher beschrieben. Charakteristisch ist die dreieckige Form der Mittelphalanx des Zeigefingers. In schweren F\u00e4llen ist der Zeigefinger nach radial verbogen. Mutationen in jeweils einem von zwei Genen f\u00fchren zu BDA2: BMPR1B (4q23-q24) und GDF5 (20q11.2). Andere Mutationen im GDF5-Gen sind Ursache der Brachydaktylie C (s. dort). Angenommen wird autosomal-dominante Vererbung. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, congenital limb malformation characterized by shortening (hypoplasia or aplasia) of the middle phalanges of the index finger and, sometimes, of the fifth finger. On radiographs, the middle phalanx of the index fingers often appear triangular and in severely affected cases, the index finger is curved radially. The lower limb phenotype is generally milder.", "synonyms": "Brachydactyly, Mohr-Wriedt type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q73.8", "omim": "112600", "umls": "C1832702", "mesh": "C537089", "gard": "979"}, {"name": "Brachydaktylie Typ Sm\u00f8rgasbord", "sub_name": "Brachydaktylie Typ A7", "german_description": "Die Brachydaktylie A7 (Typ Sm\u00f8rgasbord) ist eine Form von Brachydaktylie mit Merkmalen der Brachydaktylien Typ A2 (verk\u00fcrzte Mittelphalanx des Zeige- und manchmal auch des Kleinfingers) und D (verk\u00fcrzte Daumen-Endphalanx) und verschiedenen weiteren Zeichen. Der Typ A7 wurde in 1 Familie beschrieben. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare dysostosis with brachydactyly characterized by variable combinations of features of brachydactyly types A2 (such as delta-shaped middle phalanx of the second finger or toe) and D (short, broad distal phalanx of the thumb) and other types of brachydactyly (symphalangism), as well as unique features (dislocatable thumbs, lateral deviation of second toes with elevation of first toes). There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1989.", "synonyms": "Brachydactyly, Smorgasbord type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q73.8", "gard": "984"}, {"name": "Brachydaktylie Typ Temtamy", "sub_name": "Brachydaktylie Typ A4", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene angeborene Gliedma\u00dfenfehlbildung, die durch kurze Mittelphalangen des 2. und 5. Fingers und das Fehlen der Mittelphalangen der Zehen 2 bis 5 gekennzeichnet ist. Gelegentlich kann auch der 4. Finger betroffen sein und zeigt sich mit einer abnormal geformten Mittelphalanx, die eine radiale Abweichung der distalen Phalanx verursacht. Andere Hand-/Fu\u00dffehlbildungen, wie Syndaktylie, Polydaktylie, Repositionsdefekte und Symphalangismus, k\u00f6nnen assoziiert sein.", "synonyms": "Brachydaktylie Typ Temtamy, Brachymesophalangie II und V, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q73.8", "OMIM": "112800", "UMLS": "C1862139", "GARD": "990"}, {"name": "Brachymesophalangie II und V", "sub_name": "Brachydaktylie Typ A4", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene angeborene Gliedma\u00dfenfehlbildung, die durch kurze Mittelphalangen des 2. und 5. Fingers und das Fehlen der Mittelphalangen der Zehen 2 bis 5 gekennzeichnet ist. Gelegentlich kann auch der 4. Finger betroffen sein und zeigt sich mit einer abnormal geformten Mittelphalanx, die eine radiale Abweichung der distalen Phalanx verursacht. Andere Hand-/Fu\u00dffehlbildungen, wie Syndaktylie, Polydaktylie, Repositionsdefekte und Symphalangismus, k\u00f6nnen assoziiert sein.", "synonyms": "Brachydaktylie Typ Temtamy, Brachymesophalangie II und V, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q73.8", "OMIM": "112800", "UMLS": "C1862139", "GARD": "990"}, {"name": "Brachymetapodie - Anodontie - Hypotrichose - Albinismus", "sub_name": "Okulo-osteo-kutanes Syndrom", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch kongenitale Anodontie, kleine Maxilla, Minderwuchs mit verk\u00fcrzten Metacarpalia und Metatarsalia, sp\u00e4rliches Haar, Albinismus und multiple Augenanomalien. Es wurde bei 3 Geschwistern (1 Bruder, 2 Schwestern) beschrieben. Die Vererbung ist autosomal-rezessiv. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare multiple congenital anomalies/dysmorphic syndrome characterized by short stature and particularly pronounced shortening of the third to fifth metacarpals and metatarsals, congenital anodontia, sparse hair, dyspigmentation of the skin, hypoplastic nipples and underdeveloped external genitals in females, and multiple ocular abnormalities (such as distichiasis, strabismus, nystagmus, lenticular opacities, and severe myopia, among others). Dysmorphic craniofacial features include brachycephaly, downslanting palpebral fissures, broad nasal root, low-set ears, and small maxilla and prominent mandible. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1968.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.5", "omim": "211370", "umls": "C1859385"}, {"name": "Brachymorphie-Onychodysplasie-Dysphalangie-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Brachymorphie-Onychodysplasie-Dysphalangie-Syndrom (BOD) ist ein sehr seltenes Fehlbildungs-Syndrom und gekennzeichnet durch Kleinwuchs, hypoplastische Kleinfinger mit kleinen dysplastischen N\u00e4geln, faziale Dysmorphien (grobe Gesichtsz\u00fcge, breiter Mund, breite Nase) und leichte intellektuelle Behinderung. Es wird vermutet, dass das Coffin-Siris-Syndrom (s. dort) und das BOD -Syndrom evtl. allelische Varianten sind.", "synonyms": "BOD-Syndrom, Senior-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.1", "OMIM": "113477", "UMLS": "C1862082", "MeSH": "C536242", "GARD": "918"}, {"name": "Brachyolmie", "german_description": "Bei allen Typen der Brachyolmie beginnt in der Kindheit ein Minderwuchs mit verk\u00fcrztem Stamm und allgemeiner Platyspondylie, aber ohne wesentliche epiphys\u00e4re oder metaphys\u00e4re Ver\u00e4nderungen der langen Knochen. Vier haupts\u00e4chliche Typen werden unterschieden. 1) Der Hobaek-Typ: Der Minderwuchs manifestiert sich in der sp\u00e4ten Kindheit oder dem fr\u00fchen Teenage-Alter. Der Minderwuchs ist haupts\u00e4chlich auf den Stamm beschr\u00e4nkt. 2) Der Toledo-Typ: Er ist wahrscheinlich in Hinblick auf die Skelett- und Wirbelver\u00e4nderungen identisch mit dem Hobaek-Typ, aber die Patienten scheiden abnorme Mengen Glykosaminoglykane aus und haben punktf\u00f6rmige periphere Hornhauttr\u00fcbungen. 3) Der Maroteaux-Typ: \u00c4hnlicher Ph\u00e4notyp mit Beginn in der Kindheit, aber unregelm\u00e4\u00dfige und verschm\u00e4lerte Zwischenwirbelr\u00e4ume, erhebliche Ausweitung der Wirbel nach lateral und Abrundung der vorderen und hinteren Wirbelwand. 4) Der autosomal-dominante Typ: Die Symptome sind etwas weniger schwer ausgepr\u00e4gt als bei den anderen Typen, die autosomal-rezessiv vererbt werden. Die meisten Patienten haben eine Skoliose oder Kyphose. Neben diesen 4 Typen gibt es auch individuelle Verl\u00e4ufe, die ggw. noch nicht klassifiziert werden k\u00f6nnen. Die genetische Beratung kann sich nur auf den Erbgang beziehen. Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik ist nicht m\u00f6glich, eine spezifische Therapie gibt es nicht. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Brachyolmia is a rare, clinically and genetically heterogeneous group of bone disorders characterized by short trunk, mild short stature, scoliosis and generalized platyspondyly without significant abnormalities in the long bones.", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q76.3", "umls": "C0432228", "mesh": "C537098", "gard": "10903", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of brachyolmia is not known, but the disorder is probably under-recognized. Fewer than 100 cases have been reported to date. Cases have been reported in various ethnic groups. However, most cases with the Hobaek/Toledo type reported so far were of Turkish origin.", "clinical_description": "Four types of brachyolmia have been described: autosomal recessive brachyolmia, Hobaek/Toledo type, autosomal recessive brachyolmia-amelogenesis imperfecta syndrome, autosomal dominant brachyolmia, and autosomal recessive brachyolmia, Maroteaux type (see these terms). The age of onset is generally in childhood with short stature becoming more evident with age. The clinical manifestations are generally mild to moderate, with minor physical functional repercussions. Some patients report non-specific back pain. The disorder is not associated with intellectual disability. AR brachyolmia, Hobaek/Toledo type is characterized by short-trunked short stature with platyspondyly and scoliosis. Corneal opacities and precocious calcification of costal cartilage occur in rare cases. In AR brachyolmia-amelogenesis imperfecta syndrome, short-trunked short stature is associated with platyspondyly and enamel abnormalities. AD brachyolmia is a more severe form with significant short-trunked short stature, platyspondyly and kyphoscoliosis. Lastly, presumably autosomal recessive brachyolmia, Maroteaux type is a vague entity that has not been well characterized but may involve short trunk/short stature, generalized platyspondyly and rounding vertebral bodies.", "etiology": "Mutations in the PAPSS2 gene (10q24) have been found in patients with AR brachyolmia, Hobaek/Toledo type, and in the TRPV4 gene (12q24.1) in patients with AD brachyolmia. Precise pathogenesis is not well understood.", "diagnostic_methods": "Clinical and radiological findings are used to diagnose brachyolmia. Molecular genetic testing can also be used to confirm the diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnosis includes other genetic skeletal dysplasia syndromes, particularly mild spondyloepiphyseal dysplasia, including mild type 2 collagenopathy and mild Morquio disease (see this term).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is available on molecular grounds, when a mutation (or mutations) was ascertained in a familial case.", "genetic_counseling": "Brachyolmia follows either an autosomal recessive or rarely an autosomal dominant pattern of inheritance. Genetic counseling based on the mode of inheritance should be provided to affected families.", "management_and_treatment": "No specific treatment is currently available for this disease.", "prognosis": "The prognosis for patients with brachyolmia is generally very good."}, {"name": "Brachyolmie-Amelogenesis imperfecta-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "An exceedingly rare form of brachyolmia, characterized by mild platyspondyly, broad ilia, elongated femoral necks with coxa valga, scoliosis, and short trunked short stature associated with amelogenesis imperfecta of both primary and permanent dentition.", "synonyms": "Platyspondyly-amelogenesis imperfecta syndrome, Verloes-Bourguignon syndrome, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q76.3", "omim": "601216", "umls": "C1832594", "gard": "5478"}, {"name": "Brachyolmie, autosomal-rezessive", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive Brachyolmie ist eine Unterform der Brachyolmie (s. diesen Begriff), einer Gruppe seltener genetisch bedingter Skeletterkrankungen, die durch kurzst\u00e4mmigen Kleinwuchs mit Platyspondylie und Skoliose gekennzeichnet ist. Hornhauttr\u00fcbungen und eine fr\u00fchzeitige Verkalkung des Rippenknorpels sind seltene syndromale Komponenten. Eine vorzeitige Pubert\u00e4t kann auftreten.", "synonyms": "Brachyolmie Typ Hobaek/Toledo, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "Q76.3", "OMIM": "271530\u00a0 271630", "epidemiology": "Die genaue Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form der Brachyolmie ist nicht bekannt. Es wurden etwa 20 F\u00e4lle in verschiedenen ethnischen Gruppen (Japan, Korea, T\u00fcrkei) berichtet, manchmal im Zusammenhang mit konsanguinen Verbindungen. Die Mehrheit der bisher berichteten F\u00e4lle war jedoch t\u00fcrkischer Herkunft.", "clinical_description": "Die betroffenen Kinder zeigen im Allgemeinen ein normales Geburtsgewicht und eine normale K\u00f6rperl\u00e4nge. Eine Platyspondylie ist bereits in der fr\u00fchen Kindheit vorhanden, aber die Patienten kommen meist erst in der sp\u00e4ten Kindheit oder in der fr\u00fchen Pubert\u00e4t in \u00e4rztliche Behandlung als Folge des verz\u00f6gerten Wachstums und des kurzen Rumpfes. Zu den radiologischen Merkmalen geh\u00f6ren Platyspondylie mit rechteckigen Wirbelk\u00f6rpern und unregelm\u00e4\u00dfigen Endplatten, breites Os ilium, kurzer Femurhals und breite proximale Interphalangealgelenke. Gelegentlich sind L\u00e4ngsstreifen im Oberschenkelhals zu sehen. Fr\u00fchzeitige Verkalkungen des Rippenknorpels sind beschrieben. Die Erkrankung wird als relativ gutartig beschrieben, mit Ausnahme von leichten unspezifischen R\u00fcckenschmerzen und einer leichten Skoliose, die im jungen Erwachsenenalter beginnt. Es gibt jedoch nur wenige Berichte \u00fcber das Endergebnis der muskuloskelettalen Morbidit\u00e4t. Der mentale Status und das Gesicht werden als normal beschrieben. Bei einigen Patienten wird \u00fcber periphere punktf\u00f6rmige Tr\u00fcbungen der Hornhaut berichtet, die bei der Spaltlampenuntersuchung gefunden werden (fr\u00fcher Toledo-Typ).", "etiology": "Bei betroffenen Patienten wurde eine Reihe verschiedener Mutationen im PAPSS2-Gen (10q23.2-q23.3) festgestellt. PAPSS2 kodiert f\u00fcr die PAPS (3'-Phosphoadenosin-5'-phosphosulfat)-Synthase 2. PAPSS2-Mutationen wurden auch als Ursache f\u00fcr zwei andere Erkrankungen beschrieben: Spondyloepimetaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie Typ PAPSS2 (siehe diesen Termini), und Spondylodysplasie mit vorzeitiger Pubert\u00e4t (vor der Entdeckung der molekularen Grundlage der rezessiven Brachyolmie Typ Hobaek/Toledo).", "diagnostic_methods": "Den betroffenen Familien soll eine genetische Beratung angeboten werden.", "summary": "Die genaue Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form der Brachyolmie ist nicht bekannt. Es wurden etwa 20 F\u00e4lle in verschiedenen ethnischen Gruppen (Japan, Korea, T\u00fcrkei) berichtet, manchmal im Zusammenhang mit konsanguinen Verbindungen. Die Mehrheit der bisher berichteten F\u00e4lle war jedoch t\u00fcrkischer Herkunft."}, {"name": "Brachyolmie Typ 2", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic spondylodysplastic dysplasia characterized by short trunk/short stature, generalized platyspondyly with rounding of vertebral bodies. The vertebral bodies show less elongation compared to patients with other types of the disorder. Precocious calcification of the cerebral falx and non-specific minor facial anomalies may be associated. There have been no new reports since 1989.", "synonyms": "Brachyolmia type 2, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q76.3", "omim": "613678", "umls": "C3159322"}, {"name": "Brachyolmie Typ 3", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A relatively severe form of brachyolmia, a group of rare genetic skeletal disorders, characterized by short-trunked short stature, platyspondyly and kyphoscoliosis. Degenerative joint disease (osteoarthropathy) in the spine, large joints and interphalangeal joints becomes manifest in adulthood.", "synonyms": "Brachyolmia type 3, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q76.3", "omim": "113500", "umls": "C0432227", "gard": "10429", "epidemiology": "The precise prevalence of this form of brachyolmia is not known. About 30 cases have been reported.", "clinical_description": "Patients with Brachyolmia type 3 generally have a normal birth weight and length. Affected individuals present with moderately short trunk/short stature and mildly short limbs in childhood. Kyphoscoliosis is common and sometimes severe. Adult patients develop degenerative joint disease in the spine, large joints and small joints of the hands and feet, which may cause significant musculoskeletal morbidity, such as chronic pain in the extremities and spine, and paresthesia. Final adult height is reported to be 155-168 cm (males) and 136-150 cm (females). The radiographic features include severe platyspondyly particularly in the cervical spine, elongated vertebral bodies (overfaced pedicles), broad ilia, and mild metaphyseal irregularity in the proximal femora. Carpal ossification may be mildly delayed, and mild brachydactyly may exist.", "etiology": "Heterozygous mutations in the TRPV4 gene (12q24.11) are responsible for autosomal dominant brachyolmia. TRPV4 mutations are associated with other skeletal dysplasias, including lethal and nonlethal metatropic dysplasia, spondyloepiphyseal dysplasia Maroteaux type, and spondylometaphyseal dysplasia Kozlowski type (see these terms). Autosomal dominant brachyolmia falls into the mildest end of the TRPV4-associated skeletal dysplasia group. TRPV4 encodes a Ca-permeable, non-selective cation channel that participates in the regulation of osmotic sensitivity and mechanosensitivity. It remains to be explained how dysregulation of the cation channel causes the skeletal abnormalities.", "genetic_counseling": "Genetic counseling should be provided to affected families, in consideration of the autosomal dominant mode of inheritance."}, {"name": "Brachyolmie Typ Hobaek/Toledo", "sub_name": "Brachyolmie, autosomal-rezessive", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive Brachyolmie ist eine Unterform der Brachyolmie (s. diesen Begriff), einer Gruppe seltener genetisch bedingter Skeletterkrankungen, die durch kurzst\u00e4mmigen Kleinwuchs mit Platyspondylie und Skoliose gekennzeichnet ist. Hornhauttr\u00fcbungen und eine fr\u00fchzeitige Verkalkung des Rippenknorpels sind seltene syndromale Komponenten. Eine vorzeitige Pubert\u00e4t kann auftreten.", "synonyms": "Brachyolmie Typ Hobaek/Toledo, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "Q76.3", "OMIM": "271530\u00a0 271630", "epidemiology": "Die genaue Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form der Brachyolmie ist nicht bekannt. Es wurden etwa 20 F\u00e4lle in verschiedenen ethnischen Gruppen (Japan, Korea, T\u00fcrkei) berichtet, manchmal im Zusammenhang mit konsanguinen Verbindungen. Die Mehrheit der bisher berichteten F\u00e4lle war jedoch t\u00fcrkischer Herkunft.", "clinical_description": "Die betroffenen Kinder zeigen im Allgemeinen ein normales Geburtsgewicht und eine normale K\u00f6rperl\u00e4nge. Eine Platyspondylie ist bereits in der fr\u00fchen Kindheit vorhanden, aber die Patienten kommen meist erst in der sp\u00e4ten Kindheit oder in der fr\u00fchen Pubert\u00e4t in \u00e4rztliche Behandlung als Folge des verz\u00f6gerten Wachstums und des kurzen Rumpfes. Zu den radiologischen Merkmalen geh\u00f6ren Platyspondylie mit rechteckigen Wirbelk\u00f6rpern und unregelm\u00e4\u00dfigen Endplatten, breites Os ilium, kurzer Femurhals und breite proximale Interphalangealgelenke. Gelegentlich sind L\u00e4ngsstreifen im Oberschenkelhals zu sehen. Fr\u00fchzeitige Verkalkungen des Rippenknorpels sind beschrieben. Die Erkrankung wird als relativ gutartig beschrieben, mit Ausnahme von leichten unspezifischen R\u00fcckenschmerzen und einer leichten Skoliose, die im jungen Erwachsenenalter beginnt. Es gibt jedoch nur wenige Berichte \u00fcber das Endergebnis der muskuloskelettalen Morbidit\u00e4t. Der mentale Status und das Gesicht werden als normal beschrieben. Bei einigen Patienten wird \u00fcber periphere punktf\u00f6rmige Tr\u00fcbungen der Hornhaut berichtet, die bei der Spaltlampenuntersuchung gefunden werden (fr\u00fcher Toledo-Typ).", "etiology": "Bei betroffenen Patienten wurde eine Reihe verschiedener Mutationen im PAPSS2-Gen (10q23.2-q23.3) festgestellt. PAPSS2 kodiert f\u00fcr die PAPS (3'-Phosphoadenosin-5'-phosphosulfat)-Synthase 2. PAPSS2-Mutationen wurden auch als Ursache f\u00fcr zwei andere Erkrankungen beschrieben: Spondyloepimetaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie Typ PAPSS2 (siehe diesen Termini), und Spondylodysplasie mit vorzeitiger Pubert\u00e4t (vor der Entdeckung der molekularen Grundlage der rezessiven Brachyolmie Typ Hobaek/Toledo).", "diagnostic_methods": "Den betroffenen Familien soll eine genetische Beratung angeboten werden.", "summary": "Die genaue Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form der Brachyolmie ist nicht bekannt. Es wurden etwa 20 F\u00e4lle in verschiedenen ethnischen Gruppen (Japan, Korea, T\u00fcrkei) berichtet, manchmal im Zusammenhang mit konsanguinen Verbindungen. Die Mehrheit der bisher berichteten F\u00e4lle war jedoch t\u00fcrkischer Herkunft."}, {"name": "Brachyolmie Typ Maroteaux", "sub_name": "Brachyolmie Typ 2", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic spondylodysplastic dysplasia characterized by short trunk/short stature, generalized platyspondyly with rounding of vertebral bodies. The vertebral bodies show less elongation compared to patients with other types of the disorder. Precocious calcification of the cerebral falx and non-specific minor facial anomalies may be associated. There have been no new reports since 1989.", "synonyms": "Brachyolmia type 2, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q76.3", "omim": "613678", "umls": "C3159322"}, {"name": "Brachytelephalangie mit Dysmorphien und Kallmann-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Brachytelephalangy - dysmorphism - Kallmann syndrome is a developmental anomaly characterized by brachytelephalangy, distinct craniofacial features (prominent square forehead, telecanthus, small nose, malar hypoplasia, smooth philtrum and thin upper lip), and relative to other family members, a short stature. These features may be associated with anosmia and hypogonadotropic hypogonadism (considered as Kallman syndrome ; see this term). Brachytelephalangy - dysmorphism - Kallmann syndrome has been described in a mother and her son and there have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1986.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.0", "omim": "113480", "umls": "C2931421"}, {"name": "Brachyzephalie-H\u00f6rverlust-Katarakt-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Aym\u00e9-Gripp-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Fine-Lubinsky-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch psychomotorische Retardierung, Brachyzephalie, flaches Gesichtsprofil, kleine Nase, Mikrostomie, Gaumenspalte, Katarakt, H\u00f6rverlust, hypoplastisches Skrotum und Fingeranomalien. Bisher wurden weniger als 10 Patienten beschrieben. Die meisten F\u00e4lle waren sporadisch, es wurden aber auch 2 Geschwister (1m., 1w.) mit m\u00f6glicher autosomal-rezessiver Vererbung beschrieben. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic multiple congenital anomalies/dysmorphic syndrome characterized by congenital cataract, sensorineural hearing loss, developmental delay with variable degrees of intellectual disability, seizures, short stature, brachycephaly, and dysmorphic facial features (such as flat facial appearance, ptosis, short nasal tip, long philtrum, low-set and posteriorly rotated ears, and small mouth). Additional reported manifestations are skeletal abnormalities, nail dystrophy, mammary gland hypoplasia, and autism spectrum disorder.", "synonyms": "Brachycephaly-deafness-cataract-intellectual disability syndrome, Brachycephaly-hearing loss-cataract-intellectual disability syndrome, Fine-Lubinsky syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "601088\u00a0 601353", "umls": "C0795941", "mesh": "C537933", "gard": "958"}, {"name": "Brachyzephalie, isolierte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Synostose, bikoronare nicht-syndromale, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q75.0", "OMIM": "123100\u00a0 615314\u00a0 616602", "UMLS": "C0221356", "summary": "Die Isolierte Brachyzephalie ist eine relativ h\u00e4ufige nicht-syndromale Kraniosynostose mit pr\u00e4maturer Fusion beider Kranzn\u00e4hte. Sie f\u00fchrt zu einer Sch\u00e4deldeformit\u00e4t mit breiter flacher Stirn und tastbaren Koronarleisten. Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt ist etwa 1:20.000. Die Sch\u00e4deldeformit\u00e4t ist gekennzeichnet durch einen kurzen anterior-posterioren Sch\u00e4deldurchmessers und eine kompensatorische Zunahme des bitemporalen Durchmessers. M\u00f6glich sind auch supraorbitale Rezession und Exorbitismus/Exophthalmus. Mit der Brachyzephalie assoziierte faziale Dysmorphien sind Mittelgesichtshypoplasie, leichter Hypertelorismus und vorgew\u00f6lbte Schl\u00e4fen. Hirndrucksteigerung (ICP) ist h\u00e4ufig und kann unbehandelt Ursache eines intellektuellen Defizits sein. Ohne Behandlung f\u00fchrt ICP im Erwachsenenalter zu Knochendefekten. Es ist noch unklar, in welchem Umfang die nicht-syndromale Brachyzephalie genetisch determiniert ist. Die meisten F\u00e4lle sind sporadisch, 14% aller F\u00e4lle sind famili\u00e4r, etwa 10% der F\u00e4lle werden dominant vererbt. In 74% der famili\u00e4ren und in 17% der sporadischen F\u00e4lle wird (v\u00e4terlich vererbt) die rekurrente Mutation P250R im FGFR3-Gen (4p16.3) f\u00fcr den Fibroblastenwachstumsfaktor-Rezeptor 3 gefunden. Weibliche Tr\u00e4ger der P250R-Mutation sind schwerer und h\u00e4ufiger betroffen als m\u00e4nnliche Tr\u00e4ger (w:m = 2:1). H\u00e4ufig sind die Mutationstr\u00e4ger leicht schwerh\u00f6rig. Einige Mutationstr\u00e4ger haben eine Brachydaktylie und/oder eine Fusion von Metakarpalknochen. Bei einem einzelnen Patienten mit isolierter bikoronarer Synostose wurde eine Mutation im TWIST 1-Gene (7p21) gefunden. Zu nicht-genetischen Determinanten geh\u00f6ren evtl. mechanische Einengungen w\u00e4hrend der Schwangerschaft und nach der Geburt. Die Diagnose st\u00fctzt sich auf klinische und sonografische Befunde, auf R\u00f6ntgenaufnahmen und 3D-CT- und/oder MRT-Untersuchungen des Sch\u00e4dels. F\u00fcr alle Familien mit der nicht-syndromalen Form der Brachyzephalie wird ein molekulares Screening empfohlen, da die morphologischen und funktionellen Ergebnisse einer operativen Korrektur bei Nicht-Tr\u00e4gern der FGFR3-Mutation g\u00fcnstiger zu sein scheinen. Bedingt durch die ph\u00e4notypische Variabilit\u00e4t bei Tr\u00e4gern der P250R-Mutation ist eine klinische Unterscheidung von syndromalen und nicht-syndromalen Formen der Brachyzephalie oft schwierig. Zwar erinnert die Sch\u00e4delform manchmal an das Saethre-Chotzen- oder das Pfeiffer-Syndrom (s. diese Termini), aber das Fehlen offenkundiger Hand- und/oder Fu\u00dfanomalien ist ein diagnostisches Leitsymptom der nicht-syndromalen Brachyzephalie. Die ausgepr\u00e4gte Vorw\u00f6lbung der Schl\u00e4fen, besonders bei weiblichen Tr\u00e4gern der FGFR3-Mutation, kann differentialdiagnostische Bedeutung haben. Wichtigste Behandlung ist die chirurgische Rekonstruktion der Sch\u00e4deln\u00e4hte. Dadurch wird die Sch\u00e4delform verbessert, das intrakraniale Volumen vergr\u00f6\u00dfert und gleichzeitig in der Regel der Hirndruck verringert. Die fr\u00fche Diagnose einer H\u00f6rst\u00f6rung erm\u00f6glicht, falls erforderlich, eine rechtzeitige Intervention. Die intellektuelle Entwicklung der Patienten nach kranialer Expansion ist meist gut. Patienten mit der FGFR3-Mutation haben im Vergleich zu Patienten ohne diese Mutation ein 5-fach h\u00f6heres Risiko, dass eine zweite Operation notwendig wird. Auch sind die Ergebnisse des chirurgischen Engriffes weniger g\u00fcnstig."}, {"name": "Brachyzephalie-Taubheit-Katarakt-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Aym\u00e9-Gripp-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Fine-Lubinsky-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch psychomotorische Retardierung, Brachyzephalie, flaches Gesichtsprofil, kleine Nase, Mikrostomie, Gaumenspalte, Katarakt, H\u00f6rverlust, hypoplastisches Skrotum und Fingeranomalien. Bisher wurden weniger als 10 Patienten beschrieben. Die meisten F\u00e4lle waren sporadisch, es wurden aber auch 2 Geschwister (1m., 1w.) mit m\u00f6glicher autosomal-rezessiver Vererbung beschrieben. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic multiple congenital anomalies/dysmorphic syndrome characterized by congenital cataract, sensorineural hearing loss, developmental delay with variable degrees of intellectual disability, seizures, short stature, brachycephaly, and dysmorphic facial features (such as flat facial appearance, ptosis, short nasal tip, long philtrum, low-set and posteriorly rotated ears, and small mouth). Additional reported manifestations are skeletal abnormalities, nail dystrophy, mammary gland hypoplasia, and autism spectrum disorder.", "synonyms": "Brachycephaly-deafness-cataract-intellectual disability syndrome, Brachycephaly-hearing loss-cataract-intellectual disability syndrome, Fine-Lubinsky syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "601088\u00a0 601353", "umls": "C0795941", "mesh": "C537933", "gard": "958"}, {"name": "Bradbury-Eggleston-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Dysautonomie, reine", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Bradbury-Eggleston-Syndrom, Hypotension, idiopathische orthostatische, Orthostatischen Hypotension, idiopathische, PAF, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter, \u00c4ltere Erwachsene", "ICD-10": "G90.3", "UMLS": "C0393911\u00a0 C2931939", "MeSH": "C544351\u00a0 D054970", "GARD": "10428", "summary": "Die Reine Dysautonomie (pure autonomic failure, PAF) ist eine neurodegenerative Erkrankung des Sympathicus-Astes des vegetativen Nervensystems und wird als orthostatische Hypotonie manifest. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht genau bekannt. Die Krankheit tritt im Erwachsenenalter auf. Die ersten Symptome der PAF sind orthostatische Hypotonie, erektile Dysfunktion und Harnwegsst\u00f6rungen. Andere Symptome, darunter Hyperhidrose und Horner-Syndrom (s. dort) weisen auf eine St\u00f6rung des Sympathicus-Systems. Neurologische St\u00f6rungen fehlen. Die PAF ist sporadisch, die Ursache ist nicht bekannt. Es handelt sich um eine Synucleinopathie mit Lewy-K\u00f6rpern und Neuronenverlust im intermedi\u00e4r-lateralen Trakt der Medulla und den sympathischen Ganglien. An die Diagnose einer PAF wird bei klinischen Zeichen gedacht, die mit einer chronischen Dysfunktion des Sympathischen Nervensystems vereinbar sind, ohne dass weitere neurologische Symptome bestehen. Die Diagnose wird durch den Nachweis einer neurogenen orthostatischen Hypotension (Abfall des arteriellen Blutdrucks beim Stehen um >=20/10 mm Hg ohne reaktive Tachykardie) best\u00e4tigt. Eine 24-Stunden-Blutdruckmessung zeigt ein Fehlen oder eine Umkehr des Tag-Nacht-Rhythmus. Einige Einrichtungen bieten spezifische Tests f\u00fcr PAF an (Ewing-Test, Pupillen- und Schwei\u00dffunktion, Analyse der Variabilit\u00e4t von Pulsfrequenz und Blutdruck, Sympathicus-Mikroneurographie und MIBG-Szintigraphie). Die Noradrenalin-Plasmaspiegel sind niedrig und steigen beim Stehen nicht an. EMG und zerebrales MRI/CT ergeben normale Befunde. Die Suche nach immunologischen, metabolischen oder toxischen Ursachen und Mangelzust\u00e4nden bleibt ohne Ergebnis. Differentialdiagnosen sind: (i) iatrogene (kardio-vaskul\u00e4re und urologische Medikamente, Psychopharmaka) oder behandelbare (Dehydratation, Venenschw\u00e4che, An\u00e4mie) Ursachen der orthostatischen Hypotension; (ii) Dopamin-Beta-Hydroxylase-Mangel (s. dort), wird bei Patienten mit vermutet idiopathischer orthostatischer Hypotension durch das Vorhandensein von Noradrenalin im Plasma ausgeschlossen; (iii) prim\u00e4re oder sekund\u00e4re periphere Polyneuropathie (Diabetes, Amyloidose, Niereninsuffizienz, Guillain-Barr\u00e9-Syndrom, paraneoplastische Syndrome); (iv) Dysautonomie bei neurodegenerativen Krankheiten (Multiple Systematrophie, Morbus Parkinson), die durch normale neurologische und paraklinische Befunde bei Patienten mit PAF ausgeschlossen werden. Im Gegensatz zu akuten oder sub-akuten Pan-Dysautonomien ist die PAF nur langsam progredient. Die Behandlung ist zum einen nicht-medikament\u00f6s, mit St\u00fctzstr\u00fcmpfen, Bauchbinde, h\u00e4ufigen Mahlzeiten, mit nur langsamem Aufrichten, vermehrter Fl\u00fcssigkeits- und Salzaufnahme, Vermeidung von langem Stehen, von Alkohol und von warmer Umgebung. Medikamenten-Standards sind Midodrin (ein alpha-adrenerger Agonist) und Fludrocortison (ein Kalium senkendes Mineralokortikoid). Eine Wirksamkeit indirekter Sympathicomimetika (Heptaminol) und Ergotamin-Derivaten (Dihydro-Ergotamin) konnte nicht gesichert werden. Andere Medikamente (Pyridostigmin, Droxidopa) sind Gegenstand laufender klinischer Studien oder wurden f\u00fcr besondere Situationen entwickelt, z.B. An\u00e4mie (Erythropoetin) oder postprandiale Hypotension (Octreotid). Dem Risiko eines arteriellen Dekubitus-Hochdrucks kann durch die folgenden einfachen Regeln vorgebeugt werden: Vor dem Schlafengehen keinen Vasokonstriktor anwenden, nachts in halb-sitzender Position ruhen, in extremen F\u00e4llen ein blutdrucksenkendes Medikament geben. Die Progredienz der PAF dauert mehr als 20 Jahre. Wenn im Verlauf der Dysautonomie neurologische Symptome auftreten, kann die orthostatische Hypotension im nachhinein als Zeichen einer Multiplen Systematrophie oder Parkinson-Krankheit diagnostiziert werden."}, {"name": "Braddock-Jones-Superneau-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Kraniosynostose - Dandy-Walker-Malformation - Hydrozephalus", "german_description": "Das gemeinsame Auftreten von Kraniosynostose und Dandy-Walker-Malformation mit Hydrozephalus definiert ein Syndrom mit multiplen Fehlbildungen. Die Dandy-Walker-Malformation und die Kraniosynostose (sh. dort) kommen nicht nur als isolierte Fehlbildungen sondern auch als Teil von Fehlbildungs-Syndromen vor. Ihr gemeinsames Auftreten wurde bei insgesamt 4 Patienten beschrieben, n\u00e4mlich bei einer Mutter und 2 ihrer Kinder und bei einem dritten, nicht verwandten Kind. Bei allen F\u00e4llen bestand eine Kraniosynostose der Sagittalnaht, bei einem der Patienten war zus\u00e4tzlich die Kranznaht vorzeitig verschlossen. Wahrscheinlich wird das Syndrom autosomal-dominant vererbt. Alle Patienten hatten einen Hypertelorismus und eine Mikrogenie. Das erste Kind der betroffenen Mutter verstarb pl\u00f6tzlich im Alter von 9 Monaten nach der Obstruktion des ventrikulo-peritonealen Shunts. Bei keinem der Patienten wurde eine Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung beobachtet. Bei allen Patienten wurde die Kraniosynostose chirurgisch behandelt. Zur Behandlung des Hydrozephalus ben\u00f6tigten 2 Patienten ein ventrikulo-peritonealen Shunt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Craniosynostosis, Dandy-Walker malformation and hydrocephalus is a malformation disorder characterized by sagittal craniosynostosis (see this term), Dandy-Walker malformation, hydrocephalus, craniofacial dysmorphism (including dolichocephaly, hypertelorism, micrognathia, positional ear deformity) and variable developmental delay. The inheritance pattern appears to be autosomal dominant.", "synonyms": "Braddock-Jones-Superneau syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "Q03.1", "omim": "123155", "gard": "998"}, {"name": "Braddock-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Braddock-Syndrom ist ein seltenes Fehlbildungs-Syndrom mit multiplen angeborenen Anomalien. Es wurde bei 2 Geschwistern beschrieben und ist gekennzeichnet durch eine VACTERL-\u00e4hnliche Assoziation in Verbindung mit Lungenhochdruck, Larynxnetzen, blauen Skleren, malformierten Ohren, dauerhaft verz\u00f6gertem Wachstum und normaler Intelligenz.", "synonyms": "VATER-\u00e4hnliches Syndrom - pulmonale Hypertension - Ohranomalien - Kleinwuchs, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "608406", "UMLS": "C1842082"}, {"name": "Bradyopsie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Verz\u00f6gerte Zapfenadaptation (Prolonged electroretinal response supression (PERRS)), ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "H53.8", "OMIM": "608415", "GARD": "12299", "summary": "Als Bradyopsie bezeichnet man die verl\u00e4ngerte 'response suppression' im Elektroretinogramm mit erschwerter Anpassung an wechselnde Helligkeiten. Es besteht Lichtscheu, die Sehsch\u00e4rfe ist normal bis leicht vermindert. Bisher wurden f\u00fcnf nicht miteinander verwandte Patienten beschrieben. Die Symptome bestanden seit der Kindheit. Die Krankheit ist genetisch heterogen: Ursache sind rezessive Mutationen entweder im RGS9- (Chromosomenregion 17q23-q24) oder im R9AP-Gen (Chromosomenregion 19q13.11). Das RGS9-Gen kodiert f\u00fcr ein GTPase-aktivierendes Protein im \u00e4u\u00dferen Segment der St\u00e4bchen, das R9AP-Gen f\u00fcr das dazugeh\u00f6rige Ankerprotein. "}, {"name": "Brailsford-Krankheit", "sub_name": "Mueller-Weiss-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare bone disease characterized by spontaneous adult-onset tarsal navicular osteonecrosis. Patients present with chronic mid- and hindfoot pain, swelling and tenderness over the dorsomedial aspect of the midfoot, flattening of the medial longitudinal arch, and pes planovarus. Radiographic findings include comma-shaped deformity due to collapse of the lateral part of the navicular bone and medial or dorsal protrusion of a portion or the entire bone. The condition may be bilateral or asymmetric and associated with pathological fractures.", "synonyms": "Brailsford disease, Mueller-Weiss osteonecrosis of the tarsal bone, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "age_of_onset": "Adult"}, {"name": "Branchiogene Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Megarban\u00e9-Loiselet-Syndrom ist ein multiples angeborenes Anomaliensyndrom, das bisher in einer Familie beschrieben wurde und durch verzweigte Zysten oder Fisteln, Ohrmissbildungen, angeborenen H\u00f6rverlust (leitf\u00e4hig, sensorineural und gemischt), innere Geh\u00f6rgangshypoplasie, Schielen, Trismus, abnormale f\u00fcnfte Finger, vitiligin\u00f6se L\u00e4sionen, Kleinwuchs und leichte Lernbehinderung gekennzeichnet ist. Nieren- und Harnr\u00f6hrenanomalien sind nicht vorhanden.", "synonyms": "M\u00e9garban\u00e9-Loiselet-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.0", "OMIM": "609166", "UMLS": "C1836673"}, {"name": "Branchio-okulo-faziales Syndrom", "german_description": "Weniger als 50 Patienten mit dem Branchio-okulo-fazialem Syndrom (BOFS) sind bisher beschrieben worden. Einige F\u00e4lle sind sporadisch, die meisten kommen aber aus Familien mit mehr als 1 Betroffenen und sind vereinbar mit autosomal-dominanter Vererbung. Symptome sind: niedriges Geburtsgewicht und verz\u00f6gertes Wachstum; bilaterale branchiogene Fisteln, manchmal mit H\u00e4mangiomen oder linearen, verbrennungs-\u00e4hnlichen Hautl\u00e4sionen hinter den Ohren; angeborener Strabismus; verschlossene Tr\u00e4nen-Nasen-G\u00e4nge; Nase mit breiter Basis und flacher Spitze; vorstehende Oberlippe mit breitem Philtrum; 'Karpfenmund'. Weitere Fehlbildungen sind: Pseudo-Spalte der Oberlippe, \u00e4hnlich einer operativ oder spontan verschlossenen Spalte; malformierte Ohren, Schalleitungs-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit; pr\u00e4aurikul\u00e4re Gr\u00fcbchen; Lippengr\u00fcbchen; hoher Gaumenbogen; Zahnanomalien; Augenfehlbildungen (Kolobome, Mikrophthalmie); subkutane Zysten unter der Kopfhaut; Nierenanomalien (Agenesie, Zysten, Hydronephrose). Erwachsene Patienten ergrauen vorzeitig. Ein Patient hatte neben den typischen Symptomen eines BOFS eine partielle Agenesie des Kleinhirnwurms. Zwei Geschwister mit diesem Syndrom hatten h\u00e4mangiomat\u00f6se Orbita-Zysten. Bei 2 F\u00e4llen von BOFS wurden pr\u00e4axiale Polydaktylie und wei\u00dfe Stirnlocke beschrieben. Die Intelligenz ist normal, die Sprache n\u00e4selnd. Das postnatale Wachstum verl\u00e4uft zwischen der 3. und 5. Perzentile. Die retroaurikul\u00e4ren branchiogenen Halsdefekte geh\u00f6ren zu den am h\u00e4ufigsten gesehenen Symptomen. Histologisch k\u00f6nnen in den L\u00e4sionen Thymusanteile nachweisbar sein. Das BOF-Syndrom und das Branchio-oto-renale (BOR)-Syndrom haben als gemeinsame Symptome Stenosen des Tr\u00e4nen-Nasen-Ganges, Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, pr\u00e4aurikul\u00e4re Gr\u00fcbchen, malformierte Ohrmuscheln und Nierenanomalien. Das BOF-Syndrom ist aber nicht mit dem BOR-Syndrom allelisch. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, dominantly inherited multiple congenital anomalies syndrome characterized by highly variable clinical phenotype involving the three main affected systems: branchial (cutaneous) defects, ophthalmic malformations and facial anomalies. Additional features can be present.", "synonyms": "BOFS, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q18.8", "omim": "113620", "umls": "C0376524", "gard": "3212", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of branchio-oculo-facial syndrome (BOFS) is unknown but fewer than 150 individuals with a well-described clinical and/or molecular diagnosis have been reported in the literature so far.", "clinical_description": "The branchial defects include cervical or infra- and/or supra-auricular skin defects that vary in size and shape but are typically characterized as thinned erythematous cutaneous defects. Ocular features are highly variably expressed including microphthalmia, anophthalmia, coloboma, cataract, ptosis, nasolacrimal duct obstruction, strabismus and significant visual impairment. The characteristic craniofacial features include dolichocephaly, hypertelorism, telecanthus, upslanted palpebral fissures, broad nose with full nasal tip, pre-auricular and upper lip pits, external ear anomalies (malformed and prominent pinnae), inner ear and petrous bone anomalies (such as cochlear dysplasia, Mondini dysplasia and enlarged vestibular aqueduct), cleft lip (including lesser forms, such as microform, ''pseudocleft'' or abnormal philtrum) with or without cleft palate, and lower facial nerve and/or muscle hypoplasia (partial 7th cranial nerve weakness). Patients have conductive/sensorineural/mixed hearing loss. Additional findings include ectopic dermal thymus, renal anomalies (dysplastic, multisystem or absent kidneys, vesicoureteral reflux) and ectodermal anomalies (premature hair graying, hypoplastic teeth, dysplastic nails and subcutaneous dermoid-like cysts, often on the scalp). Psychomotor development is typically normal. Autism spectrum disorder, intellectual disability, growth restriction, congenital heart defects and polydactyly are rare.", "etiology": "BOFS is caused by mutations involving the gene TFAP2A (6p24.3) that encodes the transcription factor AP-2 alpha that regulate gene expression during embryogenesis (of the eye, ear, face, body wall, limbs and neural tube).", "diagnostic_methods": "The clinical diagnosis of BOFS is established if all three of the main features (branchial, ocular and craniofacial) are present or if two of the three main features are present in addition to either ectopic thymus or a positive family history in a first-degree relative. Diagnosis may be confirmed with molecular testing.", "differential_diagnosis": "The most important differential diagnosis of BOFS is the branchio-oto-renal syndrome (BOR syndrome).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis and preimplantation genetic testing are possible where the pathogenic variant has previously been identified in a family member.", "genetic_counseling": "BOFS has shown almost complete penetrance and a significant inter- and intrafamilial variability. No clear genotype-phenotype correlation exists. Transmission is autosomal dominant and an affected individual has a 50% chance of having an affected child at each pregnancy. About 50-60% of the diagnosed individuals have a de novo pathogenic variant.", "management_and_treatment": "Multidisciplinary care is required, including craniofacial specialists, plastic surgeons, ophthalmologists, otolaryngologists, dentists and genetic counseling for affected families. Renal and cardiac abnormalities should be excluded and when necessary supportive therapies should be considered.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is generally good but depends on the severity of associated manifestations."}, {"name": "Branchiootisches Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Branchiootische Syndrom ist ein seltenes, genetisch bedingtes Syndrom mit multiplen kongenitalen Anomalien, das durch Anomalien des zweiten Kiemenbogens (Branchialzysten und -fisteln), Fehlbildungen des Au\u00dfen-, Mittel- und Innenohrs in Verbindung mit Schallempfindungs-, Misch- oder Schallleitungsschwerh\u00f6rigkeit gekennzeichnet ist und bei dem Nierenanomalien fehlen. Typische Ohrbefunde bestehen aus fehlgebildeten Ohrmuscheln (z. B. Schopf- oder Kuppelohren), pr\u00e4aurikul\u00e4ren Gruben und/oder Anh\u00e4ngseln sowie Mittel- und/oder Innenohrdysplasien (einschlie\u00dflich Cochlea-, Vestibular- und Bogengangshypoplasie, Fehlbildung der Geh\u00f6rkn\u00f6chelchen und des Mittelohrraums).", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.0", "OMIM": "120502\u00a0 602588\u00a0 608389", "GARD": "10148"}, {"name": "Branchio-oto-renales Syndrom", "sub_name": "BOR-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Branchio-oto-renale (BOR)-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch Kiemenbogenanomalien (Branchialspalten, -fisteln und -zysten), H\u00f6rst\u00f6rungen (Fehlbildungen der Ohrmuschel mit pr\u00e4-aurikul\u00e4ren Gr\u00fcbchen, Schallleitungs- und sensorisch-neurale Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit) und Fehlbildungen der Niere (Fehlbildungen der ableitenden Harnwege, Nierenhypoplasie oder -agenesie, Nierendysplasie, Nierenzysten). Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist 1:40.000. Die Nierenbeteiligung kann in chronische Niereninsuffizienz m\u00fcnden. Die Auspr\u00e4gung des BOR-Syndroms ist zwischen den Familien und auch innerhalb einer Familie au\u00dferordentlich unterschiedlich. In einigen Familien fehlen Nieren- und Harnwegsanomalien ganz. Die Vererbung ist autosomal-dominant. Das urs\u00e4chlich beteiligte Gen, EYA1, liegt auf dem langen Arm des Chromosoms 8. Bei etwa 40% der Patienten konnten in diesem Gen Punktmutationen und Deletionen nachgewiesen werden. Urs\u00e4chliche Mutationen wurden auch in den Genen SIX1 und SIX5 identifiziert, deren Produkte mit EYA1 unter Bildung von Transkriptionsfaktor-Komplexen interagieren. Wenn die verursachende Mutation bekannt ist, kann den Familien eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik angeboten werden, wegen der stark variablen Expressivit\u00e4t ist die genetische Beratung aber schwierig. Zur Betreuung der BOR-Patienten geh\u00f6ren: Exzision der Branchialfisteln und -zysten, Anpassung einer geigneten H\u00f6rhilfe, F\u00f6rderprogramme f\u00fcr Schwerh\u00f6rige, regelm\u00e4\u00dfige Untersuchung durch einen Nephrologen. Gelegentlich kann Dialyse oder Nierentransplantation erforderlich werden. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare otomandibular dysplasia syndrome characterized by branchial arch anomalies (branchial clefts, fistulae, cysts), malformations of the ear associated with hearing impairment (malformations of the auricle with pre-auricular pits, conductive or sensorineural hearing impairment), and renal malformations (urinary tree malformation, renal hypoplasia or agenesis, renal dysplasia, renal cysts).", "synonyms": "Branchiootorenal syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "113650\u00a0 610896", "umls": "C0265234", "mesh": "D019280", "gard": "10147", "meddra": "10071135", "epidemiology": "Worldwide, the prevalence of Branchiootorenal (BOR) syndrome in the general population is unknown; however, in the pediatric population it is estimated to be 1/40,000.", "clinical_description": "The expression of the disease varies widely from one family to another and among individuals of the same family. Some individuals do not present with renal abnormalities or a urinary tract malformation.", "etiology": "The causative gene, EYA1, is located on the long arm of chromosome 8. Point mutations and deletions in EYA1 have been identified in approximately 40-75% of affected individuals. In a smaller proportion of patients, mutations in the SIX1 and SIX5 genes have been identified, the products of which interact with EYA1 to form transcription factor complexes.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis of BOR syndrome might be suspected clinically in an individual with second branchial arch anomalies, auricular malformations, preauricular pits or tags, deafness and/or renal anomalies. Especially if there are other affected family members. By genetic testing, the diagnosis can be validated in around half of the patients.", "differential_diagnosis": "The main differential diagnosis is branchio-oculo-facial syndrome (BOFS), caused by TFAP2A variants, which is characterized by branchial defects, highly variable ocular defects and characteristic craniofacial features which can include ear anomalies. Moreover, renal anomalies can occur in patients with BOFS. Other differential diagnosis include hypoparathyroidism-sensorineural deafness-renal disease (HDR) syndrome, due to GATA3 variants, which is distinguished by the presence of hypoparathyroidism in the majority of patients; and otofaciocervical syndrome. Moreover, hearing loss is a common symptom in many genetic disorders.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible if the pathogenic variant has previously been identified in a family member. Although, the variable expressivity of the syndrome makes it impossible to predict the severity of the disease in the fetus.", "genetic_counseling": "The disorder is inherited in an autosomal dominant manner; most patients have an affected parent whilst some cases occur sporadically. Genetic counselling should be offered to affected individuals informing them that there is a 50% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy. The penetrance is thought to be complete while there is a great intrafamilial and interfamilial variability in the presence, severity and type of anomalies.", "management_and_treatment": "Management of affected patients includes excision of branchial fistulae or cysts, hearing aids and education programs appropriate for the hearing impaired, and follow-up by a nephrologist. Dialysis or renal transplantation may be required.", "prognosis": "Most patients with BOR syndrome receiving appropriate treatment are able to lead normal, active lives. The prognosis of BOR syndrome patients primarily depends on the severity of the renal involvement. Pregnancies where the fetus has severe renal impairment can end in a miscarriage. Later in life, the renal disease might progress to end-stage renal disease."}, {"name": "Branchio-skeleto-genitales Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltenes Fehlbildungs-Syndrom mit multiplen kongenitalen Anomalien/Dysmorphien, das gekennzeichnet ist durch eine moderate Inntelligenzminderung, distinkte kraniofaziale Merkmale (einschlie\u00dflich Brachyzephalie, Gesichtsasymmetrie, ausgepr\u00e4gtem Hypertelorismus, Blepharochalasis, Proptosis, eine breite Nase mit konkavem Nasenkamm und knolliger Nasenspitze, Mittelgesichtshypoplasie, bifides Gaumenz\u00e4pfchen oder partielle Gaumenspalte und Prognathismus), fortschreitende Zahnanomalien (Dentiger\u00f6se Zysten, radikul\u00e4re Dentin-Dysplasie und fr\u00fcher Zahnverlust), Wirbelfusionen (insbesondere C2-C3) und Hypospadie. Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit ist ein zus\u00e4tzliches beobachtetes Merkmal.", "synonyms": "BSG-Syndrom, Elsahy-Waters-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0oder\u00a0X-chromosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "211380", "UMLS": "C1859384", "GARD": "955"}, {"name": "Brasilianisches h\u00e4morrhagisches Fieber", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Brazilian hemorrhagic fever, caused by the Sabia virus (a newly discovered arenavirus), is a viral hemorrhagic fever, believed to originate from Sao Paulo, Brazil, with only 3 reported cases (2 of which were due to laboratory accidents) to date, characterized by fever, nausea vomiting myalgia tremors, and hemorragic manifestations such as conjunctival petechia and haematemesis, leading potentially to shock, coma and death.", "synonyms": "Sabia hemorrhagic fever, ", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "A96.8", "umls": "C0343633"}, {"name": "Brauer-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Dysplasie, dermale faziale fokale, Typ I", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Focal facial dermal dysplasia type I (FFDD1), also known as Brauer syndrome, is a focal facial dysplasia (FFDD; see this term) characterized by congenital bitemporal cutis aplasia.", "synonyms": "Bitemporal aplasia cutis congenita, Brauer syndrome, FFDD type I, FFDD1, Focal facial dermal dysplasia 1, Brauer type, Focal facial dermal dysplasia type 1, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q82.8", "omim": "136500", "umls": "C1744559\u00a0 C2936827", "mesh": "C536385\u00a0 C537068", "gard": "8416", "epidemiology": "FFDD1 has been reported in over 80 cases including three large multi-generational families (German, English, Australian) and several sporadic cases.", "clinical_description": "The bitemporal, rarely unilateral, hypoplastic scar-like lesions in FFDD, resembling forceps marks, are usually the only manifestations of FFDD1. Other very rarely described and usually mild facial dysmorphic features may comprise a low frontal hairline, sparse hair, sparse lateral eyebrows, distichiasis (upper lashes), flattened nasal tip, bulbous nasal tip, prominent upper lip, skin dimples lateral to lips, horizontal chin furrow, vertical chin cleft, and linear grooves on the forehead. Most patients usually have normal intelligence.", "etiology": "Etiology is unknown.", "diagnostic_methods": "Clinical examination reveals bitemporal scars.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes focal facial dermal dysplasia type 2 and 3 (see these terms).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is not available", "genetic_counseling": "FFDD1 is transmitted in an autosomal dominant manner with full penetrance.", "management_and_treatment": "No specific treatment exists. There is limited experience with plastic surgery for the facial scar-like lesions.", "prognosis": "Affected individuals have a normal intelligence and life span."}, {"name": "Braun-Bayer-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Nephrose-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Harnwegsanomalien-Fingerfehlbildungen-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltenes, genetisch bedingtes Syndrom, das durch multiple kongenitalen Anomalien, inkl. Harnwegsanomalien, Nephrose, Schallleitungsschwerh\u00f6rigkeit und digitale Fehlbildungen (kurze und bifide distale Phalangen von Daumen und Gro\u00dfzehen) gekennzeichnet ist. Seit 1962 gibt es keine weiteren Beschreibungen in der Literatur.", "synonyms": "Braun-Bayer-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unbekannt\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "256200", "UMLS": "C1850552", "MeSH": "C536402", "GARD": "3943"}, {"name": "BRBN", "sub_name": "Blue rubber bleb-Naevus", "german_description": "Der Blue rubber bleb-Naevus (BRBNS) ist eine seltene vaskul\u00e4re Fehlbildung mit vor allem kutanen und viszeralen L\u00e4sionen, die h\u00e4ufig zu schweren und potentiell t\u00f6dlichen Blutungen und An\u00e4mie f\u00fchren. Bisher wurden mehr als 200 F\u00e4lle beschrieben, aber die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Multifokale ven\u00f6se Fehlbildungen bestehen am h\u00e4ufigsten in der Haut und im Gastrointestinaltrakt (GIT), aber auch im Gehirn, in den Nieren, Lungen, Augen, Knochen uns anderen Organen. Beschrieben wurden auch Gerinnungsst\u00f6rungen (Verbrauchskoagulopathie, Thrombozytopenie). Die L\u00e4sionen sind in der Regel schon im Kindesalter ausgepr\u00e4gt, k\u00f6nnen sich aber auch erst im sp\u00e4teren Leben entwickeln. Sie pulsieren leicht, sind blau gef\u00e4rbt und komprimierbar. Wichtigste klinische Manifestation sind akute oder chronische Blutungen aus multiplen vaskul\u00e4ren Fehlbildungen im GIT, in der Regel im D\u00fcnndarm. Akute Blutungen werden manifest mit Bluterbrechen, Mel\u00e4na (Blutstuhl) oder rektale Blutungen. Ohne radikale Behandlung werden die Patienten mit BRBNS durch chronische Magendarmblutungen an\u00e4misch und m\u00fcssen ihr ganzes Leben mit Eisen und Bluttransfusionen behandelt werden. Eine maligne Umwandlung der L\u00e4sionen wurde bisher nicht beschrieben. Seltene Komplikationen der gastrointestinalen Malformationen sind Volvulus, Intussuszeption und Darminfarkt. Die Ursache des Syndroms ist nicht bekannt. Die meisten F\u00e4lle erscheinen isoliert, aber mehrere Familien mit autosomal-dominanter Vererbung wurden beschrieben. Mutationen im TEK/TIE2-Gen (9p21), das f\u00fcr eine endotheliale Rezeptor-Tyrosinkinase kodiert, sind wahrscheinlich f\u00fcr die famili\u00e4ren F\u00e4lle verantwortlich. Methoden zur Diagnose des BRBNS sind H\u00e4matologie, Endoskkopie, Ultraschall, CT, MRI und Histopathologie. Differentialdiagnosen sind: Gef\u00e4\u00dftumoren, entweder benigne (H\u00e4mangiome) oder maligne (Kaposi-Sarkom, Angiosarkom); Gef\u00e4\u00dfanomalien bei angeborenen oder systemischen Erkrankungen (Klippel-Trenaunay-Weber, Ehlers-Danlos, die CREST-Variante der Sklerodermie, Osler-Weber-Rendu-Syndrom) und erworbene oder sporadische L\u00e4sionen (Angiodysplasien, vaskul\u00e4re Ektasie des Antrum pyloricum, strahleninduzierte vaskul\u00e4re Ektasie und Dieulafoy-L\u00e4sionen (sh. diese Termini). Naevi der Haut bluten in der Regel nicht: Chirurgische Resektion, Sklerotherapie oder Embolisation ergeben gute kosmetische Resultate. Wenn keine massiven gastrointestinalen Blutungen auftreten, ist eine konservative Behandlung mit Eisengaben und/oder Bluttransfusionen ausreichend. Wenig wirksam sind Kortikosteroide, anti-fibrinolytische Agentien, hochdosierte intraven\u00f6se Gaben von Gammaglobulin und Interferon-alpha. Langzeitbehandlung mit dem Somatostatin-Analogon Octreotid reduziert den Blutverlust aus den Naevi und anderen vaskul\u00e4ren L\u00e4sionen des Magendarmtraktes. Intraoperative Enteroskopie ist die sicherste diagnostische und/oder therapeutische Methode mit endoskopischer Koagulation oder vollst\u00e4ndiger chirurgischer Keilekzision. Es wird empfohlen, die Indikation f\u00fcr einen operativen Eingriff mit drahtloser Kapsel-Endoskopie abzukl\u00e4ren. Diese Methode kann auch f\u00fcr die Kontrolle des Therapieeffektes n\u00fctzlich sein.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare vascular malformation disorder with cutaneous and visceral lesions frequently associated with serious, potentially fatal bleeding and anemia.", "synonyms": "BRBN, Bean syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q27.8", "omim": "112200", "umls": "C0346072", "mesh": "C536240", "gard": "5940", "epidemiology": "More than 200 cases have been published so far, but prevalence is unknown.", "clinical_description": "Multifocal venous malformations most commonly involve the skin and gastrointestinal tract (GIT), but can also affect the brain, kidneys, lungs, eyes, bones and other organs. Hemostatic abnormalities due to consumption coagulopathy and thrombocythemia have also been described. The lesions are generally present in childhood but can develop later in life. They are usually blue colored and easily compressible with light palpation. The main clinical manifestation is acute or chronic bleeding from the multiple GIT vascular malformations, with the small intestine usually being involved. The acute bleeding presents as hematemesis, melena, or rectal bleeding. Unless treated radically, patients with BRBN develop anemia from chronic gastrointestinal bleeding and require lifelong treatment with iron and blood transfusions. Malignant transformation of the lesions has not been reported so far. Infrequent complications of the gastrointestinal malformations are volvulus, intussusception and intestinal infarction.", "etiology": "The cause of the syndrome is still unknown. Although most cases show no apparent hereditary pattern, autosomal dominant expression has been reported in several families. A gene mutation has been mapped to the short arm of chromosome 9 and might be involved in these familial cases.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnostic methods include: blood counts, endoscopy, ultrasound, CT, MRI, and histopathology.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include vascular tumors, either benign (hemangiomas) or malignant (Kaposi's sarcoma, angiosarcoma); vascular anomalies associated with congenital or systemic diseases (Klippel-Trenaunay-Weber, Ehlers-Danlos, the CREST variant of scleroderma, and Osler-Weber-Rendu syndrome) and acquired and sporadic lesions (angiodysplasias, gastric antral vascular ectasia, radiation-induced vascular ectasias, and Dieulafoy's lesions) (see these terms).", "management_and_treatment": "Cutaneous lesions do not usually bleed: surgery, sclerotherapy or embolization provide a good cosmetic result. In the absence of massive GIT bleeding, a conservative treatment is sufficient (iron supplementation and/or blood transfusions). Corticosteroids, antifibrinolytic agents, high-dose intravenous gamma globulin and interferon alpha are of poor effect. Long-term use of octreotide has been found to reduce blood loss from BRBN and other vascular gastrointestinal lesions. Intra-operative enteroscopy is the accepted ultimate diagnostic and/or therapeutic procedure, allowing immediate resolution of pathological findings by endoscopic coagulation or surgical full-thickness wedge excision. It is recommended to start with capsule wireless endoscopy to specify the indication for the procedure. Capsule endoscopy may also be a useful tool for monitoring the effects of therapy."}, {"name": "BRE", "sub_name": "Rolando-Epilepsie", "german_description": "Die Benigne Epilepsie des Kindesalters mit Rolandischen (zentro-temporalen) Spikes (BECRS) ist das h\u00e4ufigste Epilepsiesyndrom im Kindesalter. Es ist charakterisiert durch Partial-Anf\u00e4lle, meist w\u00e4hrend des Schlafes oder kurz vor dem Aufwachen, mit Beteiligung von Mund, Gesicht und Sprachorganen. Auch eine Generalisierung ist m\u00f6glich. Das EEG ist typisch und bildet das haupts\u00e4chliche diagnostische Kriterium. Es ist biphasisch und setzt sich aus hochgespannten Spikes und scharfen Wellen mit nachfolgenden langsamen Wellen zusammen. Dieses Muster wurde 'zentrotemporal' genannt, oder auch 'Rolandische Spikes'. Regelm\u00e4\u00dfig sistieren die Anf\u00e4lle in der Adoleszenz. Antikonvulsiva werden selten ben\u00f6tigt. BECRS macht 13-23% aller F\u00e4lle von Epilepsie des Kindesalters aus. Die Inzidenz ist 21 / 100.000 Kinder unter 15. Das dominant vererbte Einzelgen mit niedriger Penetranz und Expressivit\u00e4t und mit Altersbegrenzung liegt in der Chromosomenregion 15q14. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Rolandic epilepsy (RE) is a focal childhood epilepsy characterized by seizures consisting of unilateral facial sensory-motor symptoms, with electroencephalogram (EEG) showing sharp biphasic waves over the rolandic region. It is an age-related epilepsy, with excellent outcome.", "synonyms": "BECRS, BECTS, BRE, Benign epilepsy of childhood with centrotemporal spikes, Benign familial epilepsy of childhood with rolandic spikes, Benign rolandic epilepsy, Centrotemporal epilepsy, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G40.0", "omim": "117100\u00a0 245570", "umls": "C0376532\u00a0 C2363129", "gard": "10287", "epidemiology": "RE is the most common childhood epilepsy and accounts for 8-25% of all childhood epilepsies. Its incidence has been estimated to be approximately 1/5,000 in children within 15 years.", "clinical_description": "Onset is between 3 and 12 years, in otherwise normal children (peak of onset is 5-8 years). Seizures typically occur during sleep or drowsy states; they are brief with unilateral sensorimotor (such as numbness, tingling, drooling) that involves pharynx, tongue, face, lips and sometimes hand. Speech arrest often occurs, while comprehension is preserved. Seizures may alternate from one side to the other and may become generalized. Longer attacks can be followed by post-ictal hemiplegia. Some children may have selective neuropsychological impairment affecting language, attention, visuomotor skills and behavior. They usually do not outlast the period of active seizures. Seizure remission occurs within 2-4 years from the onset. The majority of patients have <10 seizures and 10-20% have a single seizure.", "etiology": "Etiology of RE is still unknown. There is probably a genetic predisposition: an increased rate of RE, febrile seizures, and epilepsy-aphasia spectrum disorders were found among relatives. Pathogenesis seems to be related with the critical and vulnerable phase of brain maturation.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis of RE relies on the clinical features and on EEG findings that show slow, diphasic, high voltage, centrotemporal spikes, activated by sleep. Brain magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) is normal.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes other idiopathic focal childhood epilepsies (benign childhood occipital epilepsy, Panayiotopoulos type and Gastaut type. Other etiologies causing similar symptoms are excluded with brain MRI.", "genetic_counseling": "Autosomal dominant transmission has been reported in some cases.", "management_and_treatment": "The majority of patients, who have a single or few seizures, do not require treatment. Differently, patients with frequent seizures (10-20%) may need treatment for a short time. In such cases, carbamazepine or valproate are preferred even if, in rare cases, carbamazepine may have a paradoxical effect.", "prognosis": "Prognosis of RE is favorable since nearly 90% of patients remit before puberty. In rare cases (<1%), RE may evolve to atypical RE with linguistic, behavioral and neuropsychological deficits. An aggressive treatment with steroids, in these cases might change the evolution of the disease and a remission of neuropsychological deficits might be seen."}, {"name": "BRESEK-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "BRESHECK-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "308205", "UMLS": "C3502469", "summary": "Der Typ Reish der X-chromosomalen geistigen Retardierung ist gekennzeichnet durch Hirnfehlbildungen (brain), schwere geistige Behinderung (retardation), ektodermale Dysplasie, Skelettanomalien (Wirbelanomalien, Skoliose, Polydaktylie), Ohren(ear)- und Augen(eye)anomalien (Fehlentwicklung; d\u00fcnner Sehnerv; tiefsitzende, gro\u00dfe Ohren; Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit) und Nieren(kidney)-Dysplasie oder -Hypoplasie. Dieses BRESEK-Syndrom wurde bei 2 Br\u00fcdern beschrieben, von denen einer kurz nach der Geburt starb. Einer der Br\u00fcder hatte auch eine Hirschsprung-Krankheit, eine Gaumenspalte und einen Kryptorchismus (cleft palate/cryptorchidism), woraus das Akronym BRESHECK folgt. Das Syndrom wird X-chromosomal-dominant vererbt. "}, {"name": "BRESHECK-Syndrom", "sub_name": "BRESEK-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "BRESHECK-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "308205", "UMLS": "C3502469", "summary": "Der Typ Reish der X-chromosomalen geistigen Retardierung ist gekennzeichnet durch Hirnfehlbildungen (brain), schwere geistige Behinderung (retardation), ektodermale Dysplasie, Skelettanomalien (Wirbelanomalien, Skoliose, Polydaktylie), Ohren(ear)- und Augen(eye)anomalien (Fehlentwicklung; d\u00fcnner Sehnerv; tiefsitzende, gro\u00dfe Ohren; Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit) und Nieren(kidney)-Dysplasie oder -Hypoplasie. Dieses BRESEK-Syndrom wurde bei 2 Br\u00fcdern beschrieben, von denen einer kurz nach der Geburt starb. Einer der Br\u00fcder hatte auch eine Hirschsprung-Krankheit, eine Gaumenspalte und einen Kryptorchismus (cleft palate/cryptorchidism), woraus das Akronym BRESHECK folgt. Das Syndrom wird X-chromosomal-dominant vererbt. "}, {"name": "BRIC", "sub_name": "Cholestase, benigne intrahepatische, rekurrente", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Benigne rekurrente intrahepatische Cholestase (BRIC), eine erbliche Leberst\u00f6rung, ist gekennzeichnet durch intermittierende Episoden intrahepatischer Cholestase, im Allgemeinen ohne Progression zu chronischem Leberschaden. Man nimmt an, dass die BRIC zu einem klinischen Spektrum intrahepatischer cholestatischer St\u00f6rungen geh\u00f6rt, das von den bei BRIC beobachteten milden intermittierenden Episoden bis hin zu schwerer, chronischer und progredienter Cholestase reicht, wie man sie bei der Progressiven famili\u00e4ren intrahepatischen Cholestase (PFIC; siehe dort) beobachtet.", "synonyms": "BRIC, Summerskill-Walshe-Tygstrup Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "K83.1", "OMIM": "243300\u00a0 605479", "UMLS": "C0149841", "GARD": "12185", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz der BRIC ist unbekannt.", "clinical_description": "Die erste cholestatische Episode kann in jedem Alter erfolgen, jedoch ist ein Beginn in den ersten zwei Lebensdekaden am h\u00e4ufigsten. Die Patienten weisen Sch\u00fcbe starken Juckreizes und Gelbsucht auf, die mehrere Wochen oder Monate andauern k\u00f6nnen, bevor sie spontan abklingen. Zu den assoziierten Symptomen geh\u00f6ren M\u00fcdigkeit, Appetitmangel, dunkler Urin und blasser Stuhl. Hepatomegalie ist ebenfalls ein h\u00e4ufiger Befund. Zwischen den Episoden zeigen die Patienten keine Symptome und die Intervalle zwischen den Anf\u00e4llen variieren von Monaten bis zu Jahren. Die Faktoren, die den Ausbruch der Cholestase ausl\u00f6sen bleiben bislang noch unklar, aber sowohl Virusinfektionen als auch Schwangerschaften und orale Verh\u00fctungsmittel wurden in der Vergangenheit daf\u00fcr verantwortlich gemacht. Zwei Formen der BRIC wurden beschrieben (BRIC1 und BRIC2) (siehe jeweils dort). Klinisch sind beide Formen einander recht \u00e4hnlich; jedoch k\u00f6nnen Patienten mit BRIC1 extrahepatische Merkmale zeigen, etwa H\u00f6rverlust, Pankreatitis und Diarrhoe, w\u00e4hrend Cholelithiasis ein h\u00e4ufiges Symptom bei BRIC2 ist. Patienten mit BRIC2 haben zudem ein erh\u00f6htes Risiko, an hepatobili\u00e4ren malignen Erkrankungen zu erkranken.", "etiology": "Die BRIC1 ist allelisch zur PFIC1 (siehe dort) und wird durch Mutationen im ATP8B1-Gen (18q21) verursacht. Es kodiert eine P-Typ-ATPase, die an der Gallenkan\u00e4lchen-Membran der Hepatozyten und in anderen Epithelien exprimiert wird. BRIC2 ist allelisch zu PFIC2 (siehe dort) und wird durch Mutationen im ABCB11-Gen (2q24) verursacht, das die leberspezifische Gallensalz-Exportpumpe (BSEP) kodiert. Die krankheitsverursachenden Mutationen bei der BRIC sind in der Regel Missense-Mutationen.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf der klinischen Anamnese (mindestens 2-3 Cholestase-Episoden), der Serum-Biochemie (niedrige bis normale Gamma-GT-Aktivit\u00e4t und Cholesterinspiegel, erh\u00f6hte Gesamt-Gallens\u00e4uren (TBA) und hohe Spiegel konjugierten Bilirubins w\u00e4hrend der Episoden), der Cholangiographie (die normale intra- und extrahepatische Galleng\u00e4nge zeigt), der Leberhistologie (mit der eine intrahepatische Cholestase bei normaler Leberstruktur nachgewiesen wird) und der immunohistochemischen Analyse (fehlende oder verringerte BSEP-F\u00e4rbung bei der Mehrzahl der BRIC2-Patienten). Die Mutationsanalyse best\u00e4tigt die Diagnose und differenziert die Subtypen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind: Medikament\u00f6s induzierte cholestatische Erkrankung, intrahepatische Cholestase w\u00e4hrend der Schwangerschaft, prim\u00e4re bili\u00e4re Zirrhose und prim\u00e4r sklerosierende Cholangitis (siehe jeweils dort). Die BRIC kann von der PFIC auf der Grundlage des Krankheitsverlaufs und der Leberhistologie unterschieden werden.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Pr\u00e4natale Tests sind m\u00f6glich, wenn die krankheitsverursachenden Mutationen in der Familie bekannt sind.", "genetic_counseling": "Sowohl BRIC1 als auch BRIC2 werden autosomal-rezessiv vererbt, Bei einer BRIC-Familie wurde ein scheinbar autosomal-dominanter Erbgang (Pseudo-Dominanz?) beschrieben.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung erfolgt haupts\u00e4chlich symptomatisch: Rifampicin und Cholestyramin werden verordnet zur Verringerung des Juckreizes und um bei einigen Patienten die Remission einer cholestatischen Episode zu induzieren. Auch Plasmapherese/MARS (Molecular Adsorbents Recirculation System) hat sich in einigen F\u00e4llen als wirksam erwiesen. F\u00fcr Personen, die auf eine medikament\u00f6se Therapie nicht ansprechen, ist eine endoskopische nasobili\u00e4re Drainage im Allgemeinen wirksam. Eine partielle Ableitung nach au\u00dfen wird ebenfalls eingesetzt, um die Lebensqualit\u00e4t zu verbessern und eine Progression der Erkrankung zu verhindern. Eine Lebertransplantation kann schlie\u00dflich bei Patienten mit h\u00e4ufigen und schweren Episoden indiziert sein.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist allgemein g\u00fcnstig, mit einer Tendenz zu geringerer H\u00e4ufigkeit der Episoden mit zunehmendem Alter. Beschrieben wurde jedoch auch eine Progression von der BRIC zur PFIC, was auf ein klinisches Kontinuum hindeutet.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz der BRIC ist unbekannt."}, {"name": "BRIC1", "sub_name": "Cholestase, benigne intrahepatische, rekurrente, Typ 1", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "BRIC Typ 1, BRIC1, ", "ICD-10": "K83.1", "OMIM": "243300", "UMLS": "C1855731", "MeSH": "C535930", "GARD": "10028", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Cholestase, benigne intrahepatische, rekurrente"}, {"name": "BRIC2", "sub_name": "Cholestase, benigne intrahepatische, rekurrente, Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "BRIC Typ 2, BRIC2, ", "ICD-10": "K83.1", "OMIM": "605479", "UMLS": "C2608083\u00a0 C3489789", "MeSH": "C535931", "GARD": "10029", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Cholestase, benigne intrahepatische, rekurrente"}, {"name": "BRIC Typ 1", "sub_name": "Cholestase, benigne intrahepatische, rekurrente, Typ 1", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "BRIC Typ 1, BRIC1, ", "ICD-10": "K83.1", "OMIM": "243300", "UMLS": "C1855731", "MeSH": "C535930", "GARD": "10028", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Cholestase, benigne intrahepatische, rekurrente"}, {"name": "BRIC Typ 2", "sub_name": "Cholestase, benigne intrahepatische, rekurrente, Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "BRIC Typ 2, BRIC2, ", "ICD-10": "K83.1", "OMIM": "605479", "UMLS": "C2608083\u00a0 C3489789", "MeSH": "C535931", "GARD": "10029", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Cholestase, benigne intrahepatische, rekurrente"}, {"name": "Brill-Krankheit", "sub_name": "Brill-Zinsser-Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Brill-Krankheit, ", "ICD-10": "A75.1", "UMLS": "C0006181", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Brill-Zinsser-Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Brill-Krankheit, ", "ICD-10": "A75.1", "UMLS": "C0006181", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Brittle-Cornea-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Brittle-Cornea-Syndrom ist eine Form des Ehlers-Danlos-Syndroms, das durch schwere Augenmanifestationen gekennzeichnet ist. Diese \u00e4u\u00dfern sich in extremer Hornhautverd\u00fcnnung mit Fragilit\u00e4t und Rissen, die in Abwesenheit eines signifikanten Traumas auftreten und bei Fortschreiten der Krankheit zur Erblindung f\u00fchren k\u00f6nnen. Extraokulare Manifestationen umfassen Taubheit, entwicklungsbedingte H\u00fcftdysplasie und Gelenkhypermobilit\u00e4t.", "synonyms": "Syndrom der spr\u00f6den Hornhaut, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q79.6", "OMIM": "229200\u00a0 614170", "UMLS": "C0268344", "GARD": "1019"}, {"name": "Broad-beta-Lipoprotein\u00e4mie", "sub_name": "Dysbetalipoprotein\u00e4mie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene kombinierte Hyperlipid\u00e4mie (HLP Typ 3), die durch hohe Cholesterin- und Triglyceridwerte, die von Lipoproteinen intermedi\u00e4rer Dichte (IDLs) transportiert werden, und ein hohes Risiko f\u00fcr fortschreitende Atherosklerose und vorzeitige kardiovaskul\u00e4re Erkrankungen gekennzeichnet ist.", "synonyms": "Broad-beta-Lipoprotein\u00e4mie, Famili\u00e4re Dyslipid\u00e4mie Typ 3, HLP Typ 3, Hyperlipid\u00e4mie Typ 3, Hyperlipoprotein\u00e4mie Typ 3, Remnant-Hyperlipid\u00e4mie, Remnant-Krankheit, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter, \u00c4ltere Erwachsene, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "E78.2", "OMIM": "617347", "UMLS": "C0020479", "MeSH": "D006952", "GARD": "6703", "MedDRA": "10060751", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz der Dysbetalipoprotein\u00e4mie wird in der Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung auf 1/10.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. \u00dcberwiegend sind M\u00e4nner betroffen (Verh\u00e4ltnis m\u00e4nnlich/weiblich etwa 2:1). Die Erkrankung tritt sehr selten vor dem Erwachsenenalter oder bei pr\u00e4menopausalen Frauen auf.", "clinical_description": "Die meisten Patienten sind asymptomatisch. Klinische Zeichen, die im Erwachsenenalter auftreten k\u00f6nnen, sind Xanthome an den Augenlidern (d. h. Xanthelasmen), vor\u00fcbergehende Xanthome an den Handfl\u00e4chen (d. h. planare palmaren Xanthome) oder tuber\u00f6se Xanthome \u00fcber Ellenbogen oder Knien. Es kann eine empfindliche Hepatomegalie beobachtet werden. Die Patienten entwickeln eine stark progrediente Atherosklerose, die zu einer vorzeitigen kardiovaskul\u00e4ren Erkrankung (Schlaganfall, koronare und periphere Arterienerkrankung) f\u00fchren kann. Patienten, die eine starke Hypertriglycerid\u00e4mie aufweisen, k\u00f6nnen auch eine akute Pankreatitis entwickeln.", "etiology": "Die Krankheit resultiert aus Mutationen im APOE-Gen (19q13.31), das f\u00fcr Apolipoprotein E kodiert, ein Protein, das die zellul\u00e4re Aufnahme von triglyceridreichen Lipoproteinresten (d. h. IDLs mit etwa gleichen Anteilen an Cholesterin und Triglyceriden) mit antioxidativen und entz\u00fcndungshemmenden Eigenschaften vermittelt. Di\u00e4tetische, metabolische, hormonelle Faktoren k\u00f6nnen die Krankheit verschlimmern, ebenso wie chronische Entz\u00fcndungen, Xenobiotika (z. B. Immunsuppressiva, Retinoide, Antidepressiva) oder andere genetische Kofaktoren (z. B. APOA5, APOC3, LIPC, LPL-Varianten).", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf dem Nachweis eines abnormalen Lipoproteinprofils mit erh\u00f6hten N\u00fcchternserumkonzentrationen von Gesamtcholesterin, Triglyceriden und Apolipoprotein B sowie erniedrigtem Plasma-High-Density-Lipoprotein (HDL)-Cholesterin (<40 mg/dL). Genetische Tests best\u00e4tigen die Diagnose. Bei jungen Erwachsenen k\u00f6nnen Anzeichen einer klinisch stummen Atherosklerose in der arterieller Bildgebung beobachtet werden.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Differentialdiagnose umfasst alle anderen Formen von atherogenen Hyperlipid\u00e4mien wie die famili\u00e4re Hypercholesterin\u00e4mie und die famili\u00e4re Hypertriglyzerid\u00e4mie.", "genetic_counseling": "In den meisten F\u00e4llen, die mit dem APOE (E2)-Genotyp assoziiert sind, ist der Erbgang kodominant oder bedingt rezessiv. Tr\u00e4ger dieses Genotyps zeigen den Ph\u00e4notyp der HLP Typ 3 nur, wenn andere metabolische, exogene oder genetische Faktoren vorhanden sind. Einige Patienten tragen jedoch heterozygote oder compound-heterozygote seltene APOE-Varianten, die f\u00fcr die Entwicklung der Krankheit ausreichen; in diesen F\u00e4llen ist die Vererbung autosomal-dominant oder kodominant.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung umfasst eine kohlenhydrat- und fettarme Di\u00e4t, Bewegung und lipidsenkende Medikamente (z. B. Fibrate, Statine) und ist in der Regel ausreichend f\u00fcr eine vollst\u00e4ndige R\u00fcckbildung der Erkrankung innerhalb weniger Monate. In schweren F\u00e4llen mit offenkundigen kardiovaskul\u00e4ren und/oder pankreatischen Manifestationen k\u00f6nnen intensive Therapien (z. B. Proproteinkonvertase Subtilisin/Kexin Typ 9 (PCSK9), ApoC3- oder mikrosomale Triglycerid-Transferprotein (MTP)-Inhibitoren, LDL-Apherese) vorgeschlagen werden.", "prognosis": "Ohne Behandlung haben die Patienten ein 5-10-fach h\u00f6heres Risiko f\u00fcr vorzeitige und wiederkehrende atherothrombotische Ereignisse als die Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz der Dysbetalipoprotein\u00e4mie wird in der Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung auf 1/10.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. \u00dcberwiegend sind M\u00e4nner betroffen (Verh\u00e4ltnis m\u00e4nnlich/weiblich etwa 2:1). Die Erkrankung tritt sehr selten vor dem Erwachsenenalter oder bei pr\u00e4menopausalen Frauen auf."}, {"name": "Brody-Myopathie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic skeletal muscle disease characterized by childhood onset of exercise-induced progressive impairment of muscle relaxation, stiffness, cramps, and myalgia, predominantly in the arms, legs, and face (eyelids), and, biochemically, by a reduced sarcoplasmic reticulum Ca(2+)-ATPase activity. Symptoms improve after a few minutes of rest and may be exacerbated by cold. The term Brody syndrome refers to a clinically distinguishable subset of patients without ATP2A1 mutations, with adolescence or adult onset and selective muscular involvement, in which myalgia is more common.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Adult, Childhood", "icd_10": "G71.8", "omim": "601003", "umls": "C1832918", "mesh": "C536607", "gard": "9158"}, {"name": "Bronchiale Dysplasie - Intelligenzminderung - Inguinalhernie", "sub_name": "Lambert-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Lambert-Syndrom wurde bisher nur in 1 franz\u00f6sischen Familie bei 4 Geschwistern beschrieben. Charakteristisch sind branchiale Dysplasie (Jochbein-Hypoplasie, Makrostomie, pr\u00e4aurikul\u00e4re Tags, Geh\u00f6rsgangs-Atresie), Klumpf\u00fc\u00dfe, Leistenhernien, Cholestase durch geringe Anzahl interlobul\u00e4rer Galleng\u00e4nge und intellektuelles Defizit.", "synonyms": "Bronchiale Dysplasie - Intelligenzminderung - Inguinalhernie, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unbekannt\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "245550", "UMLS": "C1855551", "MeSH": "C538396", "GARD": "3169"}, {"name": "Bronchialer NET", "sub_name": "Tumor, neuroendokriner, bronchialer", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare neuroendocrine neoplasm characterized by origin from pulmonary neuroendocrine cells and ranging from low-grade typical carcinoid and intermediate-grade atypical carcinoid to high-grade large-cell neuroendocrine carcinoma and small-cell carcinoma. Two thirds of the tumors are located in the major bronchi, with a predilection for the right lung, in particular the middle lobe. Most patients with central bronchial tumors present with hemoptysis, cough, recurrent pulmonary infections, fever, chest discomfort, and unilateral wheezing, while peripheral carcinoids are usually discovered only incidentally. Carcinoid syndrome or Cushing syndrome are very rare. The tumors may be part of multiple endocrine neoplasia type 1.", "synonyms": "Bronchial NET, ", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent, Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "D38.1"}, {"name": "Bronchialkarzinom, kleinzelliges", "german_description": "Das Kleinzellige Bronchialkarzinom (Kleinzelliger Lungenkrebs, SCLC) ist ein hochmalignes bronchogenes Karzinom, das \u00fcberwiegend im Zentrum der Lunge, in einem Hauptbronchus entsteht. Die mittlere Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1/20.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Vom SCLC sind haupts\u00e4chlich Peronen mittleren Alters (27-66 Jahre) mit Raucheranamnese betroffen. Etwa 70% der Patienten mit SCLC haben bei Stellung der Diagnose schon extra-thorakale Symptome. Zu den Symptomen geh\u00f6ren Thoraxschmerz, Dyspnoe, Husten und pfeifende Atmung. Die Beteiligung benachbarter Bereiche verursacht Heiserkeit, Dysphagie und Oberes Vena-cava-Syndrom (Obstruktion des Blutflusses durch die Vena cava superior). Zus\u00e4tzliche Symptome als Folge einer Fernmetastasierung sind ebenfalls m\u00f6glich. Rauchen und Strahlenexposition sind synergistisch wirkende Risikofaktoren. Die industrielle Exposition mit Bis (Chlormethyl\u00e4ther) ist ein weiterer Risikofaktor. R\u00f6ntgenaufnahmen des Thorax sind nicht ausreichend empfindlich, um einen SCLC fr\u00fchzeitig zu erkennen. R\u00f6ntgenologischen Auff\u00e4lligkeiten mu\u00df weiter nachgegangen werden, meist mit Computertomographie. Die Diagnose wird bioptisch gesichert. Patienten mit SCLC erhalten meist Bestrahlung und/oder Chemotherapie. In Hinblick auf eine Verbesserung der \u00dcberlebenschancen der Patienten ist sowohl bei ausgedehnten und bei begrenzten SCLC eine kombinierte Chemotherapie wirksamer als die Behandlung mit Einzelsubstanzen. Es kann auch eine prophylaktische Bestrahlung des Sch\u00e4dels erwogen werden, da innerhalb von 2-3 Jahren nach Behandlungsbeginn ein hohes Risiko f\u00fcr zentralnerv\u00f6se Metastasen besteht. Das Kleinzellige Bronchialkarzinom ist der aggressivste Lungentumor: Die 5-Jahres-\u00dcberlebensrate betr\u00e4gt 1-5%, der Median des gesamten \u00dcberlebens liegt bei etwa 6 bis 10 Monaten. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Small cell lung cancer (SCLC) is a highly aggressive malignant neoplasm, accounting for 10-15% of lung cancer cases, characterized by rapid growth, and early metastasis. SCLC usually manifests as a large hilar mass with bulky mediastinal lymphadenopathy presenting clinically with chest pain, persistent cough, dyspnea, wheezing, hoarseness, hemoptysis, loss of appetite, weight loss, and neurological and endocrine paraneoplastic syndromes. SCLC is primarily reported in elderly people with a history of long-term tobacco exposure.", "synonyms": "SCLC, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "C34.9", "omim": "182280", "umls": "C0149925"}, {"name": "Bronchiektasie, idiopathische", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Idiopathic bronchiectasis\u00a0(IB) is a progressive lung disease characterized by chronic dilation of the bronchi and destruction of the bronchial walls in the absence of any underlying cause (such as post infectious disease, aspiration, immunodeficiency, congenital abnormalities and ciliary anomalies).", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "J47", "omim": "211400\u00a0 613021\u00a0 613071", "umls": "C0339985"}, {"name": "Bronchiolitis, konstriktive", "sub_name": "Bronchiolitis obliterans mit obstruktiver Lungenerkrankung", "german_description": "Die Erwachsenenform der Bronchiolitis obliterans mit obstruktiver Atemst\u00f6rung ist charakterisiert durch eine entz\u00fcndliche und fibrosierende Wandverdickung der Bronchiolen, wodurch deren Lumen verengt und die Luftzirkulation eingeschr\u00e4nkt wird. Der Krankheit geht entweder eine akute, \u00e4tiologisch gekl\u00e4rte Affektion voraus oder sie entwickelt sich unter besonderen Bedingungen durch ungekl\u00e4rte Mechanismen. Selten tritt sie auch isoliert als sog. Idiopathische Bronchiolitis auf. Das Einatmen toxischer Gase (z.B. NO2) oder (bei Erwachenen allerdings selten) Infektionen k\u00f6nnen die Erkrankung ausl\u00f6sen. Eine Bronchiolitis obliterans tritt manchmal auch bei systemischen Erkrankungen auf, z.B. bei rheumatoider Arthritis, wo sie m\u00f6glicherweise durch D-Penicillamin ausgel\u00f6st wird. Sie ist auch eine schwere Komplikation nach Lungentransplantation mit chronischer Absto\u00dfungsreaktion oder nach Knochenmarktransplantion mit Graft-versus-Host-Krankheit. Idiopathische Formen scheinen selten zu sein, obwohl viele von ihnen evtl. f\u00e4lschlich als chronisch obstruktive Lungenerkrankung diagnostiziert werden. Sie beginnen mit Belastungs-Dyspnoe, oft zusammen mit Husten und rezidivierenden Bronchitiden. Diese werden meist durch progrediente Bronchiektasie der gro\u00dfen Bronchien beg\u00fcnstigt. Die Spirometrie zeigt eine floride obstruktive Erkrankung an, die kaum oder gar nicht reversibel ist. Eine erniedrigte Sauerstoffs\u00e4ttigung des Blutes ist ein sp\u00e4tes Symptom. Bildgebende Verfahren sind diagnostisch wenig informativ, jedoch sind 'Mosaik'-Befunde im CT verd\u00e4chtig. Die Diagnose wird durch Lungenbiopsie gesichert. Hierin sieht man eine parietale Bronchiolitis, meist ohne die Zeichen alveol\u00e4rer entz\u00fcndlicher oder fibrosierender Prozesse. Fibrosen k\u00f6nnen die Bronchiolen unter Zur\u00fccklassung einer bindegewebigen Narbe vollst\u00e4ndig zerst\u00f6ren. In einigen F\u00e4llen, z.B. nach Lungentransplantation, gen\u00fcgen evtl. schon radiologische Untersuchungen und Funktionstests zur Sicherung der Diagnose und er\u00fcbrigen eine Biopsie. Kortikosteroide und Immunsuppressiva k\u00f6nnen den Zustand der Patienten stabilisieren oder bessern, besonders dann, wenn eine entz\u00fcndliche zellul\u00e4re Reaktion noch im Vordergrund steht. Der Endpunkt der Krankheit ist eine Ateminsuffizienz, die eine Lungentransplantation n\u00f6tig macht.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Bronchiolitis obliterans syndrome (BOS) is a lung disorder that is mainly associated with chronic allograft dysfunction after lung transplantation and that is characterized by inflammation and fibrosis of bronchiolar walls that reduce the diameter of the bronchioles and result in progressive and irreversible airflow obstruction.", "synonyms": "Constrictive bronchiolitis, Obliterative bronchiolitis, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "J44.8", "umls": "C0006272\u00a0 C2350875", "gard": "5961"}, {"name": "Bronchiolitis obliterans mit obstruktiver Lungenerkrankung", "german_description": "Die Erwachsenenform der Bronchiolitis obliterans mit obstruktiver Atemst\u00f6rung ist charakterisiert durch eine entz\u00fcndliche und fibrosierende Wandverdickung der Bronchiolen, wodurch deren Lumen verengt und die Luftzirkulation eingeschr\u00e4nkt wird. Der Krankheit geht entweder eine akute, \u00e4tiologisch gekl\u00e4rte Affektion voraus oder sie entwickelt sich unter besonderen Bedingungen durch ungekl\u00e4rte Mechanismen. Selten tritt sie auch isoliert als sog. Idiopathische Bronchiolitis auf. Das Einatmen toxischer Gase (z.B. NO2) oder (bei Erwachenen allerdings selten) Infektionen k\u00f6nnen die Erkrankung ausl\u00f6sen. Eine Bronchiolitis obliterans tritt manchmal auch bei systemischen Erkrankungen auf, z.B. bei rheumatoider Arthritis, wo sie m\u00f6glicherweise durch D-Penicillamin ausgel\u00f6st wird. Sie ist auch eine schwere Komplikation nach Lungentransplantation mit chronischer Absto\u00dfungsreaktion oder nach Knochenmarktransplantion mit Graft-versus-Host-Krankheit. Idiopathische Formen scheinen selten zu sein, obwohl viele von ihnen evtl. f\u00e4lschlich als chronisch obstruktive Lungenerkrankung diagnostiziert werden. Sie beginnen mit Belastungs-Dyspnoe, oft zusammen mit Husten und rezidivierenden Bronchitiden. Diese werden meist durch progrediente Bronchiektasie der gro\u00dfen Bronchien beg\u00fcnstigt. Die Spirometrie zeigt eine floride obstruktive Erkrankung an, die kaum oder gar nicht reversibel ist. Eine erniedrigte Sauerstoffs\u00e4ttigung des Blutes ist ein sp\u00e4tes Symptom. Bildgebende Verfahren sind diagnostisch wenig informativ, jedoch sind 'Mosaik'-Befunde im CT verd\u00e4chtig. Die Diagnose wird durch Lungenbiopsie gesichert. Hierin sieht man eine parietale Bronchiolitis, meist ohne die Zeichen alveol\u00e4rer entz\u00fcndlicher oder fibrosierender Prozesse. Fibrosen k\u00f6nnen die Bronchiolen unter Zur\u00fccklassung einer bindegewebigen Narbe vollst\u00e4ndig zerst\u00f6ren. In einigen F\u00e4llen, z.B. nach Lungentransplantation, gen\u00fcgen evtl. schon radiologische Untersuchungen und Funktionstests zur Sicherung der Diagnose und er\u00fcbrigen eine Biopsie. Kortikosteroide und Immunsuppressiva k\u00f6nnen den Zustand der Patienten stabilisieren oder bessern, besonders dann, wenn eine entz\u00fcndliche zellul\u00e4re Reaktion noch im Vordergrund steht. Der Endpunkt der Krankheit ist eine Ateminsuffizienz, die eine Lungentransplantation n\u00f6tig macht.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Bronchiolitis obliterans syndrome (BOS) is a lung disorder that is mainly associated with chronic allograft dysfunction after lung transplantation and that is characterized by inflammation and fibrosis of bronchiolar walls that reduce the diameter of the bronchioles and result in progressive and irreversible airflow obstruction.", "synonyms": "Constrictive bronchiolitis, Obliterative bronchiolitis, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "J44.8", "umls": "C0006272\u00a0 C2350875", "gard": "5961"}, {"name": "Bronchiolitis obliterans mit organisierender Pneumonie", "sub_name": "Pneumonie, kryptogene organisierende", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Kryptogene organisierende Pneumonie (COP) oder Bronchiolitis obliterans mit organisierender Pneumonie (BOOP) ist eine Form der idiopathischen interstitiellen Lungenentz\u00fcndung, die pathologisch durch die organisierende Pneumonie (OP) gekennzeichnet ist, die mit unspezifischen grippe\u00e4hnlichen Symptomen sowie Husten und Atemnot auftritt und bei der keine \u00e4tiologisches Ursache gefunden wird.", "synonyms": "BOOP, Bronchiolitis obliterans mit organisierender Pneumonie, COP, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter, \u00c4ltere Erwachsene", "ICD-10": "J84.1", "UMLS": "C0242770", "MeSH": "D018549", "GARD": "1620", "epidemiology": "COP macht 5-10% der interstitiellen Lungenerkrankungen aus. Die j\u00e4hrliche Inzidenz in Island wurde auf 1/90.900 gesch\u00e4tzt.", "clinical_description": "Das durchschnittliche Alter der Erkrankung ist 50-60 Jahre. Die Patienten zeigen unspezifische Merkmale wie mildes Fieber, unproduktiver Husten, Unwohlsein, Anorexie, Gewichtsverlust und progressiver, aber leichter Dyspnoe. Bei der Auskultation finden sich fokal sp\u00e4rliche Rasselger\u00e4usche \u00fcber den betroffenen Bereichen, die teilweise mit klinischen Konsolidierungsmerkmalen einhergehen. Es gibt keine Anzeichen von Trommelschlegelfingern. Zwischen dem Auftreten der ersten Symptome und der Diagnose k\u00f6nnen 3 oder mehr Monate vergehen. In schnell fortschreitenden F\u00e4llen kann die Dyspnoe schwerwiegend sein. Seltene Erscheinungsformen sind Brustschmerzen, Nachtschwei\u00df und H\u00e4moptyse. Es wurden Pneumothorax und Pneumomediastinum berichtet. COP verschwindet in der Regel mit der Behandlung, aber in bis zur H\u00e4lfte der F\u00e4lle treten R\u00fcckf\u00e4lle auf. Obwohl die meisten diagnostizierten F\u00e4lle inzwischen behandelt werden, wurde auch eine spontane Besserung \u00fcber 3-6 Monate berichtet.", "etiology": "Die \u00c4tiologie ist unbekannt. Die Stadien der COP-Pathogenese umfassen die Verletzungsphase (Permeabilit\u00e4ts\u00f6dem und Fibrinablagerungen als Reaktion auf eine Verletzung der Alveolarzellen), die proliferierende Phase (Bildung von fibroinflammatorischen Knospen), die reife Phase (Vorhandensein von \"reifen\" fibrotischen Knospen im Alveolarraum) und die L\u00f6sungsphase (Reversibilit\u00e4t von L\u00e4sionen).", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf dem klinischen Bild, der Bildgebung, der Histopathologie der Lunge und dem Ausschluss aller Ursachen der sekund\u00e4ren OP. Die hochaufl\u00f6sende Computertomographie zeigt 3 Hauptmuster der Bildgebung: mehrere fleckige alveol\u00e4re Tr\u00fcbungen, die migrieren k\u00f6nnen (in den meisten F\u00e4llen; typische COP), ein einzelner Fokusknoten oder eine einzelne Masse (Fokale COP) oder diffuse infiltrative Tr\u00fcbungen (infiltrative oder progressive fibrotische COP). Die videogest\u00fctzte Thorakoskopie ist die Methode der Wahl bei der Gewinnung von Lungengewebe, aber transbronchiale Biopsien, Kernnadelbiopsien und seit Neuestem transbronchiale Kryobiopsien sind alternative Methoden. Histologische Befunde der OP sind eine l\u00fcckenhafte F\u00fcllung der Lungenalveolen und Atemwegsbronchiolen durch Knospen von Granulationsgewebe aus Fibroblasten und Myofibroblasten (Massonk\u00f6rper). Die faseroptische Bronchoskopie mit bronchoalveol\u00e4rer Lavage zeigt einen deutlichen Anstieg der Lymphozyten und einen leichten Anstieg der Neutrophilen und Eosinophilen. Es werden erh\u00f6hte C-reaktive Proteinserumspiegel und Neutrophilzahlen im peripheren Blut berichtet.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Hauptdifferenzialdiagnose ist die idiopathische chronische eosinophile Pneumonie. Sekund\u00e4re OP m\u00fcssen auch durch die Beseitigung ihrer m\u00f6glichen Ursachen ausgeschlossen werden, einschlie\u00dflich prim\u00e4rer bili\u00e4rer Zirrhose, ulzerativer Kolitis, Morbus Crohn, Sweet-Syndrom, Sarkoidose, Morbus Beh\u00e7et, prim\u00e4rem Lungenlymphom, Medikamenten, Infektionen und allen Bindegewebserkrankungen, insbesondere rheumatoide Arthritis und idiopathisch entz\u00fcndliche Myopathien.", "management_and_treatment": "Standardtherapie f\u00fcr COP sind Kortikosteroide, meist mit Prednison-Dosen von 0,75 mg/kg/Tag f\u00fcr 4 Wochen, die \u00fcber einen Zeitraum von 24 Wochen allm\u00e4hlich abnehmen. Bei Patienten mit schnell fortschreitender COP kann hochdosiertes intraven\u00f6ses Methylprednisolon verabreicht werden. Die fokale COP wird oft durch die Entfernung von L\u00e4sionen diagnostiziert, die zun\u00e4chst als neoplastisch galten, wobei eine weitere Therapie oft nicht erforderlich ist. R\u00fcckf\u00e4lle sollten mit einer Anfangsdosis von 20 mg/Tag Prednison behandelt werden, die sich dann \u00fcber einen Zeitraum von 12 Wochen verj\u00fcngt. Rezidive, die zu oft oder w\u00e4hrend einer Kortikosteroidtherapie auftreten, sollten zu einer Neubewertung der Diagnose f\u00fchren. Die immunsuppressive Therapie kann selten bei schweren infiltrativen Formen der COP eingesetzt werden.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist in der Regel gut, da sich die meisten F\u00e4lle erfolgreich mit einer Kortikosteroidbehandlung behandeln lassen. Rezidive treten jedoch bei 13-58% der Patienten auf und k\u00f6nnen sich bei h\u00e4ufigerem Auftreten auf die Lebensqualit\u00e4t auswirken.", "summary": "COP macht 5-10% der interstitiellen Lungenerkrankungen aus. Die j\u00e4hrliche Inzidenz in Island wurde auf 1/90.900 gesch\u00e4tzt."}, {"name": "Bronchiolitis, obliterative", "sub_name": "Bronchiolitis obliterans mit obstruktiver Lungenerkrankung", "german_description": "Die Erwachsenenform der Bronchiolitis obliterans mit obstruktiver Atemst\u00f6rung ist charakterisiert durch eine entz\u00fcndliche und fibrosierende Wandverdickung der Bronchiolen, wodurch deren Lumen verengt und die Luftzirkulation eingeschr\u00e4nkt wird. Der Krankheit geht entweder eine akute, \u00e4tiologisch gekl\u00e4rte Affektion voraus oder sie entwickelt sich unter besonderen Bedingungen durch ungekl\u00e4rte Mechanismen. Selten tritt sie auch isoliert als sog. Idiopathische Bronchiolitis auf. Das Einatmen toxischer Gase (z.B. NO2) oder (bei Erwachenen allerdings selten) Infektionen k\u00f6nnen die Erkrankung ausl\u00f6sen. Eine Bronchiolitis obliterans tritt manchmal auch bei systemischen Erkrankungen auf, z.B. bei rheumatoider Arthritis, wo sie m\u00f6glicherweise durch D-Penicillamin ausgel\u00f6st wird. Sie ist auch eine schwere Komplikation nach Lungentransplantation mit chronischer Absto\u00dfungsreaktion oder nach Knochenmarktransplantion mit Graft-versus-Host-Krankheit. Idiopathische Formen scheinen selten zu sein, obwohl viele von ihnen evtl. f\u00e4lschlich als chronisch obstruktive Lungenerkrankung diagnostiziert werden. Sie beginnen mit Belastungs-Dyspnoe, oft zusammen mit Husten und rezidivierenden Bronchitiden. Diese werden meist durch progrediente Bronchiektasie der gro\u00dfen Bronchien beg\u00fcnstigt. Die Spirometrie zeigt eine floride obstruktive Erkrankung an, die kaum oder gar nicht reversibel ist. Eine erniedrigte Sauerstoffs\u00e4ttigung des Blutes ist ein sp\u00e4tes Symptom. Bildgebende Verfahren sind diagnostisch wenig informativ, jedoch sind 'Mosaik'-Befunde im CT verd\u00e4chtig. Die Diagnose wird durch Lungenbiopsie gesichert. Hierin sieht man eine parietale Bronchiolitis, meist ohne die Zeichen alveol\u00e4rer entz\u00fcndlicher oder fibrosierender Prozesse. Fibrosen k\u00f6nnen die Bronchiolen unter Zur\u00fccklassung einer bindegewebigen Narbe vollst\u00e4ndig zerst\u00f6ren. In einigen F\u00e4llen, z.B. nach Lungentransplantation, gen\u00fcgen evtl. schon radiologische Untersuchungen und Funktionstests zur Sicherung der Diagnose und er\u00fcbrigen eine Biopsie. Kortikosteroide und Immunsuppressiva k\u00f6nnen den Zustand der Patienten stabilisieren oder bessern, besonders dann, wenn eine entz\u00fcndliche zellul\u00e4re Reaktion noch im Vordergrund steht. Der Endpunkt der Krankheit ist eine Ateminsuffizienz, die eine Lungentransplantation n\u00f6tig macht.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Bronchiolitis obliterans syndrome (BOS) is a lung disorder that is mainly associated with chronic allograft dysfunction after lung transplantation and that is characterized by inflammation and fibrosis of bronchiolar walls that reduce the diameter of the bronchioles and result in progressive and irreversible airflow obstruction.", "synonyms": "Constrictive bronchiolitis, Obliterative bronchiolitis, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "J44.8", "umls": "C0006272\u00a0 C2350875", "gard": "5961"}, {"name": "Bronchitis fibrinosa", "sub_name": "Bronchitis, plastische", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Bronchitis fibrinosa, Krupp\u00f6se Bronchitis, Pseudomembran\u00f6se Bronchitis, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "UMLS": "C0264342\u00a0 C0920258", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Bronchitis, plastische", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Bronchitis fibrinosa, Krupp\u00f6se Bronchitis, Pseudomembran\u00f6se Bronchitis, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "UMLS": "C0264342\u00a0 C0920258", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Bronchopulmonale Sequester, kongenitale", "sub_name": "Lungensequestration, kongenitale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die angeborene Lungensequestration ist eine seltene respiratorische Fehlbildung, die durch eine zystische oder solide Masse aus nicht funktionierendem primitivem segmentalem Lungengewebe gekennzeichnet ist, die nicht mit dem Tracheobronchialbaum kommuniziert und eine anomale systemische Blutversorgung aufweist. Die intralobul\u00e4re Sequestration kann asymptomatisch sein oder sich mit rezidivierenden pulmonalen Infektionen, H\u00e4moptysen, Brustschmerzen und Husten pr\u00e4sentieren und wird meist bei \u00e4lteren Kindern und Erwachsenen diagnostiziert. Extralob\u00e4re pulmonale Sequestration zeigt sich mit Atemnot, Zyanose, Schwierigkeiten bei der Nahrungsaufnahme oder Infektionen, kann mit anderen Anomalien assoziiert sein und wird meist bei Neugeborenen oder S\u00e4uglingen diagnostiziert.", "synonyms": "Bronchopulmonale Sequester, kongenitale, Pulmonale Sequestration, kongenitale, ", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q33.2", "GARD": "4593"}, {"name": "Bronchopulmonale Sequestration, extralob\u00e4re kongenitale", "sub_name": "Lungensequestration, extralob\u00e4re kongenitale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Bronchopulmonale Sequestration, extralob\u00e4re kongenitale, ", "ICD-10": "Q33.2", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Bronchopulmonale Sequestration, intralob\u00e4re kongenitale", "sub_name": "Lungensequestration, intralob\u00e4re kongenitale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Bronchopulmonale Sequestration, intralob\u00e4re kongenitale, ", "ICD-10": "Q33.2", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Bronspiegel-Zelnick-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Aplasia cutis congenita mit intestinaler Lymphangiektasie", "german_description": "Die Aplasia cutis congenita (ACC) ist ein seltener, in der Regel am Scheitel lokalisierter Hautdefekt. Er wurde mit einer Reihe von Krankheiten assoziiert gefunden, einmal auch mit intestinaler Lymphangiektasie (IL), bei 2 Br\u00fcdern. Bei der Geburt hatte der Propositus eine ACC des Scheitels und \u00d6deme, die 6 Monate anhielten. Mit 3 Jahren hatte er ein generalisiertes \u00d6dem, eine Hypoprotein\u00e4mie und Lymphopenie. Radioisotopen-Analysen und eine D\u00fcnndarmbiopsie sicherten die Diagnose einer IL. Unter einer fettfreien Di\u00e4t mit mittelkettigen Triglyzeriden normalisierten sich klinisches Bild und Laborwerte. Der 1 Jahr j\u00fcngere, ebenfalls betroffene Bruder hatte ein glattes Gliedma\u00dfen\u00f6dem und eine ausgedehnte ACC am Scheitel mit darunterliegendem Knochendefekt. Er starb mit 2 Monaten im Schock nach einer pl\u00f6tzlichen massiven Blutung aus dem Sagittalsinus. Die Assoziation von ACC und IL ist eines von mehreren Beispielen f\u00fcr das gemeinsame Auftreten ektodermaler und mesodermaler St\u00f6rungen. Das Zusammentreffen ist deshalb sehr wahrscheinlich nicht zuf\u00e4llig. Man kann annehmen, da\u00df die Krankheit autosomal-rezessiv vererbt wird. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "An extremely rare association syndrome, described in only two brothers to date (one of which died at 2 months of age), characterized by aplasia cutis congenita of the vertex and generalized edema (as well as hypoproteinemia and lymphopenia) due to intestinal lymphangiectasia. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1985.", "synonyms": "Bronspiegel-Zelnick syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q84.8", "omim": "207731", "umls": "C1859753", "mesh": "C537788", "gard": "753"}, {"name": "Brooke-Spiegler-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic disease characterized as an inherited skin tumour predisposition syndrome presenting with skin appendage tumours, namely cylindromas, spiradenomas and trichoepitheliomas", "synonyms": "CYLD cutaneous syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Adult", "omim": "132700\u00a0 601606\u00a0 605041\u00a0 612099", "umls": "C1857941", "mesh": "C536611", "gard": "10179", "epidemiology": "To date, more than 200 cases of CYLD Cutaneous Syndrome (CCS) have been reported in the literature. Increased severity in females is recognized.", "clinical_description": "CCS typically manifests in adolescence and early adulthood with the appearance of multiple skin tumours including cylindromas, spiradenomas and trichoepitheliomas. Tumour development is progressive and can affect the head and neck as well as torso. Cylindromas present as different sized pink nodules on the scalp which can become confluent (historically called ''turban tumour''). Spiradenomas are painful blue nodules that can measure several centimeters across. Trichoepitheliomas manifest as skin colored papules or firm nodules, bilateral and symmetrically distributed, preferring the central face region, particularly the nose and the surrounding skin. Patients may also develop small milia on the skin of the face. Mosaic presentations are recognised, with risk of genetic transmission to children. A minority of patients can also get major and minor salivary glands neoplasms, usually membranous basal cell adenoma. Malignancies arising in preexisting spiradenoma, cylindroma and spiradenocylindroma have been reported. Malignant tumours may be aggressive carcinomas with local infiltrative growth or metastases. Rarely, skin cylindromas may metastasise to the lung without involvement of lymph nodes (pulmonary cylindromas). Malignant metastases to bone, lung and the liver have been reported.", "etiology": "CCS is due to germline mutations in the CYLD gene (16q12-q13), a tumour suppressor gene which encodes a protein that plays a key role in negatively regulating several signaling pathways, such as NF-KB, JNK, Wnt, TGFB and TRK.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis of CCS is based mainly on clinical examination, family history and skin biopsy. Histopathologic findings of cylindromas, spiradenomas and trichoepitheliomas are consistent with CCS. CYLD gene testing is now performed in affected individuals that fit clinical diagnostic criteria.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential clinical diagnosis for multiple skin and/or scalp tumours include Birt-Hogg-Dub\u00e9 syndrome, neurofibromatosis type 1, Cowden syndrome, tuberous sclerosis complex, Marie-Unna hypotrichosis, basal cell naevus syndrome, pilar cysts, multiple syringomas. These can be usually excluded following clinical examination and skin biopsy of a tumour, followed by dermatopathological assessment.", "genetic_counseling": "CCS is inherited as an autosomal dominant trait with high penetrance and variable expressivity. Prognostication regarding severity, tumour type, or clinical presentation is currently not possible in confirmed CYLD mutation carriers.", "management_and_treatment": "Removal of cylindroma, spiradenoma, and trichoepithelioma is by conventional surgery. For an optimal outcome, as much normal scalp and skin as possible must remain in place. '' Scalp-sparing'' strategies include early primary excision with direct skin closure, tumour enucleation followed by direct skin closure, and excision followed by secondary intention healing techniques. Hyfrecation for selected small tumours and laser ablation of smaller lesions may be considered. Mohs micrographic surgery for recurrent benign tumours after primary surgical excision may have limited benefit, and lead to unnecessarily large surgical defects. Multidisciplinary skin cancer team management of tumours that have undergone malignant transformation is advised, and such a team may include a dermatologist, plastic surgeon, oncologist, radiologist and pathologist. Radiotherapy should be avoided as this may cause additional new tumours, and may increase risk of maligant transformation. Although malignant transformation is uncommon, patients are advised to report tumours that grow rapidly, or ulcerate and bleed. These features should prompt excision and histological assessment.", "prognosis": "Tumours observed in CCS are usually benign and most patients have a normal life span. The development of malignant tumours may shorten lifespan."}, {"name": "Brown-Vialetto-van Laere-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Riboflavin-Transporter-Defizienz", "german_description": "Bisher wurden 80 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic motor neuron disease characterized by a peripheral and cranial neuropathy, neuronal loss in anterior horns and atrophy of spinal sensory tracts, causing muscle weakness, sensory loss, diaphragmatic paralysis and respiratory insufficiency, and multiple cranial nerve deficits such as sensorineural hearing loss, bulbar symptoms, and loss of vision due to optic atrophy. Depending on the transporter affected, Riboflavin transporter deficiency 2 (RFVT2) and Riboflavin transporter deficiency 3 (RFVT3) are distinguished.", "synonyms": "Brown-Vialetto-van Laere syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Infancy, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "G12.1", "omim": "211500\u00a0 211530\u00a0 614707", "umls": "C0796274", "mesh": "C537111", "gard": "9993", "epidemiology": "Riboflavin transporter deficiency (RTD) has been reported in more than 100 genetically diagnosed cases to date.", "clinical_description": "Onset may occur from early infancy until adulthood, with a more severe presentation at a younger age. The most frequent presenting symptoms are cranial neuropathy, sensory ataxia, muscle weakness and respiratory insufficiency due to diaphragmatic paralysis. The cranial neuropathy leads to sensorineural hearing loss, loss of vision due to optic atrophy, dysarthria, dysphagia, feeding problems, facial weakness and eye movement impairments. Peripheral neuropathy in combination with anterior horn cell dysfunction and atrophy of the sensory tracts in the spinal cord causes muscle weakness with atrophy and (sensory) ataxia. Diaphragmatic paralysis in combination with general muscle weakness may rapidly lead to respiratory insufficiency, especially in infants and young children. Often, feeding through a nasogastric tube or gastrostomy device and artificial ventilation and tracheotomy are required. Sensory ataxia and optic atrophy seem more prevalent in RFVT2 than RFVT3 deficient patients.", "etiology": "Pathogenic biallelic mutations in the genes SLC52A2 and SLC52A3 that encode riboflavin transporter 2 and 3 cause RTD2 and RTD3, respectively. Riboflavin (Vitamin B2) is a water-soluble vitamin that is essential for normal metabolism. The loss of function of the riboflavin transporter results in cellular flavin deficiency in different tissues. As flavins play an important role in mitochondrial function, mitochondrial dysfunction might act as a pathomechanism contributing to neurodegeneration in RTD.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is only possible through mutational analysis of all genes coding for riboflavin transporters. Biochemical tests can show abnormalities such as abnormal (MADD-like) plasma acylcarnitine profiles, abnormal urine organic acids and decreased plasma flavin levels; however, approximately 50% of patients have normal results. Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) is normal in the large majority of RTD patients. Electrophysiological testing (EMG) can show findings consistent with a sensorimotor axonal neuropathy with signs of anterior horn cell dysfunction, but normal results can also be observed.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis include neuromuscular diseases, in particular congenital or mitochondrial myopath and rapidly progressive neuropathies.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible if family mutations in the SLC52A2 or SLC52A3 genes are known.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Riboflavin supplementations is lifesaving and daily administration of a high dose oral riboflavin supplementation should be started immediately upon suspicion of RTD; treatment is lifelong. In cases with early onset, assisted ventilation, tracheostomy, and maintenance of nutrition via gastrostomy may be required. Regular clinical evaluation is required and includes neurological examination as well as evaluation of hearing and vision, respiratory function and skeletal deformities like scoliosis. Depending on the symptoms, physical and speech therapy should be initiated. Cochlear implants have proven highly successful for hearing loss in RTD.", "prognosis": "If untreated, RTD is progressive and often fatal, with respiratory insufficiency as the main cause of death. However, severity and rate of progression vary between patients. When treated with high doses of riboflavin, the majority of patients show improvement over time and early treatment may even result in full recovery and normal development. In contrast, patients with irreversible damage may show stabilization but no improvement of symptoms. No deaths have been reported in riboflavin-treated patients."}, {"name": "BRRS", "sub_name": "Bannayan-Riley-Ruvalcaba-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, das BRRS wird aber generell f\u00fcr eine seltene Krankheit gehalten.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare developmental defect during embryogenesis characterized by hamartomatous intestinal polyposis, lipomas, macrocephaly and genital lentiginosis.", "synonyms": "BRRS, Myhre-Riley-Smith syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "158350", "umls": "C0265326", "gard": "5887", "epidemiology": "The prevalence is unknown, but Bannayan-Riley-Ruvalcaba syndrome (BRRS) is generally considered as a rare disease.", "clinical_description": "BRRS shares some of the clinical characteristics of Cowden syndrome (CS;) but with differing frequencies. Unlike CS, the classic presentation of BRRS occurs neonatally or shortly thereafter with macrocephaly, Hashimoto struma, lipomatosis, vascular malformations and speckled lentiginosis of the penis or vulva. Developmental delay and gastrointestinal hamartomatous polyposis occur in a subset of BRRS patients. There should be a low threshold to evaluate for autism spectrum disorder in BRRS, especially if a PTEN mutation is found. It is unclear if the case-based signs of myopathic processes in proximal muscles, pectus excavatum, joint hyperextensibility, scoliosis and high birth weight are truly components of BRRS. Although predisposition to cancer was not thought to be a feature of this syndrome, it is now believed that BRRS patients with a germline PTEN mutation share the same risk of cancer development as CS patients.", "etiology": "BRRS is caused (in 60% of cases) by a mutation in the phosphatase and tensin homolog (PTEN) gene (10q23) that encodes PTEN, a dual-specificity phosphatase. When BRRS is accompanied by germline PTEN mutations, it belongs to the PHTS group. Because the non-PTEN CS-related genes (ex. SDHB-D, AKT1, PIK3CA and KLLN) have not been formally studied in BRRS, it is not clear if they are also etiologic for non-PTEN-related BRRS.", "diagnostic_methods": "There are no specific criteria for diagnosis of BRRS but it is usually determined by the clinical presentation. The pediatric criteria of the PTEN scoring systemcan be used and are heavily based on the presence or absence of macrocephaly and the presence of one of four sub-criteria (autism spectrum disorder, dermatologic features, vascular malformations and/or gastrointestinal polyposis). A germline PTEN mutation confirms that the BRRS patient belongs to the PHTS group.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include Lhermitte-Duclos syndrome, juvenile polyposis syndrome, Peutz-Jeghers syndrome (PJS), Birt-Hogg-Dube syndrome, Proteus syndrome, Cowden syndrome, Gorlin syndrome, and neurofibromatosis type 1.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible for at-risk pregnancies if the disease-causing mutation is discovered in an affected family member.", "genetic_counseling": "BRRS is inherited autosomal dominantly. Genetic counseling can be offered to patients with germline PTEN mutations and asymptomatic family members should also be tested for the mutation to identify those that need to be monitored before symptom onset.", "management_and_treatment": "Management and treatment are multidisciplinary. Monitoring for symptoms of gastrointestinal hamartomatous polyposis is important as they can be more severe than those seen in CS. Once a germline PTEN mutation is identified, the patient should undergo a screening thyroid ultrasound exam, starting at the age of 7, and a low threshold for evaluation for autism spectrum disorder is strongly recommended. In patients over the age of 18, a yearly skin check is recommended. A colonoscopy and biennial renal imaging should begin between the ages of 35-40, unless symptomatic. Women should perform monthly breast self-examinations and yearly breast screenings as well as transvaginal ultrasounds (postmenopausal) or endometrial biopsies beginning at the age of 35. It is also important to pay attention to neurological and vascular malformations as well as GI symptoms.", "prognosis": "The prognosis is unknown and is dependent on initial presentation and likely genotype."}, {"name": "BRSS", "sub_name": "Schilbach-Rott-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Schilbach-Rott-Syndrom (SRS) ist eine autosomal-dominant vererbte Krankheit mit fazialen Dysmorphien (Hypertelorismus, Blepharophimise), Gaumenspalte und h\u00e4ufig bestehender Hypospadie im m\u00e4nnlichen Geschlecht", "synonyms": "BRSS, Hypotelorismus - Gaumenspalte - Hypospadie, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "164220", "UMLS": "C1834038", "GARD": "2930", "epidemiology": "Das SRS wurde bisher bei 18 Individuen beschrieben. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt.", "clinical_description": "Charakteristisch f\u00fcr das SRS ist die auff\u00e4llige Erscheinung des Gesichts mit Hypertelorismus, Blepharophimose, Gesichtsasymmetrie, mit kleinen, nach vorn gerichteten Ohren, mit langer prominenter Nase, einem kleinen Mund und einer Gaumenspalte mit assoziierten Anomalien. H\u00e4ufige Symptome sind h\u00e4utige Syndaktylie der Finger und Zehen, Kleinwuchs und im m\u00e4nnlichen Geschlecht Hypospadie. M\u00f6glich sind eine leichte intellektuelle Behinderung und Lernschwierigkeiten.", "etiology": "Die Ursache ist ungekl\u00e4rt", "genetic_counseling": "Das SRS wird autosomal-dominant mit variabler Expressivit\u00e4t vererbt.", "summary": "Das SRS wurde bisher bei 18 Individuen beschrieben. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt."}, {"name": "Brucellose", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Brucellosis is an anthropozoonotic infection, endemic in the Mediterranean region, the Middle East, Latin America and parts of Asia and Africa, that is caused by gram-negative coccobacilli of the genus Brucella transmitted through consumption of unpasteurized dairy products or through direct contact with infected animals, placentas or aborted fetuses. Brucellosis is characterized by fever, fatigue, malaise, headache, anorexia, weight loss, sweating, osteomuscular pain (joint and lumbar pain), and arthritis.", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "A23.0\u00a0 A23.1\u00a0 A23.2\u00a0 A23.3\u00a0 A23.8\u00a0 A23.9", "umls": "C0006309", "mesh": "D002006", "gard": "5966", "meddra": "10006500"}, {"name": "Bruck-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Osteogenesis imperfecta - kongenitale Gelenkkontrakturen, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "M21.8", "OMIM": "259450\u00a0 609220", "UMLS": "C0432253\u00a0 C1836602\u00a0 C1850168", "GARD": "1029", "MedDRA": "10063718", "summary": "Das Bruck-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch die Assoziation einer Osteogenesis imperfecta mit angeborenen Gelenkkontrakturen. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, in der Literatur wurden bisher weniger als 40 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Symptome sind Osteoporose mit erh\u00f6hter Knochenbr\u00fcchigkeit, zunehmende Gelenkkontrakturen, oft mit Pterygien, Schaltknochen, Skoliose durch Wirbeldeformit\u00e4ten, sowie Kleinwuchs. Die geistige Entwicklung ist normal. Das Syndrom ist genetisch heterogen: In einer Familie wurde der Genort in die Region 17p12 kartiert (Bruck-Syndrom 1) w\u00e4hrend bei anderen Betroffenen Mutationen im PLOD2-Gen (3q24) beschrieben wurden (Bruck-Syndrom 2). Das PLOD2-Gen kodiert f\u00fcr die Telopeptid-Lysylhydroxylase. Das Syndrom wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. "}, {"name": "Brugada-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Brugada-Syndrom (BrS) ist gekennzeichnet durch angehobenes ST-Segment in den rechts-pr\u00e4kordialen Ableitungen (V1-V3), durch inkompletten oder kompletten Rechtsschenkelblock und Suszeptibilit\u00e4t zu ventrikul\u00e4ren Tachyarrhythmien und pl\u00f6tzlichen Herztod. BrS ist eine bioelektrische St\u00f6rung ohne erkennbare myokardiale Ver\u00e4nderungen. Da das aberrante EKG-Muster oft nur intermittierend auftritt und distinkte regionale Schwankungen der H\u00e4ufigkeit zeigt, ist die Pr\u00e4valenz der Krankheit nur schwierig zu ermitteln. Die gr\u00f6\u00dften Kohorten im Fernen Osten ergaben eine Pr\u00e4valenz von 1:700 bis 1:800. In Europa und den USA hat das BrS eine Pr\u00e4valenz von 1:3.300 bis 1:10.000. Eine Analyse der weltweiten Literatur ergibt f\u00fcr das diagnostische Typ 1-Muster des EKGs eine Pr\u00e4valenz von 1:1.000. Die ersten Symptome treten am h\u00e4figsten im dritten bis vierten Lebensjahrzehnt auf, M\u00e4nner sind acht Mal h\u00e4ufiger betroffen als Frauen. Ein h\u00e4ufiges Symptom des BrS ist die Synkope. Sie tritt typischerweise in Ruhe oder im Schlaf auf. In einigen F\u00e4llen sistiert die Tachykardie nicht spontan und f\u00fchrt zum pl\u00f6tzlichen Herztod. Ausl\u00f6ser der Arrhythmien sind: Fieber, ausgiebige Mahlzeiten und einige Medikamente (Antiarrhythmika, Antidepressiva). In einigen F\u00e4llen fallen die EKG-Ver\u00e4nderungen nicht ins Auge oder sind nicht diagnostisch. In diesen F\u00e4llen ist die Verabreichung von Antiarrhythmika der Klasse IC (Ajmalin und Flecainid) f\u00fcr die Diagnose bzw. den Ausschluss des BrS erforderlich. Am h\u00e4ufigsten betrifft das BrS ein normales Herz. In einer Untergruppe von Patienten wurden jedoch mit MRI subtile strukturelle Anomalien des rechten Ventrikels gefunden. Es wurde \u00fcber sporadische F\u00e4lle und \u00fcber famili\u00e4re F\u00e4lle mit autosomal-dominantem Erbgang berichtet. Sieben Ionenkanal-Gene sind urs\u00e4chlich beteiligt: SCN5A, GPD1-L, CACNA1C, CACNB2, SCN1B, KCNE3 und SCN3B. Die Diagnose st\u00fctzt sich auf die klinische Untersuchung und das EKG, sowie auf die Testungmit IC-Antiarrhythmika. Eine genetische Testung ist verf\u00fcgbar. Krankheiten, die ebenfalls ein typisches Brugada-EKG-Muster zeigen k\u00f6nnen, sind: Akute Perikarditis, Duchenne-Muskeldystrophie, arrhythmogene rechtsventrikul\u00e4re Kardiomyopathie (s. diese Termini), Hypertrophie des linken Ventrikels, fr\u00fche Repolarisation, akute Myokard-Isch\u00e4mie, akuter Myokardinfarkt, Lungenembolie, Prinzmetal-Angina, Aortendissektion, Thiaminmangel, Hyperkali\u00e4mie, Hyperkalz\u00e4mie und Hypothermie. In seltenen F\u00e4llen wurde wegen BrS eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik durchgef\u00fchrt, kontrollierte Berichte hier\u00fcber fehlen. Eine prim\u00e4re und sekund\u00e4re Pr\u00e4vention des Herzstillstandes ist bisher nur durch die Implantierung eines Kardioverter-Defibrillators (ICD) m\u00f6glich. Deshalb ist auch die rechtzeitige Identifizierung von Hochrisiko-Personen vorrangiges Ziel des klinischen Entscheidungsprozesses. Als begleitende Therapie f\u00fcr Patienten mit h\u00f6herem Risiko ist an die Gabe von Chinidin zu denken, da hierdurch die Zahl der ICD-Schocks reduziert werden kann. Die meisten BrS-Patienten bleiben asymptomatisch, 20-30% erleben Synkopen und 8-12% mindestens 1 Herzstillstand (der evtl. zum pl\u00f6tzlichen Herztod f\u00fchrt). Risikofaktoren f\u00fcr Herzstillstand und pl\u00f6tzlichen Herztod sind ein spontanes diagnostisches EKG-Muster und eine Synkope in der Vorgeschichte.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A cardiac disorder characterized on electrocardiogram (ECG) by ST segment elevation with a coved aspect on the right precordial leads, and a clinical susceptibility to ventricular tachyarrhythmias and sudden death occurring in the absence of overt myocardial abnormalities.", "synonyms": "Idiopathic ventricular fibrillation, Brugada type, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Childhood", "icd_10": "I49.8", "omim": "601144\u00a0 611777\u00a0 611875\u00a0 611876\u00a0 612838\u00a0 613119\u00a0 613120\u00a0 613123\u00a0 616399", "umls": "C1142166\u00a0 C1955837", "mesh": "D053840", "gard": "1030", "meddra": "10059027", "epidemiology": "Given that the ECG pattern diagnostic for Brugada Syndrome is fluctuant, unlike other inherited arrhythmogenic syndromes, the data regarding the prevalence of the disease are controversial. According to a recent metanalysis, the worldwide prevalence of Brugada syndrome is estimated at 1/2,000, but it varies according to region and ethnicity. Brugada syndrome is rare in Hispanic and Caucasian populations and non-rare in Asian populations. By region, the prevalence is estimated at 1/20,000 in North America and 1/10,000 in Europe. Prevalence is higher in Asia and Middle East where estimates range between 1/270-625. The disease is observed more frequently in men than in women (8:1) and it is extremely rare in children.", "clinical_description": "Symptoms usually manifest in the third-fourth decade of life. Syncope, typically occurring at rest, is a common presentation. In some cases, tachycardia does not terminate spontaneously and leads to sudden death. Most frequently, the disease occurs in a normal heart, but subtle structural abnormalities of the right ventricle have been described in a subset of patients. Triggers for the onset of arrhythmias may include fever, abundant meals, some drugs (including antiarrhythmics and antidepressants). On ECG, three different patterns may be observed. Type 1, which is the only diagnostic pattern, is defined as a coved-type ST-segment elevation (0.2 mV) followed by a negative T wave. In type 2, ST-segment elevation has a saddleback appearance with a high-takeoff ST-segment elevation (0.2 mV), a trough (0.1mV) displaying ST elevation, and then either a positive or biphasic T wave. Type 3 has either a saddleback appearance or a coved-type ST-segment elevation (maximum 0.1mV). It is important to underline that only Type 1 ECG is diagnostic for the syndrome.", "etiology": "The gene SCN5A (3p22.2) is responsible for 30% of cases with a gene variant implicated. Other identified genes include CACNA1C (12p13.33), SCNN1A (12p13), SLMAP (3p14.3), SEMA3A (7q21.11), SCN2B (11q23.3). However, in nearly 70% of affected families the genetic cause is unknown.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis is based on clinical examination and detection of type 1 ECG pattern using a 12-lead Holter ECG. In some cases, the ECG manifestations are not obvious or non-diagnostic (type 2, 3 and S ECG patterns). In such instances, a provocative test with the administration of class IC antiarrhythmic drugs (ajmaline, flecainide or procainamide) may be used to confirm/exclude diagnosis. Genetic testing is available after a clinical diagnosis has been established.", "differential_diagnosis": "Disorders that could present the typical Brugada ECG pattern include isolated right bundle branch block, pectus excavatum, arrhythmogenic right ventricular cardiomyopathy, acute pericarditis, acute myocardial ischemia or infarction, and early repolarization.", "genetic_counseling": "Both sporadic and familial cases have been reported and pedigree analysis suggests an autosomal dominant pattern of inheritance.", "management_and_treatment": "Implantable cardioverter defibrillator (ICD) is the only therapeutic option of proven efficacy for primary and secondary prophylaxis of cardiac arrest. Thus, correct risk stratification is a major goal for management. Quinidine may be regarded as an adjunctive therapy for patients at higher risk and may reduce the number of cases of ICD shock in patients at risk of recurrence. Recently, epicardial ablation of the right ventricular outflow tract has emerged as a therapeutic option in patients at higher risk.", "prognosis": "The majority of patients remain asymptomatic, 20-30% experience syncope and 8-12% experience at least one cardiac arrest (potentially leading to sudden death). Risk factors for cardiac arrest and sudden death are a spontaneously diagnostic ECG pattern and a history of syncope."}, {"name": "Brunner-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Monoaminoxidase-A-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Monoaminoxidase-A-Mangel ist eine sehr seltene X-chromosomal-rezessiv vererbte St\u00f6rung des Stoffwechsels der biogenen Amine. Er ist klinisch charakterisiert durch mildes intellektuelles Defizit, impulsive Aggressivit\u00e4t und manchmal gewaltt\u00e4tiges Verhalten. Die Symptome setzen im Kindesalter ein.", "synonyms": "Brunner-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "E70.8", "OMIM": "300615", "UMLS": "C0796275", "GARD": "3531"}, {"name": "Brunner-Winter-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Feingold-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Feingold-Syndrom (FS), auch Okulo-Digito-Oesophago-duodenal-(ODED) Syndrom genannt, ist ein seltenes erbliches Fehlbildungssyndrom, das durch Mikrozephalie, Kleinwuchs und zahlreiche Anomalien der Finger charakterisiert ist. Es umfasst zwei Unterformen: das FS Typ 1 (FS1) und das FS Typ 2 (FS2) (s. diese Termini). Das FS1 ist bei weitem die h\u00e4ufigste Erkrankungsform, w\u00e4hrend das FS2 bislang nur bei 3 Patienten beschrieben wurde und die gleichen klinischen Charakteristika wie das FS1 zeigt, jedoch bei Abwesenheit von gastrointestinaler Atresie und kurzer Lidspalte.", "synonyms": "Brunner-Winter-Syndrom, FGLDS, FS, Fingeranomalien - kurze Lidspalten - \u00d6sophagus- oder Duodenalatresie, MMT, MODED-Syndrom, Mikrozephalie - Intelligenzminderung - Tracheo-\u00d6sophageal-Fistel, Mikrozephalie - Okulo-Digito-Oesophago-duodenal-Syndrom, Mikrozephalie-Fingeranomalien-normale Intelligenz-Syndrom, ODED-Syndrom, Okulo-Digito-Oesophago-Duodenal-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "164280\u00a0 614326", "UMLS": "C0796068", "GARD": "8407"}, {"name": "Brunner-Winter-Syndrom Typ 1", "sub_name": "Feingold-Syndrom Typ 1", "german_description": "Die genaue Pr\u00e4valenz ist unbekannt. Die \u00fcberwiegende Mehrheit der FS-F\u00e4lle entf\u00e4llt auf die das FS1. Etwa 120 F\u00e4lle wurden bislang berichtet.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic congenital malformation syndrome characterized by digital anomalies (shortening of the 2nd and 5th middle phalanx of the hand, clinodactyly of the 5th finger, syndactyly of toes 2-3 and/or 4-5, thumb hypoplasia), microcephaly, facial dysmorphism (short palpebral fissures and micrognathia), gastrointestinal atresia (primarily esophageal and/or duodenal), and mild-to-moderate learning disability.", "synonyms": "Brunner-Winter syndrome type 1, Digital anomalies with short palpebral fissures and atresia of esophagus or duodenum type 1, FGLDS1, FS1, MMT type 1, MODED syndrome type 1, Microcephaly-digital anomalies-normal intelligence syndrome type 1, Microcephaly-intellectual disability-tracheoesophageal fistula syndrome type 1, Microcephaly-oculo-digito-esophageal-duodenal syndrome syndrome type 1, ODED syndrome type 1, Oculo-digito-esophageal-duodenal syndrome type 1, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "164280", "epidemiology": "The exact prevalence is unknown. Feingold syndrome type 1 (FS1) accounts for the vast majority of FS cases. An estimated 120 cases have been reported to date.", "clinical_description": "Characteristic clinical findings of FS1 are present at birth with digital anomalies being the most frequent and including: brachymesophalangy (most commonly affecting the 2nd and 5th fingers), thumb hypoplasia and toe syndactyly. Microcephaly and facial dysmorphism (short palpebral fissures, micrognathia) are also noted in most cases. The most serious manifestations that are noted in approximately half of cases are esophageal and duodenal (rarely jejunal or anal) atresia, with or without tracheo-esophageal fistula. The presence of a fistula can be indicated by signs such as coughing, gagging, vomiting, abdominal distension and, in some cases, respiratory distress. Gastrointestinal atresia must be treated immediately or it can be fatal. Mild learning deficits can become apparent in early childhood but severe intellectual disability is very rarely seen.", "etiology": "FS1 is caused by a mutation or deletion in the proto-oncogene MYCN (2p24.3). It encodes a protein with a basic helix-loop-helix domain that is expressed at various stages of human embryonic development.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on characteristic clinical features and imaging studies. Gastrointestinal atresia can be seen with pre-natal or post-natal ultrasound or by MRI. Molecular genetic testing can identify a MYCN mutation, confirming a diagnosis of FS1.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis of FS1 includes FS type 2 (FS2), VACTERL association, CHARGE syndrome, brachydactyly type A4 and Fanconi anemia.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal testing is possible in FS1 families with a known MYCN mutation or deletion.", "genetic_counseling": "FS1 is inherited autosomal dominantly; however, most cases arise de novo. Genetic counseling is possible.", "management_and_treatment": "Extensive medical examinations are needed to identify possible anomalies of the heart or kidneys. Management of FS1 (and FS2) typically centers on surgical correction of the specific congenital anomalies (certain types of cardiac malformations, and/or tracheo-esophageal fistula) in the immediate postnatal period, followed by long-term medical management of sequelae. Gastrointestinal atresia requires prompt treatment involving IV fluid administration and surgery. Optimal surgical treatment of infants with esophageal atresia and tracheoesophageal fistula remains controversial and gastroesophageal reflux (GER) is extremely frequent in patients treated for the two conditions. GER is refractory to medical treatment and often requires anti-reflux surgery. Renal and cardiac anomalies should receive the standard treatments and prophylactic antibiotics may be beneficial. Special education is recommended for children and adults with learning deficits. Hearing loss should equally be monitored by an audiologist. Cochlear implants are possible in certain cases.", "prognosis": "Prognosis depends on congenital malformations (especially cardiac and renal anomalies) present. If optimal surgical correction is achievable, the prognosis can be relatively positive, though some patients will continue to be affected by their congenital malformations throughout life."}, {"name": "Brunner-Winter-Syndrom Typ 2", "sub_name": "Feingold-Syndrom Typ 2", "german_description": "Das FS2 ist extrem selten und wurde bislang nur f\u00fcr 3 Patienten beschrieben.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic congenital malformation syndrome characterized by microcephaly, short stature, digital anomalies (brachymesophalangy, fifth finger clinodactyly, syndactyly of toes and hypoplastic thumbs) and mild intellectual disabilities but that lacks the manifestations of gastrointestinal atresia.", "synonyms": "Brachydactyly-short stature-microcephaly syndrome, Brunner-Winter syndrome type 2, FGLDS2, FS2, MMT type 2, Microcephaly-digital anomalies-normal intelligence syndrome type 2, Microcephaly-intellectual disability-tracheoesophageal fistula syndrome type 2, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "614326", "epidemiology": "Feingold syndrome type 2 (FS2) is extremely rare with less than 20 patients described in the literature to date.", "clinical_description": "FS2 patients present with microcephaly, brachydactyly, brachymesophalangy of the second and fifth fingers, hypoplastic thumbs and toe syndactyly as seen in FS1. Mild intellectual disability is also noted. Unlike FS1, patients with FS2 lack any form of gastrointestinal atresia and they do not display short palpebral fissures.", "etiology": "FS2 is thought to be caused by a hemizygous deletion in the MIR17HG gene on chromosome 13q31.3. This is the first example of a syndromic development deficit in humans that is caused by a miRNA gene.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is suspected on clinical presentation and can be confirmed by high-resolution CGH (comparative genomic hybridization) arrays.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis of FS2 includes FS type 1 (FS1), VACTERL association, CHARGE syndrome, brachydactyly type A4 and Fanconi anemia.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal testing is possible in FS2 families with a known MIR17HG mutation or deletion.", "genetic_counseling": "FS2 is inherited in an autosomal dominant manner; however, most cases arise de novo. Genetic counseling is possible.", "management_and_treatment": "Extensive medical examinations are needed to identify possible anomalies of the heart or kidneys. Management of FS2 typically centers for long-term medical sequelae. Occupational therapy / surgical intervention for finger/toe anomalies may be required. Renal and cardiac anomalies should receive the standard treatments and prophylactic antibiotics may be beneficial. Special education is recommended for children and adults with learning deficits. Hearing loss should equally be monitored by an audiologist. Cochlear implants are possible in certain cases.", "prognosis": "Prognosis depends on congenital malformations (especially cardiac and renal anomalies) present. If optimal surgical correction is achievable, the prognosis can be relatively positive, though some patients will continue to be affected by their congenital malformations throughout life."}, {"name": "Brustdr\u00fcse, akzessorische", "sub_name": "Brustdr\u00fcse, \u00fcberz\u00e4hlige", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare breast malformation characterized by the presence of accessory breasts with a complete ductal system, areola, and nipple in addition to two normal breasts. The accessory breast tissue mostly lies along the milk lines. It is often not recognized until puberty, when it begins to respond to regular hormonal fluctuations, and may develop the same changes as normal breasts throughout life.", "synonyms": "Accessory breasts, Polymastia, ", "icd_10": "Q83.1", "umls": "C0266010", "meddra": "10049786"}, {"name": "Brustdr\u00fcse, \u00fcberz\u00e4hlige", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare breast malformation characterized by the presence of accessory breasts with a complete ductal system, areola, and nipple in addition to two normal breasts. The accessory breast tissue mostly lies along the milk lines. It is often not recognized until puberty, when it begins to respond to regular hormonal fluctuations, and may develop the same changes as normal breasts throughout life.", "synonyms": "Accessory breasts, Polymastia, ", "icd_10": "Q83.1", "umls": "C0266010", "meddra": "10049786"}, {"name": "Brustkrebs, famili\u00e4rer", "sub_name": "Brustkrebs, heredit\u00e4rer", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic gynecological tumor characterized by early onset breast cancer in association with a germline mutation. Tumors arising in carriers of BRCA1 and BRCA2 mutations differ morphologically and genetically from each other, as well as from sporadic breast cancers. Most BRCA1-associated tumors are invasive ductal adenocarcinomas of no special type, typically of higher grade than sporadic tumors, and more often negative for hormone receptors. In addition, more cases with features of typical or atypical medullary carcinoma are seen in these patients. Likewise, BRCA2-associated tumors tend to be of higher grade than sporadic ones, although their phenotype is similar. They show a low frequency of HER-2 expression.", "synonyms": "Familial breast cancer, Familial breast carcinoma, Hereditary breast carcinoma, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Multigenic/multifactorial\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "C50.0\u00a0 C50.1\u00a0 C50.2\u00a0 C50.3\u00a0 C50.4\u00a0 C50.5\u00a0 C50.6\u00a0 C50.8", "omim": "114480\u00a0 604370\u00a0 612555\u00a0 613399", "umls": "C0346153"}, {"name": "Brustkrebs, heredit\u00e4rer", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic gynecological tumor characterized by early onset breast cancer in association with a germline mutation. Tumors arising in carriers of BRCA1 and BRCA2 mutations differ morphologically and genetically from each other, as well as from sporadic breast cancers. Most BRCA1-associated tumors are invasive ductal adenocarcinomas of no special type, typically of higher grade than sporadic tumors, and more often negative for hormone receptors. In addition, more cases with features of typical or atypical medullary carcinoma are seen in these patients. Likewise, BRCA2-associated tumors tend to be of higher grade than sporadic ones, although their phenotype is similar. They show a low frequency of HER-2 expression.", "synonyms": "Familial breast cancer, Familial breast carcinoma, Hereditary breast carcinoma, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Multigenic/multifactorial\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "C50.0\u00a0 C50.1\u00a0 C50.2\u00a0 C50.3\u00a0 C50.4\u00a0 C50.5\u00a0 C50.6\u00a0 C50.8", "omim": "114480\u00a0 604370\u00a0 612555\u00a0 613399", "umls": "C0346153"}, {"name": "Brust- und Ovarialkrebssyndrom, heredit\u00e4res", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "C50\u00a0 C56", "OMIM": "604370\u00a0 612555\u00a0 613399\u00a0 614291", "UMLS": "C0677776", "summary": "Brustkrebs (BC) ist der h\u00e4ufigste b\u00f6sartige Tumor der Frauen und macht bei ihnen 25% aller Krebs-Neuerkrankungen aus. Die meisten BC-F\u00e4lle sind sporadisch, f\u00fcr 5-10% wird eine erbliche Pr\u00e4disposition angenommen. Autosomal-dominante Mutationen in zwei Genen, BRCA1 (17q21) und BRCA2 (13q12.3), sind wahrscheinlich f\u00fcr die Mehrzahl der famili\u00e4ren F\u00e4lle von fr\u00fch beginnendem BC und/oder Ovarialkrebs (OA) verantwortlich, und f\u00fcr 3-4% aller BC-Erkrankungen. Die Pr\u00e4valenz von Keimbahnmutationen in der weiblichen Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung wurde zu etwa 1:1.600 gesch\u00e4tzt. Das Lebenszeit-Risiko, mit einer solchen Mutation an einem erblichen BC (HBC) und/oder OC zu erkranken, betr\u00e4gt bis zu 80%. F\u00fcr eine gegebene Mutation in einem der Suszeptibilit\u00e4tsgene sind die Schwere der Erkrankung und das Erkrankungsalter nicht nur zwischen den Familien, sondern auch innerhalb einer Familie variabel, was an die Beteiligung anderer genetischer Faktoren und nicht-erblicher Faktoren denken l\u00e4sst. Der HBC zeigt keine spezifischen ph\u00e4notypischen Merkmale, der diagnostische Verdacht basiert auf den folgenden Merkmalen: Erh\u00f6hte Zahl von betroffenen Familienmitgliedern in der gleichen Vorfahrenreihe (m\u00fctterlich oder v\u00e4terlich), fr\u00fcher Krankheitsbeginn, vermehrt beidseitig Betroffene, Assoziation mit Eierstockkrebs (in jedem Alter) und Brustkrebs beim Mann. Die Diagnose wird durch molekulargenetische Analyse best\u00e4tigt. Sie erlaubt eine bessere Betreuung der Personen, die ein Risiko haben, ebenfalls mit einem BC und/oder einem OC zu erkranken. Zur Betreuung der Mutationstr\u00e4ger geh\u00f6ren regelm\u00e4\u00dfige Kontrollen, chirurgische Optionen, Chemopr\u00e4vention und akkurate Behandlung des BC und/oder OC. Die Behandlungs-Richtlinien werden noch diskutiert. Es laufen Kohortenstudien mit dem Ziel, f\u00fcr BRCA1- und BRCA2-Mutationstr\u00e4ger gezielte Strategien zur Krebspr\u00e4vention zu entwickeln. "}, {"name": "BS", "sub_name": "Bloom-Syndrom", "german_description": "Weil die Erkrankung sehr selten ist, kann die H\u00e4ufigkeit nicht genau angegeben werden. Bei den Ashkenazi-Juden ist die H\u00e4ufigkeit als Folge eines Gr\u00fcndereffektes auf 1/48.000 erh\u00f6ht.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Bloom syndrome is a rare disorder associated with pre- and postnatal growth deficiency, a telangiectatic erythematous rash of the face and other sun-exposed areas, insulin resistance and predisposition to early onset and recurrent cancer of multiple organ systems.", "synonyms": "BSyn, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q82.2", "omim": "210900", "umls": "C0005859", "mesh": "D001816", "gard": "915", "epidemiology": "Bloom syndrome (BSyn) overall prevalence is unknown, but in the Ashkenazi Jewish population it is estimated at approximately 1/ 48,000 births. A founder mutation, known as BLMash is present in approximately 1 in 100 persons of Ashkenazi Jewish background. There are also founder mutations in the Slavic and Hispanic populations.", "clinical_description": "Individuals with BSyn show proportionate growth deficiency of prenatal onset (average birth weight 1757 g) and continuing throughout life (average adult height of 149 cm for men and 138 cm for women). Dolichocephaly, narrow face, prominent nose and ears, and malar and mandibular hypoplasia can be observed. Subcutaneous adipose tissue is sparse. Telangiectatic erythema appears during the first 1-2 years of life on the face (in particular the cheek), dorsum of the hands and other sun-exposed areas. Caf\u00e9-au-lait macules and hypopigmented skin lesions are common. Children with BSyn characteristically feed slowly, have a decreased appetite and eat a limited variety of foods. Despite nutritional interventions, weight gain is modest and children are rarely in the normal range for growth. One major feature of Bsyn is a greatly increased predisposition to cancers in a distribution corresponding to the general population but occurring at a much younger age. Survivors of a first cancer may have multiple cancers in their lifetime. Most men with BSyn have azoospermia or severe oligospermia, while women are often fertile but may begin menopause prematurely.", "etiology": "Bloom syndrome is inherited as an autosomal recessive trait. The BLM gene codes for a RecQ helicase that forms a complex with two other proteins, DNA topoisomerase III\u03b1 and RMI.BLM heterozygotes are healthy and without any clinical features of the disorder.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis of BSyn is suspected clinically by identification of characteristic features and is confirmed by identification of biallelic pathogenic variants of the BLM gene on molecular genetic testing.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnosis of Bloom syndrome includes Fanconi anemia, Silver-Russell syndrome, Rothmund-Thomson syndrome, ataxia-telangiectasia, and Nijmegen breakage syndrome. Three other disorders also may be of interest in a differential diagnosis. RECQ-mediated genome instability 1, RECQ-mediated genome instability 2, Microcephaly, growth restriction, & increased sister-chromatid exchange 2.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis of at-risk pregnancies is possible by cytogenetic (SCE) or molecular genetic testing (BLM sequencing and deletion/duplication) of fetal cells obtained by amniocentesis or chorionic villus sampling. Molecular genetic testing is preferred.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Management is symptomatic. Increased calorie density formulas and foods may promote weight gain and increased growth. Although growth hormone treatment may improve linear growth, many clinicians caution against its use because of reports of early onset of cancer in some treated children. Standard antibiotic regimens are used to treat infections. If the serum levels of immunoglobulins are low and the patient is experiencing repeated infections, some have been treated with intravenous or subcutaneous immunoglobulins. Skin protection, including covering exposed skin and use of a broad-spectrum sunscreen with at least 30 SPF is crucial to reduce the sun-sensitive skin rash. Health supervision recommendations for persons with Bloom syndrome have been published, including recommendations for cancer surveillance. Due to hypersensitivity of patients to chemotherapy, reduced dosage and/or duration of therapy is recommended, usually beginning with 50% of the weight-based dosage. Caution should be exercised with use of ionizing radiation or alkylating agents, particularly busulfan, cyclophosphamide or melphalan.", "prognosis": "The high occurrence of cancer reduces life expectancy. The median overall life expectancy is approximately 30 years, with cancer and related complications as the leading cause of death."}, {"name": "BSCL", "sub_name": "Lipodystrophie, generalisierte kongenitale", "german_description": "Die Kongenitale Lipodystrophie Berardinelli-Seip (BSCL) ist gekennzeichnet durch Lipatrophie, Hypertriglyzerid\u00e4mie, Hepatomegalie und akromegaloide Zeichen. Sie geh\u00f6rt zusammen mit Leprechaunismus, Rabson-Mendenhall-Syndrom, Erworbener generalisierter Lipodystrophie und den Typen A und B der Insulinresistenz (s. diese Termini) zu den Syndromen mit extremer Insulinresistenz. Die Pr\u00e4valenz der BSCL in der Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung Europas wird auf 1:400.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die BSCL ist mit einer Insulinresistenz assoziiert, diese wird, beginnend im zweiten Lebensjahrzehnt, klinisch als Diabetes mellitus manifest. Zu den Komplikationen geh\u00f6ren hypertrophe Kardiomyopathie, Fettleber mit Leberfunktionsst\u00f6rung, Muskelhypertrophie, verschiedene hormonelle St\u00f6rungen (u.a. akzeleriertes Wachstum der Kleinkinder und vorzeitige Pubert\u00e4t) und Knochenzysten mit Spontanfrakturen. Zwei urs\u00e4chliche Gene wurden identifiziert: AGPAT2 (9q34), das f\u00fcr ein Schl\u00fcsselenzym der Triglyzerid-Biosynthese kodiert (1-Acyl-glycerol-3-phosphate-O-Acyltransferase-2) und BSCL2(11q13), das f\u00fcr das Protein Seipin kodiert. Die meisten Patienten mit BSCL2-Mutationen sind geistig retardiert. Die Vererbung ist autosomal-rezessiv. Zur Diagnose f\u00fchrt das klinische Bild zusammen mit den biochemischen Ver\u00e4nderungen. Durch Mutationsnachweis kann die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt werden. Differentialdiagnosen sind die Laminopathien und das Parry-Romberg-Syndrom (s. diese Termini). Die Behandlung besteht in fettarmer Di\u00e4t und in der Kontrolle der Insulinresistenz und des Diabetes. Die Prognose wird durch die begleitenden Komplikationen bestimmt ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autosomal recessive form of lipodystrophy characterized by the association of generalized lipoatrophy with acromegaloid features, muscle hypertrophy, insulin resistance, hypertriglyceridemia, and liver steatosis.", "synonyms": "BSCL, Berardinelli-Seip congenital lipodystrophy, Berardinelli-Seip syndrome, CGL, Lipoatrophic diabetes, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "E88.1", "omim": "269700\u00a0 606721\u00a0 608594\u00a0 612526\u00a0 613327", "umls": "C0011859\u00a0 C0221032", "meddra": "10024603", "clinical_description": "Presentation is typically in the first months of life with failure to thrive, hepatomegaly, generalized lipoatrophy, prominent musculature, umbilical prominence, acromegaloid features of extremities. Hypertriglyceridemia, insulin resistance, hyperglycemia and liver steatosis can be present in infancy, or diagnosed in late childhood, adolescence or adulthood. Accelerated growth in infancy, virilization of female patients and precocious puberty have been reported in some cases. High blood pressure, hypertrophic cardiomyopathy and bone cysts are frequent complications. Mild intellectual disability can be present, mainly in CGL related to BSCL2. Muscular dystrophy and cardiac arrhythmia are reported in CGL related to CAVIN1.", "etiology": "Two main causative genes have been identified: AGPAT2 (9q34), encoding a key enzyme in triglyceride biosynthesis (1-acyl-glycerol-3-phosphate-O-acyltransferase-2), BSCL2 (11q13), encoding the reticulum endoplasmic seipin protein. A few cases of CGL are due to biallelic pathogenic variants in CAV1 (7q31.2) and CAVIN1 (17q21.2), encoding respectively caveolin-1 and cavin-1, which are major components of specialized plasma membrane microdomains called caveolae. Generalized lipodystrophy is described in rare patients with biallelic pathogenic variants in the genes PPARG (3p25.2) or LMNA (1q22), for which heterozygous mutations are associated with familial partial lipodystrophy.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis of CGL is based on recognition of the clinical picture and associated metabolic disturbances including low serum leptin levels. The differential diagnosis of each monogenic form of the disease requires genetic testing.", "differential_diagnosis": "CGL may occur as a feature in other diseases. Differential diagnoses include acquired generalized lipodystrophy (which occurs mainly in the context of auto-immune diseases), monogenic syndromes of insulin resistance, autoinflammatory diseases, partial forms of lipodystrophy and premature ageing syndromes.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis can be discussed in families with a known disease causing mutation.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Couples in which each member carries at least one pathogenic variant should be informed that the risk of disease transmission to their offspring is 25%. A positive genetic test in an adult patient may lead to test the carriership of his/her partner.", "management_and_treatment": "Diet should be carefully managed, avoiding overfeeding in patients with CGL who are typically hyperphagic due to leptin deficiency. A low glycemic-index and low fat diet, supplemented with medium chain triglycerides in infants/children, is usually needed to manage insulin resistance, diabetes and hypertriglyceridemia. Exercise should be encouraged in the absence of cardiac complications. Insulin sensitizers (mainly metformin) and lipid-lowering drugs (statins, or fibrates in case of major hypertriglyceridemia) are helpful. Diabetes may require other non-specific treatments, along with insulin. The orphan drug metreleptin is authorized in Europe, as a therapeutic option in addition to diet, for the treatment of metabolic complications of generalized lipodystrophy associated with leptin deficiency, in adults and children above the age of 2 years. Regular metabolic, hepatic and cardiac monitoring is recommended. Ethinylestradiol should be avoided in women with CGL.", "prognosis": "Prognosis depends on the presence of associated complications. Complications of diabetes, liver disease, and hypertrophic cardiomyopathy are significant causes of morbidity and early mortality."}, {"name": "BSG-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Branchio-skeleto-genitales Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltenes Fehlbildungs-Syndrom mit multiplen kongenitalen Anomalien/Dysmorphien, das gekennzeichnet ist durch eine moderate Inntelligenzminderung, distinkte kraniofaziale Merkmale (einschlie\u00dflich Brachyzephalie, Gesichtsasymmetrie, ausgepr\u00e4gtem Hypertelorismus, Blepharochalasis, Proptosis, eine breite Nase mit konkavem Nasenkamm und knolliger Nasenspitze, Mittelgesichtshypoplasie, bifides Gaumenz\u00e4pfchen oder partielle Gaumenspalte und Prognathismus), fortschreitende Zahnanomalien (Dentiger\u00f6se Zysten, radikul\u00e4re Dentin-Dysplasie und fr\u00fcher Zahnverlust), Wirbelfusionen (insbesondere C2-C3) und Hypospadie. Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit ist ein zus\u00e4tzliches beobachtetes Merkmal.", "synonyms": "BSG-Syndrom, Elsahy-Waters-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0oder\u00a0X-chromosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "211380", "UMLS": "C1859384", "GARD": "955"}, {"name": "BSI", "sub_name": "Bathing-suit-Ichthyose", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Badeanzug-Ichthyose (BSI) ist eine seltene Variante der autosomal-rezessiven kongenitalen Ichthyose (ARCI) und gekennzeichnet durch gro\u00dfe dunkle Schuppen in spezifischen Bereichen des K\u00f6rpers.", "synonyms": "BSI, Badeanzug-Ichthyose, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q80.2", "OMIM": "242300", "epidemiology": "In der Literatur wurden bisher weniger als 20 Patienten beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Der besondere Hautbefund erscheint nach dem Abwerfen der seit der Geburt bestehenden Kollodiummembran: Anders als bei anderen Formen der ARCI sind die Gliedmassen (mit Ausnahme der Falten) und das Gesicht durch die Ichthyose nicht betroffen. Die Schuppen treten in w\u00e4rmeren Hautbereichen auf, an Stamm, Kopfhaut und in den Achseln. In den betroffenen Bereichen haben die Patienten wie bei lamell\u00e4rer Ichthyose (LI) gro\u00dfe dunkle Schuppen.", "etiology": "Ursache der BSE sind spezifische temperatur-sensitive Mutationen im TGM1-Gen, das f\u00fcr die an der Verhornung des Stratum corneum beteiligte Transglutaminase 1 kodiert. In den betroffenen (w\u00e4rmeren) Hautbereichen ist die Enzymaktivit\u00e4t deutlich reduziert, im Gegensatz zur normalen Haut mit nahezu normaler Enzymaktivit\u00e4t. Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt.", "summary": "In der Literatur wurden bisher weniger als 20 Patienten beschrieben."}, {"name": "BSPDC", "sub_name": "Striopallidodentate Kalzinose, bilaterale", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Bilateral striopallidodentate calcinosis (BSPDC, also erroneously called Fahr disease) is characterized by the accumulation of calcium deposits in different brain regions, particularly the basal ganglia and dentate nucleus, and is often associated with neurodegeneration.", "synonyms": "BSPDC, Cerebrovascular ferrocalcinosis, Idiopathic basal ganglia calcification, PFBC, Primary familial brain calcification, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G23.8", "omim": "213600\u00a0 615007\u00a0 615483\u00a0 616413\u00a0 618824", "umls": "C0393590", "gard": "6406", "meddra": "10059626", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of BSPDC is not known, however it is very rare and fewer than 200 cases have been reported. BSPDC is more common in men (male:female ratio 2:1).", "clinical_description": "BSPCD can be asymptomatic. Symptomatic forms usually manifest in the fourth decade of life, whereas calcification may be found in the second decade. Patients present with progressive movement disorders, including parkinsonism, chorea, tremor, dystonia, athetosis and orofacial dyskinesia, ataxia and neuropsychiatric disorders including difficultly with concentration and memory, personality and/or behavior changes, and dementia. The first manifestations often include clumsiness, fatigability, unsteady gait, slow or slurred speech, dysphagia, involuntary movements or muscle cramping. Seizures occur frequently. Urinary incontinence may occur.", "etiology": "The causative gene or genes are not known. Linkage to chromosome 14q has been established in one family. Calcium is the major element deposited on the basal ganglia and accounts for the radiologic appearance of the disease. It is thought that the calcifications observed are a marker of the disease rather than a cause of the clinical symptoms.", "diagnostic_methods": "Single proton emission computed tomography (SPECT) reveals markedly decreased perfusion to the basal ganglia bilaterally with decreased perfusion to the cerebral cortices. Diagnosis is based on CT or MRI evidence of bilateral, almost symmetric, calcifications of one or more of the following areas: basal ganglia, dentate nuclei, thalamus and cerebral white matter. Diagnosis is further based on normal childhood growth and development and the absence of parathyroid or other known neurologic disorders. Electroencephalogram, nerve conduction studies, and pattern shift visual-evoked potentials studies are usually normal and brainstem auditory-evoked potentials may vary from normal to minor abnormalities.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include hypoparathyroidism and pseudohypoparathyroidism, which can usually be excluded by normal serum levels of parathyroid hormone, Kenny-Caffey syndrome type 1, neurodegeneration with iron accumulation, Cockayne syndrome and Aicardi-Gouti\u00e8res syndrome (see these terms).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Genetic counseling may be offered.However, there is currently no possibility of antenatal diagnosis.", "genetic_counseling": "It can be familial or sporadic. Over 30 families with the familial form have been reported. The familial form of idiopathic basal ganglia calcification is inherited in an autosomal dominant manner.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no specific treatment available. Treatment based on amelioration of manifestations, including pharmacologic treatment for anxiety, depression, obsessive-compulsive behaviors and dystonia, may be attempted.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is not fully understood due to a lack of longitudinal studies. However, while asymptomatic cases have been observed in individuals younger than 25 years old, it is possible that symptoms may appear with increasing age."}, {"name": "BTBGD", "sub_name": "Biotin-Thiamin-responsive St\u00f6rung der Basalganglien", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic neurological disorder characterized by subacute encephalopathy with confusion, seizures, and movement disorder, often following a history of febrile illness. Imaging may reveal bilateral lesions in the basal ganglia. The disease usually becomes symptomatic in childhood and is life-threatening if left untreated, but symptoms can be reversed and progression prevented by treatment with high doses of biotin and thiamine.", "synonyms": "BBGD, BTBGD, Biotin-responsive basal ganglia disease, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "icd_10": "G93.8", "omim": "607483", "umls": "C1843807", "mesh": "C537658", "gard": "10237"}, {"name": "BTD-Mangel", "sub_name": "Biotinidase-Mangel", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des klinischen Biotinidase (BTD)-Mangels wird auf 1:61.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Heterozygotenfrequenz in der Normalbev\u00f6lkerung betr\u00e4gt etwa 1:120.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A late-onset form of multiple carboxylase deficiency, an inborn error of biotin metabolism that, if untreated, is characterized by seizures, breathing difficulties, hypotonia, skin rash, alopecia, hearing loss and delayed development.", "synonyms": "Juvenile-onset multiple carboxylase deficiency, Late-onset multiple carboxylase deficiency, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal, Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "E53.8", "omim": "253260", "umls": "C0220754\u00a0 C1854698", "mesh": "D028921", "gard": "894", "meddra": "10071434", "epidemiology": "Prevalence of clinical biotinidase deficiency (BD) is estimated to be 1/61,000. Carrier frequency in the general population is approximately 1/120.", "clinical_description": "Symptoms of BD deficiency typically appear within the first few months of life, but later onset has also been reported. Individuals with untreated profound deficiency (less than 10 % of mean normal serum biotinidase activity) have variable clinical findings including seizures, hypotonia, eczematoid rash, alopecia, ataxia, hearing loss, fungal infections, and developmental delay. Metabolically, untreated children can exhibit ketolactic acidosis, organic acidemia (-uria) and mild hyperammonemia. Individuals with untreated partial BD (10% to 30% of mean normal biotinidase activity) may be asymptomatic, but during periods of stress, such as illness, fever or fasting, may develop symptoms similar to those of individuals with profound BD. Multiple adults with optic neuropathy and/or peripheral neuropathy, that is often mistakenly diagnosed as multiple sclerosis, have been shown to have profound biotinidase deficiency.", "etiology": "BD deficiency is caused by mutations in the BTD gene (3p25) resulting in reduced or absent biotinidase activity. This enzyme recycles free, non-protein bound, biotin which is required for multiple biotin-dependent metabolic processes. There are more than 150 known mutations of the BTD gene that cause BD.", "diagnostic_methods": "The disorder is detected through newborn screening when available. Other cases are diagnosed by clinical signs and symptoms and confirmed by demonstration of deficient serum biotinidase activity. Molecular mutation analysis of the BTD gene is also possible.", "differential_diagnosis": "The symptoms of BD overlap with those of other metabolic diseases, including holocarboxylase synthetase deficiency, isolated carboxylase deficiency, nutritional biotin deficiency, zinc deficiency and essential fatty acid deficiency. Testing for biotinidase deficiency should be considered in all individuals thought to have multiple sclerosis.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis for at-risk pregnancies is possible and can be performed by enzymatic analysis or by mutation analysis when the mutation is known. However, because of the treatability of the disorder, prenatal testing is not considered by most families.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them of the 25% risk of having an affected child for each pregnancy. Siblings of patients with BD should be tested for the deficiency even if they do not exhibit symptoms.", "management_and_treatment": "Supplementation with oral biotin in the free, non-protein bound, form is the primary treatment and improves symptoms in symptomatic patients, and prevents symptoms in those identified by newborn screening or before symptoms have developed. Once some features, such as optic atrophy, hearing loss, or developmental delay develop, they may not be reversible with biotin treatment. Treatment with biotin should be maintained lifelong. There are no known, serious adverse effects of biotin therapy. Patients and their families should be warned about the importance of treatment compliance. Periodic ophthalmological, neurological and metabolic evaluations are recommended. Raw eggs should be avoided because of their avidin content (biotin-binding substance), but cooking inactivates the binding effect of avidin.", "prognosis": "The prognosis for individuals diagnosed with BD is very good, provided they are treated before symptoms occur and are compliant with biotin therapy. In adult patients presenting with optic neuropathy and/or peripheral neuropathy, improvement in symptoms is likely with early intervention. However, if such individuals remain symptomatic for too long a period, their symptoms may be irreversible."}, {"name": "BTHS", "sub_name": "Barth-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Barth-Syndrom (BTHS) ist ein angeborener Defekt des Phospholipid-Stoffwechsels und gekennzeichnet durch dilatative Kardiomyopathie (DCM), Myopathie der Skelettmuskulatur, Neutropenie, verz\u00f6gertes Wachstum und Organoazidurie.", "synonyms": "3-Methylglutaconazidurie Typ 2, BTHS, Kardioskelettale Myopathie - Neutropenie, X-chromosomal, Kardioskelettale Myopathie-Neutropenie-Syndrom, MGA2, X-chromosomale kardioskelettale Myopathie und Neutropenie, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "E71.1", "OMIM": "302060", "UMLS": "C0574083", "MeSH": "D056889", "GARD": "5890", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz im der Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung wird auf 1:454.000 gesch\u00e4tzt, die Pr\u00e4valenz unter lebend Geborenen auf 1:140.000 (SW-England, South Wales) bis 1:300.000 -1:400.000 (USA). Am BTHS erkrankt das m\u00e4nnliche Geschlecht.", "clinical_description": "Das klinische Bild ist sehr unterschiedlich. Die meisten Knaben entwickeln im ersten Lebensjahrzehnt, im allg. schon im ersten Lebensjahr, eine DCM, die von einer Endokardfibroelastose (EFE) und oder linksventrikul\u00e4ren Noncompaction (LVNC) begleitet sein kann. Sie kann auch schon in utero beginnen und zu Herzinsuffizienz, fetalem Hydrops und Fehlgeburt oder im 2./3. Trimenon zur Totgeburt f\u00fchren. Ventrikul\u00e4re Arrhythmie, besonders in der Adoleszenz, kann zu pl\u00f6tzlichem Herztod f\u00fchren. Es besteht ein signifikantes Schlaganfall-Risiko. Die (meist proximale) Skelettmyopathie ist Ursache von verz\u00f6gerten motorischen Meilensteinen, Muskelhypotonie, schwerer Lethargie oder Belastungsintoleranz. W\u00e4hrend der Neugeborenenzeit besteht eine Neigung zur Hypoglyk\u00e4mie. Neunzig Prozent der Patienten haben eine milde bis schwere intermittierende oder persistierende Neutropenie mit dem Risiko einer Septik\u00e4mie, von schwerer bakterieller Sepsis, Mundgeschw\u00fcren oder schmerzhaften Gummen. Laktatazidose und leichte An\u00e4mie sind m\u00f6gliche Befunde. Die betroffenen Knaben zeigen in der Regel eine verz\u00f6gerte Pubert\u00e4t und ein bis in die sp\u00e4ten Teens oder fr\u00fchen 20er Jahre verz\u00f6gertes Wachstum. Danach kommt es oft zu einem erheblichen Wachstumsschub. Die Patienten k\u00f6nnen auch gro\u00dfe Schwierigkeiten mit angemessener Nahrungsaufnahme haben. Episodische Diarrh\u00f6en sind h\u00e4ufig. Viele Patienten haben \u00e4hnliche Gesichtsmerkmale: Pausbacken, tiefliegende Augen, prominente Ohren.", "etiology": "Ursache des BTHS sind Mutationen im Tafazzin-Gen (TAZ; Xq28), das f\u00fcr die TAZ1p-Acyltransferase kodiert. Dieses Enzym ist am Stoffwechsel des Cardiolipins, einem wichtigen Phospholipid der inneren Mitochondrien-membran, beteiligt. Die defekte TAZ1p-Funktionf\u00fchrt zu abnormer Modifizierung des Cardiolipins, wodurch letzlich die Struktur der Mitochondrien und die Finktion der Atemkette beeintr\u00e4chtigt werden.", "diagnostic_methods": "Historisches diagnostisches Vorgehen war das Stoffwechselscreening des Urins mit dem Nachweis einer erh\u00f6hten Ausscheidung organischer S\u00e4uren (typisch: 3-Methylglutacons\u00e4ure (3-MCGA)), gefolgt von der Sequenzierung des TAZ<7I>-Gens. Die Ausscheidung der MCGA kann aber auch in schweren F\u00e4llen normal sein. Die Methode der Wahl ist deshalb jetzt die Bestimmung des Verh\u00e4ltnisses Mono-Lysocardiolipin (MLCL) / Cardiolipin (CL) in Blut, Geweben, Fibroblasten oder aus asservierten Guthrie-K\u00e4rtchen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind heredit\u00e4re dilatative und nutritive Kardiomyopathien und idiopathische / zyklische Neutropenie.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "In Familien mit bekannter Mutation ist eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Krankheit wird X-chromosomal-rezessiv vererbt.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung ist im wesentlichen unterst\u00fctzend und erfordert ein multidisziplin\u00e4res Team. Die Herzinsuffizienz wird konventionell medikament\u00f6s, oder in refrakt\u00e4ren F\u00e4llen chirurgisch durch Herztransplantation behandelt. Das Risiko einer bakteriellen Sepsis in F\u00e4llen von intermittierender Neutropenie kann durch prophylaktische Gabe von Antibiotika und/oder intermittierende Anwendung von Granulozyten-Kolonie-stimulierendem Faktor (G-CSF) verringert werden. Die Schwierigkeiten bei der Nahrungsaufnahme erfordern evtl. Ern\u00e4hrung durch Nase-Magen- oder Gastrostomie-Sonde.", "prognosis": "Durch fr\u00fche Diagnose und verbesserte Behandlung und Betreuung wurde die Prognose erheblich verbessert. Die Patienten erreichen bereits ihr 40. Lebensjahr, und es ist zu erwarten, das sie noch dar\u00fcber hinaus \u00fcberleben werden.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz im der Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung wird auf 1:454.000 gesch\u00e4tzt, die Pr\u00e4valenz unter lebend Geborenen auf 1:140.000 (SW-England, South Wales) bis 1:300.000 -1:400.000 (USA). Am BTHS erkrankt das m\u00e4nnliche Geschlecht."}, {"name": "BTK-Defizienz", "sub_name": "Agammaglobulin\u00e4mie, X-chromosomale", "german_description": "Die X-chromosomal rezessiv vererbte Form der Agammaglobulin\u00e4mie (Typ Bruton) manifestiert sich mit rezidivierenden bakteriellen Infektionen der Atemwege und des Magen-Darm-Traktes. Sie pr\u00e4disponiert auch zu chronischen Infektionen mit Enteroviren. Die Ursache der Krankheit ist eine gest\u00f6rte Reifung der B-Zellen mit mangelnder Produktion von Immunglobulinen, bedingt durch Mutationen im BTK-Gen f\u00fcr die Bruton-Tyrosinkinase. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist etwa 1:200.000. Die Behandlung besteht in regelm\u00e4\u00dfigen intraven\u00f6sen Infusionen von Immunglobulinen. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A clinically variable form of isolated agammaglobulinemia, an inherited immunodeficiency disorder, characterized in affected males by recurrent bacterial infections during infancy.", "synonyms": "BTK-deficiency, Bruton type agammaglobulinemia, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-linked recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "D80.0", "omim": "300310\u00a0 300755", "umls": "C0221026", "mesh": "C537409", "gard": "1033", "meddra": "10060360", "epidemiology": "Estimated prevalence is 1/350,000 to 1/700,000. Annual incidence is not known. The disorder has been reported in various ethnic groups worldwide. Only males are affected and females are asymptomatic carriers.", "clinical_description": "Affected individuals are usually healthy in the first few months of life due to residual maternal immunoglobulins. The majority of patients develop recurrent or persistent bacterial infections, most commonly caused by S. pneumoniae and H. influenzae, within the first two years of life,: otitis media, conjunctivitis, sinusitis, respiratory infections, diarrhea and skin infections (impetigo, cellulitis, abscesses, and furuncles). Other severe infections may include empyema, meningitis, sepsis, or septic arthritis. Pyoderma or cellulitis (associated with neutropenia) and pseudomonas or staphylococcal sepsis are frequent presenting findings, particularly in patients less than 12 months of age. Lymph nodes, tonsils, and other lymphoid tissues are unusually small or absent. Rare patients are reported to have vitiligo, erythematous rash, or alopecia totalis. Infections tend to persist throughout adulthood. Affected patients are reported to have a higher susceptibility to severe and chronic enteroviral infections. Growth and development are usually normal. Some patients have a less severe clinical presentation and are not recognized as immunodeficient until 10 years of age or later. Complications of X-linked agammaglobulinemia (XLA) include progressive lung disease, chronic sinusitis, inflammatory bowel disease, arthritis , as well as neurological changes.", "etiology": "XLA is caused by mutations in the BTK gene (Xq21.33-q22) involved in B lymphocyte differentiation and maturation.", "diagnostic_methods": "A diagnosis of XLA should be considered in patients with recurrent or persistent otitis media, pneumonia, sinusitis, and conjunctivitis starting before age five years or severe bacterial infections such as sepsis, meningitis, cellulitis, or empyema. A family history consistent with X-linked transmission also points to this diagnosis. Suspicion can be confirmed with blood tests showing low serum Ig and markedly reduced B lymphocyte counts. Molecular genetic testing can also be used to establish or confirm the diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include autosomal recessive or dominant agammaglobulinemia, common variable immunodeficiency (CVID), hyper IgM syndrome and severe combined immunodeficiency (SCID) (see these terms).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible following identification of the disease-causing mutation in the family.", "genetic_counseling": "XLA, as the name indicates, follows an X-linked pattern of inheritance. Nearly 50% of cases are familial, while the remainder are thought to be related to de novo mutations. Genetic counseling should be provided to members of affected families.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no curative treatment for XLA but good disease control can be achieved through consistent gammaglobulin therapy. This can be given intravenously (400-600 mg/kg every 3 to 4 weeks) or subcutaneously (100 mg/kg every week). Therapy should be started as early as possible. Some immunologists advocate chronic prophylactic antibiotics and treatment of acute infections should be prolonged and at maximal doses of antibiotics.", "prognosis": "Most patients with XLA lead a normal life. Life expectancy may be reduced in some patients as a result of complications such as severe infections and chronic pulmonary damage. Early therapeutic measures and treatment compliance are major prognostic factors."}, {"name": "BTK-Mangel", "sub_name": "Agammaglobulin\u00e4mie, X-chromosomale", "german_description": "Die X-chromosomal rezessiv vererbte Form der Agammaglobulin\u00e4mie (Typ Bruton) manifestiert sich mit rezidivierenden bakteriellen Infektionen der Atemwege und des Magen-Darm-Traktes. Sie pr\u00e4disponiert auch zu chronischen Infektionen mit Enteroviren. Die Ursache der Krankheit ist eine gest\u00f6rte Reifung der B-Zellen mit mangelnder Produktion von Immunglobulinen, bedingt durch Mutationen im BTK-Gen f\u00fcr die Bruton-Tyrosinkinase. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist etwa 1:200.000. Die Behandlung besteht in regelm\u00e4\u00dfigen intraven\u00f6sen Infusionen von Immunglobulinen. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A clinically variable form of isolated agammaglobulinemia, an inherited immunodeficiency disorder, characterized in affected males by recurrent bacterial infections during infancy.", "synonyms": "BTK-deficiency, Bruton type agammaglobulinemia, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-linked recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "D80.0", "omim": "300310\u00a0 300755", "umls": "C0221026", "mesh": "C537409", "gard": "1033", "meddra": "10060360", "epidemiology": "Estimated prevalence is 1/350,000 to 1/700,000. Annual incidence is not known. The disorder has been reported in various ethnic groups worldwide. Only males are affected and females are asymptomatic carriers.", "clinical_description": "Affected individuals are usually healthy in the first few months of life due to residual maternal immunoglobulins. The majority of patients develop recurrent or persistent bacterial infections, most commonly caused by S. pneumoniae and H. influenzae, within the first two years of life,: otitis media, conjunctivitis, sinusitis, respiratory infections, diarrhea and skin infections (impetigo, cellulitis, abscesses, and furuncles). Other severe infections may include empyema, meningitis, sepsis, or septic arthritis. Pyoderma or cellulitis (associated with neutropenia) and pseudomonas or staphylococcal sepsis are frequent presenting findings, particularly in patients less than 12 months of age. Lymph nodes, tonsils, and other lymphoid tissues are unusually small or absent. Rare patients are reported to have vitiligo, erythematous rash, or alopecia totalis. Infections tend to persist throughout adulthood. Affected patients are reported to have a higher susceptibility to severe and chronic enteroviral infections. Growth and development are usually normal. Some patients have a less severe clinical presentation and are not recognized as immunodeficient until 10 years of age or later. Complications of X-linked agammaglobulinemia (XLA) include progressive lung disease, chronic sinusitis, inflammatory bowel disease, arthritis , as well as neurological changes.", "etiology": "XLA is caused by mutations in the BTK gene (Xq21.33-q22) involved in B lymphocyte differentiation and maturation.", "diagnostic_methods": "A diagnosis of XLA should be considered in patients with recurrent or persistent otitis media, pneumonia, sinusitis, and conjunctivitis starting before age five years or severe bacterial infections such as sepsis, meningitis, cellulitis, or empyema. A family history consistent with X-linked transmission also points to this diagnosis. Suspicion can be confirmed with blood tests showing low serum Ig and markedly reduced B lymphocyte counts. Molecular genetic testing can also be used to establish or confirm the diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include autosomal recessive or dominant agammaglobulinemia, common variable immunodeficiency (CVID), hyper IgM syndrome and severe combined immunodeficiency (SCID) (see these terms).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible following identification of the disease-causing mutation in the family.", "genetic_counseling": "XLA, as the name indicates, follows an X-linked pattern of inheritance. Nearly 50% of cases are familial, while the remainder are thought to be related to de novo mutations. Genetic counseling should be provided to members of affected families.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no curative treatment for XLA but good disease control can be achieved through consistent gammaglobulin therapy. This can be given intravenously (400-600 mg/kg every 3 to 4 weeks) or subcutaneously (100 mg/kg every week). Therapy should be started as early as possible. Some immunologists advocate chronic prophylactic antibiotics and treatment of acute infections should be prolonged and at maximal doses of antibiotics.", "prognosis": "Most patients with XLA lead a normal life. Life expectancy may be reduced in some patients as a result of complications such as severe infections and chronic pulmonary damage. Early therapeutic measures and treatment compliance are major prognostic factors."}, {"name": "Buckley-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Hyper-IgE-Syndrom, autosomal-dominantes", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Autosomal-dominante Hyper-IgE-Syndrom (AD-HIES) ist ein sehr seltener prim\u00e4rer Immundefekt und klinisch gekennzeichnet durch die Trias hohes Serum-IGE (>2000 IU/ml), rezidivierende Staphylokokken-Hautabszesse und rezidivierende Pneumonien mit Bildung von Pneumatozelen.", "synonyms": "AD-HIES, Buckley-Syndrom, HIES, autosomal-dominantes, Hyperimmunoglobulin\u00e4mie E -Infektions-Syndrom, rekurrentes, Hyperimmunoglobulin\u00e4mie E-Syndrom Typ 1, Hyperimmunoglobulin\u00e4mie E-Syndrom, autosomal-dominantes, Job-Syndrom, STAT3-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "D82.4", "OMIM": "147060", "UMLS": "C2936739\u00a0 C3489795\u00a0 C3887645", "GARD": "6800", "epidemiology": "Die gesch\u00e4tzte Jahres-Inzidenz betr\u00e4gt etwa 1/1.000.000. Das Syndrom betrifft beide Geschlechter in gleicher Weise.", "clinical_description": "Das AD-HIES beginnt in typischen F\u00e4llen mit Neugeborenen-Ekzem. Betroffen sind aber auch in unterschiedlichem Schweregrad Immunsystem, Bindegewebe, Skelett und Zahnentwicklung. Die h\u00e4ufigsten Zeichen der Immunschw\u00e4che/-dysregulation sind Ekzem, rezidivierende Hautabszesse, Pneumonie mit Bildung von Pneumatozelen, mukokutane Candidiasis, erh\u00f6hte IgE-Serumspiegel und Eosinophilie. Schwere rezidivierende Atemwegsinfektionen, die zu chronischer Ateminsuffizienz f\u00fchren k\u00f6nnen, sind h\u00e4ufig. Zusammen mit Mittellinien-Anomalien wurde ein distinktes Aussehen des Gesichtes beschrieben (rauhe Haut, Gesichtsasymmetrie, prominente Stirn, tiefliegende Augen, breiter Nasenr\u00fccken, volle Nasenspitze, Progenie). Bei etwa der H\u00e4lfte der Patienten treten geh\u00e4uft pathologische Frakturen der langen Knochen und Rippen auf. Bei mehr als 60% besteht eine Skoliose unterschiedlichen Schweregrades. Anomalien der Zahnentwicklung sind ein regelm\u00e4\u00dfiges Merkmal: Die mangelhafte Resorption der prim\u00e4ren Zahnwurzeln kann zu verl\u00e4ngerter Retention der prim\u00e4ren Z\u00e4hne f\u00fchren, wodurch wiederum ein regelhafter Durchbruch der permanenten Z\u00e4hne verhindert wird. Beschrieben wurden auch Gef\u00e4\u00dfver\u00e4nderungen (Aneurysma der Herzkranzgef\u00e4\u00dfe und der Aorta, Thrombose der Kleinhirn-Arterie und ein angeboren offener Ductus venosus). Symptome von Seiten der Augen sind Xanthelasmen,\u00fcbergro\u00dfes Chalazion, Lidkn\u00f6tchen, Strabismus, Netzhautabl\u00f6sung und komplizierte Katarakt. Es besteht ein erh\u00f6htes Risiko f\u00fcr Autoimmunkrankheiten und lymphoproliferative Krankheiten.", "etiology": "Bei 70 % der Patienten ist der Ph\u00e4notyp mit heterozygoten Mutationen im STAT-Gen (17q21.31) assoziiert. STAT3 hat eine Schl\u00fcsselrolle bei der Signaltransduktion einer gro\u00dfen Zahl von Zytokinen (Kontrolle von Infektionen mit Pilzen und extrazellul\u00e4ren Bakterien). Die \u00c4tiologie der \u00fcbrigen 30% ist nicht bekannt.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnostisches Hauptmerkmal ist eine erh\u00f6hter Serumspiegel des Immunglobulins E (IgE) mit > 2000 U/ml, und oft > 5000 U/ml. Um die Wahrscheinlichkeit der Diagnose beurteilen zu k\u00f6nnen, wurde ein klinischer Score entwickelt. IgE-Gesamtkonzentration > 1000 IU/ml und ein gewichteter Score der klinischen Symptome >30 spricht f\u00fcr AD-HIES durch STAT3-Mangel. Der Nachweis einer dominant-negativen heterozygoten Mutation im STAT3-Gen sichert die Diagnose definitiv.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind Zystische Fibrose und Chronisch-granulomat\u00f6se Krankheit (s. diese Termini), sowie schwere atopische Dermatitis und HIV-Infektion. Beschrieben wurde auch ein klinisch distinktes autosomal-rezessives Hyper-IgE-Syndrom (AR-HIES; s. dort).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik ist m\u00f6glich, wenn in der Familie die krankheitsverursachende Mutation bekannt ist.", "genetic_counseling": "Die meisten F\u00e4lle von AD-HIES sind durch Neumutationen verursacht und deshalb sporadisch, die STAT3-Mutationen werden autosomal-dominant vererbt.", "management_and_treatment": "Zur Therapie geh\u00f6ren die Verh\u00fctung und Versorgung von Infektionen mit langzeitiger Anwendung systemischer Antibiotika und Antimykotika. Lungenabszesse m\u00fcssen eventuell chirurgisch behandelt werden, m\u00f6gliche Komplikationen erfordern jedoch eine strenge Indikation. Die Rolle der Transplantation h\u00e4matopoetischer Stammzellen (HSCT) muss weiter untersucht werden.", "prognosis": "Obwohl HIES mit signifikanter Morbidit\u00e4t und Mortalit\u00e4t verbunden ist, verbessern angemessene Pflege, enge \u00dcberwachung und Compliance des Patienten die Prognose. Die Patienten k\u00f6nnen dann 50 Jahre alt oder \u00e4lter werden.", "summary": "Die gesch\u00e4tzte Jahres-Inzidenz betr\u00e4gt etwa 1/1.000.000. Das Syndrom betrifft beide Geschlechter in gleicher Weise."}, {"name": "Budd-Chiari-Syndrom", "german_description": "Dem Budd-Chiari-Syndrom (BCS) liegt eine Obstruktion des ven\u00f6sen Ausflusses der Leber zugrunde, entweder auf der Ebene der Lebervenen oder des terminalen Segmentes der Vena cava. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist weitgehend unbekannt, die Sch\u00e4tzungen reichen von 1:50.000 bis 1:100.000. Die Obstruktion f\u00fchrt zu Leberstauung und isch\u00e4mischer Nekrose. Der Schweregrad ist abh\u00e4ngig von der Schnelligkeit, mit der sich die Obstruktion entwickelt und vom Ausma\u00df der Obstruktion. H\u00e4ufigste Ursache der Verschl\u00fcsse sind Thrombosen (prim\u00e4res BCS). Im Verlauf reorganisieren sich die Thrombi zu einer Form von fibr\u00f6sem Gewebe, das entweder eine lokalisierte Stenose oder einen diffusen Verschluss mit Umwandlung in fibr\u00f6se Str\u00e4nge verursacht. Lokalisierte Stenosen k\u00f6nnen als membranartige Strukturen erscheinen. Das sekund\u00e4re BCS ist Folge einer Tumorinvasion in das Venenlumen oder einer Kompression der Vene durch einen wachsenden Tumor. Die wichtigsten Manifestationen des BCS sind Aszites (oft massiv und therapierefrakt\u00e4r) mit Mangelern\u00e4hrung und Niereninsuffizienz, gastrointestinale Blutungen durch portale Hypertension, Leberinsuffizienz mit hepatischer Enzephalopathie und schwere Infektionen. Aber auch asymptomatische Formen wurden beschrieben. Das prim\u00e4re BCS steht in Verbindung mit einer Reihe von Faktoren, die das Auftreten ven\u00f6ser Thrombosen beg\u00fcnstigen: Prim\u00e4re myeloproliferative Syndrome (in 50% der F\u00e4lle, manifest als 'forme fruste' oder atypische Form der Krankheit, aber durch Nachweis einer JAK2-Genmutation diagnostiziert), Faktor-V-Leiden-Thrombophilie, Protein C-Mangel, Antiphospholipid-Syndrom, Behcet- Krankheit, Paroxysmale n\u00e4chtliche H\u00e4moglobinurie (s. diese Termini), Gebrauch oraler \u00d6strogen-Progesteron-Kontrazeptiva, inflammatorische Colitis. Durch Darstellung der Lebervenen und der Vena cava inferior mit nicht-invasiven, bildgebenden Verfahren (Doppler- Ultraschall, Tomodensitometry, MRI) kann die Diagnose bei bestehendem Verdacht durch einen Radiologen mit ausreichender Erfahrung meist gestellt werden. Hepatische Venographie oder Cavographie oder Leberbiopsie sind in der Regel nicht erforderlich. Der nat\u00fcrliche Verlauf des BCS ist sehr ung\u00fcnstig, ohne Behandlung \u00fcberleben weniger als 10% der Patienten drei Jahre. Heute liegt bei fr\u00fcher Diagnose und schnellem Therapiebeginn die 5-Jahres-\u00dcberlebensrate \u00fcber 90%. Die Therapie zielt auf eine Korrektur der Ursachen des Thromboserisikos, Langzeittherapie mit Antikoagulantien, Rekanalisation der verschlossenen Venen duch interventionelle Radiologie, TIPS (transjugularer intrahepatischer porto-systemischer Shunt) und, bei Versagen anderer Behandlungsmethoden, Lebertransplantation. Die Langzeitprognose wird durch die Art des assoziierten Thromboserisikos bestimmt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare vascular liver disease characterized by obstruction of hepatic venous outflow involving either the hepatic veins or the terminal segment of the inferior vena cava.", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Multigenic/multifactorial\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "I82.0", "omim": "600880", "umls": "C0019154\u00a0 C0856761", "mesh": "D006502", "gard": "5968", "meddra": "10006537", "epidemiology": "Prevalence of Budd-Chiari syndrome (BCS) remains largely unknown but estimates range between 1/50,000 and 1/100,000.", "clinical_description": "The obstruction leads to hepatic congestion and ischemic necrosis. Severity depends on the speed of onset and extent of the obstruction. Obstructions are generally caused by thrombosis (primary BCS). With time, thrombi reorganize to form a fibrous tissue that leads either to localized stenosis of the thrombotic vein or to diffuse obliteration resulting in its transformation into fibrous cords. Localized stenoses may present as the appearance of a membrane-like structure. Secondary BCS results from tumor invasion into the lumen or compression of the vein by an expansive lesion. BCS presentation and manifestations are extremely diverse, so that the diagnosis must be considered in any patient with acute, acute-on-chronic or chronic liver disease. The principal manifestations of BCS are ascites (which is often massive and intractable) leading to undernutrition and renal insufficiency, gastrointestinal hemorrhage due to portal hypertension, and hepatic insufficiency resulting in encephalopathy and severe infections. However, asymptomatic forms have also been reported.", "etiology": "Primary BCS is associated with a combination of factors that lead to a susceptibility for venous thrombosis: primary myeloproliferative neoplasms (present in 50% of cases and manifesting as a 'forme fruste' or atypical forms of the disease, but identified through detection of the JAK2 V617F mutation, CALR mutations or others), Factor V Leiden thrombophilia, protein C deficiency, antiphospholipid syndrome, Behcet disease, paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria (see these terms), use of estrogen-progesterone oral contraceptives and systemic inflammatory diseases.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis can usually be established by non-invasive means through imaging of the hepatic veins and the inferior vena cava (Doppler ultrasound, tomodensitometry and MRI) but requires a radiologist with sufficient experience and with an awareness of the potential diagnosis. Liver biopsy should not be performed to diagnose BCS when vascular imaging demonstrates obstruction of the hepatic venous outflow tract. Hepatic venography or cavography, and liver puncture biopsy are necessary only when BCS of the small hepatic veins is not seen on imaging.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include hepatic veno-occlusive disease / sinusoidal obstruction syndrome (VOD/SOS), cardiac failure, decompensated chronic liver disease, and tumoral invasion of the liver.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment approaches include correction of the factors leading to an increased risk of thrombosis, long-term anticoagulant therapy, recanalization of the obstructed veins by interventional radiology, TIPS (transjugular intrahepatic portosystemic shunt) and liver transplantation in case of failure of other treatment methods.", "prognosis": "The natural course of the disease is very severe (less than 10% of patients survive for more than 3 years without treatment). At present, when the diagnosis is made quickly and treatment is initiated rapidly, the survival rate is 90% at 5 years. The long-term prognosis depends on the associated risk factors for thrombosis."}, {"name": "Buerger-Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Thrombangiitis obliterans, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "I73.1", "OMIM": "211480", "UMLS": "C0040021", "GARD": "5969", "summary": "Die Endangitis obliterans von-Winiwarter-Buerger ist eine segmentale, obliterierende Entz\u00fcndung von Arterien und Venen mit Thrombose und Rekanalisierung der betroffenen Gef\u00e4\u00dfe. Es ist eine nicht-atherosklerotische Entz\u00fcndung der kleinen und mittelgro\u00dfen Arterien und der Arm- und Beinvenen. Die Krankheit tritt weltweit auf. Ihr Anteil unter den Patienten mit peripheren arteriellen Durchblutungsst\u00f6rungen reicht von niedrigen 0,5-5,6% in West-Europa bis zu sehr hohen Anteilen in Indien (45-63%), Korea und Japan (16-66%) und bei den Ashkenazi-Juden (80%). Die Diagnose wird klinisch gestellt. Zu den klinischen Kriterien, die Olin im Jahr 2000 zusammenfa\u00dfte, geh\u00f6ren: Alter unter 45; gegenw\u00e4rtiger oder fr\u00fcherer Tabakkonsum; distale Isch\u00e4mie der Gliedma\u00dfen (mit Claudicatio intermittens, Ruheschmerz, isch\u00e4mischen Ulzera, und dokumentiert mit nicht-invasiven Untersuchungen der Gef\u00e4\u00dfe); Ausschlu\u00df von Autoimmunkrankheiten, Thrombophilie und Diabetes mellitus; Ausschlu\u00df einer proximalen Quelle von Embolie durch Echokardiographie und Arteriographie; konsistente angiographische Befunde an betroffenen und nicht betroffenen Gliedma\u00dfen. Die \u00c4tiologie der Endangitis obliterans ist unbekannt, jedoch ist Tabakgebrauch f\u00fcr Beginn und Fortschreiten der Krankheit entscheidend. Wenn die Patienten noch rauchen, ist der vollst\u00e4ndige Verzicht auf Tabak ein essentieller erster Behandlungsschritt. Gef\u00e4\u00dferweiternde Medikamente und gerinnungshemmende Substanzen wie Aspirin k\u00f6nnen verschrieben werden, helfen aber bei der peripheren Gef\u00e4\u00dferkrankung in der Regel wenig. "}, {"name": "Bull-Nixon-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Prim\u00e4re basil\u00e4re Invagination", "german_description": "Die basil\u00e4re Impression ist radiologisch erkennbar als eine Invagination des kranio-vertebralen \u00dcberganges in den Sch\u00e4del hinein, mit resultierender Verk\u00fcrzung des Halses und abnormer Kopfhaltung.Die seltene prim\u00e4re Form wurde bei etwa 100 Patienten beschrieben. Wahrscheinlich ist die Vererbung autosomal-dominant. Etwa die H\u00e4lfte der F\u00e4lle sind frei von Symptomen. Bei den \u00fcbrigen bestehen ein Horner-Syndrom, Pyramidenzeichen oder die Symptome einer Syringomyelie (Empfindungsst\u00f6rungen, Schw\u00e4che der Gliedma\u00dfen). ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Primary basilar impression (PBI) is a very rare skeletal developmental defect characterized by congenital upward translocation of the upper cervical spine and clivus into the foramen magnum. PBI can be asymptomatic or associated with severe neurological dysfunction.", "synonyms": "Bull-Nixon syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "Q75.8", "omim": "109500", "umls": "C1862299", "gard": "1037"}, {"name": "Bull\u00f6se kongenitale ichthyosiforme Erythrodermie Brocq", "sub_name": "Ichthyose, epidermolytische, autosomal-dominante", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Epidermolytische Ichthyose (EI) ist eine seltene keratinopathische Ichthyose (KPI, siehe dort), mit einen blasenbildenden Ph\u00e4notyp bei der Geburt, der sich fortschreitend zu einem hyperkeratotischen Ph\u00e4notyp entwickelt", "synonyms": "BCIE, Bull\u00f6se kongenitale ichthyosiforme Erythrodermie Brocq, EHK, EI, Erythrodermie, ichthyosiforme kongenitale, bull\u00f6se Form, Hyperkeratose, epidermolytische, Ichthyose, bull\u00f6se, Ichthyosis hystrix Typ Brocq, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q80.3", "OMIM": "113800\u00a0 607602", "UMLS": "C0079153", "GARD": "1039", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz aller Typen der KPI wird auf 1/909.000 in Frankreich gesch\u00e4tzt. Die genaue Pr\u00e4valenz der EI ist unbekannt.", "clinical_description": "S\u00e4uglinge weisen bei Geburt oder kurz danach eine generalisierte Erythrodermie, schwere Blasenbildung, milde Abschuppung und oberfl\u00e4chliche Hauterosionen an Stellen mit kleinerem Trauma und in Beugebereichen auf. Sp\u00e4ter entwickeln sich gelbbraune hyperkeratotische Plaques, oft assoziiert mit milder Hintergrund-Erythrodermie, meist in den ersten Lebensmonaten. Mit der Zeit verschlimmert sich die Hyperkeratose, w\u00e4hrend die Blasenbildung in der Regel abnimmt, trotz Rezidiven nach einem Hauttrauma oder im Sommer. Die Hyperkeratose ist oft generalisiert, jedoch weisen einige Patienten begrenzte Hautl\u00e4sionen auf, insbesondere in den Gelenkbereichen, am vorderen Hals, der Bauchwand und den infraglut\u00e4alen Falten. Eine palmoplantare Beteiligung wird bei einigen Patienten beobachtet. Die Haut weist h\u00e4ufig einen Juckreiz auf uns ist \u00fcbelriechend; Hautinfektionen k\u00f6nnen auftreten. Weitere m\u00f6gliche Merkmale sind: Hypohidrose, Abschuppung der Kopfhaut und Nageldystrophie. Bei schweren F\u00e4llen kann eine Wachstumsst\u00f6rung beobachtet werden. Die EI dauert, mit einer Hyperkeratose unterschiedlicher Intensit\u00e4t und Ausdehnung, bis in das Erwachsenenalter an. Eine klinische Variante der EI, die ringf\u00f6rmige EI (AEI, siehe dort), weist eine ringf\u00f6rmige Verteilung polyzyklischer erythemat\u00f6ser Abschuppungen auf, die sich in der Regel am Rumpf und den Extremit\u00e4ten entwickeln und sich meist wieder aufl\u00f6sen.", "etiology": "Die Erkrankung wird durch Mutationen in den Genen verursacht, die f\u00fcr die epidermalen suprabasalen Keratine 1 (KRT1; 12q13.13) und 10 (KRT10; 17q21-q23) kodieren. Hierdurch wird die Bildung des Keratin-Zwischenfilaments in den suprabasalen Keratinozyten beeintr\u00e4chtigt. Es besteht eine Genotyp-Ph\u00e4notyp-Korrelation, wobei eine palmoplantare Beteiligung in der Regel mit KRT1-Mutationen assoziiert ist. Die Lage der Mutation beeinflusst m\u00f6glicherweise den Schweregrad des Ph\u00e4notyps.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf dem klinischen Bild und der histologischen Untersuchung der Hautl\u00e4sionen, die eine Hyperkeratose mit Orthokeratose, Hypergranulose und Zytolyse in den oberen Schichten des Stratum spinosum und Stratum granulosum (epidermolytische Hyperkeratose) zeigt. Die Elektronenmikroscopie zeigt suprabasale Keratinozyten mit unregelm\u00e4\u00dfig geformten Klumpen von Keratin-Zwischenfilamenten. Gentests best\u00e4tigen die Diagnose.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen bei der Geburt sind: Toxische epidermale Nekrolyse, erbliche Epidermolysis bullosa, Incontinentia pigmenti (siehe jeweils dort) oder Herpesinfektionen, w\u00e4hrend sie in sp\u00e4teren Stadien andere KI, wie die oberfl\u00e4chliche EI und die Ichthyosis hystrix Curth-Macklin (siehe jeweils dort) umfasst.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine genetische pr\u00e4natale Diagnose ist m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Die meisten F\u00e4lle sind sporadisch. Die \u00fcbrigen sind autosomal-dominante, seltener autosomal-rezessive F\u00e4lle. Betroffenen Familien soll eine genetische Beratung angeboten werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung ist symptomatisch. H\u00e4ufig werden Emollientien eingesetzt, jedoch ist deren Wirksamkeit begrenzt. Topische Keratolytika oder orales Acitretin bei schweren Formen kann hyperkeratotische L\u00e4sionen bessern, ist jedoch mit schweren Nebenwirkungen verbunden, darunter Hautbr\u00fcchigkeit und verst\u00e4rkte Blasenbildung. Antiseptische Waschungen verringern die bakterielle Besiedlung und den K\u00f6rpergeruch. Eine antibiotische Therapie ist in F\u00e4llen einer bakteriellen Infektion erforderlich.", "prognosis": "Der Schweregrad der Erkrankung variiert. Eine EI kann die Lebensqualit\u00e4t beeintr\u00e4chtigen und zu einer sozialen Behinderung aufgrund der Hautaspekte, der Schmerzen, des Juckreizes, des K\u00f6rpergeruchs und/oder der rekurrierenden Infektionen f\u00fchren. Eine EI kann au\u00dferdem im neonatalen Zeitraum aufgrund von Infektionen und/oder Dehydrierung lebensbedrohlich sein.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz aller Typen der KPI wird auf 1/909.000 in Frankreich gesch\u00e4tzt. Die genaue Pr\u00e4valenz der EI ist unbekannt."}, {"name": "Buphthalmie", "sub_name": "Glaukom, kongenitales", "german_description": "Das angeborene Glaukom ist das h\u00e4ufigste Glaukom des Kindesalters. Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf ungef\u00e4hr 1/27.800 Geburten in Europa gesch\u00e4tzt. M\u00e4nner sind h\u00e4ufiger betroffen als Frauen, und die Krankheit tritt in 70-80 % der F\u00e4lle bilateral auf.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare ophthalmic disorder characterized by an elevated intra-ocular pressure. The clinical presentation frequently associates an increase in the size of the eye, as well as corneal edema.", "synonyms": "Buphthalmia, Buphthalmos, Buphthalmus, Primary congenital glaucoma, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q15.0", "omim": "231300\u00a0 600975\u00a0 613085\u00a0 613086\u00a0 617272", "umls": "C0020302", "epidemiology": "Congenital glaucoma (CG) is the most common glaucoma of infancy. The birth prevalence is estimated at around 1/45,450 live births in Europe. Males are more commonly affected than females and the disease is bilateral in 70 to 80% cases.", "clinical_description": "Diagnosis is made in the first year of life in about 80% of cases. The classic triad includes epiphora, blepharospasm and photophobia. Affected children are noted as having red watery eyes, cloudy corneas and ocular enlargement, caused by stretching of the immature eye due to elevated intraocular pressure. Children older than 3 years develop progressive myopia and insidious field loss.", "etiology": "Etiology is poorly understood but the obstruction to the aqueous outflow seems to occur at the iridocorneal angle and at the level of the trabeculum. Gene mapping of affected families has identified three chromosomal loci, GLC3A in 2p22.2, GLC3B in 1p36 and GLC3C in 14q24.3-q31.1 of which, the CYP1B1 gene (2p22.2) on GLC3A harbors mutations. Mutations in LTBP2 (14q24.3) and MYOC (1q23-q24) genes have also been identified.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is made by a complete ophthalmologic examination, which reveals a hazy cornea of increased size and presence of Haab's striae, increased intraocular pressure (IOP) (more than 20 mm Hg or asymmetry of more than 5 mm Hg is of concern), deep anterior chamber, abnormally high insertion of iris, poorly developed scleral spur (with gonioscopy), increased cup to disc ratio of the optic nerve head and refraction testing showing myopia and astigmatism. Examination under anesthesia is done if necessary.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnoses for red watery eyes include nasolacrimal duct obstruction, conjunctivitis, corneal abrasion and uveitis while those for corneal enlargement include high axial myopia and megalocornea. The differential diagnoses for corneal clouding and edema include congenital corneal dystrophies, birth trauma, keratitis, congenital ocular anomalies or storage diseases while those for optic nerve cupping include physiologic cupping, coloboma of optic papilla, genetic optic atrophy and optic nerve hypoplasia.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis can determine the risk of the disease in families with known mutations.", "genetic_counseling": "Most cases are sporadic, in about 10% of cases autosomal recessive inheritance is seen with variable penetrance. In the case of an autosomal recessive inheritance, genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Congenital glaucoma is primarily managed surgically, with medical therapy playing only an adjunctive role. At first, it is usually practiced angle surgery (such as goniotomy or trabeculotomy), trabeculectomy or deep sclerectomy The choice depends on the severity of the glaucoma and the surgeon's habits Glaucoma drainage devices and diode laser cyclophotocoagulation are used in refractory cases. Amblyopia, corneal scarring and cataract are late complications. Early visual rehabilitation is important to prevent amblyopia. Patients may need regular life-long follow up to monitor IOP.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is largely related to the timing of presentation; early diagnosis and prompt surgical treatment significantly influences the visual outcome. Most patients successfully treated in infancy maintain good pressure control with stable optic nerves and fully functional visual fields into adulthood."}, {"name": "Buphthalmus", "sub_name": "Glaukom, kongenitales", "german_description": "Das angeborene Glaukom ist das h\u00e4ufigste Glaukom des Kindesalters. Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf ungef\u00e4hr 1/27.800 Geburten in Europa gesch\u00e4tzt. M\u00e4nner sind h\u00e4ufiger betroffen als Frauen, und die Krankheit tritt in 70-80 % der F\u00e4lle bilateral auf.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare ophthalmic disorder characterized by an elevated intra-ocular pressure. The clinical presentation frequently associates an increase in the size of the eye, as well as corneal edema.", "synonyms": "Buphthalmia, Buphthalmos, Buphthalmus, Primary congenital glaucoma, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q15.0", "omim": "231300\u00a0 600975\u00a0 613085\u00a0 613086\u00a0 617272", "umls": "C0020302", "epidemiology": "Congenital glaucoma (CG) is the most common glaucoma of infancy. The birth prevalence is estimated at around 1/45,450 live births in Europe. Males are more commonly affected than females and the disease is bilateral in 70 to 80% cases.", "clinical_description": "Diagnosis is made in the first year of life in about 80% of cases. The classic triad includes epiphora, blepharospasm and photophobia. Affected children are noted as having red watery eyes, cloudy corneas and ocular enlargement, caused by stretching of the immature eye due to elevated intraocular pressure. Children older than 3 years develop progressive myopia and insidious field loss.", "etiology": "Etiology is poorly understood but the obstruction to the aqueous outflow seems to occur at the iridocorneal angle and at the level of the trabeculum. Gene mapping of affected families has identified three chromosomal loci, GLC3A in 2p22.2, GLC3B in 1p36 and GLC3C in 14q24.3-q31.1 of which, the CYP1B1 gene (2p22.2) on GLC3A harbors mutations. Mutations in LTBP2 (14q24.3) and MYOC (1q23-q24) genes have also been identified.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is made by a complete ophthalmologic examination, which reveals a hazy cornea of increased size and presence of Haab's striae, increased intraocular pressure (IOP) (more than 20 mm Hg or asymmetry of more than 5 mm Hg is of concern), deep anterior chamber, abnormally high insertion of iris, poorly developed scleral spur (with gonioscopy), increased cup to disc ratio of the optic nerve head and refraction testing showing myopia and astigmatism. Examination under anesthesia is done if necessary.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnoses for red watery eyes include nasolacrimal duct obstruction, conjunctivitis, corneal abrasion and uveitis while those for corneal enlargement include high axial myopia and megalocornea. The differential diagnoses for corneal clouding and edema include congenital corneal dystrophies, birth trauma, keratitis, congenital ocular anomalies or storage diseases while those for optic nerve cupping include physiologic cupping, coloboma of optic papilla, genetic optic atrophy and optic nerve hypoplasia.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis can determine the risk of the disease in families with known mutations.", "genetic_counseling": "Most cases are sporadic, in about 10% of cases autosomal recessive inheritance is seen with variable penetrance. In the case of an autosomal recessive inheritance, genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Congenital glaucoma is primarily managed surgically, with medical therapy playing only an adjunctive role. At first, it is usually practiced angle surgery (such as goniotomy or trabeculotomy), trabeculectomy or deep sclerectomy The choice depends on the severity of the glaucoma and the surgeon's habits Glaucoma drainage devices and diode laser cyclophotocoagulation are used in refractory cases. Amblyopia, corneal scarring and cataract are late complications. Early visual rehabilitation is important to prevent amblyopia. Patients may need regular life-long follow up to monitor IOP.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is largely related to the timing of presentation; early diagnosis and prompt surgical treatment significantly influences the visual outcome. Most patients successfully treated in infancy maintain good pressure control with stable optic nerves and fully functional visual fields into adulthood."}, {"name": "Burkitt-Lymphom", "german_description": "Das Burkitt-Lymphom ist ein differenzierter B-Zell-Tumor des lymphatischen Systems und macht mehr als die H\u00e4lfte der Lymphome des Kindesalters aus. Zwei Typen wurden identifiziert: Eine endemische Form (bei Schwarz-Afrikanern) mit Tumoren der Wangenregion, verursacht durch das Epstein-Barr-Virus (EBV) und eine sporadische, vom EBV unabh\u00e4ngige Form mit abdominalen Tumoren. Die Tumoren wachsen schnell und breiten sich auf Knochenmark, ZNS und Schleimh\u00e4ute aus. In mehr als 75% der F\u00e4lle wird eine pathognomonische Translokation t(8;14)(q24;q32) gefunden. Das Onkogen c-myc in der Region 8q24 ist in die N\u00e4he der schweren Immunglobulin-Ketten in der Region 14q32 transloziert. Selten sind Translokationen des c-myc-Onkogens auf Chromosom 2 (Immunglobulin-Kappa-Ketten) oder 22 (Immunglobulin-Lambda-Ketten). B-Zellen mit diesen Translokationen exprimieren an ihrer Oberfl\u00e4che Immunglobuline und Differenzierungs-Marker (CD19, CD20 und CD22). Die Behandlung mu\u00df notfallm\u00e4\u00dfig beginnen und besteht aus einer kurzen und intensiven Chemotherapie. Die Heilungsrate ist 90%, aber die Behandlung ist aufwendig und erfordert Betreuung durch ein pluridisziplin\u00e4res, kinderonkologisches Team. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Burkitt lymphoma is a rare form of malignant mature B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma.", "synonyms": "Small non-cleaved cell lymphoma, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "C83.7\u00a0 C91.8", "omim": "113970", "umls": "C0006413\u00a0 C0079770", "mesh": "D002051\u00a0 D008228", "gard": "4894\u00a0 5973", "meddra": "10006595\u00a0 10053518\u00a0 10067184", "epidemiology": "In Europe and north America it represents around half of all malignant non-Hodgkin lymphoma in children and around 2% in adults. Two incidence peaks occur: one in childhood/adolescence and the second after the age of 40 years. In Europe the standardized incidence ratio is 1/530,000 for individuals aged between 0 and 14 years and 1/670,000 for individuals aged between 15 and 19 years. Males are affected more than females.", "clinical_description": "Patients with HIV in whom antiviral treatment is ineffective are particularly susceptible to Burkitt lymphoma. Two forms of the disease exist: an `endemic' form (sub tropical Africa) linked to the Epstein Barr virus (EBV) that presents classically in the form of a maxillary tumor (an abdominal tumor is often present, particularly in older children), and a `sporadic' form not linked to EBV that develops mainly in the abdomen. Burkitt lymphoma can also develop in the ear, nose and throat and more rarely in other locations (orbit, kidney, bone). The tumor is very proliferative and secondarily invades the bone marrow (in about 35% of cases) and the central nervous system (in about 15% of cases). It has the appearance of tumoral meningitis or paralysis of the cranial nerves. Burkitt leukemia, with the clinical characteristics of other types of leukemia, is possible. The tumors develop from the digestive tract (mainly the intestine) and extend to the peritoneum and sometimes also the liver, pancreas, spleen, kidneys or ovaries. The most frequent clinical signs are abdominal pain, nausea, an alteration of general state and/or the appearance of lymph nodes and tumors.", "etiology": "In most cases Burkitt lymphoma is associated with a specific translocation t(8;14)(q24;q32) that juxtaposes the MYC/c-Myc gene (8q24) next to the heavy chain immunoglobulin gene (14q32). In rare cases the translocation affects chromosome 2 (kappa chain in immunoglobulins) or 22 (lambda chain in immunoglobulins). The cells express surface immunoglobulins and B differentiation markers (CD19, CD20). The proliferation index of the tumor is extremely high (Ki67 > 95%). EBV influences the genesis of the endemic form of Burkitt lymphoma but the mechanisms responsible are not well understood.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on biopsy of a mass, an effusion puncture or bone marrow that reveals the presence of tumor cells. The extent of the tumor can be evaluated using images (mainly ultrasound and scanning).", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include other forms of abdominal tumors in children (Wilms tumor and neuroblastomas, although these are retroperitoneal, and desmoplastic tumors; see these terms) and other types of lymphoma and leukemia of B and T precursors in cases with bone marrow involvement.", "management_and_treatment": "Management should be carried out in a specialist oncology/hematology centers. Treatment is with a few months of intensive chemotherapy. The efficacy of rituximab has not yet been proven but it is the subject of several clinical trials. Burkitt lymphoma constitutes a therapeutic emergency. The key to curing the disease is a combination of rapid and individualized management (particularly adapted to the frequent metabolic problems that occur at the start of treatment) and appropriate anti-tumor treatment.", "prognosis": "The current cure rate is in the order of 80-90% thanks to a difficult but relatively short treatment that is without long term sequelae."}, {"name": "Burning-Mouth-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Zungen- und Schleimhautbrennen", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare neurologic disease characterized by an unremitting bilateral symmetrical burning sensation of the oral mucosa without clinical evidence of causative lesions. It most frequently occurs in postmenopausal women and typically affects the tongue, less often the palate, lips, or buccal mucosa. It is often associated with dysgeusia and xerostomia.", "synonyms": "BMS, Oral dysesthesia, Orodynia, Stomatodynia, Stomatopyrosis, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "K14.6", "umls": "C0006430\u00a0 C2930806", "gard": "5974"}, {"name": "Burn-McKeown-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch beidseitige Choanalatresie mit charakteristischen fazialen Dysmorphien (abtehende Ohren, Hypertelorismus mit kurzen Lidspalten und Anomalien des \u00e4u\u00dferen Drittels der Unterlider). Es wurde bei 5 Kindern aus 3 Familien beschrieben. Bei 1 Fall kam es zur Hernienbildung in die Vorderkammer eines Auges, das enukleiert werden musste. Drei der Kinder hatten Herzscheidewand-Defekte, drei hatten einen H\u00f6rverlust und zwei eine einseitige Lippenspalte. Alle Kinder entwickelten sich psycho-motorisch normal. Zwar besteht eine erhebliche \u00dcberlappung der Symptome mit den Symptomen der CHARGE-Assoziation, die sehr auff\u00e4llige \u00c4hnlichkeit der f\u00fcnf beschriebenen Kinder untereinander legt aber die Annahme nahe, dass es sich um eine eigenst\u00e4ndige Entit\u00e4t handelt. Da in zwei der drei Familien Geschwister betroffen waren, wird das Syndrom wahrscheinlich durch einen Einzelgendefekt verursacht. Eine starker Kandidatenlocus liegt im distalen Teil von 18p oder 18q. Die Betreuung erfordert ein multidisziplin\u00e4res Team, eine H\u00f6rpr\u00fcfung ist erforderlich. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare multiple congenital anomaly syndrome characterized by bilateral choanal atresia associated with characteristic cranio-facial dysmorphisms (hypertelorism with narrow palpebral fissures, coloboma of inferior eyelid with presence of eyelashes medial to the defect, prominent nasal bridge, thin lips, prominent ears), that can be accompanied by hearing loss, unilateral cleft lip, preauricular tags, cardiac septal defects and anomalies of the kidneys. Affected individuals have normal intelligence.", "synonyms": "Choanal atresia-hearing loss-cardiac defects-craniofacial dysmorphism syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "608572\u00a0 616462", "umls": "C1837822", "mesh": "C537411", "gard": "10041", "epidemiology": "To date, approximately 20 families have been reported worldwide.", "clinical_description": "Affected individuals present with dysmorphic features from birth onwards. Bilateral choanal stenosis/atresia is potentially life threatening, and may present with respiratory distress at birth. Most patients have lower eyelid defects that can result in corneal exposure and drying. Hearing loss is frequently observed (70% of patients). Cleft lip/palate (approximately 60%) can be uni- or bilateral. Cardiac defects (approximately 30%) include persistent ductus arteriosus (PDA) and patent foramen ovale. Short stature is uncommon but when present is proportionate and mild. Intelligence is typically normal, although intellectual disability has been reported.", "etiology": "The disease is usually caused by a loss of function mutation in TXNL4A (18q23) on one allele and a promotor deletion of TXNL4A on the second allele. Only one family has been described with a homozygous promotor deletion. It is still unclear how reduced expression of this ubiquitously expressed spliceosome protein results in craniofacial defects during development. A few patients are associated with mutations in POLR1A (2p11.2).", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is suspected on clinical presentation and confirmed by sequencing of the promotor and coding region of TXNL4A.", "differential_diagnosis": "The features of this syndrome overlaps with those of the CHARGE and Treacher Collins syndromes.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Theoretically, prenatal diagnosis is possible if there is a positive family history. It is very unlikely that the diagnosis will be prenatally established without a positive family history.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Intubation is required for neonates presenting with respiratory distress. Surgery is required for choanal atresia. Multidisciplinary referral for evaluation of the possible ophthalmological, audiological, maxillofacial and cardiac anomalies is required. Hearing loss, eye and cardiac defects are managed according to routine procedures. The facial dysmorphism might warrant psychological therapy.", "prognosis": "Quality of life is reduced due to choanal atresia, hearing loss and facial dysmorphism. Life expectancy is not reduced."}, {"name": "Burton Skelettdysplasie", "sub_name": "Schwartz-Jampel-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Schwartz-Jampel-Syndrom (SJS) ist gekennzeichnet durch Myotonie und Knochen- und Gelenkanomalien. Bisher wurden in der Literatur etwa 100 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Die klinischen Symptome treten bald nach der Geburt auf. Die Myotonie f\u00fchrt zu einem charakteristischen Gesicht mit Blepharophimose und einem runzligen Gesichtsausdruck. Berichtet wurde auch \u00fcber tiefsitzende, malformierte Ohren und Mikrogenie. Wegen eingeschr\u00e4nkter Beweglichkeit der Gelenke haben die Patienten einen unsicheren Gang. Die Steifheit der Gelenke nimmt im Verlauf zu und erreicht in der Adoleszenz den H\u00f6hepunkt. H\u00e4ufige Symptome sind abgeflachte Wirbelk\u00f6rper, H\u00fcftdysplasie, gekr\u00fcmmte Diaphysen und unregelm\u00e4\u00dfige Epiphysen. Dazu kommen Kleinwuchs, Hirsutismus, Myopie und kleine Testes. Das Syndrom wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache des SJS sind Mutationen im HSPG2-Gen (1p36), das f\u00fcr Perlecan, eine Basalmembran- und Stromakomponente, kodiert. Die Myotonie wird elektromyographisch diagnostiziert, die Knochen-Knorpelanomalien radiologisch. Der Perlecan-Mangel wird immunzytochemisch in Haut- und Muskelbiopsien nachgewiesen. Differentialdiagnostisch ist an das St\u00fcve-Wiedemann-Syndrom (s. dort) zu denken, das sich vom SJS durch die Art der Skelettanomalien und durch die schwerere fr\u00fche Prognose unterscheidet. Auch an schwere Formen der kongenitalen Myotonie mit Chloridkanal-Mutationen und an die Myotonie mit Natriumkanal-Mutationen soll hierbei gedacht werden. Die Behandlung der Myotonie ist schwierig, in einigen Studien erwies sich Carbamazepin als hilfreich. Die Krankheit scheint nach der Adoleszenz einen stabilen Zustand zu erreichen. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic neuromuscular disease characterized by permanent myotonia, mask-like facies (with blepharospasm, narrow palpebral fissures, small mouth with pursed lips and puckered chin) , and chondrodysplasia (variably manifesting with short stature, pectus carinatum, kyphoscoliosis, bowing of long bones, epiphyseal, metaphyseal, and hip dysplasia).", "synonyms": "Aberfeld syndrome, Burton skeletal dysplasia, Burton syndrome, Catel-Hempel syndrome, Dysostosis enchondralis metaepiphysaria, Catel-Hempel type, Myotonic chondrodystrophy, Myotonic myopathy, dwarfism, chondrodystrophy, ocular and facial anomalies, Osteochondromuscular dystrophy, SJS, SJS1, Schwartz-Jampel syndrome type 1, Schwartz-Jampel-Aberfeld syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "G71.1\u00a0 Q78.8", "omim": "255800", "umls": "C0036391", "gard": "250", "epidemiology": "Approximately, 130 cases have been described in the literature to date.", "clinical_description": "Presentation is typically by 1 year to 2 years of age, but may occur earlier, with myotonia, maske-like facies, short stature, non-progressive muscle weakness, muscle hypertrophy, progressive restriction of range of motion and paucity of subcutaneous tissue. Facial features consist of blepharospasm, progressive blepharophimosis, pursed lips and a puckered chin. Micrognathia, low-set ears with folded helices and dystopia canthorum have also been reported. The myotonia is characterized by continuous muscle activity recorded on electroneuromyography. Limited joint mobility leads to an unsteady gait. Joint stiffness is progressive, reaching its peak during adolescence The severity of chondrodysplasia is variable and may consist of flattening of the vertebral bodies, hip dysplasia, metaphyseal widening, slender diaphyses, kypho-scoliosis, multiple joint contractures and bowing of long bones. Rarely, myopia, inguinal and umbilical hernias and micro-orchidism have been reported.", "etiology": "Loss of function mutations in HSPG2 (1p36) are causative. HSPG2  encodes perlecan, a major component of the cellular matrix that plays an important role in maintaining cartilaginous tissue integrity and regulating muscle excitability. The exact pathogenesis is unknown.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is established by demonstration of both myotonia via electromyography and chondrodysplasia via radiographs. Genetic testing may confirm diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Schwartz-Jampel syndrome (SJS) is non-allelic with Stuve-Wiedemann syndrome, a severe skeletal dysplasia that is typically fatal during the neonatal period and was formerly described as SJS type 2. Other differential diagnosis should include Freeman Sheldon and Marden Walker syndrome and, in cases with minimal skeletal abnormalities, myotonic disorders ( including myotonia congenita, myotonia permamens, and myotonic dystrophy).", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to affected families, informing them that the risk of disease transmission is 25% where both parents are unaffected carriers.", "management_and_treatment": "The management of patients with SJS is primarily supportive and best offered by a team comprising a neurologist, a geneticist, a physical therapist, an orthopedic surgeon, an ophthalmologist and a psychologist. Medical treatment with muscle relaxants and antiepileptic drugs, such as carbamazepine, phenytoin, or procainamide, aimed to alleviate myotonia has limited usage, although early initiation of treatment may limit the extent of disability. Physical therapy is important to prevent contracture formation and fixed skeletal deformity. Botulinum toxin A injections for blepharospasm has been reported with limited and variable results Rarely, surgical intervention is considered for blepharospasm including orbicularis oculi myectomy or levator aponeurosis resection improve functional and cosmetic outcome. Malignant hyperthermia is a potentially lethal complication of anesthesia.", "prognosis": "Progressively worsening blepharospasm is an important morbidity that can interfere with vision. The disease appears to stabilize after adolescence and does not affect life span."}, {"name": "Burton-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Schwartz-Jampel-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Schwartz-Jampel-Syndrom (SJS) ist gekennzeichnet durch Myotonie und Knochen- und Gelenkanomalien. Bisher wurden in der Literatur etwa 100 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Die klinischen Symptome treten bald nach der Geburt auf. Die Myotonie f\u00fchrt zu einem charakteristischen Gesicht mit Blepharophimose und einem runzligen Gesichtsausdruck. Berichtet wurde auch \u00fcber tiefsitzende, malformierte Ohren und Mikrogenie. Wegen eingeschr\u00e4nkter Beweglichkeit der Gelenke haben die Patienten einen unsicheren Gang. Die Steifheit der Gelenke nimmt im Verlauf zu und erreicht in der Adoleszenz den H\u00f6hepunkt. H\u00e4ufige Symptome sind abgeflachte Wirbelk\u00f6rper, H\u00fcftdysplasie, gekr\u00fcmmte Diaphysen und unregelm\u00e4\u00dfige Epiphysen. Dazu kommen Kleinwuchs, Hirsutismus, Myopie und kleine Testes. Das Syndrom wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache des SJS sind Mutationen im HSPG2-Gen (1p36), das f\u00fcr Perlecan, eine Basalmembran- und Stromakomponente, kodiert. Die Myotonie wird elektromyographisch diagnostiziert, die Knochen-Knorpelanomalien radiologisch. Der Perlecan-Mangel wird immunzytochemisch in Haut- und Muskelbiopsien nachgewiesen. Differentialdiagnostisch ist an das St\u00fcve-Wiedemann-Syndrom (s. dort) zu denken, das sich vom SJS durch die Art der Skelettanomalien und durch die schwerere fr\u00fche Prognose unterscheidet. Auch an schwere Formen der kongenitalen Myotonie mit Chloridkanal-Mutationen und an die Myotonie mit Natriumkanal-Mutationen soll hierbei gedacht werden. Die Behandlung der Myotonie ist schwierig, in einigen Studien erwies sich Carbamazepin als hilfreich. Die Krankheit scheint nach der Adoleszenz einen stabilen Zustand zu erreichen. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic neuromuscular disease characterized by permanent myotonia, mask-like facies (with blepharospasm, narrow palpebral fissures, small mouth with pursed lips and puckered chin) , and chondrodysplasia (variably manifesting with short stature, pectus carinatum, kyphoscoliosis, bowing of long bones, epiphyseal, metaphyseal, and hip dysplasia).", "synonyms": "Aberfeld syndrome, Burton skeletal dysplasia, Burton syndrome, Catel-Hempel syndrome, Dysostosis enchondralis metaepiphysaria, Catel-Hempel type, Myotonic chondrodystrophy, Myotonic myopathy, dwarfism, chondrodystrophy, ocular and facial anomalies, Osteochondromuscular dystrophy, SJS, SJS1, Schwartz-Jampel syndrome type 1, Schwartz-Jampel-Aberfeld syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "G71.1\u00a0 Q78.8", "omim": "255800", "umls": "C0036391", "gard": "250", "epidemiology": "Approximately, 130 cases have been described in the literature to date.", "clinical_description": "Presentation is typically by 1 year to 2 years of age, but may occur earlier, with myotonia, maske-like facies, short stature, non-progressive muscle weakness, muscle hypertrophy, progressive restriction of range of motion and paucity of subcutaneous tissue. Facial features consist of blepharospasm, progressive blepharophimosis, pursed lips and a puckered chin. Micrognathia, low-set ears with folded helices and dystopia canthorum have also been reported. The myotonia is characterized by continuous muscle activity recorded on electroneuromyography. Limited joint mobility leads to an unsteady gait. Joint stiffness is progressive, reaching its peak during adolescence The severity of chondrodysplasia is variable and may consist of flattening of the vertebral bodies, hip dysplasia, metaphyseal widening, slender diaphyses, kypho-scoliosis, multiple joint contractures and bowing of long bones. Rarely, myopia, inguinal and umbilical hernias and micro-orchidism have been reported.", "etiology": "Loss of function mutations in HSPG2 (1p36) are causative. HSPG2  encodes perlecan, a major component of the cellular matrix that plays an important role in maintaining cartilaginous tissue integrity and regulating muscle excitability. The exact pathogenesis is unknown.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is established by demonstration of both myotonia via electromyography and chondrodysplasia via radiographs. Genetic testing may confirm diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Schwartz-Jampel syndrome (SJS) is non-allelic with Stuve-Wiedemann syndrome, a severe skeletal dysplasia that is typically fatal during the neonatal period and was formerly described as SJS type 2. Other differential diagnosis should include Freeman Sheldon and Marden Walker syndrome and, in cases with minimal skeletal abnormalities, myotonic disorders ( including myotonia congenita, myotonia permamens, and myotonic dystrophy).", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to affected families, informing them that the risk of disease transmission is 25% where both parents are unaffected carriers.", "management_and_treatment": "The management of patients with SJS is primarily supportive and best offered by a team comprising a neurologist, a geneticist, a physical therapist, an orthopedic surgeon, an ophthalmologist and a psychologist. Medical treatment with muscle relaxants and antiepileptic drugs, such as carbamazepine, phenytoin, or procainamide, aimed to alleviate myotonia has limited usage, although early initiation of treatment may limit the extent of disability. Physical therapy is important to prevent contracture formation and fixed skeletal deformity. Botulinum toxin A injections for blepharospasm has been reported with limited and variable results Rarely, surgical intervention is considered for blepharospasm including orbicularis oculi myectomy or levator aponeurosis resection improve functional and cosmetic outcome. Malignant hyperthermia is a potentially lethal complication of anesthesia.", "prognosis": "Progressively worsening blepharospasm is an important morbidity that can interfere with vision. The disease appears to stabilize after adolescence and does not affect life span."}, {"name": "Buschke-Fischer-Brauer-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Palmoplantarkeratose, punktierte, Typ I", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die punktf\u00f6rmige Palmoplantarkeratose Typ I (PPKP1), auch bekannt als Buschke-Fischer-Brauer-Syndrom, ist eine sehr seltene erbliche Hauterkrankung, die durch eine unregelm\u00e4\u00dfig verteilte epidermale Hyperkeratose der Handfl\u00e4chen und Fu\u00dfsohlen gekennzeichnet ist und eine gro\u00dfe klinische Variabilit\u00e4t aufweist.", "synonyms": "Buschke-Fischer-Brauer-Syndrom, PPKP1, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "Q82.8", "OMIM": "148600\u00a0 614936", "GARD": "3103", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz von PPK1 wurde auf 1,17/100.000 in Kroatien und 3,3/100.000 in Slowenien gesch\u00e4tzt. Weltweit wurden bisher 35 Familien mit PPK1 gemeldet.", "clinical_description": "Typische klinische Merkmale sind multiple hyperkeratotische Papeln und zentrale Einbuchtungen, die unregelm\u00e4\u00dfig auf den Handfl\u00e4chen und Fu\u00dfsohlen verteilt sind. Die L\u00e4sionen entwickeln sich meist in der fr\u00fchen Adoleszenz, k\u00f6nnen aber auch sp\u00e4ter im Leben auftreten. Manchmal k\u00f6nnen zus\u00e4tzlich konfluierende Verdickungen an den Fu\u00dfsohlen beobachtet werden. Je nach klinischer Pr\u00e4sentation kann PPKP1 mit Schmerzen an Druckstellen, insbesondere an den Fu\u00dfsohlen, einhergehen. Die L\u00e4sionen k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber Druckstellen zusammenwachsen.", "etiology": "Urs\u00e4chlich f\u00fcr PPKP1 sind Mutationen im AAGAB-Gen (15q22.33-q23). Dieses Gen kodiert f\u00fcr das Alpha- und Gamma-Adaptin-bindende Protein p34, das am Clathrin-vermittelten Signalweg beteiligt ist und bei St\u00f6rung eine Erh\u00f6hung der Halbwertszeit mehrerer Rezeptortyrosinkinasen in basalen Keratinozyten verursacht, was zu Hyperproliferation und Hyperkeratose f\u00fchrt. In einigen asiatischen Patienten mit \u00e4hnlichen Ph\u00e4notyp wurden dar\u00fcber hinaus urs\u00e4chliche Mutationen im COL14A1-Gen (8q23) identifiziert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Mutationsanalyse des AAGAB-Gens und des COL14A1-Gens best\u00e4tigt die klinische Diagnose. Obwohl nicht spezifisch f\u00fcr PPKP1, zeigt die histologische Untersuchung der Papeln Hypergranulose und Hyperkeratose mit einer gut definierten zentralen epidermalen Depression.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Differentialdiagnose umfasst Verrucae vulgares und jede andere Form von Palmoplantarkeratosen (siehe diesen Begriff).", "genetic_counseling": "PPKP1 wird autosomal-dominant vererbt. Eine genetische Beratung ist m\u00f6glich.", "management_and_treatment": "Die mechanische Entfernung der Hyperkeratose ist die effektivste symptomatische Behandlung. Keratolytische Cremes k\u00f6nnen die Wirkung unterst\u00fctzen. Bei einigen Patienten mit schwerem Ph\u00e4notyp haben sich orale Retinoide als symptomlindernd erwiesen.", "prognosis": "Obwohl sich das klinische Erscheinungsbild mit der Zeit verschlechtern kann, ist die allgemeine Prognose gut. Je nach klinischem Schweregrad und Schmerzempfindlichkeit der Patienten kann die Lebensqualit\u00e4t beeintr\u00e4chtigt sein.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz von PPK1 wurde auf 1,17/100.000 in Kroatien und 3,3/100.000 in Slowenien gesch\u00e4tzt. Weltweit wurden bisher 35 Familien mit PPK1 gemeldet."}, {"name": "Buschke-Ollendorff-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Dermatofibrose, disseminierte, mit Osteopoikilose, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "Q78.8", "OMIM": "166700", "UMLS": "C0265514", "MeSH": "C537415", "GARD": "1044", "summary": "Das Buschke-Ollendorff-Syndrom (BOS) ist eine benigne Erkrankung mit Osteopoikilose des Skeletts ('fleckige Knochen') und bindegewebigen Naevi der Haut. Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1:20.000 gesch\u00e4tzt, verl\u00e4ssliche Zahlen sind nicht bekannt. Die Symptomatik kann in jedem Alter beginnen, die Auspr\u00e4gung der Symptome im Knochen und in der Haut ist unterschiedlich. R\u00f6ntgenologisches Zeichen der Osteopoikilose sind kleine runde Flecken mit erh\u00f6hter Knochendichte, die vor allem Bereich der Epiphysen der R\u00f6hrenknochen liegen. Diese Ver\u00e4nderungen sind harmlos und werden meist zuf\u00e4llig bei R\u00f6ntgenuntersuchungen aus anderem Grund gefunden, allerdings wurde bei einer Minderzahl der Patienten eine eingeschr\u00e4nkte Beweglichkeit von Gelenken beschrieben. Die Zahl der L\u00e4sionen schwankt von einigen wenigen bis zu vielen. Meist treten sie in Schulter, Ellenbogen, Handgelenk, Becken, Knie und Fu\u00dfgelenk auf. Die Hautl\u00e4sionen des BOS, bindegewebige Naevi, werden entweder als weit verstreute, hautfarbene bis gelbe kleine Papeln manifest oder als mehr lokalisierte gr\u00f6\u00dfere L\u00e4sionen, die man als 'gelbe Plaques' bezeichnet. In Familien mit BOS k\u00f6nnen betroffene Individuen sowohl Knochen- als auch Hautl\u00e4sionen oder aber nur eine dieser Ver\u00e4nderungen aufweisen. Bei einigen Betroffenen aus BOS-Familien wurde eine Melorheostose (s. dort) beschrieben. Das BOS wird autosomal-dominant vererbt. Ursache sind heterozygote Loss-of-function-Mutationen im LEMD3-Gen (12q14). Das Gen kodiert f\u00fcr ein Protein der inneren Kernmembran, das mit der BMP- und der TGF-beta-Signalkette interagiert. Zur Diagnose des BOS f\u00fchren die histologische Analyse der Hautl\u00e4sionen und die R\u00f6ntgenuntersuchung des Skeletts. Die Histologie der Hautl\u00e4sionen ist gekennzeichnet durch unterschiedlich stark ausgepr\u00e4gte Bindegewebsanomalien. Betroffen sind hierbei vor allem die Kollagenfasern und die elastischen Fasern. Die Kollagenb\u00fcndel k\u00f6nnen verdickt und verbreitert sein. Die elastischen Fasern sind vermehrt, unregelm\u00e4\u00dfig oder fragmentiert, aber, anders als beim Pseudoxanthoma elasticum (s. dort), nicht kalzifiziert. In j\u00fcngerem Alter k\u00f6nnen die Knochenl\u00e4sionen selten sein und werden dann evtl. \u00fcbersehen. Die elektronenmikroskopische Untersuchung der Knochenl\u00e4sionen zeigt Herde mit vermehrten und leicht verdickten Trabekeln. Diese Herde m\u00fcssen von der Melorheostose und sklerotischen Knochenmetastasen differenziert werden. Eine Osteopoikilose kann auch als isolierter Befund bei Individuen ohne Familiengeschichte von BOS auftreten. Weiterhin kann sie zusammen mit anderen sklerosierenden Dysplasien und als Symptom des 12q14-Mikrodeletions-Syndroms (s. dort) auftreten. Die korrekte Diagnose des BOS ist wichtig, um unn\u00f6tige Untersuchungen und Therapien zu vermeiden, denn die Knochen- und Hautl\u00e4sionen des BOS verursachen im allgemeinen keine Beschwerden. Die Patienten haben entsprechend eine gute Prognose."}, {"name": "Butyrylcholinesterase-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Pseudocholinesterase-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "E88.8", "OMIM": "617936", "UMLS": "C1283400", "MeSH": "C537417", "GARD": "7482", "summary": "Der Butyrylcholinesterase (BChE)-Mangel ist ein Stoffwechseldefekt, der nach Anwendung einiger bei der Anaesthesie verwendeter Medikamente, z.B. der Muskelrelaxantien Succinylcholin oder Mivacurium und gewisser Lokalan\u00e4sthetika (z.B. Procain), zu verl\u00e4ngerter Apnoe f\u00fchrt. Die Dauer der Apnoe variiert abh\u00e4ngig vom Ausma\u00df des Enzymdefektes erheblich. Die Pr\u00e4valenz des BChE-Mangels ist am h\u00f6chsten bei Menschen europ\u00e4ischer Herkunft: Zwischen 3,4 und 4% der Bev\u00f6lkerung haben haben einen partiellen Mangel, der zu leicht verl\u00e4ngerter Apnoe (5 Minuten bis 1 Stunde) f\u00fchrt. Eines von etwa 2.500 Individuen hat eine auf mehr als 1 Stunde verl\u00e4ngerte Apnoe. Bei BChE-Aktivit\u00e4ten unterhalb der Nachweisgrenze dauern die Apnoen mehr als 8 Stunden. Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser schwersten Form wird auf 1:100.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. - Der BChE-Mangel hat erbliche und nicht-erbliche Ursachen. Der genetisch bedingte Mangel, mit Mutationen im BCHE-Gen, wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Das Gen, in dem viele atypische Varianten identifiziert wurden, liegt im E1-Locus in der Chromosomenregion 3q26.1-q26.2. Ein nicht-erblicher BChE-Mangel mit erh\u00f6hter Sensitivit\u00e4t gg\u00fc. den o.g. Medikamenten kann sich in der Schwangerschaft, bei Neugeborenen oder auch z.B. bei chronischen Infektionen, Mangelern\u00e4hrung, Lebererkrankungen und Malignomen manifestieren. Die Diagnose erfolgt durch Messung der Enzymaktivit\u00e4t im Plasma, in Kombination mit dem Dibucain- und Fluorid-Hemmtest. Eine DNA-Analyse wird nicht routinem\u00e4\u00dfig durchgef\u00fchrt, erm\u00f6glicht aber die Erkennung von Heterozygoten mit atypischen Allelen. Ohne Exposition mit den genannten Medikamenten haben die Betroffenen keine Symptome. Bei verl\u00e4ngerter Apnoe nach An\u00e4sthesie ist k\u00fcnstliche Beatmung erforderlich, bis das Medikament abgebaut ist und die neuromuskul\u00e4re Funktion sich normalisiert hat. "}, {"name": "bv-FTD", "sub_name": "Verhaltensvariante der frontotemporalen Demenz", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Behavioral variant of frontotemporal dementia (bv-FTD) is a form of frontotemporal dementia (FTD; see this term), characterized by progressive behavioral impairment and a decline in executive function with frontal lobe-predominant atrophy.", "synonyms": "bv-FTD, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G31.0", "omim": "172700\u00a0 600274\u00a0 600795\u00a0 616437\u00a0 619132"}, {"name": "BVMD", "sub_name": "Best vitelliforme Makuladegeneration", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Best Vitelliforme Makuladegeneration (BVMD) ist eine genetisch bedingte Makuladegeneration mit Verlust der zentralen Sehkraft, Metamorphopsie (ver\u00e4nderte Wahrnehmung von Gegenst\u00e4nden) und vermindertem Arden-Verh\u00e4ltnis im Elektrookulogramm. Ursache ist eine eigelb-\u00e4hnliche L\u00e4sion der Fovea und ihrer Umgebung.", "synonyms": "BMD, BVMD, Best Makuladegeneration, Best-Krankheit, Dystrophia vitelliformis, Fr\u00fch beginnende vitelliforme Makuladystrophie, Juvenile vitelliforme Makuladystrophie, Makuladegeneration, vitelliforme, Typ 2, Polymorpe vitelline Makuladegeneration, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "H35.5", "OMIM": "153700", "UMLS": "C0339510\u00a0 C2745945", "GARD": "182", "epidemiology": "Sch\u00e4tzungen der Pr\u00e4valenz liegen zwischen 1:5.000 in Nordschweden und 1:67.000 in D\u00e4nemark. Das m\u00e4nnliche Geschlecht ist h\u00e4ufiger betroffen (m:w = 3:1).", "clinical_description": "Die BVMD beginnt im Kindesalter, manchmal auch erst sp\u00e4ter (5-13 Jahre). Bei Geburt ist der Visus noch normal. Die BVMD schreitet in mehreren Stadien fort: Stadium 1:Asymptomatische pr\u00e4vitelliforme Phase; Stadium 2: Bildung einer dotter-gelben (vitelliformen) L\u00e4sion in der Makula; Stadium 2a: Der Inhalt der Fovea wird weniger homogen ('R\u00fchrei-artig'); Stadium 3 (Pseudo-Hypopyon): Die vitelliforme Substanz in der L\u00e4sion wird fl\u00fcssig. Schlie\u00dflich l\u00f6st sich die L\u00e4sion auf und hinterl\u00e4sst eine Narbe, wodurch der zentrale Visus verloren geht (20/200). Weiter kompliziert wird dieser Verlauf durch eine subfoveale choroidale neovaskul\u00e4re (CNV) Membran (bei Kindern selten). M\u00f6gliche Symptome sind gest\u00f6rte Unterscheidung von Farben (vor allem der Protanachse) und Metamorphopsie. Der periphere Visus und die Dunkeladaptation bleiben erhalten. Einige Mutationstr\u00e4ger bleiben symptomfrei.", "etiology": "Die BVMD ist gekennzeichnet durch Atrophie des Pigmentepithels der Netzhaut (RPE) mit gest\u00f6rtem zentralen Visus. In den meisten F\u00e4llen ist die BVMD verursacht dirch Mutationen im BEST1-Gen (11q12). Es kodiert f\u00fcr Bestrophin-1, einen im RPE exprimierten Chlorid-Kanal. Der Defekt dieses Proteins f\u00fchrt im Gefolge des gest\u00f6rten Ionenaustausches zur Ablagerung von Lipofuszin.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren Familienanamnese, Testung der Sehsch\u00e4rfe und Inspektion des Augenhintergrundes (mit Nachweis gelber, runder Ablagerungen von Lipofuszin im Zentrum der Makula). Das Vollfeld-Elektroretinogramm (ERG) ist normal. Im Elektrookulogramm (EOG) wird das Ruhepotential des Auges durch Bestimmung des Arden-Quotienten (AR: Verh\u00e4ltnis Lichtpeak/Dunkelminimum; normal \u22651.8) gekennzeichnet. Bei BVMD ist der AR in der Regel vermindert (1.0-1.3). Durch hochaufl\u00f6sende optische Koh\u00e4renztomographie kann die abnorme Ablagerung von Lipofuszin zwischen den Photorezeptoren und dem RPE nachgewiesen werden. Durch Mutationsanalyse im BEST1-Gen wird die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen der BVMD sind die Foveo-makul\u00e4re vitelliforme Dystrophie mit Beginn im Erwachsenenalter, die Altersabh\u00e4ngige Makuladegeneration, die autosomal-rezessive Bestrophinopathie, die autosomal-dominante Vitreo-retino-choroidopathie, Retinitis pigmentosa (s. diese Termini) und die Ochsenaugen-Makulopathie.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Pr\u00e4nataldiagnose und Pr\u00e4implantationsdiagnostik sind m\u00f6glich, wenn in der Familie die urs\u00e4chliche Mutation bekannt ist.", "genetic_counseling": "Die BVMD wird autosomal-dominant mit vollst\u00e4ndiger Penetranz vererbt. Erkrankungsalter und Ausma\u00df des Visusverlustes variieren innerhalb und zwischen den Familien.", "management_and_treatment": "Teil der symptomatischen Behandlung sind Sehhilfen bei signifikant eingeschr\u00e4nktem Visus. F\u00fcr Patienten aller Altersstufen werden j\u00e4hrliche ophthalmologische Kontrollen empfohlen. Tabakkonsum soll vermieden werden, da er das Risiko f\u00fcr neovaskul\u00e4re Makuladegeneration erh\u00f6ht. Optionen f\u00fcr die Behandlung einer CNV sind: Photodynamische Therapie mit Verteporfin, direkte Laser-Photokoagulation oder Anti-VEGF-Agentien (Bevacizumab). Eine Behandlungsart der BVMD ist die trans-korneale elekrische Retina-Stimulation.", "prognosis": "Die BVMD kann bis zu geographischer Atrophie fortschreiten und ist in einigen F\u00e4llen durch die Entwicklung einer CNV kompliziert. 7-9% der Patienten erfahren keinen Visusverlust aber haben bei normalem ERG ein ver\u00e4ndertes EOG.", "summary": "Sch\u00e4tzungen der Pr\u00e4valenz liegen zwischen 1:5.000 in Nordschweden und 1:67.000 in D\u00e4nemark. Das m\u00e4nnliche Geschlecht ist h\u00e4ufiger betroffen (m:w = 3:1)."}, {"name": "B-Vorl\u00e4uferzell-Leuk\u00e4mie/Lymphom, akut lymphoblastisch", "sub_name": "Lymphoblastische B-Vorl\u00e4uferzell-Leuk\u00e4mie, akute", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare acute lymphoblastic leukemia characterized by infiltration of bone marrow and peripheral blood by small to medium-sized blast cells typically positive for the B-cell markers CD19, cCD79a, and cCD22. Predilection sites for extramedullary involvement are the central nervous system, lymph nodes, spleen, liver, and testes. Patients present with evidence of bone marrow failure (i. e. thrombocytopenia, anemia, and/or neutropenia) and variable leukocyte count, as well as lymphadenopathy, hepatomegaly, splenomegaly, bone pain, and arthralgias.", "synonyms": "B-ALL, Precursor B-cell acute lymphoblastic leukemia/lymphoma, Precursor B-cell acute lymphocytic leukemia, Precursor B-cell acute lymphocytic leukemia/lymphoma, ", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "C83.5\u00a0 C91.0", "omim": "615545", "umls": "C0006413\u00a0 C1292769"}, {"name": "BWCFF", "sub_name": "Baraitser-Winter zerebro-fronto-faziales Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Baraitser-Winter-Syndrom (BWS) ist ein Fehlbildungssyndrom. Charakteristische Zeichen sind faziale Dysmorphien (metopische Leiste, Hypertelorismus mit Ptose, breite kolbige Nase, geschwungene Augenbrauen, zunehmende Vergr\u00f6berung des Gesichtes), okul\u00e4res Kolobom, Pachygyrie und/oder Band-Heterotopien mit antero-posteriorem Gradienten, fortschreitende Versteifung der Gelenke und intellektuelles Defizit unterschiedlichen Ausma\u00dfes, oft mit schwerer Epilepsie. Das Fryns-Aftimos-Syndrom (FAS) bezeichnet das Erscheinungsbild des BWS bei \u00e4lteren Patienten.", "synonyms": "BWCFF, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.0", "OMIM": "243310\u00a0 614583", "UMLS": "C1855722", "GARD": "5279", "epidemiology": "BWS und FAS wurden anf\u00e4nglich f\u00fcr unterschiedliche Entit\u00e4ten gehalten. Sie wurden bisher bei etwa 30 nicht miteinander verwandten Patienten beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Das klinische Bild umfasst sehr auff\u00e4llige Dysmorphien: Eine metopische Leiste, die dem Sch\u00e4del ein trigonozephales Aussehen verleiht, Hypertelorismus, lange und breite, schr\u00e4g abw\u00e4rts verlaufende Lidspalten, kongenitale Ptose, hoch gebogene Augenbrauen, gro\u00dfe Nase mit gro\u00dfer kolbige oder flacher Spitze, prominente Nasenwurzel, langes Philtrum und leichte Mikrogenie. Die Gesichtsz\u00fcge vergr\u00f6bern sich im sp\u00e4ten Kindesalter und in der Adoleszenz mit ausgepr\u00e4gten Nasenfalten. Lippen- und Gaumenspalte sind m\u00f6gliche Symptome. H\u00e4ufig bestehen Augenanomalien, wie Iris- und/oder Netzhautkolobom mit oder ohne Mikrophthalmie. Bei den meisten Patienten wird eine gewisse Dysplasie der Hirnrinde, Pachygyrie (oft im Frontalhirn st\u00e4rker ausgepr\u00e4gt) und subkortikale Band-Heterotopien. In schweren F\u00e4llen hat das Gehirn oft ein lissenzephales Aussehen, aber andere Patienten haben ein normales MRI. Der Kopfumfang entwickelt sich im Kleinkindalter in Richtung auf eine Mikrozephalie. Das Wachstum ist leicht verz\u00f6gert, die Endgr\u00f6\u00dfe ist unternormal. Patienten mit Hydronephrose wurden beschrieben, Fehlbildungen der inneren Organe sind jedoch selten. Der Grad der geistigen Behinderung reicht von leicht bis sehr schwer und korreliert mit dem Schweregrad der Hirnanomalien und dem Vorhandensein einer (nicht selten therapieresistenten) Krampfneigung. Im Kleinkindalter bestimmen die neurologischen Probleme das klinische Bild, w\u00e4hrend die fazialen Dysmorphien weniger im Vordergrund stehen. In der Adoleszenz kommt es in den gro\u00dfen Gelenken (Knie, Schulter, Ellenbogen) zu eingeschr\u00e4nkter Beweglichkeit, gefolgt von Gangst\u00f6rungen im Erwachsenenalter. Auch eine Kyphoskoliose kann sich entwickeln.", "etiology": "Das BWS ist genetisch heterogen. Es wird verursacht durch heterozygote Mutationenen in einem der 2 Gene, die f\u00fcr ubiquit\u00e4r exprimierte Aktine kodieren: Das ACTB-Gen (7p22; Locus BRWS1) und das ACTG1-Gen (17q25; Locus BRWS2). Alle Mutationen sind Missense-Mutationen mit wahrscheinlich konstitutiver Genaktivit\u00e4t ('gain of function'-Mechanismus), da Deletionen der gleichen Gene nicht zum BWS-Ph\u00e4notyp f\u00fchren.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose wird durch Mutationsnachweis in den Genen ACTG1 und ACTB best\u00e4tigt.", "differential_diagnosis": "Im Kleinkindalter kann das BWS dem nun Noonan-Syndrom \u00e4hneln (siehe dort). Beim Typ Teebi des Hypertelorismus (siehe dort) sehen die Lidspalten \u00e4hnlich aus. CHARGE-Syndrom, der Typ Norman-Roberts des Lissenzephalie-Syndroms und andere Syndrome mit Lissenzephalie/Pachygyrie (siehe diese Termini) \u00fcberlappen teilweise das klinische Bild des BWS.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Das abnorme Gyrierungs-Muster kann pr\u00e4natal erkannt werden. Das Wiederholungsrisiko des BWS wird auf <1% gesch\u00e4tzt. Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik ist m\u00f6glich, es m\u00fcssen jedoch vorher das niedrige Wiederholungsrisiko und das Risiko einer Fehlgeburt diskutiert werden.", "genetic_counseling": "Alle molekular best\u00e4tigten F\u00e4lle waren sporadisch. Theoretisch ist autosomal-dominante Vererbung m\u00f6glich, wurde bisher jedoch nicht beobachtet.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung erfordert angemessene p\u00e4dagogische Ma\u00dfnahmen. Die Behandlung der Epilepsie ist, wie auch bei anderen Pachygyrie-Formen, schwierig. Einige Patienten sind sogar gegen Kombinationstherapien resistent. Orthop\u00e4dische Versorgung ist unerl\u00e4sslich, da die zunehmende Versteifung der Gelenke zum Verlust der autonomen Gehf\u00e4higkeit f\u00fchren kann.", "prognosis": "Einige Patienten mit schweren Hirnanomalien haben in fr\u00fchem Alter eine ung\u00fcnstige Prognose. Die meisten Patienten mit leichteren ZNS-Anomalien k\u00f6nnen das Erwachsenenalter erreichen, werden aber nie autonom.", "summary": "BWS und FAS wurden anf\u00e4nglich f\u00fcr unterschiedliche Entit\u00e4ten gehalten. Sie wurden bisher bei etwa 30 nicht miteinander verwandten Patienten beschrieben."}, {"name": "BWS", "sub_name": "Beckwith-Wiedemann-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Beckwith-Wiedemann-Syndrom (BWS) ist eine genetische Erkrankung mit Gro\u00dfwuchs, Tumor-Pr\u00e4disposition und angeborenen Fehlbildungen.", "synonyms": "BWS, Exomphalos - Makroglossie - Gigantismus, Wiedemann-Beckwith-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Unbekannt\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q87.3", "OMIM": "130650", "UMLS": "C0004903", "MeSH": "D001506", "GARD": "3343", "MedDRA": "10050344", "epidemiology": "Die Krankheit tritt in allen Ethnien auf, ihre Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1:13.700 gesch\u00e4tzt. Sie ist in beiden Geschlechtern gleich h\u00e4ufig, nur bei eineiigen Zwillingen \u00fcberwiegt das weibliche Geschlecht.", "clinical_description": "In der zweiten H\u00e4lfte der Schwangerschaft und in den ersten Lebensjahren wachsen die Patienten beschleunigt, w\u00e4hrend die typische Erwachsenengr\u00f6\u00dfe im Normalbereich liegt. M\u00f6gliche Zeichen abnormen Wachstums sind auch Hemihyperplasie und/oder Makroglossie (die zu Schwierigkeiten beim F\u00fcttern und Sprechen und, seltener, zu Schlafapnoe f\u00fchrt). Bei 30-50 % der Neugeborenen besteht eine Hypoglyk\u00e4mie. H\u00e4ufig bestehen erkennbare Gesichtsz\u00fcge, die sich im Erwachsenenalter oft normalisieren. Charakteristische Befunde sind, neben Makrosomie, Makroglossie, Hemihyperplasie und Hypoglyk\u00e4mie, Omphalozele/Nabelhernie/Rektusdiastase, embryonaler Tumor, Furche(n) an der Vorderseite der Ohrl\u00e4ppchen und Gr\u00fcbchen an der hinteren Helix, Naevus flammeus oder andere Gef\u00e4\u00dffehlbildungen, Viszeromegalie der Bauchorgane, fetale adrenokortikale Zytomegalie (pathognomonisch), Nierenfehlbildungen, positive Familienanamnese und, selten, Gaumenspalte. Herzfehler werden bei 9-34 % der F\u00e4lle gefunden, und etwa die H\u00e4lfte von diesen hat eine sich spontan zur\u00fcckbildende Kardiomegalie. Eine Kardiomyopathie ist selten. Die Patienten haben ein hohes Risiko f\u00fcr das Auftreten b\u00f6sartiger embryonaler Tumoren, besonders in den ersten 8 Lebensjahren, wenn das Risiko 7,5 % (Bereich 4-21 %) betr\u00e4gt.", "etiology": "Ursache des BWS sind verschiedene epigenetische und/oder genetische Ver\u00e4nderungen, mit gest\u00f6rter Regulation von genomisch gepr\u00e4gten (imprint) Genen auf Chromosom 11p15.5. Die Krankheit tritt sporadisch in 85 % und famili\u00e4r in 15 % auf. Molekulare Untergruppen sind mit unterschiedlichen Wiederholungsrisiken und unterschiedlichen klinischen Befunden verbunden.", "diagnostic_methods": "In der Regel wird die Diagnose durch das Vorhandensein von mindestens drei charakteristischen klinischen Befunden gest\u00fctzt, aber embryonale Tumoren treten auch bei milden Verl\u00e4ufen auf. Positive molekulare Befunde k\u00f6nnen die Diagnose best\u00e4tigen; negative Ergebnisse schlie\u00dfen aber ein BWS nicht aus.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind Simpson-Golabi-Behmel-, Costello-, Perlman- und Sotos-Syndrom und die MPS Typ VI.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik durch Chorionzottenbiopsie oder Amniozentese kann angeboten werden, besonders wenn eine zytogenetische oder genomische Ver\u00e4nderung identifiziert wurde. Ver\u00e4nderungen der Methylierung sind z. Zt. verl\u00e4sslicher nach Amniozentese nachzuweisen. Eine Amniozentese ist eventuell auch indiziert, wenn im fetalen Ultraschall BWS-assoziierte Befunde (z. B. fetale Omphalozele) erhoben wurden. Wenn der molekulare Defekt nicht bekannt ist, dienen die Messung des Alpha-Feto-Proteins im m\u00fctterlichen Serum und die gezielte Ultraschalluntersuchung als Suchtest.", "genetic_counseling": "Im Rahmen einer genetischen Beratung wird das Wiederholungsrisiko abgesch\u00e4tzt.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Patienten werden standardgem\u00e4\u00df mit unterst\u00fctzend medizinischen und chirurgischen Verfahren versorgt. Wenn ein BWS vermutet/diagnostiziert wird, soll mit der Tumor\u00fcberwachung begonnen werden, auch bei einem klinisch nicht betroffenen eineiigen Zwilling eines Patienten. Zu diesem Zeitpunkt sollen Genotyp/Ph\u00e4notyp-Korrelationen f\u00fcr diesen Zweck unber\u00fccksichtigt bleiben. Bei verd\u00e4chtigen oder diagnostischen pr\u00e4natalen Befunden soll in der Neugeborenenzeit regelm\u00e4\u00dfig auf m\u00f6gliche Hypoglyk\u00e4mie untersucht werden. In gleicher Weise soll bei klinisch nicht betroffenen Neugeborenen verfahren werden, die nach der Familienanamnese ein erh\u00f6htes Risiko tragen.", "prognosis": "Am schweren Ende des klinischen Spektrums tragen die Patienten das Risiko f\u00fcr einen fr\u00fchen Tod im Gefolge der Komplikationen, die aus Hypoglyk\u00e4mie, Fr\u00fchgeburtlichkeit, Kardiomyopathie, Makroglossie oder Tumoren resultieren. Patienten, die das Kindesalter \u00fcberleben, haben in der Regel eine gute Prognose.", "summary": "Die Krankheit tritt in allen Ethnien auf, ihre Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1:13.700 gesch\u00e4tzt. Sie ist in beiden Geschlechtern gleich h\u00e4ufig, nur bei eineiigen Zwillingen \u00fcberwiegt das weibliche Geschlecht."}, {"name": "B-Zell-Expansion mit NF-kB- und T-Zell-Anergie-Krankheit", "sub_name": "BENTA-Krankheit", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare primary immunodeficiency characterized by infantile onset of generalized lymphadenopathy, splenomegaly, and lymphocytosis, with excessive polyclonal expansion of B-cells. Patients present recurrent infections and impaired T-cell and antibody responses, while overt autoimmune manifestations are usually absent. Occurrence of B-cell malignancy later in life has been reported.", "synonyms": "B-cell expansion with NF-kB and T-cell anergy disease, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "D81.8", "omim": "616452"}, {"name": "B-Zell-Immundefekt-Extremit\u00e4tenanomalien-urogenitale Fehlbildungen-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "BILU-Syndrom, Hoffman-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "B-Zell-Leuk\u00e4mie, chronische lymphatische", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "B-cell chronic lymphocytic leukemia (B-CLL) is a type of B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma (see this term), and the most common form of leukemia in Western countries, affecting elderly adults (mean age of 67 and 72 years) with a slight male predominance (1.7:1), and characterized by a highly variable clinical presentation that can include asymptomatic disease or non-specific B-symptoms such as unintentional weight loss, severe fatigue, fever (without evidence of infection), and night sweats as well as cervical lymphadenopathy, splenomegaly and frequent infections. Some patients can also develop autoimmune complications such as autoimmune hemolytic anemia or immune thrombocytopenia (see these terms). The clinical course is extremely heterogeneous with survival ranging from a few months to several decades.", "synonyms": "B-CLL, B-cell chronic lymphoid leukemia, Small lymphocytic lymphoma, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Multigenic/multifactorial\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "C91.1", "omim": "109543\u00a0 151400\u00a0 609630\u00a0 612557\u00a0 612558\u00a0 612559", "umls": "C0023434\u00a0 C0855095\u00a0 C1868683", "mesh": "D015451", "gard": "8227", "meddra": "10008958"}, {"name": "B-Zell-Lymphom der roten Pulpa, diffuses splenisches", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das diffuse kleine B-Zell-Lymphom der Milz ist ein seltenes, indolentes B-Zell-Non-Hodgkin-Lymphom, das durch eine abnorme Proliferation kleiner, monomorpher, basophiler B-Lymphozyten mit vill\u00f6sem Zytoplasma in der roten Pulpa der Milz, im Knochenmark und im peripheren Blut gekennzeichnet ist. Sie pr\u00e4sentiert sich typischerweise in den sp\u00e4ten klinischen Stadien mit Splenomegalie und moderater Lymphozytose. Zytopenien sind selten und sind vermutlich mit Hypersplenismus assoziiert.", "synonyms": "SDRPL, Splenisches diffuses kleinzelliges B-Zell-Lymphom der roten Pulpa, ", "ICD-10": "C83.0"}, {"name": "B-Zell-Lymphom, diffuses gro\u00dfzelliges", "german_description": "Die prim\u00e4ren diffusen gro\u00dfzelligen B-Zell-Lymphome (DLB-CL) sind aggressive Tumoren und machen etwa 40% der B-Zell-Malignome aus. Das DLB-CL ist meist aus einer Mischung von zentroblast- und immunoblastartigen Zellen zusammengesetzt. Diese Zellen exprimieren in typischen F\u00e4llen die B-Zell-Marker CD19, CD20 und CD22, sowie das Oberfl\u00e4chen-Immunglobulin (sIg). Die DLB-CL sind klinisch und genetisch heterogene Tumoren. Durch die h\u00e4ufig wiederkehrenden chromosomalen Translokationen t(3;14), t(8;14) und t(14;18) werden genetische Untergruppen charakterisiert, die zusammen etwa 50% der DLB-CL ausmachen. Dennoch sind die genetischen Grundlagen der klinischen Heterogenit\u00e4t der DLB-CL nur z.T. bekannt. Das Erkrankungsalter liegt im Mittel im 6. Lebensjahrzehnt, streut aber weit, auch Kinder k\u00f6nnen erkranken. Die Patienten kommen mit 1 oder mehreren rasch wachsenden, Beschwerden bereitenden Tumoren im Bereich der Lymphknoten oder in anderen Bereichen. Bis zu 40% der Tumore sind extranodal. Die h\u00e4ufigste extranodale Lokalistion ist der Magen, obwohl die meisten prim\u00e4ren Lymphome des ZNS, der Knochen, Nieren und Testes ebenfalls DLB-CL sind. Mit der Standardtherapie werden etwa 40% geheilt. Aber 50% der Patienten haben nach der Behandlung Rezidive, an deren Folgen sie sterben. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Diffuse large B-cell lymphoma is the most common subtype of non-Hodgkin lymphoma (NHL; see this term) in adults characterized by a median age of presentation in the sixth decade of life (but also rarely occurring in adolescents and children) with the initial presentation being single or multiple rapidly growing masses (that may or may not be painful) in nodal or extranodal sites (such as thyroid, skin, breast, gastrointestinal tract, testes, bone, or brain) and that can be accompanied by symptoms of fever, night sweats and weight loss. DLBCL has an aggressive disease course, with the elderly having a poorer prognosis than younger patients, and with relapses being common.", "synonyms": "DLBCL, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Multigenic/multifactorial\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "C83.3", "umls": "C0079744", "mesh": "D016403", "gard": "3178", "meddra": "10012818"}, {"name": "B-Zell-Lymphom, diffuses gro\u00dfzelliges, mit chronischer Entz\u00fcndung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das diffuse gro\u00dfzellige B-Zell-Lymphom mit chronischer Entz\u00fcndung ist eine Epstein-Barr-Virus-assoziierte maligne lymphoproliferative Erkrankung, die sich im Zusammenhang mit langj\u00e4hrigen oder langsam wachsenden, chronisch entz\u00fcndlichen L\u00e4sionen entwickelt, wie z. B. chronisches Pleuraempyem, metallische Implantate in Knochen und Gelenken, chronische Osteomyelitis, chronische ven\u00f6se Ulzera oder, selten, granulomat\u00f6se Entz\u00fcndungen. Der Tumor ist meist prim\u00e4r lokalisiert, ohne Beteiligung anderer Organe.", "synonyms": "DLBCL bei chronischer Entz\u00fcndung, ", "ICD-10": "C83.3"}, {"name": "B-Zell-Lymphom, diffuses gro\u00dfzelliges, prim\u00e4r kutanes, vom leg Typ", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, aggressive, primary cutaneous B-cell lymphoma characterized by rapidly progressive, red to bluish, often ulcerating, nodular tumors predominantly involving the lower legs. Histology shows sheets of centroblasts and immunoblasts that spare the epidermis, but infiltrate the dermis and subcutaneous tissues, and often disseminate extracutaneously. The neoplastic cells typically express CD20, CD79a, Bcl-2, MUM-1, and FOXP1, but are negative for CD10.", "synonyms": "PCDLBCL,LT, ", "icd_10": "C83.3"}, {"name": "B-Zell-Lymphom, gro\u00dfzelliges, ALK+", "sub_name": "ALK-positives gro\u00dfzelliges B-Zell-Lymphom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A very rare variant of diffuse large B-cell lymphoma (DLBCL) mainly affecting middle-aged immunocompetent men and characterized by a consistent primary involvement of lymph nodes (mainly in the cervical and mediastinum lymph nodes) and with infrequent extra nodal involvement of the bone marrow and other extra-nodal sites (head and neck region, liver, spleen, and gastrointestinal tract). It has an aggressive disease course, and is associated with a poor prognosis.", "synonyms": "ALK+ LBCL, ALK+ large B-cell lymphoma, ", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0or\u00a0Multigenic/multifactorial\u00a0", "icd_10": "C83.3"}, {"name": "B-Zell-Lymphom, gro\u00dfzelliges, prim\u00e4r mediastinales", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Primary mediastinal B-cell lymphoma (PMBL) is a rare subtype of diffuse large B-cell lymphoma (DLBCL; see this term), arising from B cells of thymic origin, that affects mainly women between the ages of 20-30, that usually presents with a bulky and rapidly expanding anterior mediastinal mass, often with pleural and pericardial effusions, and that can invade the lungs, superior vena cava, pleura, pericardium, and chest wall, leading to manifestations of cough, dyspnea, and superior vena cava syndrome.", "synonyms": "Large cell lymphoma of the mediastinum, Med-DLBCL, Mediastinal diffuse large-cell lymphoma with sclerosis, Primary mediastinal clear cell lymphoma of B-cell type, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Multigenic/multifactorial\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "C83.3", "umls": "C0855152\u00a0 C1292754", "meddra": "10036710"}, {"name": "B-Zell-Lymphom, intravaskul\u00e4res gro\u00dfzelliges", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Intravascular large B-cell lymphoma (IVLBCL) is a very rare form of diffuse large B-cell lymphoma (see this term) characterized by the selective growth of lymphoma cells within the lumina of small blood vessels (especially the capillaries) that most often presents with a wide range of clinical manifestations (as potentially any tissue can be involved), with patients from Western countries more frequently manifesting with neurological and cutaneous symptoms while patients from Asian countries more frequently displaying hepatosplenomegaly and thrombocytopenia. IVLBCL is characterized by an absence of lymphadenopathy, an aggressive clinical course and a poor prognosis.", "synonyms": "Angioendotheliomatosis proliferans systemisata, Angiotropic large cell lymphoma, Intravascular lymphomatosis, Malignant angioendotheliomatosis, Tappeiner-Pfleger disease, ", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "icd_10": "C83.3", "meddra": "10069643"}, {"name": "B-Zell-Lymphom, kleinzelliges", "sub_name": "B-Zell-Leuk\u00e4mie, chronische lymphatische", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "B-cell chronic lymphocytic leukemia (B-CLL) is a type of B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma (see this term), and the most common form of leukemia in Western countries, affecting elderly adults (mean age of 67 and 72 years) with a slight male predominance (1.7:1), and characterized by a highly variable clinical presentation that can include asymptomatic disease or non-specific B-symptoms such as unintentional weight loss, severe fatigue, fever (without evidence of infection), and night sweats as well as cervical lymphadenopathy, splenomegaly and frequent infections. Some patients can also develop autoimmune complications such as autoimmune hemolytic anemia or immune thrombocytopenia (see these terms). The clinical course is extremely heterogeneous with survival ranging from a few months to several decades.", "synonyms": "B-CLL, B-cell chronic lymphoid leukemia, Small lymphocytic lymphoma, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Multigenic/multifactorial\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "C91.1", "omim": "109543\u00a0 151400\u00a0 609630\u00a0 612557\u00a0 612558\u00a0 612559", "umls": "C0023434\u00a0 C0855095\u00a0 C1868683", "mesh": "D015451", "gard": "8227", "meddra": "10008958"}, {"name": "B-Zell Lymphozytose, persistente polyklonale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die persistierende polyklonale B-Zell-Lymphozytose (PPBL) ist eine seltene, im Allgemeinen gutartige, lymphoproliferative h\u00e4matologische Erkrankung, die gekennzeichnet ist durch eine chronische, stabile, persistierende, polyklonale Lymphozytose der B-Ged\u00e4chtniszellen, das Vorhandensein von zweikernigen Lymphozyten im peripheren Blut und einen polyklonalen Anstieg des Serum-Immunglobulin M (IgM). Die Patienten sind meist asymptomatisch oder k\u00f6nnen sich mit einer leichten Splenomegalie pr\u00e4sentieren.", "synonyms": "PPBL, Persistente polyklonale B-Zell Lymphozytose mit binukle\u00e4ren Lymphozyten, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Keine Daten verf\u00fcgbar", "ICD-10": "D72.8", "OMIM": "606445", "UMLS": "C1847973"}, {"name": "B-Zell-NHL", "sub_name": "B-Zell-Non-Hodgkin-Lymphom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "B-Zell-NHL, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "B-Zell-Non-Hodgkin-Lymphom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "B-Zell-NHL, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "B-Zell-Non-Hodgkin-Lymphom, aggressives", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Aggressives B-Zell NHL, ", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "B-Zell-Non-Hodgkin-Lymphom, indolentes", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Indolentes B-Zell NHL, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "B-Zell-Prolymphozytenleuk\u00e4mie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare mature B-cell neoplasm characterized by clonal proliferation of B-cell prolymphocytes, with prolymphocytes constituting more than 55% of lymphoid cells in peripheral blood. IG genes are clonally rearranged. Neoplastic cells are present in the bone marrow, peripheral blood, and spleen. Patients usually present with B symptoms, massive splenomegaly but absent or minimal lymphadenopathy, rapidly increasing lymphocyte count, anemia, and thrombocytopenia. Therapy response is poor.", "synonyms": "B-PLL, ", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "C91.3", "umls": "C0475801", "mesh": "D054403", "gard": "8223"}]